2005
二氧化碳减排已经成为缓解全球气候变化的一个重要议题.目前,火电厂排放的CO2约占中国CO2排放量的1/3左右,减少其CO2排放可以通过提高能量转化效率和回收封存CO2两种主要方式.常规锅炉汽机电厂、IGCC以及煤气化-固体氧化物燃料电池(SOFC)混合循环分别代表了现在、近期及未来燃煤电厂的典型配置,超临界及超超临界电厂效率可以达到40%以上,采用GEH型等先进燃气轮机的IGCC可提高到50%以上,而混合循环电厂的效率则有望达到60%以上.利用Aspen PlusTM对这三种电厂进行了模拟,考察了三者在回收CO2前后性能的变化.在此基础上,分析了减排CO2及征收排放税等措施对各电厂发电成本的影响,进而就未来如何促进电厂减排CO2进行了探讨.@对大雁、协庄和昔阳3个不同煤化程度的煤样,在N2,CO2和水蒸气3种不同气氛及不同温度下进行了热解研究,考察了煤化程度、热解气氛和热解温度对煤热解产物产率和热解气性质的影响规律.研究表明,对上述3个煤样,随煤化程度加深,焦产率增加,油和气产率一般随煤中挥发分增加而增加,但又与煤的大分子结构、热解温度和加热速率等有密切关系;干馏气组成H2和CH4含量协庄煤样最高,而(CO+CO2)含量因煤中氧含量的降低而下降.与N2气氛相比,CO2和水蒸气气氛中半焦产率下降,气产率增加;油产率水蒸气气氛下最高.H2组分含量在水蒸气气氛下最高,而CO,CH4和烃类C2～C5组分则最低.LHV在N2,CO2和水蒸气气氛下逐次降低.@为了实现煤的洁净转化,研究煤热解过程中N转移的机理,实验在固定床反应器上采用程序升温法对碳含量不同的三种煤样进行了氩、甲烷、15%水蒸气/氩和15%水蒸气/甲烷气氛下的煤加氢热解研究,主要对热解过程中产生的NOx主要前驱物NH3的释放规律及其影响因素进行了考察.实验表明,由于水蒸气、甲烷提供了活性含H集团,促进了热解过程中NH3的生成;另外,甲烷和水蒸气之间的协同作用,可以提供更多的活性含H集团.煤特性、反应温度和反应时间是影响NH3生成和半焦产率的主要因素.@使用美国Perkin Elmer公司生产的Pyris1TGA热重分析仪,对不同粒径煤采用非等温热重法进行了实验研究,研究表明:煤热解过程可分为四个阶段,升温速率和粒径对煤热解曲线都有显著影响,并用挥发分释放特性指数反映煤热解特性,最后用热解动力学方程研究煤的热解过程,计算结果表明,热解动力学参数能很好地反映煤的热解状况.@对云南小龙潭煤、河南义马煤、山西平朔煤及山西常村煤的镜质组及平朔煤的惰质组、壳质组的结构特性进行了考察. 煤岩显微组分采用手选和等密度法分离的方法,结构特性采用红外光谱仪、X射线衍射仪及电子扫描显微镜进行分析. 结果表明,不同煤的镜质组结构与原煤的变质程度有关;低阶煤的镜质组含脂肪氢较多,高阶煤镜质组含芳香氢较多;低阶煤镜质组的芳香微晶结构单元较小,镜质组的结构基本代表了原煤的结构特征.平朔煤三种显微组分的结构有很大不同,壳质组较其他两种组分含有较多的脂肪氢,惰质组的芳香微晶结构单元较大.@年轻煤是煤液化的良好原料,但它的氧含量高增加了煤液化过程中无用的氢耗,对这些煤进行脱氧改质有重要的意义.选择了四种年轻煤——霍林河、小龙潭、义马和神华煤在高压釜内水蒸气气氛下进行了脱氧改质的研究.结果表明,处理后煤样的氧含量和含氧官能团降低显著,氧的脱除率最高达到了20.7%.此外,煤质还有一些其他的变化,如热值和碳含量有所提高,最高内在水分和挥发分降低,表明煤阶有所提高.对煤中的总酸性基、羧基和酚羟基的化学分析显示,脱氧改质后煤样的羧基、酚羟基等含氧官能团明显降低, 羧基和酚羟基的最高脱除率分别达到了78.5%和31.3%,达到了脱氧改质的目的.@气化炉是煤气化技术中的关键设备.气化炉内火焰燃烧稳定性下降,会出现燃烧噪音增加、气化燃烧效率降低及熄火等现象,对安全性和经济性产生严重的影响.对气流床气化炉内不同气化燃烧状态下的火焰压力信号进行了小波分析.结果表明,压力信号在一定频段内的分布与气化炉内火焰燃烧的状态密切相关,发现随着火焰燃烧稳定性加强,气化炉内压力信号向高频方向移动,以此可以建立气流床气化炉燃烧诊断模型.@将分形理论的概念应用到煤焦气化研究中.煤焦气化过程孔结构参数间的变化规律符合一定的分形关系,气化速率越大,分形维数也越大,但是分形理论并不适用于所有煤焦气化过程研究,只有那些孔容积绝大部分由中小孔构成的煤焦才符合分形规律.@用一个石英玻璃管反应器考察了700 ℃～1 300 ℃下,半焦对甲烷的水蒸气和二氧化碳重整制备合成气的影响.实验发现,半焦的存在明显提高甲烷的转化率,降低甲烷的开始转化温度.通过对反应前后C原子和H原子的物料恒算,可以得出半焦的重量在甲烷的二氧化碳重整反应过程中几乎没有变化,半焦对重整反应的作用类似于“催化”过程.@研究了晋城和潞安煤在高压下对纯CH4,CO2及其二元混合气体的吸附特性,在对混合气体绝对吸附量计算公式推导的基础上,对绝对吸附等温线进行了研究.结果表明:高压下煤对混合气体的吸附介于纯CH4和CO2之间,Gibbs吸附等温线和绝对吸附等温线表现出较大的差异;煤对混合气体中CH4和CO2的吸附呈现出不同的吸附特点;煤对CO2优先吸附,并且随着压力的升高,煤对CO2选择性吸附能力增加.本研究结果对开展注烟道气提高煤层采收率和煤层埋藏CO2具有一定的指导作用.@在热解反应器的上部设置混合段,在混合段内安装几层特制的挡板,固体热载体与煤颗粒在进入热解反应器之前先进入混合段,在挡板的作用下依靠重力进行快速分散、混合,然后落入反应器内进行热解反应. 实验在1 kg煤～10 kg热载体的间歇粉煤快速热解反应装置上进行,并与用螺旋搅拌桨进行搅拌混合的热解实验结果进行了比较.结果表明,在混合段内设置几层挡板是一种非常有效的混合方式,可以被用于炉前低温干馏过程.@为充分利用煤泥资源,在其中添加助燃催化剂,以期提高它的燃烧热效率. 对比研究了硝酸钾催化剂及TF配方助燃催化剂对兖州煤泥着火温度、燃尽温度和放热面积的影响.研究结果表明,添加催化剂后,煤泥着火温度降低,燃尽温度提前,且燃烧放热量增加;TF配方催化剂对煤泥催化燃烧的效果优于硝酸钾催化剂.探讨了助燃催化剂对煤催化燃烧的作用机理.@在固定床装置上研究了Fe-Ca基脱硫剂在含氧、含水蒸气以及含氧-水蒸气混合气氛中的初次再生行为,考察了再生温度对再生行为的影响. 结果表明,在含氧气氛中再生时,随着再生温度的提高,再生率下降;在含水蒸气气氛中再生时,温度提高,再生率增大,与含氧气氛再生时相比,后者的再生时间较长;而在含氧-水蒸气的混合气氛中再生时,适当的低温和较高的H2O/O2比值则有利于提高单质硫的选择性.@研究了磷酸一步炭活化云南先锋褐煤的炭活化动力学.结果表明,用活化剂磷酸和助剂浸渍褐煤后,可加速炭活化进程,使褐煤中氢和氧主要以水和低分子量的醇醛形式脱除,炭活化反应速度对活化过程的相对挥发分为一级,并且用磷酸浸渍褐煤可提高炭活化速度常数60%.@选用大同烟煤和高温煤沥青为原料,采用压块成型法制造煤质颗粒活性炭.当制备过程的其他工艺条件相同时,氧化预处理可使最终活性炭制品的水容量、碘吸附值、亚甲蓝吸附值和四氯化碳吸附率分别提高27%～34%,134 mg /g ,86 mg /g～96 mg /g和9%～13.5%(绝对算术差值);当控制最终制品的性能为水容量106%～119%,碘吸附值>1 050 mg /g,亚甲蓝吸附值>225 mg /g,四氯化碳吸附率67%～75%时,氧化预处理可使活化工序的产品得率提高10%以上.不论对制品的吸附性能还是对产品的收率,氧化预处理都是绝对有利的.@在热聚合反应釜中,研究了煤沥青中甲苯不溶物、喹啉不溶物、β树脂、软化点及结焦值等质量指标在热聚合改质过程中的变化规律. 实验结果表明,在热聚合过程中,煤沥青中甲苯不溶物、喹啉不溶物、软化点及结焦值等指标均随聚合温度升高和聚合时间延长都有变化性增加,而β树脂在实验条件下,开始随聚合温度升高和聚合时间延长,到一定值后,再提高温度,或延长时间则下降,存在一极大值区间,该结果得到重复性实验的确认.结果显示,改质沥青的主要质量指标波动范围很小,可为今后的放大实验或工业生产提供重要依据.@在D115 mm×1 000 mm有机玻璃制成的圆柱型流化床中,对玉米秆、稻秆、煤及其混合物的流化特性进行了实验研究. 实验结果表明,单一生物质颗粒不能形成良好的流化状态,而加入一定量煤构成生物质和煤二组分混合颗粒可以实现稳定流化. 当生物质和煤混合颗粒中生物质的质量分率小于50%时,可以达到很好的流化状态,生物质和煤二组分混合颗粒的最小流化速度随生物质质量分率的增加而减小.@以对甲基苯甲醛(4-methy l benzaldehyde,简称4-MB)为改性剂,在对甲苯磺酸(PTS)的作用下对煤沥青进行了改性研究.采用傅立叶红外光谱(FT-IR)和核磁共振氢谱(1 HNMR)对煤沥青改性机理进行分析;采用扫描电镜(SEM)观察改性后煤沥青的形貌;采用光学显微镜观察改性沥青热解产物的光学结构.结果表明,对甲基苯甲醛在酸性催化剂的催化作用下与煤沥青发生亲电取代反应,改性后煤沥青出现纤维结构,改性沥青热解产物的光学组织结构为较好的广域(D)结构.因此,改性后的煤沥青有望作为优质的炭材料基体前驱体.@煤基聚苯胺复合导电材料是利用煤的酸性官能团特征、孔结构特征和芳香层片特征,以煤为模板,用APS引发苯胺单体,在煤中原位聚合而成的.其中煤的孔结构是影响煤/PAN导电性能的重要因素.选择HNO3,H2O2氧化及苯胺抽提的方法改变煤的孔结构; 通过电导率及孔结构分析表明,氧化和抽提使煤的孔结构变得发达,因而苯胺能更好地进入已溶胀煤的孔结构中,提高了煤基聚苯胺的电导率.@将反应体系的温度升高到升华点以上,是提高等离子体裂解煤制乙炔收率的必由之路. 采用最小自由能方法研究了煤的C-H-O热力学平衡体系,在此基础上提出了一种以煤层气甲烷为冷却剂的等离子体裂解煤制乙炔方案,初始反应体系的温度在4 000 K以上.理论的计算和分析结果表明,这种方案可获得较高的乙炔收率,而单位质量乙炔的比能耗很低,具有很好的经济效益和环境效益.@分别用二硫化碳(CS2)/四氢呋喃(体积比1∶2)混合溶剂和环己酮对义马煤和美国Pocaho ntas No.3(P3)标准煤样进行了彻底萃取,在60℃下用30% 双氧水溶液分别氧化了所得的两种萃余煤,用GC /MS对反应混合物中的水溶液的苯可溶物和水不溶物的CS2可溶物进行了分析.结果表明:在所得水溶液的苯可溶物中都检测出苯酚; 在由义马萃余煤氧化所得的水不溶物的CS2可溶物中检测出多种含氧有机化合物和长链烷烃,而在P3萃余煤氧化所得的水不溶物的CS2可溶物中只检测到一系列长链烷烃.@通过对二甲醚合成过程包含的三个独立反应- CO+H2合成甲醇反应( MSR) ,甲醇脱水反应( MDR)和水煤气变换反应(WGSR)依次组合而成的三个反应体系——M SR, MSR+MDR和MSR+ MDR+ WGSR的研究,在较宽范围内研究了合成气组成、温度和压力对二甲醚合成过程的影响; 详细阐述了在反应之间产生的协同效应的优点和不足,为二甲醚的动力学研究提供理论指导.@Fischer-Tropsch( F-T)合成是将煤炭、天然气和生物质等含碳资源间接转化为液体燃料的关键工艺步骤,深入了解其反应机理,对于完善F-T合成催化剂设计以及优化其工业操作条件具有重要的理论价值.对近年来有关F-T合成中关键的CO活化机理研究进行了总结和评述,着重介绍了不同过渡金属元素对CO的吸附和活化性质,并就金属晶面与CO的相互作用、催化助剂的影响以及F-T合成反应中与H2 的共吸附作用等方面进行分析,为进一步的研究工作提供理论参考.@征收碳税、强化石油开采以及开放二氧化碳减排贸易等措施可以促进发电行业减排CO2.但是这些措施,尤其是碳税和减排贸易,可能需要较长的时间才能在中国施行.因此,必须考虑在这段时期内如何改善减排CO2的IGCC和煤气化固体氧化物燃料电池(SO FC)混合循环的经济性,进而促进IGCC和混合循环的发展.以煤气化氢电联产系统作为尝试,设计、模拟了四种不同的联产方案,通过对各方案的投资、发电和制氢成本的分析,就氢电联产能否及如何改善经济性、如何从能量利用和成本两方面配置联产系统、以及实施碳税等措施前后如何促进发电厂减排CO2等方面进行了探讨.@论述了在使用不同催化剂和不同还原剂的条件下,选择性催化还原(SCR)脱除电站烟气中氮氧化物的基本原理. SCR催化剂有三种不同的类型: 贵金属型、金属氧化物型和离子交换的沸石分子筛型,并讨论了三种不同催化剂在SCR反应过程中的活性特征.论述了在国外应用最广泛的V2O5-WO3-MoO3/TiO2类催化剂的成分组成以及各成分在反应过程中的作用.列举了在SCR催化剂的生产和使用过程中需要考虑和解决的主要问题.@研究了不同温度(40 ℃～120 ℃)下神华煤在有机溶剂N,N-二甲基甲酰胺、四氢萘和循环油中的溶胀动力学.结果表明: 随温度升高,神华煤在有机溶剂中的溶胀速率在增大,但在极性溶剂N, N-二甲基甲酰胺中的溶胀速率远大于在非极性溶剂四氢萘中的溶胀速率;神华煤的溶胀行为符合一级反应动力学方程; 神华煤在三种溶剂中的活化能均小于10 kJ/mol,表明在溶胀过程中,其速度由溶剂分子在煤中的扩散所控制.@研究了童亭亮煤和洼里亮煤在CS2-NMP混合溶剂中的可溶性,重点考察了原煤,萃取物,萃余物在工业分析、真密度和黏结指数方面的联系; 同时运用红外光谱( FTIR)现代分析技术对原煤及其萃取物和萃余物的组成和结构特征进行了对比分析,在此基础上提出了煤中主要存在两种组分即“致黏组分”和“不黏组分”的概念,并据此对胶质体液相的来源作了初步解释.最后得出了萃取物中主要是煤中富含脂肪族和酚, 醇, 醚结构的组分, 而萃余物中主要是富含缩合芳环的组分.@采用密度泛函( DFT)方法,在UB3LYP /6- 31G( d)水平上研究了煤中噻吩型有机硫的热解机理.对热解过程中由于官能团周围环境的不同而形成的二类噻吩自由基进行了量子化学计算,通过对键的Mulliken布居数等计算结果的分析,得到了二类自由基的热解途径.计算结果表明,CS键是热解引发键,热解产物最终为乙炔,含硫部分则较易于与氢自由基结合,以H2S的形式逸出.@采用管式炉固定床反应器,考察了平朔煤( PS)、神木煤( SM)和阳城煤( YC)三种不同变质程度的煤种在热解过程中的HCN 和N H3 释放规律,主要讨论煤中所固有的矿物质在这一过程中对氮分配的影响.结果表明: 不同变质程度的煤种脱除矿物质后,均表现为热解过程中的NH3释放量减少,其减少程度与灰分的性质有关; 而HCN 的释放与煤中矿物质的关系却受煤变质程度的影响; 同时矿物质对不同形态氮的分配也有明显的作用.@褐煤及生物质均具有隔绝空气受热时化学结构发生裂解的特性. 经过热裂解可得到半焦、焦油和煤气等三种形态的物质.对于一定的煤及生物质来说,三种形态产物的产率将因热解条件不同而有差异. 研究选取了龙口褐煤,选取了木屑和核桃壳两种生物质,在一定的条件下进行低温热解. 考察了生物质热解及生物质与褐煤共热解时,三种形态产物产率的差异.考察了低温热解所得半焦直接作为吸附剂使用的性能.吸附实验结果表明,不经任何处理的低温热解半焦吸附亚甲基蓝的单位吸附量可以达到7.3 mg /g.@用14种不同变质程度的煤与10种分散剂成浆,研究了不同CWS的静态稳定性.结果表明,低阶的煤成浆稳定性主要取决于煤质特性,且煤的亲水性越强, CWS的稳定性越好.而高阶煤的成浆稳定性,主要依赖于分散剂的结构特征.分散剂对CWS稳定性的影响,主要取决于吸附在煤粒表面的分散剂间所产生的直接或间接的相互作用,当这种相互作用能使煤粒间在静态时形成大的三维网络结构时,则CWS具有很好的稳定性.建立了用流变曲线参数表示的CWS稳定系数模型,可用于描述不同流变特性CWS的静态稳定性.@研究了木质素磺酸钠(简称木钠)对水煤浆流变行为的影响,包括木钠的浓度和分子量、浆体温度、pH值及木钠与N DF在预剪切条件下的流变性能. 结果表明: 木钠的添加量超过煤重的0.8%时,煤浆表观黏度随添加剂的增加而增加. 不同分子量的木钠对煤浆的流动性会有不同的影响.分子量在10 000～50 000级分对流变性较为有利.煤浆的温度低于60℃时,煤浆的黏度会不断减少; 超过60 ℃时,黏度会有增加.煤浆溶液在弱酸和弱碱条件下, pH值为9时可使黏度较低.木钠在上述不同的条件下均有较为理想的假塑性.在预剪切实验中,随着预剪切时间的增加煤浆黏度会不断增加.@对几种不同变质程度的煤采用低温热改质,使煤表面的性质发生变化,从而影响煤的成浆性. 研究发现,在200℃～300℃温度范围内,热改质煤表面产生显著的收缩作用,活性含氧官能团的分解使煤表面疏水化作用显著增强,从而使煤的最高内在含水量降低.上述煤表面性质的变化是该温度范围内热改质煤成浆性得以大幅度提高的主要原因.变质程度越低的煤,成浆性变化越大. 200℃～300℃是热改质煤煤浆性质发生剧烈变化的温度区, 300℃是浆体性质发生转变的转折点.@应用仪器中子活化( IN AA)、电感耦合等离子体原子发射光谱( ICP-AES)和原子吸收光谱( AAS)对我国西北部五个电厂原煤、底灰和飞灰中环境敏感性痕量元素的含量进行了系统测定,通过不同电厂原煤与燃烧产物中痕量元素的含量变化特征,揭示了痕量元素在不同燃烧产物中的相对富集规律.以痕量元素在不同燃烧产物中的相对富集系数为评价标准,建立了燃烧产物中痕量元素的分配模型. 结合痕量元素的原始赋存状态,总结了痕量元素燃烧的迁移富集机理和环境效应.@用超声波和微波辐射法在氧化反应体系下,对晋源煤进行了脱砷的研究,主要考察了煤浆浓度、煤的粒径、处理时间、氧化剂的浓度、超声波功率以及溶液酸度等因素的影响. 实验结果表明: 超声波和微波结合氧化剂可得到较好的脱砷效果,砷的脱除最高可达90% 以上.在各影响因素中,煤浆浓度越低、氧化剂的浓度越高、酸度越大和超声波的功率越大,脱砷的效果越好.@在对栲胶法脱硫工艺操作条件探讨的过程中,考察了碱液浓度(简称碱度)、栲胶浓度、钒浓度和温度对它的影响(主要考虑脱硫效率) ,获得了各因素影响脱硫效率的一般规律和适宜的操作条件,并得出碱度是影响其脱硫效率的主要因素,总碱度控制在12 g /L以下比较适宜; 栲胶和钒在脱硫过程中只起催化作用,且得到二者比例满足1.5～2时,脱硫效果最佳;温度对脱硫效率的影响主要是在较高温度下会促进副产物Na2 S2O3的生成,所以脱硫反应器中的温度不能太高,经实验证明,一般控制在30℃～40℃.@利用热重法研究污泥与煤粉的混合燃烧,并用Matlab分析计算污泥与煤粉按不同比例混合燃烧时的活化能E 与指前因子A ,并对燃烧过程及特性略加分析.通过研究分析,发现活化能和指前因子跟污泥与煤粉按不同比例混合的燃烧特性有着密切的关系,可通过活化能和指前因子来判断混合的燃烧状况,为今后进一步研究和应用打基础.@比较了11种氧化物以添加和吸附两种方式负载到同种焦炭中对焦炭溶损反应作用的区别,并从催化作用、矿物质在焦炭中的分散方式和矿物质对焦炭显微结构作用三方面分析了导致作用不同的机理.同种矿物质无论以何种方式负载对炭的催化作用是相同的.吸附矿物质主要是均匀分散在焦炭表面,而添加矿物质则部分被炭基质包裹,两种方式提供的催化表面是不同的,添加到煤中的矿物质还可以通过对焦炭结构产生影响而导致对焦炭反应性的作用.@高温模压工艺是由模压成型工艺演绎而来的一种快速成型技术,但在制备沥青基炭复合材料时,该工艺明显存在着装备投资大、模压压力低和工艺实用性差的不足. 为此,提出了一种新型的沥青基炭复合材料的制备工艺,即模压半炭化成型工艺(简称MSCT工艺) .为了验证MSCT工艺的突出优点,分别利用MSCT工艺和模压工艺制备了沥青基炭复合材料,并就其组织结构、体积密度和力学性能进行了研究. 结果表明: MSCT工艺制备的沥青基炭复合材料的微观组织比模压工艺制备的要致密的多,从而使前者的体积密度(1.77 g /cm3)和抗压强度(32.5 MPa)分别比后者提高了28 3%和144.4%.@以四氯化钛为原料,采用溶胶-凝胶法制备出二氧化钛粉体,将其用于焦化废水的光催化氧化.当热处理温度为600℃时,得到的二氧化钛混合晶体平均粒径为65 nm,其中金红石相占21.3%,实验研究表明,该混合晶体对焦化废水的处理效果最佳. 用该混合晶体处理焦化废水的最佳工艺为:每100 mL废水中加入0.4 g纳米二氧化钛混合晶体,在阳光下照射4 h, CODcr值去除率可达50%以上.@以电厂的废弃物粉煤灰为原料,研究了368 K温度范围内,粉煤灰在水热体系中自转变合成了纯度和结晶度均较高的粉煤灰基吸附剂的过程,并对其吸附性能作了初步研究.用氮吸附静态容量法,测得该粉煤灰基吸附剂的氮吸附等温线、比表面和孔分布曲线.通过粉煤灰基吸附剂对苯酚的吸附实验,给出粉煤灰基吸附剂对它的吸附等温线,并指出合理的吸附温度,大的比表面和适当的膜化工艺对提高粉煤灰基吸附剂的吸附量都是有效的.@加入适量的引发剂,通过无皂乳液聚合,以聚甲基丙烯酸甲酯( PMMA)核体为种子乳液,制备了PMMA /PAN 核-壳乳液. 实验中分别对引发剂量、丙稀腈( AN )滴加量对PMMA /PAN 壳层厚度及其粒径和粒径分布的影响进行了较详细的研究, 确定了种子乳液聚合法制备PMMA /PAN核-壳结构聚合物粒子的实验方法及条件. 通过激光粒度仪、扫描电镜和透射电镜对核-壳粒子的形态结构进行了表征,证明了PMMA /PAN复合粒子的核-壳结构.@在总结南化大化肥现有低温甲醇洗装置实际运行状况的基础上,分析了原设计存在的欠缺以及原料结构由油调整为煤后的新工况,研究制定了扩能改造设计方案.原料改煤后,装置的设计气量将为原设计的1.18倍,原料气中CO2总量将比原设计高出30% ,硫化物含量是原设计的4.8倍.在维持设计生产规模仍为30万t/a合成氨的基础上,增设了一个预吸收塔、一个解吸塔和部分热交换器,对部分物流的走向和处理进行了重新设计.这样的改造方案可使主要物流的技术指标均与原设计相当,单位能耗不高于原设计值,不产生新的污染源,不降低装置的操作可靠性和灵活性,可实现装置对原料油改煤的顺利转换.@对6种不同变质程度煤(包括气煤、弱黏煤、肥煤、焦煤和瘦煤)常温常压下用CS2-NMP 混合溶剂进行了萃取实验. 结果表明, 挥发分(V daf )为35 %左右的煤具有最高的萃取率,达到43.05%,不同煤阶煤的萃取率与其奥压膨胀度及塑性温度区间近似呈线性关系.通过对原煤、萃取残渣和生成焦粒的红外对比分析表明, 不同变质程度煤经过萃取后, 残渣中脂肪烃和脂环烃含量有所减少, 矿物质大都在残渣中, 氢键缔合峰的强弱随不同煤种表现不同, 肥煤和气煤氢键缔合的极性键都位于煤中的大分子上, 而焦煤和弱黏煤中的极性键大都在小分子化合物上.@以大豆分离蛋白质(SPI)为改性剂, 用吸附和接枝的方法对神府煤及神府氧化煤进行了表面改性和生物降解研究. 用FTIR 对接枝改性煤进行了表征. 用从土壤中分离的混合微生物菌种, 对煤及SPI 改性煤和氧化煤进行了好氧生物降解实验. 以生物降解产生的CO2产率、试样的最终失重率、降解残煤的FTIR 分析、腐植酸含量测定和降解残液的UV-VIS光谱表征了生物降解效果. 结果表明, SPI 改性对煤和氧化煤的微生物降解有促进作用, 尤其是对氧化煤促进作用更明显.接枝改性的促进作用比吸附改性强, 并且, 由于接枝改性和吸附改性中SPI 与煤的界面相互作用不同, 从而导致他们具有不同的生物降解机理.@采用多元统计方法对煤质特性与可磨性HGI 的相关性进行了研究.结果表明, 水分和挥发分越高, HGI 越低;灰分和固定碳含量越高,HGI 越高.但HGI 与煤质特性存在明显的非线性.国外文献提供的非线性预测方程不适合我国煤种.仅从煤的工业分析等化学组分出发,将其看作一种均匀的物质, 不能科学地反映煤的可磨性.煤的显微组分、矿物质类型、颗粒大小和分布以及煤种的显微构造等物理参数是决定煤可磨性能的重要因素.@以“中国煤种资源数据库”为基础,结合新采集煤样,对中国不同煤田2 237个煤层煤样的硫含量数据进行了统计分析, 分不同时代、不同地域和不同煤种讨论了中国煤中硫的分布特征, 并总结了煤中硫的分布规律. 认为中国煤中硫的含量分布与成煤时代、聚煤地区密切相关. 引入“储量权重”概念, 按聚煤区储量加权计算, 中国煤中平均硫含量为1.02%,该数值比算术平均值(1.40%)更能准确地反映中国煤中硫的含量分布.@在化学热力学和动力学理论中引入表面项, 并由此来分析和讨论粒度对煤颗粒燃烧和热解反应的影响规律.研究结果表明, 煤颗粒的粒度对其燃烧和热解反应的热力学性质和动力学参数有明显的影响, 粒度越小, 影响越大;减小煤颗粒的粒径, 化学反应的吉布斯函数差减小, 煤颗粒燃烧和热解的趋势增大, 使着火温度和热解温度降低, 自燃容易发生;并且减小煤颗粒的粒径, 其摩尔表面能增大, 导致其燃烧和热解的表观活化能降低和速率常数增大, 使煤颗粒的燃烧和热解速率加快, 使转化率、燃尽度和热解度增加.@对山西两种高灰熔点煤添加不同比例的CaO和Fe2O3助熔剂后的熔融特性及其在高温下的矿物质行为进行了实验研究, 用X 射线衍射观察分析了不同温度下的煤灰矿物组成变化. 结果表明, 在弱还原性气氛下, 两种助熔剂均可有效降低煤灰熔点, 但不同的助熔剂对不同煤灰熔点降低的效果不同. 当在煤灰中添加适量助熔剂时, 煤灰熔点可达到最低, 这是由于煤中矿物质在高温下与CaO,Fe2O3发生反应, 最终形成低熔点共熔物, 从而使得煤灰熔点下降.@采用热重分析仪(TGA)对250 ℃～500 ℃温度下NO2 影响干法脱硫反应开展了等温动力学分析. 分析结果表明, 在250 ℃～500 ℃的中低温范围内, 烟气中的二氧化氮(NO2)促进了干法脱硫反应的进行, 改善了脱硫反应产物的品质, 生成了CaSO4 . NO2 的存在可能改变了脱硫所遵循的反应动力学模式:模拟烟气中无NO2存在时, 干法脱硫反应遵循收缩核模型;而加入NO2后, 变为Avrami-Erof fev 核生成与增长模型.@在氧化物系列高温固硫剂和碳酸盐系列高温固硫剂研究的基础上, 利用TG-FTIR 联用技术和ZCL 自动定硫仪, 把一定量的分析煤样与氧化物系列高温固硫剂和碳酸盐系列高温固硫剂分别以3 ∶1 的Ca /S 比充分混和, 对燃煤的实际固硫效果进行了定性和定量检测. 结果表明, 两种系列固硫剂均使CaSO4 高温分解推迟到1 200 ℃以后, SrCO3 在高温时的固硫率高达96.7 %, 而BaCO3也达92.2 %.@采用微生物预处理-浮选联合工艺流程, 利用红假单胞菌对高硫煤进行微生物-浮选脱硫实验, 重点考察了预处理时间、矿浆浓度、pH 值和细菌浓度等因素对浮选脱硫效果的影响. 研究结果表明, 微生物-浮选脱硫是一种高效的脱硫方法, 红假单胞菌是一种有效的浮选脱硫菌种, 其预处理时间、体系的pH 值、矿浆浓度和细菌浓度等因素对脱硫效果有着显著的影响.@以石灰石悬浮液为吸收剂, 在气液撞击流洗涤器内进行了烟气脱硫实验,着重研究了液气比、循环浆液的pH 值、进气SO2浓度和吸收剂质量浓度对脱硫效率的影响,分析了各因素对脱硫效率产生影响的原因. 实验结果表明,在浆液pH值大于6.1,进气SO2浓度小于1 657 mg /m3的条件下, 较低的液气比L/G 和较低的吸收剂浓度就能达到95 %以上的脱硫效率, 增大液气比L/G 和吸收剂浓度, 脱硫效率可达99 %以上. 本实验结果在单喷头中试装置上得到了进一步的验证.@采用了气液鼓泡床反应器, 以N aOH 溶液为吸收液, 在模拟烟气条件下对氮氧化物在湿法烟气脱硫过程中的作用进行了实验研究. 结果表明, 在吸收液为碱性的环境下,NO2的存在对脱硫率略有促进,SO2的存在则可显著增加脱硝率;在吸收液变乏且已呈酸性的环境下,NO2和SO2互相抑制彼此的脱除率;无论酸碱环境,NO和SO2对彼此脱除率的影响都很微弱.NO和NO2的存在对脱硫产物影响显著,NO2的存在促进了脱硫产物中硫酸盐的生成,碱性环境下尤其显著,而NO的存在抑制了脱硫产物中硫酸盐的生成.@为寻找烟道气中SO2的微生物转化方法, 采用郑州市热电厂烟囱周围被烟气污染的土样作菌种, 对脱硫细菌的筛选、培养和脱硫能力进行了探索性研究. 分别采用液相驯化和气相驯化方法从土样中筛选培养出5 种烟气脱硫细菌, 并对这5 种细菌进行了脱硫能力的测定和正交实验. 结果表明, 所选烟气脱硫细菌对二氧化硫的脱硫率达80 %以上, 并通过正交实验, 初步得出了影响细菌脱除SO2 的因素次序为:pH 值>温度>SO2 浓度.@黄姜皂素纤维渣是黄姜酸水解提取部分皂素后的残余物, 不经处理的纤维渣任意堆置带来了严重的固体废物污染. 根据固体废物资源化的原则, 采用化学活化剂(ZnCl2)两段法, 使纤维渣资源化生产活性炭, 确定了制备活性炭的最佳制备工艺条件:炭化温度300 ℃, 炭化时间40min , 活化温度600 ℃, 活化时间1. 5 h , 料液比1 ∶4 , 浸渍时间12 h , ZnCl2 溶液浓度40 %. 借助S EM ,XRD 和N2吸附实验等手段, 对其结构与性能进行了表征, 并运用于黄姜皂素废水的吸附实验, 发现其脱色性能及去除有机物效果优于商业活性炭. 因此, 利用黄姜皂素纤维渣制备活性炭, 不仅解决了其产生的固体废物污染, 同时使其成为一种有效价廉优质的吸附剂.@以木质素与煤粉混合物为原料,KOH 为活化剂, 在活化温度为800 ℃, 升温速度为5@在以高硫低阶煤为原料, 采用硝酸钾预氧化后加KOH 化学活化的工艺制备活性炭的小试研究基础上, 进行了高硫煤基活性炭的批量反应器设计和批量制备实验. 原料煤样批处理量1. 5 kg ～2. 5 kg , 在碱炭比为2. 0 ∶1 , 活化温度850 ℃, 活化时间2. 0 h 的条件下, 经酸洗后制备的活性炭苯酚吸附量达233. 34 mg /g , 碘吸附量达1 405. 00 mg /g.@研究了由煤矸石制备活性炭-沸石分子筛复合材料的方法. 首先在高温氮气气氛中活化由K2CO3浸渍过的煤矸石, 使其中的碳质转化为活性炭, 然后将其置于NaOH 溶液中, 使其@进行了对甲基苯甲醛(PMB)改性煤沥青的中间相转化行为的研究. 采用FT-IR 和元素分析研究改性煤沥青的热解过程;采用偏光显微镜研究PMB 改性煤沥青的光学结构. 研究表明, 改性沥青含有大量的甲基和亚甲基, 随热解温度的升高, 改性沥青中的甲基和亚甲基特征峰的吸收强度逐渐减弱,C /H 原子比增加, 芳构化程度提高;此外, 改性煤沥青的光学结构为广域(D)组织.@利用浸渍法和共沉淀法合成Cu /Co /TiO2甲醇合成催化剂, 选取γ-Al2O3,磷酸改性@简述了原煤性质与温度、压力和热解气氛等热解条件对煤焦结构和气化反应活性的影响;参考该领域的国内外研究成果, 分析了热解条件影响煤焦气化反应活性的机理.由于实验设备和研究方法的差异, 对温度和压力等热解条件对煤焦气化反应活性影响的评价不尽相同, 但总体来讲, 热解终温越高、停留时间越长、升温速率越快、热解压力越大, 煤焦的气化反应活性越低;热解过程中, 原煤性质的差异也会影响煤焦的结构和气化反应活性.煤焦的石墨化应该是导致煤焦气化反应活性下降的主要原因, 因此, 热解条件的改变, 特别是温度和压力的改变对煤焦石墨化进程的影响值得进一步研究.@面对巨大的一次能源消耗以及二氧化碳排放量的急剧上升, 利用各种技术来储存从集中排放源分离得到的大量的二氧化碳成为控制大气中二氧化碳浓度的关键. 介绍了几种二氧化碳的储存方法:地质储存、陆地生态系统储存、生物储存、海洋储存和矿物储存技术的基本原理及其具体应用情况. 全面概述了各种二氧化碳储存技术的国内外研究进展, 讨论了各种技术的优缺点,并提出了今后研究的重点.@洋葱状富勒烯(onio n-like fullerenes :O LFs)可通过各种高含碳物质(如石墨、金刚石及炭黑等)、甲烷、乙炔等有机化合物和碳化硅等含碳的无机化合物的转化来制备. 根据不同的碳源, 按不同的制备方法介绍了洋葱状富勒烯的研究现状, 着重论述了煤基洋葱状富勒烯合成的研究进展, 采用射频或微波等离子体法, 以煤为原料制备了洋葱状富勒烯, 用高分辨透射电镜(H RTEM)对其形貌、尺寸与结构进行了观察, 其外观呈准球状或多面体状, 内中空, 直径分布较均匀,石墨化程度很高, 实现了洋葱状富勒烯的低温合成, 在此基础上, 结合等离子参数和煤的化学结构,初步探讨了煤基洋葱状富勒烯的生成机理.@炭材料具有很多特性, 随着工业技术的发展, 它的地位越来越重要, 以煤为原料制备新型炭材料已经引起人们的普遍关注并具有十分乐观的发展前途.从多孔炭材料、富勒烯类炭纳米材料和锂离子电池电极三方面综述了以煤为原料制备新型炭材料的研究和应用开发的新进展, 阐述了煤作为一种廉价原料的优势, 提出了煤作为制备原料在三个方面的发展方向.@通过对全国26个省、市、自治区采集的290个煤样中全硫含量进行分析测试,从不同地质时期、不同变质程度、不同地区以及四大聚煤区等方面,系统分析和考查了中国煤中硫的分布状况.结果表明,我国煤主要以中、低硫煤为主,煤中硫分储量加权平均值为0. 94% . 高硫煤及特高硫煤来自石炭和二叠纪,其他各时期煤均属于中、低硫煤. 随着煤炭变质程度的增高,硫分有增高趋势,主要是由不同的成煤时期沉积环境影响造成.各大聚煤区煤中硫分含量差别很大,自北向南有逐渐增高趋势.@利用热天平研究了龙口褐煤在甲烷气氛下的热解失重特性.研究表明,在低于400℃时,甲烷对褐煤没有促进热解的作用. 在400℃～750℃范围内,甲烷促进了煤的热解. 750 ℃以后煤在甲烷气氛下热解的TG曲线上升,出现增重. 在固定床上进行了褐煤在天然气气氛下的热解实验,分析了热解气体中碳氢组分和硫的析出规律,发现煤热解气相产物中CH4 (甲烷)、C2 (乙烷和乙烯)、C3 (丙烷和丙烯)和C4 H10 (丁烷)都是在350℃开始析出,到550℃达到最大值, 750℃时已基本全部析出.在天然气气氛下,硫的析出量一直较在氮气气氛下多,说明甲烷能促进煤中硫向气相中迁移.@通过煤炭地下气化模型试验,对新河烟煤地下气化的一般规律进行了研究,证明其地下气化的稳定性及产出符合热值燃料气的可行性. 结果表明,富氧( 93% ) -水蒸气气化工业可以产出符合电厂要求的煤气组分及热值,但需要根据气化工作面的移动随时改变供风工艺. 研究获得了稳定产气阶段的煤气组成、热值及最佳工艺操作参数,为现场气化炉设计和工艺选择提供了基础数据. 同时还获得了煤层的气化速率及各项气化指标,为新河煤层地下气化工程的设计提供了理论依据和技术参数.@采用微型高压反应釜,在不同温度和氢初压条件下,考察了白洞煤的液化性能,并采用模拟蒸馏对液化产物油进行了分析. 结果表明,随着温度和氢初压的增加,白洞煤液化总转化率和油产率均有所提高,其中,温度对反应性影响更为显著,在7 M Pa 的氢初压下,温度由420℃升高到450℃时,总转化率和油产率分别提高20. 98% 和18. 78% .同时,随温度和氢初压增加,产物呈规律性的变化,沥青烯和前沥青烯的产率下降,水产率基本不发生变化, CO+ CO2 , C1～C4产率及氢耗率增加. 液化产物油中, 中油含量最高, 占产物油的57. 5% , 轻油和重油分别占9. 5% 和33. 0% . 产物油的烷碳含量高于芳碳含量.@通过培育微生物菌种,并作用于经硝酸处理的褐煤样,得到煤生物转化产物.用此水溶性产物作为添加剂制备出水煤浆,与加与不加常规添加剂的两种水煤浆进行黏度对比试验,考察了煤生物转化产物制备的水煤浆的流变特性.结果表明,使用煤生物转化产物作为水煤浆添加剂能制备出优质水煤浆.@研究了改性熄焦粉的表面化学特性及其对吸附阳离子性能的影响. 熄焦粉不仅具有多孔结构、吸附容量大和吸附速度快的特点,而且还具有自产廉价、无二次污染等优点.研究发现,用硝酸混有少量硫酸氧化,可显著增加熄焦粉表面酸性基团的含量,提高熄焦粉的表面亲水性,降低pHpzc值,但对熄焦粉的吸附性能影响不大,改性的熄焦粉同时具有活性炭和阳离子交换树脂双重功能. 同时还考察吸附条件对金属离子吸附的影响,为水处理提供了新的经济实用方法.@利用云南丰富的褐煤资源制备了腐植酸钠作黏结剂,并用来成型铁合金厂应用的褐煤半焦. 研究了黏结剂腐植酸钠的制备方法及褐煤半焦成型工艺,并对不同配比的型焦作了各种强度指标测试. 结果表明,腐植酸钠作为半焦成型的黏结剂具有良好的综合指标.实验研究表明: 当黏结剂腐植酸钠的配入量大于8%时,褐煤型焦的各项指标达到了铁合金厂的使用要求.@用氮气等温吸附/脱附法对石油焦燃烧过程中表面形态的变化进行了分析. 通过BET法和t-plo t法对不同燃尽率的石油焦进行了比表面积和孔容积的测定. 结果表明,石油焦燃烧过程中孔隙结构变得发达,比表面积和孔容积较原样明显增大且变化趋势基本一致. 验证了石油焦燃烧具有分形动力学的行为特征,用FHH模型求得燃烧中表面分形维数值接近3,表明燃烧反应是在空间网格结构的内、外部同时发生的; 同时发现,石油焦表面分形维数与比表面积和孔容积在变化趋势上存在明显差异.@利用固定床反应器考察了高温煤气脱硫除尘一体化净化工艺中沉积粉尘对高温煤气脱硫剂脱硫性能的影响.结果表明,表面沉积粉尘对脱硫剂初次硫化行为有明显的影响,且与脱硫剂的组成和结构有关. 利用钢厂赤泥制备的脱硫剂,含有多种惰性杂质,且具有较大的孔径结构,易于和粗煤气中的粉尘作用,造成脱硫剂硫容的减小. 硫化气氛中, H2 O的存在造成脱硫剂硫容和脱硫效率的降低,但不会影响因表面沉积粉尘造成的脱硫剂硫容的减小.多次硫化-再生循环实验表明,硫化-再生循环过程有助于减小表面沉积粉尘对脱硫剂脱硫行为的影响.经历一定次数的硫化-再生循环后,粉尘对脱硫剂脱硫行为的影响逐渐消失.@与传统脱硫方法相比,有机溶剂吸收法具有投资费用低、操作简单、效率高和可反复利用等特点,为使其尽快用于工业生产,在实验室研究的基础上,对筛选的烟气吸收剂进行了扩大实验,对液气比、气速、温度和气体组成等对脱硫效果的影响进行了探讨,并对吸收剂的再生情况进行了研究. 实验结果表明,所筛选吸收剂对二氧化硫有很强的吸收效果,对二氧化碳有很好的选择性,证明了所筛选吸收剂的可行性.@采用新汶原煤和阳泉原煤作为实验用煤,通过对几种钙基固硫剂的比较,选择使用Ca(OH)2作为主固硫剂.考察Ca/S的变化对燃煤固硫燃烧特性以及动力学参数的影响.采用T系、L系、Q系和Y系四大系列几种化学试剂作为添加剂,在确定实验温度1 000℃, Ca /S为1.5的条件下,考察其对Ca(OH)2固硫能力的影响,以及固硫反应的燃烧特性和动力学参数的变化情况.@在循环流化床实验台上,对谷壳与煤共燃的SO2生成特性进行了实验研究,着重研究了床温、过量空气系数对SO2生成特性的影响.实验表明,谷壳与煤共燃能够使煤燃烧的SO2生成量降低50%以上;加入谷壳的比例存在一个最佳范围,不超过30%;共燃时SO2的生成量随床温的升高而增加,SO2的减排率随床温的升高呈起伏变化,温度为850℃时减排率最大; 共燃时过量空气系数变化对SO2的生成量无显著影响.@为了提高焦化废水的生物降解率, 采用活性污泥作菌种, 对活性污泥的梯度驯化、优势菌的筛选和分离鉴定进行了探索性研究. 结果得到5株优势菌, 其中3株属于假单胞菌属, 另外两株分别属于硝化杆菌属和微球菌属. 对这5株的单一菌及其不同组合的混合菌进行了焦化废水降解对比实验. 结果表明, 焦化废水经优势菌处理48 h后, COD 的最高降解率为81. 1%, 氨氮为51. 2%, 初步得出: 以焦化废水作为碳氮来源的梯度驯化法用于优势菌的筛选很有效.@以煤气化为核心的多联产能源系统是资源、能源和环境一体化的系统,是我国可持续发展能源的重要组成部分. 但目前缺乏对其全面、系统、客观的评价和分析,人们对其节能机理的认识还不是十分深刻. 采用矩阵模式热经济学方法分析多联产系统,方便地得到了系统火用成本形成过程,对不同品位的能在热力系统生产流程的不同部位进行了合理的定价.如在煤价300元/ t时,得到电力成本为0. 286元/( kW·h) ,甲醇成本为926元/t. 通过比较单产系统和多联产系统各子系统的成本差和火用经济系数指标,明确了多联产系统效益的来源和今后努力的方向.@煤在气化、燃烧与活性炭制备等热化学转化过程中,均存在着孔隙结构与表面积的变化. 煤的孔隙结构变化特征的研究是煤炭高效合理利用的基础. 从煤的孔隙结构的表征、反应过程中孔隙结构变化以及孔隙结构模型三方面总结了煤的孔隙结构与反应性关系领域的研究现状,并对今后的研究重点进行了展望,即加强孔隙结构与反应性关系通用规律和催化剂对孔隙结构影响两方面的研究.@气流床煤气化是我国煤高效洁净利用的关键技术. 简要总结了气流床煤气化技术的基本特点和主要影响因素,着重介绍了具有代表性的气流床煤气化技术即水煤浆气化技术中的Texaco 法和干煤粉气化技术中的Shell法,讨论了这两种技术各自的优势及存在的问题.基于国内煤气化技术研究开发的现状和工业运行情况,阐述了我国煤气化技术未来的发展趋势.@分析了煤液化油的一些基本热力学性质: 比热、蒸汽压、气-液相平衡常数和蒸发焓等,并参考石油基本热力学性质的各种测定方法及关联式计算法,探索研究了煤液化油基本热力学性质的测定方法和关联式计算法,特别是对煤液化油比热、蒸汽压的测定、气-液相平衡常数的计算及蒸发焓的估算作了详尽的讨论.最后得出了测定煤液化油这些热力学性质的适宜方法.简要概括了煤液化油馏分临界性质参数的计算.@介绍了国内外低温F-T合成粗油品组成. 同石油原油相比, F-T合成粗油品主要由链烷烃和链烯烃组成,环烷烃和芳烃含量很少,且具有硫、氮等含量少的优点.根据合成粗油品特点,结合相关产品市场行情及国家需要,考虑到规模对经济效益的影响,来研究加工改质工艺方案的设计思路,从而提高煤基合成油经济效益,推进其工业化进程.@以碳黑为主的燃烧源可吸入颗粒物的形成与控制是关系地球环境及人类健康的重要问题.目前对该课题的研究主要集中在颗粒生成后的控制方法上,而对如何在燃烧源内部控制颗粒物的生成尚处在初步探索阶段. 介绍了电场对火焰中细颗粒控制的影响因素,对国内外研究现状进行了评述,并从生成、团聚和污染物协同控制三个方面总结了以往实验研究的成果.研究表明,在电场作用下,碳黑颗粒的质量浓度最高可减小90% ; 而在电场和催化金属的作用下,则可生成结构紧凑的碳纳米管束. 最后提出了进一步研究的重点和方向.@
CO2 emission reduction is an important countermeasure against the globalclimate change. Now , about one third of China 's CO2 emission is from coal-fired power plants.Carbon mitigation from power plant scould be realized by the combination of efficiency boost and CO2 recovery and sequest ration. Rankine cycle, IGCC using adva nced turbines such as GEHclass, and Integ rated Coal Gasification SOFC ( So lid Oxide Fuel Cell ) Hybrid represent the typical configurations of coal-fired power plants for today, near term and the future, with typicalefficiencies of over 40% , 50% and 60% respectively. This paper simulates these three powerplants with Aspen PlusTM , and examines their perfo rmances with and without CO2 recovery,based on which , the effects of CO2 mitigati n and carbon taxupon the production cost ofelectrici ty are analyzed. Also , this paper discusses how to promote the carbo nmitigation inpower industry in the future.@The pyrolysis characteristics of three different rank coals as DY, X Z and XY were studied in different temperature and at three different atmo spheres as N2, CO2 and steam. Paper research the effects of coal rank, atmosphere and temperature on the yield of pyrolysis products and the composition character of pyro lysis gas. Results show that to the above three coal samples, the yields of char take on one increase trend with the coal rank deeper; the quanti ty of tar and gas will increase generally with the enhance of coal volatility, butit be effected by coal structure, pyrolysis temperature, heating rate and so on simul taneo usly. H2 and CH4 compo nents of XZ sample have amaximum in this three samples, and ( CO+ CO2 ) components take a decreaset rend with the reduce of Oelement quantity in coal. Compared with N2 atmosphere, char decrease and gas increase at CO2 and steam tmosphere, and yield of tar is hig hest in steams'. On gas composition, H2 component has the highest yield at steam atmosphere, but CO and CH4 and hydrocarbon C2-C5 obtain the minimum atit. LHV decrease in turn at N2, CO2 and steam atmospheres.@This paper mainly di scusses the fo rmatio n and release o f NOx precursors-NH3 during coal fixed-bed pyrolysis. Three coals with different carbon content were selected in our experiments. The reaction gases were Ar, CH4 , 15% H2O /Ar and 15% H2O/CH4. The results indica te that the NH3 yield is higher in the reaction gas of steam and CH4 than that of only Ar or CH4 and this increasing trend chang es with coal types, final tempera ture and reaction time. The rease is CH4 and H2O is provided to activity Hwhich high reactivity of Hcan promo te the fo rmation of NH3. The variety of char yield obtained af ter coal py rolysis is not o bvio us in the optimal reaction conditions.@Using Pyris 1TGA produced in America Perkin Elmer Compa ny , experimental studies on different diameter coal pyrolysis were carried out by non-isothermal thermo gravimetric analysis. The studies show that the pyrolytic process of coal can be divided into four stages, the heating rate and coal diameter have important effecton pyrolysis curve, and use the release property index to represent the coal pyroly sis property. Study the coal pyrolysis process by py rolysis reactio ndynamics equation, the calcuation result show that the pyrolysis kinetics parameters can be good to reflect the pyrolysis condition.@Structure of macerals, including vitrinites from four coal samples and liptinite, inertini te from Ping shuo coal, was investiga ted in this paper. Macerals were separated from different rank coals by DGC. The concent rates of macerals were analysed by Leitz MPV -Ⅲ. The chemicalst ructure and microcrystallite were determined by FT-IR and X RD. The results indicated that the structures of vit rinites are different. There was more aliphatic hydrogen in low rank coal vitrinite( YN-Vit ) than that in high rank coal vit rinite( CC-Vi t ) whereas there was more aromatic hydrogen in CC-Vit. The d ,La , Lc indicate the crystal lite structure of CC-Vit was better than YN-Vi t. It is obvio us that vitrinite can represent the structure of raw coal. As for the effect of maceral type on the structure, it was obvio us that the structure of inertinite, vitrinite, and liptinite has at remendo us difference. There was more aliphatic hydro gen in liptinite than that in other two macerals whereas there was more aromatic hydrogen in inertinite. And the crystallite@Generally, low-rank coals are appro priate raw material of coal hydroliquefaction, but high oxygen content of lignites and apart of subbi tuminous coals results in a higher hydrogen consumption. For these coals the deoxy-modification is of sig nificance. In this paper a series of deoxy-modi fica tion ex periments for 4 selected co als- Huo linhe, Xiao long tan, Yima and Shenhua were co nducted under pressuri zed vapour condition in an auto clave. As a result , the oxyg encontent and oxygen containing functional group co ntent of all treated coals obviously decreased, the highest remov al rate of oxygen was reached 20.7% . The coal property experienced some changes-for example, the calorific value and carbon content increased, the moisture holding capacity and volatile matter decreased, show ing that the coal rank somew hat raised. By chemical analysis, the acidic-carbo xyl and phenolic groups were analyzed. The result indicated that after deoxy-modificationt reatments of low rank coals, their to talacidic oxgencontaining@The gasifier is a key equipment to the process of coal gasificatio n. If f lame stabili ty decreased, the problems of combustion noi se, efficiency reducting and flameo ut is appeared. The pressure signal of different f lame status in entrained flow gasifier is analyzed by the w avelet-transform analysis in this paper. The result s indicate there is a close relationship between the combustion status and pressure sig nal, pressure sig nal moves towa rd high frequency with the increase of flame stability. Acco rding to this relatio nship, the model of combustion diag nosis in entrained flow gasifier could be established.@Fractal concepts was int roduced in the study of char gasification. The cha nges of pore surface area and pore volume of char during g asi fication could be described in acco rdance with afractal rule. The quicker the char g asified, the higher the fractal dimension was. How ever, fractal rule could only be used to describle the coal cha r gasification that the char pore volume was made up of micropore and mesopore.@A quar tz tubula r reactor has been used to study the effect of coke on the steam and carbo n dio xide reforming reactions of methane. The experiments were carried out at 700 ℃-1 300℃. The results show that the conversion of methane to produce sy ng as o bvio usly increased with the present of coke in the reactor, and the initial temperature of methane decomposition were down. From the ma terial bala nce analysis of C and H atom, it can be seen that the mass of coke is constant during the carbon dioxide reforming reactio no fmethane. The function of coke for the carbon dioxide reforming of methane is simi lar to the “catalysis”process.@The adsorption characteristics of pure CH4, CO2 and their binary mix tures on Jincheng and Lu 'an coal under high pressure have been studied, and formula of absolute adso rption has been given to employ studying the absolute adso rptioni so therm of real gas on coal in the paper. The studying results show: The adso rbed amount of mixed g ases is between pure methane and dioxide carbo nunder hig h pressure and the Gibbs adso rption i so therms is dif ferent to that of absolute adsortion; There is different adsorptio n characteristics between CH4 and CO2; It is alw ays preterential adsorption of CO2, and selection of CO2 adso rption on coal is increa sed with the increasing of equi lbrium pressure. The studying results can used to direct investigation of CO2 enhanced coalbed methane recovery and CO2 sequest ration in coalbed with injection flue gas.@Mixing sect i s set at the top of the py rolysi s reacto r. And four fanlike baf fles with tapered co nst riction are equipped in it. Coal and heat-carriers are fed into mix ing sect befo re flow ing into the py ro lysis reacto r. In the mix ing sect coal and heat-carriers are di spersed and mix ed quickly by the action of baff les under g rav ity. Experiment s are car ried out in the batch reactor of fine coal fast pyrolysis which scale is 1 kg coal and 10 kg heat-carriers. And th e results are compared with the pyrolysis ex perimental results in which coal and heat-ca rriers are mixed by screw pro peller. It shows that it is a very effectiv e mixing type and can be used in the process of low temperature pyrolysis.@In order to make full use o f the slime resource, some cataly st s are added in for enhancing the combustio n efficiency. The effect of different ca talysts on the slime ig nition tempera ture, burning completely temperature, and area of heating value are compared, The results show that catalysts can decrease the ignition temperature and burning completely temperature, increase the quantity of heat releasing during combustio n, and the catalytic effect of the TF catalyst is bet ter than KNO3 catalyst. The mechani smis discussed in this paper.@Reg eneration behavior of Fe-Ca based desul furi zer was investiga ted in the tubular fix ed-bed. The influence of regeneration temperature on regenera tion of desulfurizer were studied The results showed that , in atmo sphere containing O2, reg eneration conversio n decreases as the temperature rising , however the case is on the oppo site when reg enerated in atmosphere containing H2O. In O2-H2O containing atmo sphere, the feasibly lower temperature and the higher H2O/O2 value fav or to achieve elemental sulfur.@The kinetics of preparation active ca rbo n from Yunnan Xianfeng lig ni te with phosphoric acid activ ation was studied. The results rev eal that pre-impreg nation lignite with phosphoric acid so lution before carbo nization had a n acceleration to the carboni zation and activation of lignite, and the element H and O were elimination from lig nite by H2O, alcoholic or aldehyde lit t le mo lecular etc. The reactio n of carboni zatio n and activ atio n of lig ni te is o ne orderreactio@Gra nular coa l-based Activ ated Carbo n( AC) made f rom Da to ng bi tumite and high-temperature co al-based pi tch by the method o f agg lomeration. When the o ther procedure technologies are the same, once the AC products w ere preoxidi zed befo re ca rbo nization, the properties of the final AC product s such as wa ter adsorptio n, iodine No. , methylene blue No. and CCl4 adso rption ratio ca n increase respectively 27% -34% , 134 mg /g , 86 mg /g-96 mg /g and 9% - 13. 5% ( adsolute ari thmetic di fference) . In addi tio n, when th e pro perties of the final AC pro ducts such as water adsorption, io dine No. , methylene blue No. a nd CCl4 adso rptio n ratio can be cont rolled respectively betw een 106% and 119% , more than 1 050 mg /g, more than 225 mg /ga nd betw een 67% and 75% at the same time, it ca n raise the yield of activ ation procedure 10% at least w hi le the AC product s underw ent preo xidi zed t rea tment befo re carboni zatio n. Whether the properties or the yield of the AC product s, it 's adva ntag eous a bsolutely to pre-t reat the shapedraw material wi th o xy gen in ai r befo re the carbo niza tion procedure.@The change rules of coal ta r pi tch 's TI, QI,β-resin, sof tening point and coking value during the thermal polymeri zatio n modi fica tion were inv estiga ted in an auto clave. The resul ts indicated that T I, QI, sof tening point and coking v alue of coal tar pi tch will rise up with the increasing of the time a nd tempera ture. β-resin wil l ri se up in the fi rst stage of the thermal polymeri zatio n. Whenβ-resin reaches i ts maximum value, i t wil l decline wi th the increasing of the time and temperature. The majo r ta rg ets of modified pitch will chang e in a litt le v aria tion rang e with several repeatabi li ty test, w hich will supply the suppo rt fo r the amplified test s and industry manufacture.@Thi s paper int roduced the ex perimental study on the fluidi za tion of the mix ture o f biomass and coal. The biomass materials employed w ere cornstalk a nd rice ha ulm. The ex periments w ere ca rried out in a f luidi zed bed column wi th ID of 115 mm and heigh t o f 1 000 mm. The ex perimenta l resul ts show ed that sing le biomass material s were very di fficult to be f luidi zed, w hi le the go od f luidi zatio n could be achiev ed wi th the addi tion of coa l as lo ng as the mass f ractio n of biomass was less than 50% . A modi fied equatio n w as used to sati sfactorily predict the umf va lues of mix tures of biomass and coal.@Modification of coal tar pi tch ( CTP) as carbon materials w as studied using 4- methyl benzaldehyde ( 4-MB) as modi fier by an acid catalyst in this pa per. The modification mecha ni sm w as studied by fourier t ra nsfo rm inf ra-red( FT-IR) and 1 H nuclear mag netic reso nance ( 1 H-NMR) spectro sco py techno logies, respectiv ely. Pola ri zed microsco pe is employed to study the o ptical st ructure of pyro lyzed substances of the modi fied co al tar pi tch and shapes of the modified co al tar pi tch are observ ed th ro ugh SEM. The result s show that elect rophilic substitutio n reaction could occur betw een CTP and 4-MB under the action of toluene-p-sulfo nic acid. The sha pe of the modified coal ta r pi tch is fibre st ructure and the o ptical tex ture of py ro lyzed substances i s a wide-domains st ructure. The modi fied co al ta r pi tch with 4-MB be an promising carbo n precursor.@Coal /PAN complexes w ere sy nthesi zed by aniline monomer in coal template initiated by APS, taking advantag es of the aciolic functio nal g ro up, pore st ruct rue and speci fic aromatic ring of coal st ructure. Pore st ructure were the key facto rs that af fect the co nductivi ty of coal /PAN complexes. In thi s paper, HNO3 , H2 O2 a nd aniline ex t raction w ere chosen to cha nge the pore st ructure in co al. The analysis result s of co nductivi ty and po re st ructure indicated tha t the conductiv ity o f coal /PAN w as improved by ox ida tion and ex t raction, which dev eloped the po re st ructure in coal, a nd then faci li ta ted the process of ani line entering the sw elled coa l pore.@In order to improv e acety lene yield f rom coal by plasma py ro lysis, i t is necessary to rai se the temperature o f reactio n sy stem up to sublima tio n point of carbo n. Themody namic equilibrium systems of coal a re studied in this paper, based on w hich a new method to produce acetylene f rom coal by plasma pyro lysis wi th coal-bed metha ne as refrig eation is propo sed w here the ini tial tempera ture of reaction sy stem is abov e 4 000 K. It is show ed by theo retica l computa tion a nd analysis that hig h acetylene yield wi th low speci fic energy consumptio n can be obtained w ith this method.@Yima a nd America n Pocaho ntas No. 3 coal samples w ere ex ha ustively@The roles of three reactions inv olv ed in dimethyl ether ( DM E) synthesis from CO hydrogena tio n: methanol sy nthesi s reaction ( MSR) , methanol dehydra tio n reactio n (MDR) and wa ter g as shif t reaction (WGSR) a re studied respectiv ely by thermodynamic calcula tion. By the fo undation of three models, MSR, MSR+ MDR, MSR+ MDR+ WGSR the effect s of CO concent ra tion in feed, temperature and pressure on the synergic effect are investiga ted in a wide ra nge. Some informatio n o f the adv antag es and sho rtcoming s deriv ed f rom sy nergic effect is demonst rated to guide the study of kinetics o f dimethy l ether sy nthesi s.@Fischer-Tropsch sy nthesi s( FTS) is one of the key processes in the co nv ersiono f coal , na tural g as and biomass to liquid fuels via sy ng as. The selection o f new catalyst s and o ptimum opera tion co ndi tions in it s industrial applicatio ns need a sound scienti fic foundatio n, w hich entail detailed info rmatio n of i t s mechanism. In this paper, the development of the mecha ni stic resea rches fo r CO activ atio n in FTS a re review ed. The impo rta nt pa rts includig the nature of cataly tic surface, the o rientatio n in CO-surface interaction a nd the ef fects o f promo ters and co-adso rbents are int roduced in detai l.@Carbon tax , EOR /ECBM a nd ca rbo n emi ssio n t rading are effectiv e measures driving power g enera tio n secto r to mi tiga te CO2 . How ev er, i t still takes a lo ng time for these measures, especially carbo n tax a nd emi ssio n t rading , to come into fo rce in China. So before that, w e must consider that how to improv e the economics of IGCC and coal ga si fica tio n so lid oxide fuel cell hybrid wi th the capture and storag e o f CO2 and further facili tate the deployment of IGCC a nd SO FC hybrid in China.Wi th co-productio n o f hydrog en and pow er a s the wedg e, this a rticle designed and simulated four co-production cases. Based o n the technical resul ts, capi tal, cost of electrici ty a nd hy drog en a re analy zed, w hich suppo rt s the di scussion abo ut w hether and how to improv e the eco nomics, how to configure co-pro duction sy stems in terms o f energ y uti li zatio n a nd cost , a nd how to promo te the mi tig atio n of CO2 in pow er plants befo re and af ter the operatio n of carbo n tax a nd emi ssio n t rading measures.@The pa per concerns the selective cataly tic reductio n principle to de-NOx in flue g as using dif ferent ca talyst s and di fferent reducing ag ent. It discusses the catego ry o f three types o f SCR cataly st , w hich are included wi th no ble metal ca taly st , metal oxide catalyst , ionexchang ed zeo li te ca talyst , and describes the activi ty character of the three types catalyst s in SCR reactio n. The main composition and their actio n in the V2O5-WO3-MoO3 cataly st that has been used most commonly in the w orld are inv olv ed. The main questio ns that should be co nsidered and solved in ca talyst preparatio n and using a re pointed o ut.@Co al sw elling is o ne of the ma jo r facto rs at t ributing to vi sco sity change of coal-oi l slurry during di rect coa l liquefactio n. The sw elling kinetics o f Shenhua coal in org anic so lv ents dimethyl fo rmamide, tet ralin and recycle oil a t 40 ℃-120 ℃are studied in this paper. The result s show that the sw el ling rate of Shenhua coal in o rganic solvents increases along with temperature but the sw elling ra te in polar solv ent-dimethy l formamide i s much high than that in no n-plar solv ent-tet ralin; The sw el ling behavio r o f Shenhua coal is co nsonant wi th first reactio n kinetics; The activ ation energy of Sh enh ua coal in three solvent s are al l less than 10 k J/mo l which show s tha t during sw elling , the process is co nt rolled by solvent mo lecule dif fusio n in coal.@This thesis inv estig ates the so lubi li ties of Tong ting cla rain and Wali cla rain in CS2-N-methy 1-2-py rolidinone mix ed solv ent. Mainly ex amines th e inherent relationships betw een raw co al, exact s and residues a t th e indust rial a naly tic, real densi ty a nd visco si ty; comparativ e analysis fo r the component s and st ructural cha racteri zatio ns o f raw coal, exacts and residues by applying adv anced analytic techniques such as FTIR. Based on the researches mentioned a bov e, the co nclusion i s draw ed, tha t ex t ract s co ntains aliphatic in coal a nd compo nents having the st ructural o f alcoho l, phenolic, ether, but residues co ntains the compo nents having the st ructural o f aromatic.@The py roly sis mechani sms of thiophene in coal hav e been studied by using Densi ty Functional Theo ry ( DFT) U B3LYP /6- 31G( d ) in thi s paper. Tw o kinds of thiophene 's free radicals w hich a re produced in the pyroly sis process o f thio phene functionali ties are inv estigated by quantum chemi st ry calculation, a nalysi s w ith the bond Mulliken Po pulatio n and o ther calculatio nal result s, the mechanisms of py ro lysis of orga nic sulphur as thio phene in coal are proposed and discussed. The result s show tha t the bo nd of C S bo nd is the w eakest bond of the system, i t wi ll be dissociated fi rst in py ro lysis. The final production is HC CH , sulphur releases in the fo rm o f H2S.@Thi s paper inv olved the effect of inherent minerals on the release of HCN, NH3 and dist ributio n o f ni trog en during three co al py rolysi s. Py rolysi s w as carried out in a fix ed bed reacto r at atmospheric atmoso phere. Result s show that not only the yield of NH3 f rom deminerali zed coal i s less than that f rom raw coal in di fferent co al type during py rolysi s, but also it chang es wi th ash ma t ter in coal; HCN fo rmatio n is af fected by inherent minerals, coal rank is also one of key factors which affect s HCN fo rmation; inherent minerals also af fect s obviously ni t rogen dist ributio n.@Brow n coal and biomass all hav e the characteri stics of thermal decompo sition of their chemical st ructure. Outcomes of th ree fo rms may be g ot ten by their thermal decomposi tio n. The yields of th ree fo rms o utcome will hav e dif ferent wi th the condi tio n of thermal decomposi tio n fo r some co al and biomass. Brow n coal ( from Longkou mine) and biomass( saw dust and shell o f walnut ) w ere tested by thermal decompo sitio n under low er temperature in the study. The dif ference of the yields of three fo rms outcome was rev iew ed w hen biomass was decomposed and the mix ture of biomass and brow n coal w as decomposed under some co ndi tion o f thermal decomposi tio n. The performa nce of raw char used di rect ly as adso rbent w as rev iew ed. The result o f adsorptio n test stated tha t the adsorbing v alue of raw char to methylene blue may reach 7.3 mg /g.@In thi s paper, the static stabili ty o f di fferent CW S has been studied by using 14 Chinese coals sluries formula ted wi th 10 di spersants. The result shows that the CWS sta bility of low ra nk i s the mainly to coal 's properties, and the stro ng er the hydrophici li ty is, the bet ter the stabili ty of CWS. The CWS stability of high rank coal depends mainly o n the structure cha racteristic o f dispersant. The effect o f dispersant on CWS stability is mainly dependent on the di rect o r indirect interactio n of the di spersant w as adso rbed on the coal particle surface. When the particles in CWS were able to fo rm the larg e th ree-dimensional st ructure by the interaction of di spersants at static state, the CWS ca n be retained a goo d stabi li ty. An ex perience model has been set up, w hich may be used to estimate the sta tic stabi li ty of di fferent CWS by the pa rameters o btained f rom the rheological curv es.@The inf luences of adding the sodium lig nosulfo nate ( LS) o n th e rheo logical cha racteristics o f co al-wa ter suspensio n w ere inv estiga ted, including the ef fect s of LS concent ra tion, dif ferent molecular mass, suspension temperature, suspension pH and the rheological characteri stics compa rison o f LS a nd NDF. The ex cessiv e surfactant can induce the apparent viscosi ty to increase i f the dosag e is mo re than 0. 8% by coal w eig ht. Di fferent mo lecula r masses of LS have dif ferent inf luences o n the suspensio n f luidi ty. The f raction of 10 000-50 000 is a go od choice fo r the f luidi ty. The suspension apparent vi scosity decreases as the temperature is less than 60 ℃. The tempera ture exceeds 60 ℃, the viscosi ty w ill increase. Co nsidering the f luidi ty, the appropriate pH i s about 9 in the range o f w eak acid and basic in the suspensio n. LS has a n ideal pseudoplasticity in abov e dif ferent condi tio ns. The preashearing ex periment reveals that the suspensio n vi scosity added the LS surfactant increases w ith the time pro longing.@Sev eral kind of coal w ere thermally upg raded a t low er temperature. The resul ts show that slurry abili ty o f coal ca n be improv ed and apparent visco si ty, separated wa ter of COWS can be decreased in the tempera ture rang e o f 200 ℃-300 ℃. All o f abov e because o f the decomposi tio n of the ox yg en-bearing functional g roups on the coa l surface w hich reduced the moi sture holding capaci ty no tably.@The co ntents of envi ronmentally-sensi tiv e t race element s such As, Se, Pb, Hg, Cr , Cd, Ni, Co, Mn, Br, Sb, Be, Mo, U, Th and V w ere detemined by IN AA, ICP-AES a nd AAS. By comparing the co ntent s of t race elements in coal wi th the co ntents o f t race element s in dif ferent ash , the di st ribution characteri stic of t race element s in combustio n w as studied. Based o n the modes o f occur rence of t race elements in coal, the combustio n mechanism o f t race element s was researched.@Jiny uan coal w as t reated in oxidatio n so lv ent s under ult rasonic a nd microw ave radia tio n. The effect o f t rea ting conditions, including the co ncent ratio n of coal, si ze of coal, reactio n time, the co ncent ratio n of oxidant s, the pow er of ult raso nic and the co ncent ratio n of acid o n the yield of remov ing a rsenic w ere studied. The ex periment result s show ed that the arsenic of coal wa s obviously remov ed in oxidatio n solv ents under ult rasonic and microw av e radia tio n. The yield of remov ing a rsenic in co al reached 90% and more. The yield o f removing ari senic increases w ith the co ncent ratio n o f oxidants, the co ncent ratio n of acid, the power of ult raso nic and the low concent ra tion of coal.@In the study of the process of tannic ex t ract desulfuri za tion, alkabini ty, tannic concent ra tion va nadium co ncent ratio n a nd temperature w ere studied and the common rule of each facto r inf luence on desulfuri za tion efficiency and appropriate o peratio n condi tio n were acquired. As the primary facto r, alkabini ty should be below 12 g /L, the desul furi zatio n ef fect is optimum w hen the ra tio of tannic and sodium metav anada te w as 1. 5-2; the high abso rption tempera ture is unfavo ur fo r desulfurzation. 30 ℃-40℃w as prov ed to be effectiv e th roug h ex periments.@U ti li zes thermog rav imet ric to research the burning of the mud and coa l pow der activa tion o f mix ture, and analysis to calcula te activ ation energy E and f requency facto r A for the mud and co al pow der activ atio n of mix ture in di fferent proportion based Matlab, a nd ana lyses slight ly about the combustio n and cha racteristic of burning. Th roug h researching and analyzing finding that activ atio n energ y and f requency facto r had close relations to the burning cha racteristic, estimi te the burning co ndi tio n of mix ture th ro ug h activ atio n energ y E a nd f requency factor A in o rder to lay the foundatio n fo r studying and using fur ther in the future.@The effect s o n so lutio n loss reaction o f coke by adding 11 oxides into a same coke by mea ns of bo th additio n a nd adso rption and the dif ferences there o f w ere investiga ted. The mecha ni sms of dif ferent effect s w ere a nalysed in view of ca taly si s action, w ay of di sperse of a mineral in coke and effect s o n microst ructure o f coke by mineral. The caty lysis actions o n coke by a same mineral a re the same no ma t ter w ha t w ay of adding is used. Adsorptio n mineral merely di sperse o n the surface o f coke unifo rmly. Whi le addition mineral is part ly w raped by ma trix of coke. The cataly zed surface by the tw o means is di fferent. The mineral in coke by adding may be ef fectiv e to the reactivi ty of coke by modifying the st ructure o f coke.@High-temperature mould pressing tech nolo gy fo r pi tch-based carbon composi tes i s a ra pid shaping technique improv ed f rom mould pressing tech nolog y , but it has many di sadv antages, such as g rea t inv estment in equipment s, low er molding pressure and poo r technological practica bili ty. Therefore, this paper bro ugh t forw ard a new prepara tion tech nolog y, namely mould pressing and semi-carboni za tion techno logy ( MSCT ) . In o rder to validate the o utstanding adv antag es o f the MSC T tech nolog y , pi tch-based ca rbo n compo si tes w ere fabricated w ith M SC T technolog y and mo uld pressing techno log y, and thei r microst ructure, densi ty a nd compressiv e st reng th w ere experimented. It i s co ncluded tha t the microst ructure of the composi tes fabricated wi th MSCT techno logy is denser than that o f the composi tes fabricated wi th mould pressing techno log y, and thence the densi ty and compressiv e st rength of the fo rmer has increased respectiv ely by 28. 3% and 144. 4% as compared wi th that of the lat ter.@In the paper, na nometer titanium dioxide particles w ere prepared by sol-g el f rom TiCl4 , a nd w ere applied to photoca taly tic oxidation o f the coke waste w ater. When heatingtempera ture is 600℃, nanometer TiO2 pow ders i s mix ture of ana tase a nd rutile, it s si ze i s 65 nm, the ruti le has 21.3% in the pow ders. The ex perience result show s tha t the t rea ting ef ficiency of the mixing crystal pow ders i s the best. The optimum conditio n is adding 0. 4 g na nometer ti tanium dioxide in the 100 g w aste wa ter and laying the w aste w ater in the sun for mo re than 4 h. The remov al ef ficiency of the w aste w ater ' CODcr is up to 50% .@Fly ash-ty pe adso rbent wi th hig h crystal linity and puri ty w ere sy nthesi zed by Na2CO3 o r NaO H fusion of qua rt z-containing elut rillithe follow ed by hydrothermal t reatment. Wi thin the temperature range of 368 K, i ts adsorptio n feature was inv estiga ted. The adso rption properties of the fly ash-based adsorbent w ere cha racteri zed by adso rption iso therm, speci fic surface and po re di stribution wi th the help of N2 adso rption. The adso rption isotherm of phenol w ere tested, based on w hich effectiv e means to increa se the adso rption of f ly ash-based adso rbent is proposed.@A soap-free latex of the methy l methacrylate ( MMA ) ini tiated by some ini tiator w as prepared. Mo no-di spersed PMMA /PAN core-shell mo rpho logy compo site par ticles w ere prepared by emulsif ier-f ree seeds emulsion polymeri za tion in which soap-f ree latex acted as core. The effect s o f the initia to r, amount o f PAN on the particle size and pa rticle si ze dist ributio ns o f the la tex w ere discussed in detail. Mo rphologies o f mo no-di spersed PMM A la tex pa rticles a nd PMMA /PAN composite par ticles w ere cha racteri zed by laser particle si ze inst rument, SEM a nd T EM, co re-shell mo rpholog y of PMM A /PAN composi te particles were prov en.@On the basi s of practical running co ndi tio ns of Recti sol Wash Uni t ( RWU ) in Nanjing Chemica l Indust rial Co. Ltd. , the deficiencies in original desig n w ere summarized a nd the new si tuations in feedstock cha nge f rom heav y oil to coal w ere analyzed. So a rev amped design scheme for RWU was pro po sed. Af ter th e feedstock chang e, the raw gas f low rate, the to tal CO2 a nd the H2 S in raw g as f low wil l be 1. 18, 1. 30 a nd 4. 8 times as larg e as the o riginal@Six dif fe rent rank coals (including gas coal , weak-caking coal , fat coal , coking coal and lean coal) are ext racted by CS2-NMP mixing solvent s under room tempe rature and pressure , the coal wi th v olatile 35 % show s the hig hest ex t ractio n yield (43. 05 %). Ex t ract ion yield of dif ferent rank coals have linear relatio ns wi th thei r Au-Ar dilatation and plastic temperature domain. By the IR spect ra o f coal ,residua and coke , it show sd that af te r e xt ract ing , the content of aliphatic and alicyclic in residua decreases , mo st mine ral s in residua. Different rank coals show different intensi ty of hydrogen bonds :in fat and g as coals , this bonds locate in macrostructure ; in lean and w eak-caking coals , they are in ex tractable micro-molecular compounds.@Thi s study a ttempts to f ind a new method of soy pro tein (SPI) surface modif ication of co al to enhance the biodegradabi li ty of coal. The surface modification w as co nducted by adso rption and g raf ting method using SPI as a modifier and Shenfu coal (SC) and o xidized Shenfu coal(OC) as mat rix. The SPI g raf ted coals were characterized by FT-IR analy sis. The aerobicbiodeg radation o f SC , OC and SPI mo dified coals w as carried out using compound microo rgani sms separated from soil. CO2 yield ,w eig ht lo ss , humic acid (HA) content and FT-IR of the solid residues , and UV-VIS adsorptio n o f liquid pro duct s w ere applied to examine the bio deg radation pro perties of the samples. The result s show ed that SPI surface modi ficat ion i s able to promo te the biodeg radabi li ty of both SC and OC , especially for the OC coals. The di fference of pro tein adsorbed coal and graf ted coal o n interfacial interaction result in di fferent biodeg radat ion mechanism fo r them ;the bio degradat ion product o f adso rbed coal i s mainly CO2 , w hile the pro duct s of grafted co al s are mainly HA in bo th liquid and solid phase.@The co rrelation between pro ximate analy sis o f coal and hardg rove g rindability index(HGI)w as studied in this paper .It w as fo und that by stat istically the more the moi sture and volati le mat ter w ere in coal the less the HGI w as , but the more ash and f ixed carbo n w ere , the hig her the HGI w as .How ever , the cor relation i s no nlinear fo r pro ximate and HGI in coal s .It w as also found that the accessing function o f HGI based on pro ximate of coal by li terature is not co rrect for coals in China .The proximate analysi s is an index for co al as a homogenous compound .The index cannot reflect the complexity o f HGI .Some phy sical factors such as the maceral s ,the type , size and dist ributio n of mine ral mat ters and the microco smic tectonics are very impo rtant fo r HGI .@The sulfur content in co als of China w as studied based on 2 237 co al samples from Chinese Coal Resource Database. The di st ribut ion of sulfur in the coals from different geological ages , different coal-accumulatio n dist rict s , di fferent provinces and di fferent classes of coals w ere di scussed. The study show s that the content and dist ribution of sulfur i s influenced by geological ages and coal-accumulatio n dist rict s. The concept of "weig hted reserves"i s presented in this paper , so the weighted mean content o f sulfur in Chinese coal is 1. 02 % based on coal-accumulatio n dist rict s reserves. The w eighted mean is mo re accurate than the ari thmetical mean(1. 40 %) to ref lect the dist ributio n of sulfur.@The surface terms are induced in chemical thermo dynamics and kinetics , and ef fect s o f part icle sizes on combustio n and py roly sis o f co al particles are analy sed and discussed . The result s show that the particle size has obvious ef fect s o n combust ion and pyro ly sis of coal part icles in thermody namic pro perties and kinetic parameters , w hen particle si ze smaller , the ef fect s become s larg er ;w ith the particle size decreasing , the difference o f Gibbs functio n decreases , the tendencies of burning and pyro ly sis increase ,the burning point and py roly tic temperature decrease ,the spontaneous ig nit ion occures easily , as w ell as the molal surface energy increases when the part icle size decreasing , so as to the apparent activatio n energies of burning and py rolysis decrease and the rate constant increases .Co nsequently , the burning and the py roly tic rates of coal part icles accelerate , and the conve rsion rate , the combustion and the pyro ly sis ef fectivenesses o f coal par ticles increase.@　The fusio n characteristics of mixed ash samples and behavior o f mineral matters at high tempe ra tures w ere studied. The samples we re prepared w i th coal ashes and additives of CaO and Fe2 O3 in dif fe rent ratio. The XRD w as used to examine the changes of mineral components at dif ferent temperatures. It is show n that ,in reducing atmo sphere , fusion ag ent s can decline to the ash-mel ting point effectively , but dif ferent resul ts can be obtained fo r dif ferent coal ash. The low est ash-mel ting point can be obtained i f prope r addit ive w as mixed into coal ash ,because mine ral mat ters react w i th CaO o r Fe2O3 and produce low-melting eutectic mat ters.@　Isothermal kinetic analy sis of NO2′s effect on Dry FGD reactio n w as developed by TGA at medium tempe ra ture(250 ℃-500 ℃). Ex perimental research show ed that NO2 in f lue gas could enhance the ef ficiency of dry FGD reaction and promote the CaSO4 in reaction products at medium temperature. It is indicated that at medium temperature the dry FGD reactio n w ith the presence of NO2 w as well matched the Av rami-Ero feev random nucleation and subsequent grow th mechanism. It w as dif ferent from the shrinkag e co re mechani sm when NO2 i s absent.@On the base o f the research on oxide series and carbonate series , in this paper TG-FTIR and the device o n sulphur capture w ere exploited to investigate quali tativ e and quanti tat ive analy sis of de sulfurizatio n ef ficiency. The co als and calcium-based so rbents of ox ide series and carbonate series w ere separately blended and the ratio of calcium and sulphur w as 3∶1. The result s showed that both calcium-based so rbents of ox ide series and carbo nate series co uld pro hibi t the decompo sitio n of CaSO4 befo re 1 200 ℃. Desulfurizat ion ef ficiency of S rCO3 co uld reach 96. 7 % and desulfurization ef ficiency of BaCO3 could also reach 92. 2 % at hig h temperature.@Desulfurizatio n ex periment s of high-sulfer coals were carried out by ado pt ing rhodopseudomonas spheroides and the combination f low shee t of microo rg anism pret reatmentflo atatio n. The inf luencing factors to the de sul furizatio n resul ts were mainly ex amined ,w hich include the pret reatment t ime , concent ra tion of the slurry , pH v alues , co ncent ratio n of the baci llus etc. The result s show that microo rganism-floa tatio n is a hig h ef fective desulfurization method by Rhodopseudomo nas Sphe roides. The pret reatment time ,co ncent ratio n o f the slurry and baci llus , pH v alues of the slurry have the remarkable effect s to the desulferization resul ts.@　The f lue gas de sulfurizatio n w as studied w i th limestone suspending liquid in a gas-liquid impinging scrubber. Several paramete rs inf luencing on desulfurizatio n ef ficiency w ere investiga ted respectively , including liquid-gas ratio L /G , pH o f ci rculant slur ry , the SO2 co ncent ration o f the inlet flue gas and the limestone mass concent ration. The result s show ed that the desulfurization n ef ficiency o ver 95 %w ere at tained at pH >6. 1 ,mS O 2 <1 657 mg /m3,low er L /G and low er limestone co ntent . 99 % can be reached in large r L /G and limesto ne concent ration. The result s in the pilo t-scale plant are ag reed wi th the lab data.@　Wet f lue gas desulfurization process i s commonly adopted to contro l SO2 emission f rom co al-fi red plant s. Ex periment s we re developed to investig ate the ef fect o f NOx on w et flue g as desulfurizatio n process , wi th a gas-liquid bubbling-bed reactor and NaOH so lution as absorbent , under simulated flue gas atmo sphere. The result s show ed that the desulfurization rate increased slight ly w ith the existence of NO2 and the removal rate of NO2 increased sig nif icantly wi th the existence of SO2, when the abso rbent w as alkaline ;w hen the absorbent turned acidic , the exi stence o f NO2 and SO2 decreased each othe r's remov al rate ;NO and SO2 has lit t le inf luence on each o ther's remo val rate , no matter the absorbent w as alkaline o r acidic ;The existence of NO2 had a favo rable ef fect on the fo rmation of sulfate in desulfurizatio n product s ,especially under alkaline atmosphere , w hile the ex istence of NO had a preventive effect.@　The fundamental research o n screen and culture of desulphurizatio n bacteria has been done fo r seeking the method o f remov al o f SO2 f rom flue g as by micro org anism. Through a series of experiment s ,5 micdesulphurizatio n st rains are selected and cultiv ated f rom soil samples pol luted by f lue g as f rom the heat and pow er plant in Zhengzho u ci ty . Their desulphurization ef ficiency has been determined and o rthog onal ex periment have been done. T he result show s that thei r desulphurization eff iciencies are o ver 80 %, and the facto r's sequence inf luencing SO2 remov al f rom f lue g as by microo rg anism is pH value >temperature>SO2 concent ration.@Cellulo se residues , the acid hydroly sis residues o f discorea zingiberensis C. H. w rig ht , have brought out serio us solid w aste po llution w ithout being di sposed. Acco rding to the principle of reso urce recy cle , tw o steps activated methods w ere adapted to prepare act ivated carbon w ith chemical agent zinc chloride (ZnCl2 ) in this paper. The o pt imal process w as determined :300 ℃carbonization temperature fo r 40 mins , 600 ℃activ ated temperature for 1. 5 h ,the impreg nation ratio 4 ∶1 (the mass of ZnCl2 to that of raw material) and 12 h soaking time , 40 % ZnCl2 concentration respectiv ely . The characterizatio ns of the activ ated carbon prepared f rom the residues we re inv estig ated by the SEM , XRD and N2 adsorptio n. The adso rption ex periment s show that it can bet ter decolo ri ze diosgenin w astew ater and remo ve COD than comme rcial act ivated carbon. Therefore ,the activated carbo n prepared f rom the residues not only so lves the so lid w aste po llution but also develops an ef fective and excellent low-co st adsorbent .@　Lignin is very important reclaimed re source. Activ ated carbon w ere prepared f rom the mixture w hich w as made of co al and lig nin in this study . Experiment indicated that w hen the tempe ra ture o f carbonization is 800 ℃, the activated t ime is 60 minute , the speed o f rai sing temperature is 5 ℃/min-10 ℃/min , the ratio o f coal to activat ing reagent KOH is 1 ∶1-1 ∶2 , the percent of lig nin is 50 %-70 %,w e can prepare the activated carbon po ssessed of io dine o f 1 580 mg /g and a special surface area of 1 750 m2 /g . So lignin could improve the adso rpt ion pro pertacity of the pro duct , and the reason w as argued.@On the basis of studying in lab scale of pro ducing active carbon in process of combination o f oxidatio n w ith KNO3 and activatio n w ith KOH by using high sulphur occurring coal as the raw material , a pilo t scale of demonst rat ion pro ceeded in a batch v olume of 8 L reacto r well desig ned has been made. The resul ts show ed that the activated ca rbon obtained has capability of adsorptio n fo r pheno l as high as 233. 34 mg /g and capability of adsorptio n for io dine as hig h as 1 405. 00 mg /g w hen condit ions fo r carbonized material preparat ion are as fo llow :ratio o f KOH to carbo n of 2. 0 to 1 , activ ated temperature o f 850 ℃, and activ ation time o f 2 h as w ell.@Activated ca rbon-zeo li te composi te adsorbent s a re prepared from natural coal gang ue. The coal g ang ue impreg nated w ith K2CO3 are activ ated in the f low of N2 at 800 ℃, to convert the carbonaceous in original material into activ ated carbo n , and then the activ ated products are t reated wi th NaOH so lution , to crystallize the aluminosilicate into zeo lite 4A. The inf luences of various co ndi tions on the material sy nthe si s during the act ivatio n and cry stallizatio n are investiga ted . The pore st ructure of the adso rbent is characterized by XRD and N2 adso rption isotherm and thei r adso rpt ion abi li ties for H2O and n-C5 H14 are tested. It show s that the bo th micropo res and me soporous coexi st in compo site adsorbent and the material exhibi ts larger adso rption@　We have successfully modified coal tar pi tch w ith p-methyl benzaldehy de (PMB) in the presence of p-toluene sulfonic acid ,the meso phase t ransfo rmatio n o f w hich is studied in this paper. Pyro ly sis process of the modif ied coal tar pitch i s studied using FT-IR and element analysi s respectively. Polarized micro sco pe i s employ ed to study the optical st ructure of semi-coke of the mo dified pitch. The resul ts show that the absorbance of the C —H stretching is mode o f methyl and me thyne becomes w eaker w ith increase of heat t reatment temperature , w hich caused by demethy latio n and dehydrogenation of methyl and methy ne. The aromati zation deg ree becomes large as indicated by that C /H atom ratio is increasing. Mo reo ver ,the modificatio n cont ributes to a no table improvement in the o ptical tex ture o f semi-coke.@Cu /Co /TiO2 catalyst s w hich a re prepared by impregnatio n method and co-precipitating impreg nat ion metho d were used as methanol sy nthesi s cataly st . They w ere mixed wi th γ-Al2O3 , H3PO4-γ-Al2O3 , TiO2-γ-Al2O3 and Hβto prepare bi-functional catalyst s. Bi-functional cataly sts w ere characterized using T PR and XRD. T he result s are show ed as fo llow ing :Cu /Co /TiO2 cataly sts prepared by co-precipitating impreg natio n method are easy reduced than Cu /Co /TiO2 cataly sts prepared by impregnatio n method. The reductio n temperature of Cu /Co /TiO2 catalyst s added dehydratio n component decrease.@Effects o f coal pro pert ie s and coal py ro lysi s co ndi tions , such as temperature , pressure and py roly sis atmosphere , on the phy sical and chemical st ructure as w ell as g asification reactivi ty o f chars in the open literature have been reviewed .The mechanisms leading to the effect of py roly sis conditio ns o n char g asification reactivi ty w ere analyzed refering to another researcher s'result s .Diverse co nclusions about these ef fect s on char gasificatio n reactivi ty w ere obtained because of the dif fe rences amo ng dif ferent research jobs .But , in general , f rom most of the previo us studies i t appears that g asification reactivi ty of coal chars decreases w ith increasing py rolysi s temperature , increasing residence time ,decreasing heat ing rate and increasing py roly sis pressure , also , the differences exist in propert ies o f parent coals can ari se changes of char st ructure then the gasificatio n reactivi ty .Mo st researchers found that char st ructure became more o rdered , i .e . graphit izatio n of chars , af ter coal pyro ly sis pro cess .It has been proved that g asification react ivity@Carbon dioxide is one of the major gas po llutant s f rom fossil fuel utilization w ho se concent ratio n in the atmo sphere has led to sig nif icant climate chang e. The g reenhouse issue which mainly caused by carbon dio xide has become a global concern. So ,how to di spose the carbon dio xide separated f rom cent ralized emission source became a key to cont rol the carbon dio xide concent ration in atmo sphere , and some of majo r developed co unt ries have devoted intensive ef fect s to the development of various CO2 storage technolog ie s. Different kinds of CO2 storage methods are intro duced in this pape r , including geo logical sto rag e , ter rest rial ecosy stems sto rag e , biolo gical sto rage , ocean storage and CO2 mineral sto rag e. Scientific evidences f rom nature analo gues ,laboratory ex periments and computer simulations indicated that the CO2 storage technolog ies are feasible. T his paper summarizes the review of all kinds of carbon dio xide storage technique and di scusses the advantages and disadv antages o f present researches and put forw ard the emphasis of more studies.@Onion-like fullerenes(OLFs) could be prepared using dif ferent techniques f rom different carbon sources , such as carbonaceous materials (e. g. g raphite , diamond or carbon black ), organic compounds ( e. g. methane , ethane , acetylene ), carbides (e. g. SiC ) and so on. In this paper ,the advances of OLFs are review ed depending on carbon sources and methods . The development of coal-derived OLFs synthesis was mainly described. OLFs were obtained f rom coal by microwave or radio frequency plasma. The morphologies and structures of the product s were characterized by high resolution t ransmission elect ron microscopy (HRTEM). Results reveals that the particles displayed a clear polyhedral or quasi-spherical morphology with hollow center , having a narrow diameter distribution and high deg ree of graphitization. The method realized low-temperature synthesis of OLFs. The formation mechanism of coal-derived OLFs w as discussed in terms of plasma parameters and the chemical composition of coal.@Significant prog ress in the development and applicat ion of new advanced carbon materials hav e been seen because coal has several posit ive at t ributes w hen it is co nsidered as a feedstock for no vel carbon mate rials .Acco rding to the li terature , the emphasis of this paper i s placed o nly on poro us carbon material , fullerens and elect ro de of li thium bat teries .The advices of coal as raw mate rials of advanced carbo n material w ere given .@In this paper, w e determined the to tal sulphur co ntent s of tw o hundred a nd ninety coal samples which w ere taken f rom tw enty six provinces, municipali ties and autonomous regio ns in China. Then we analy sed the distribution o f total sulphur in coals w ith di fferent g eological ag es, dif ferent coal ranks, di fferent regio ns, di fferent coal-cumulating area s. The resul ts show tha t the coals wi th modera te to low sulphur co ntent s are prima ry in our country. The mean o f to tal sulphur content with w eight by reserves is 0. 94% . The coals with high and v ery high sulphur co ntent are mo stly f rom Carboniferous and Permian, and in the other g eolo gical ag es coals a re almost moderate a nd low sulphur content coal. The co ntent s of sulphur a re increasing by coal ra nks, which is caused by sedimentary envi ronment o f dif ferent coal-cumula ting ages. The contents o f sulphur in four coal-cumulating areas coa l hav e much dif ference, which is increasing g radually f rom no rth to south.@The w eig ht lo ss cha racters of Lo ng ko u lig nite w as studied by mea ns o f thermo g ravimetric analysis in methane. The resul ts show that metha ne can 't promo te ligni te pyroly sis below 400℃, but ca n promo te lig nite pyrolysis in the rang e o f 400℃-750 ℃. The TG curv es of lig nite pyrolysis in metha ne rise after 750℃, and the w eight increases. The py rolysi s ex periment o f ligni te in methane also be ca rried to study the characteri stic of hydroca rbo n and sulfur releasing . The gas product CH4 , C2 ( ethane and ethene ) , C3 ( propa ne a nd pro pylene) , C4 H10 ( butane ) are released a t 350℃, and thei r concentration reach the maximum at 550℃. All hydrocarbons are released at 750℃. The concent ra tion of sulfur during lig nite py roly sis in na tional g as is more than in ni t rogen, which prov e that the methane promo te sulfur transfer to g as.@Based o n the model test , the reg ula ri ty of Xinhe coal underg round gasification is studied to validate the stabi li ty of underg ro und gasi fica tion and the feasibili ty of producting high heat v alue gas. The result s rev eal s tha t underg round gasification of Xinhe coal w ith O2 ( 93% ) -H2O( g ) as gasifying agent could produce hig h heat v alue gas which could meet the need of the elect ric plant , but the g asificatio n technics must be changed wi th the g asificatio n wo rking face. The composi tion of g as, heat value a nd prime opera ting pa rameter in stable g asificatio n phase a re obtained that prov ide basic data fo r the designing of loca le g asificatio n stov e and the selecting o f tech nics. And the same time the g asificatio n ra te and the gasi fica tion index are obtained in this@The di rect liquefaction characteristics o f Baidong coal w as systema tical ly inv estigated in a micro autoclav e at dif ferent experimental conditions. The oil products w ere analy zed by simula ted di sti llatio n. The resul ts indicate tha t wi th increasing of temperature and H2 initial pressure, the to tal conv ersion and oi l yield of the Baidong coa l, are also increasing. In the same time, the effect of tempera ture is remarkably , when the temperature is increasing f rom 420℃to 450℃, the to tal co nv ersio n and oil yield enha nce 20. 98% and 18. 78% . Wi th increasing of tempera ture and H2 ini tial pressure, the productio ns chang e regularly: the PA+ AS yield decreasing, w ater yield almo st hav ing no chang es, the CO+ CO2 , C1-C4 yield a nd H2 co nsumption increasing. Fractions yield of the middle oi l di sti llates is highest; in the liquefaction oi l occupied about 57. 5% , a nd the heavy and the lig ht oil distillates are shared for 33. 0% and 9. 5% , respectively by simulated distillation analy si s. The amount o f alky l carbons is hig her than tha t o f a ry l ca rbons.@In thi s research , the bioconv ersion products hav e been o btained through the applica tio n o f cultiva tion fungis to the lig ni te coal pre-t reated wi th nit ric acid . Based on the compare son o f the v iscosi ty of coal-w ater-mix ture when additiv e is added a nd w hen it i s not. The rheolo gic behav io r o f coal-w ater-mix ture produced by bioconv ersion product s has also been researched.@This paper studied the surface chymic character of the modi fied ex ting uishing coke pow der a nd the ef fect of the adsorbing catio n capabi li ty. The ex ting ui shing coke powder no t o nly has ma ny t rai ts, such as lacuna rs fabric, adsorbent v eloci ty rapidly , self-intensity g reat ly, but also is self-productio n cheapness, no quadric empoi son. The research show s that if ni t ric acid mix ed a spo t of v it riol, i ts ox yg enatio n can evidently increase the content of acidic o n the surface o f the ex ting ui shing co ke pow der. and i t also can improve the surface hydrophilicity o f the ex ting uishing co ke pow der and reduce the pHpzc value. but it has no t too inf luence to the adsorptiv e capability of the ex ting uishing coke pow der. the modi fied ex ting ui shing coke pow der has the do uble functio ns o f the ion Abelian resin and the active ca rbo n. This ex perimentatio n also checks the adsorptive condition af fects metal io n. It provides the new eco nomic and applied method o n disposing wa ter.@We obtained humic acid sodium w hich moulded lig nite semi-coke used in ferroal loy pla n f rom brow n coal riching in Yunnan prov ince. We studied the fabricating method of humic acid sodium and fo rming process of lig nite semi-coke and tested streng th index es of moulded co ke of di fferent propor tioning. Resul t show s that w hen humic acid sodium i s used as g lue of lig nite semi-coke, it has goo d composi te index. Acco rding to ex periment s, all index es of moulded coke a re perfect w hen the addition of humic acid sodium is over 8% . And i t identifies the requi rement of ferroallo y furnace.@The chang es of the surface morpho logy of pet ro leum coke during combustion w ere analy zed by ni trog en adso rptio n /deso rption i so therms. Speci fic surface a reas, pore v olumes a t dif ferent burn-out ratios w ere determined through BET method and t-plo t method respectiv ely. Test result s show that during combustio n the specific surface area and po re v olume increase g rea tly and have the same change trend. Behav io r characteri stics o f f ractal mechanics of the combustion n are v alidated. And the surface f ractal dimensions, w hich a re found out to be nea r 3, are also determined through FHH model , indicating tha t the combustion reactio n occure simulta neously in bo th inner and outer par t of a spatial mesh. The surface f ractal dimensio ns hav e distinct di fferent chang e t rend f rom specific surface a rea a nd pore vo lume.@The combined pro cess fo r simulta neous desulfuri zatio n and dust removal is promising fo r ho t ga s cleaning because o f it s mo re compact process and low er co st . Th e understanding of desulfuri zatio n characteri stics i s the key to develop the combined processes due to the influence of deposi ted dust o n desulfurization performa nce o f sorbent s. In thi s w o rk, the interaction of sorbents wi th depo si ted dust w as investiga ted in a fix-bed reacto r. The result s show that the influence i s rela ted wi th the composi tio n a nd tex tural properties of sorbents. The so rbent based on an iro n oxide w aste material co uld interact wi th the depo sited dust causing the decrease o f sulfur capaci ty due to the v arious compo nents and la rg e po re si ze. The presence of H2O in the reactant g as could deterio ra te the desulfuri zatio n perfo rmance of so rbent, but i t could no t w ea ken the neg ative inf luence of deposi ted dust o n the sulfur capaci ty of so rbent. The sulfida tion /regeneration n cycles are further conducted to ev aluate the inf luence. It i s found that the influence became neg ligible af ter sev eral cycles. The BE T surface a rea, po re v olume and SEM surface mo rpho logy o f so rbents are also measured to investiga te the mechanisms.@Compa red w ith the t radi tio nal methods of remov al SO2 f rom flue g as, the o rga nic solv ent a bsorptio n has some adva ntag es as low inv estment , hig h SO2 absorptio n ef ficiency and deso rption ef ficiency. Fo r the a pplicatio n of o rg anic so lv ent absorptio n to indust ry as soon as possible, a small pilo tscale ex periment has been do ne based o n labo ra to ry about new desulfuri zation abso rbent fo r f lue g as, The inf luence o n desulfuri za tion efficiency fo r abso rbents is studied. And th e reg eneratio n capaci ties for abso rbent are resea rched. The result show s that the selected abso rption solv ent has no t o nly stro ng desulfurizing efficiency, but also goo d selectivi ty fo r SO2 and CO2 , the feasibili ty o f desulfuri za tion abso rbent ha s been prov ed.@Sev eral kinds of calcium abso rbent w ere resea rched compa ra tively , Ca(OH)2 w as selected the main sulfur-fix ation. The ef fect o f ra tio of Ca /S on the combustio n characteristic and kinetic parameter w as studied. Four kinds of addi tiv es ' ef fect o n the sulfur-fixing capabi li ty of Ca(OH)2 a nd combustio n cha racteristic and kinetic pa rameter w as compa red in the ex periment tempera ture of 1 000℃and Ca /S= 1. 5.@The ex periment o n the genera tion characteristics o f SO2 in co-combustio n of rice dusk and coal was carried out in ci rculating f luidi zed bed. And the influences of tempera ture and ex cess air coef ficient on the generation characteristics o f SO2 w ere studied especially. The study show ed tha t the co-combustion o f rice dusk and co al could reduce 50% productio n of SO2 g enerated in combustion o f coal at least. There existed an o ptimum ra nge o f the ratio betw een biomass a nd co al quali ty, which wa s no mo re than 30% . The productio n o f SO2 in co-combustion increased wi th bed temperature. Howev er, the reductio n ra te of SO2 fluctuated wi th bed temperature which reached maximum a t 850℃. The variation of ex cess ai r co ef ficient inf luenced the production n of SO2 in cocombustion sligh tly.@In o rde r to ra ise treat ing ef fect o f co ke p lan t w astew ater, th is ar ticle stud ied the cu lture o f the act iva ted sludge, screen ing and iso lat ion o f dom in an t m icrobe; the compa ra t ive deg rading ex perim en ts using iso lated dom inan tm icro be w ere perfo rm ed. A s a resu lt, f ivem icrobe s w e re screened. T hey a re th ree pseudom onas bac te ria, one nit robac te r bacter ium and one m icrococcus bacter ium respect ive ly. T he h ighest deg rada tion ra te o f CO D and NH3-N is 81. 1% , 51. 2% respect ive ly a fte r 48 h; and it show s tha t the g rades cu ltu re o f the act iva ted sludg e is a ve ry ef fect ive m ethod app ly ing to screen o f dom inan t m icrobe.@Poly-g eneratio n energ y sy stem based on coal gasi fica tion integ rates resource, energ y a nd env iro nment , w hich wi ll be a n impo rtant pa rt o f the sustainable dev eloping energy system for China. But the complete, systemic a nd ex ter nal eva luation o f poly-g eneratio n is still lacking , and the energy saving mechanism i s not deeply recog ni zed as w ell. By int roducing mat rix mode thermo-eco nomic method, the energ y f low s w ith dif ferent quali ties in dif ferent part s o f system are rational ly fixed prices. The ca lculated elect rici ty cost is 0. 286 y uan /( kW·h ) and the methano l cost i s 926 yua n / t. Al so some indicators like co st dif ference a nd ex erg y eco nomic coefficient of subsystems in poly-genera tion sy stem and single system a re compared, w hich defini te the source o f benefi t and point out the direction for further improvement.@Co al porosi ty and surface area will be chang ed during the thermo conv ersion of coal, such as coal g asificatio n a nd coal combustion. Understanding o f pore st ructure and reactivity i s essential for the utilization of coal. In the paper, the co rrelatio n between po re st ructure a nd reactivity o f coal is di scussed from three aspects: coal po ro sity measurement , po re structure cha nges during reactio n and pore st ructure models. The prospect of research and dev elo pment is also put fo rwa rd, that i s, further resea rch should be focused on uni fied theo ry of coa l reactivi ty and po re structure, and the influence of cataly sts in po re st ructure.@Ent rained-bed coal gasification is the key techno logy o f high ef ficiency a nd clea n utili zatio n of coal in China. Its basic cha racteristic and main af fecting facto rs are brief ly int roduced. Tw o representativ e ent rained-bed coal gasification techno logies, Texaco of co al w ater slurry gasi fica tion a nd Shel l o f dry pulverized-coal gasification, are focused, a nd thei r adv antages and existed problems are also discussed. Based o n the current sta te of co al gasi fica tion technolo gy and i ts commercial o peratio n in China , the dev elopment st rateg y fo r future w as giv en fo rw ard.@Basic thermodynamic pro perties of coal liquefied oil w ere analyzed, wi th measuring metho ds and some cor relations about basic thermody namic properties of pet roleum, measuring methods and co rrela tio ns about basic thermody namic pro perties o f coal liquefied oil w ere studied. The mea surement of v apor pressure, calculating of v apo r-liquid phase equi librium constant a nd apprai sing calcula ting pro cess of vaporization enthalpy of coal liquefied oi l w ere detai ledly discussed. Finally, the best w ay of mea suring these pro perties was obtained. In addi tio n, appraising calcula ting o f cri tical pro perties o f coal liquefied oil f ractions w ere simply o utlined.@The component s o f crude oi l f rom F-T sy nthesi s bo th at home a nd abroad are int roduced. Compa red wi th crude pet ro leum, F-T sy nthetic crude oi l mainly has pa raffin a nd alkene, containing few cyclopa raf fin and a rene, wi th ex t remely low sulfur and ni t ro gen. Based on the proper ty o f F-T synthetic crude oil , the market demand of co rrela tiv e pro ducts a nd the national need, and co nsidering the effect of productio n scale on the eco nomic benefi t, the upg rading-process i s proposed in o rder to increase eco nomic benefi t and to proper industriali zed dev elo pment fo r coal-ba sed sy nfuel.@Par ticulate mat ters, especially soo t particles fo rmatio n through incomplete combustion o f hydroca rbons is an impo rta nt pro blem w hich has increasing ly been paid much attention by all count ries th roug hout the wo rld. Nowadays, mo st of the researches are abo ut how to co nt rol the particles af ter the combustio n but barely about how to cont rol them during the combustion. This paper presents sev eral impo rta nt facto rs that af fect the particles formatio n in f lames wi th the applied elect ric field and giv es a rev iew abo ut the resea rches o n the soo t pa rticle fo rmatio n, g row th a nd removing in flames wi th the applied electric field a nd the sta tus of the interna tional research. The paper show s that wi th the applied electric field, the mass concentration o f the soo t pa rticles in f lame can be turned dow n abo ut 90% at most and wi th the addi tio n of cataly st the particles can be turned into nanotubes. Finally, the empha si s and di rectio ns fo r nex t study had been summari zed a t the end o f this pa per.@
2007


2006


2008


2011
研究了四种适宜地下气化的低阶煤在600 ℃热解条件下热解气中EPA-PAHs的生成分布特征，探讨了原煤组成的影响.结果表明，随着煤变质程度的增大，热解所产生的低环芳烃含量减少，高环芳烃含量增加，EPA-PAHs总量增加；热解气中EPA-PAHs以2R萘、3R苊、3R二氢苊、4R荧蒽、4R芘和4R苯并(a)蒽为主；3R芳烃含量最多，平均占EPA-PAHs总含量的67-57%；EPA-PAHs含量分别在碳含量为76.98％，H/C摩尔比为0.94，O/C摩尔比为0.16和挥发分为43.32%时达到最高水平.@基于重整反应系统的设备和管道尺寸、空间布置和设计运行参数等基础数据，研究并建立了主要设备、管道摩擦阻力和局部阻力计算模型，采用该模型分析了系统内各设备、管道和管道元件的压降，并对压降较大的设备和管道进行了尺寸优化.研究和优化结果表明，重整反应系统中，氧气缓冲罐、加热炉、氧气管道OG101～OG104等设备压降较大.对设备和管道的尺寸进行优化后，系统总压降由8 260.6 Pa降低到3 289.9 Pa；当系统入口压强p1=40 MPa时，系统出口压强p2=0.036 7 MPa.@以铝溶胶为黏结剂用机械混合法研究了烧结温度、还原时间、黏结剂含量及空速对Mn-Cu脱硫剂效果的影响，结果表明，900 ℃为该脱硫剂的最佳烧结温度，脱硫前用N2和H2的混合气体还原0.5 h有利于脱硫反应的进行.加入适当含量的铝溶胶有利于延长穿透时间，提高脱硫精度.空速对不同铝溶胶含量的脱硫剂影响不同，但总体来看降低空速有利于延长穿透时间.@焦炭机械强度是焦炭质量的重要指标，建立准确的焦炭机械强度预测模型可保证炼焦生产顺利进行.把支持向量回归机用于焦炭机械强度的预测，详细地分析了不同配煤煤质特性指标及炼焦工艺指标情况下的预测效果，找到了建立预测模型的有效特征参数.基于所选特征参数，当85≤M25≤90，6≤M10≤12时，支持向量机模型的预测准确率高，误差小，相关性强，同时，预测模型的泛化能力强.@对水钢分为6大类的18个生产用煤进行了镜质组反射率分布及常规煤质指标检测，对煤质指标和炼焦实验结果作了分析及评价，指出保华大类煤是影响水钢焦炭质量的主要因素，建议对其分三组堆放使用.据此，使用煤镜质组反射率分布并结合常规煤质指标为水钢制定了3个优化配煤方案，其焦炭质量明显提高，优于水钢的生产方案.研究结果表明：煤镜质组反射率分布图是指导炼焦优化配煤的有效手段，对稳定和控制焦炭质量特别是焦炭的热性质效果十分明显.对于炼焦配煤煤种多、有混煤情况时尤其适用和有效.@针对陕北半焦产品水分含量高，生产过程中水资源消耗大的问题，提出利用低温干馏煤气作为熄焦介质实现半焦干熄焦的技术方案.对应用干熄焦技术的内热式直立低温干馏炉生产半焦的过程进行了模拟物料平衡、热量平衡计算和低温干馏过程能耗分析.结果表明，干熄焦技术应用于低温干馏生产半焦过程可以节约水约203 kg/t半焦，有效回收半焦显热，节能643.30 MJ/t半焦，产品水分可大幅度减少；同时，由于水煤气反应减少，半焦收率提高；理论分析证明了该技术良好的应用前景.@采用酸碱法抽提陕北中低温煤焦油轻油和重油中的酚类物质.将轻油和重油蒸馏切割成170 ℃~240 ℃，240 ℃~270 ℃，270 ℃~300 ℃三个馏分，对三个馏分分别进行了总酚含量测定.通过最小碱油比的测定得出使一定量馏分油完全反应所需最小碱用量.设计了正交实验，得出每个馏分的最佳碱洗条件.在最佳碱洗条件下，酸碱洗涤得到轻油三个馏分酚油收率为29-21%，19.70%和16.95%；对应馏分油中总酚的回收率为95.05%，93.19%和90.30%；重油三个馏分酚油收率为58.40%，40.99%和41.55%；对应总酚回收率为91.19%，87.74%和85-83%.对脱酚油的GC/MS分析，验证了酸碱法对中低温煤焦油中酚类物质进行了有效抽提.@使用快速智能定硫仪对小麦秆、棉花秆、玉米秆三种生物质分别与高硫劣质煤混烧的固硫特性进行了研究，分析了不同混合比、温度及生物质灰成分等因素对固硫率的影响.实验结果表明，温度对固硫效果影响较大，总固硫率随温度的升高而下降；相同温度下生物质含量越高，固硫效果越好；生物质种类不同，固硫效果也不相同；生物质中氯与碱金属含量对固硫效果的影响较大.@以不同煤化度的太西无烟煤及神华烟煤为前驱体，KOH为活化剂制备系列活性炭，采用N2吸附法对活性炭孔结构进行了表征，分析了配煤对活性炭孔径分布的影响规律及机理.结果表明，不同配比的配煤均可制备出高比表面积（2 817 m2/g～3 134 m2/g）活性炭.配煤的配比是影响活性炭孔径分布的主要因素，随着配煤中高煤化度煤种配比的提高，活性炭的孔径分布逐渐变窄，中孔率也随之降低.原料煤自身结构与性质的差异是造成不同煤化度煤基活性炭孔结构差异的主要原因，通过配煤技术可以有效地调节活性炭的孔径分布.@采用爆炸辅助化学气相沉积法，以N，N-二甲基甲酰胺(DMF)为原料，在金属催化剂作用下合成了粒径分布在20 nm~40 nm的中空碳纳米颗粒.更为重要的是，发现中空碳纳米颗粒可在无金属催化剂作用下自组装形成.在此过程中，控制炸药和碳源的比例对于碳颗粒的结构和尺寸有重要影响.当炸药与碳源的摩尔比例合适时，产物中中空碳纳米颗粒的含量达到95%以上，且粒径分布均匀，约为10 nm.@以煤矿的废弃物煤矸石为原料，研究了在水热条件和导向剂超声波低温条件下，煤矸石自转变合成矸石基吸附剂的过程，并对其吸附性能作了初步研究.用氮吸附静态容量法，测得在水热条件和导向剂超声波低温条件下合成的矸石基吸附剂的氮吸附等温线、比表面和孔分布曲线.用XRD谱进行产品的晶相分析.通过矸石基吸附剂对苯酚的吸附实验，给出两种方法制得的矸石基吸附剂的吸附等温线.结果表明，在导向剂超声波低温条件下对提高矸石基吸附剂的比表面积和吸附量都是有效的.从XRD和粒径分布可以看出，导向剂超声波低温法使得合成产品的粒径远远小于传统水热合成法合成产品的粒径，而且产品的粒度均匀、单一，并且由于超声波的能量提供，晶化温度明显降低.@对甲醇气相法合成二甲醚、煤气化制甲醇气相法合成二甲醚以及煤炭-风电联产甲醇制二甲醚的三种典型二甲醚生产系统进行了流程设计、模拟和能耗/CO2排放/经济成本的3E（Energy，Economic，Enviorenment）评价，并对影响二甲醚经济成本的敏感性因素（例如煤价、甲醇价格和风电设备利用小时数等）进行了敏感性分析.@Fe-Mo/ZSM-5具有较好的NOx催化活性，比较了不同粉末的制备方法、催化剂助剂和载体等因素对蜂窝状催化剂催化还原性能的影响.结果表明，气相离子交换法制备的蜂窝状催化剂的催化活性最好，在350 ℃时NOx转化率已达到90%以上，在高温400 ℃～600 ℃范围，催化剂对NOx的催化还原转化率保持在98%.K+离子的加入明显提高了Fe-Mo/ZSM-5催化剂活性，可能调变了催化剂的表面性质，催化剂粉末在载体上的浸涂次数为2次时效果最佳.@采用浸渍法制备醋酸锌-活性炭催化剂，研究了普通浸渍和超声波浸渍制备醋酸锌活性炭催化剂，通过优化实验，得出超声波浸渍的适宜条件是：浸渍时间30 min，超声波频率28 MHz，浸渍温度45 ℃.在此条件下制得的催化剂较普通浸渍制得的催化剂醋酸锌含量提高了7%，比表面积提高了约30%.活性测试结果表明，超声波浸渍制备的催化剂活性较普通浸渍制得的催化剂活性显著提高，其中在180 ℃时活性提高了约34.54%.@采用热分析方法对大庆油页岩热解特性进行研究，考察了升温速率和热解终温对油页岩热解特性的影响.结果表明，温度是影响热解的最主要因素，随着温度的升高，挥发分产率增大；随着升温速率的增大，油页岩的热解特征温度和最大热解速率都明显提高.根据热失重曲线建立了大庆油页岩热解动力学模型，采用傅立叶红外光谱分析对油页岩及热解半焦官能团变化情况进行分析，发现油页岩的主要官能团与煤接近；随着热解终温的升高，半焦含氧官能团的吸收峰逐渐减弱.@煤制烯烃技术的发展使得煤基乙烯法PVC工艺成为一种选择，通过对不同工艺全流程碳排放量（直接碳排放+间接碳排放）进行计算分析，认为相对于煤基乙烯法PVC（纯锅炉模式）生产工艺，电石法和煤基乙烯法PVC（锅炉+燃气轮机模式）的碳排放较低，而由于后者不存在汞污染问题，从CO2减排、能源转化效率、成本和清洁化生产等综合角度来讲具有一定的优势.@分别考察了焙烧温度、硫酸浓度和煤系高岭土用量对城市生活污水中磷的吸附率的影响，在此条件下又考察了吸附等温线、吸附动力学和吸附热力学.结果表明，当焙烧温度为700 ℃，硫酸浓度为70%，煤系高岭土用量为0.75 g（每50 mL污水）时，煤系高岭土对城市生活污水中磷元素的吸附率分别达到最大.通过对吸附等温线、吸附动力学曲线和吸附热力学曲线的处理，得出硫酸活化煤系高岭土对磷的吸附行为更符合Freundlich模型，液膜扩散是其对磷吸附的主控步骤，且吸附是一个放热过程.@我国褐煤资源丰富，但是由于其水分高，导致了褐煤燃烧发电效率低下，不宜远距离运输.通过热力干燥可降低褐煤的水分含量，有利于褐煤运输和贮存，提高锅炉燃烧效率.从褐煤结构出发，提出其热力干燥过程的模型可将之视为多孔介质.分析了多孔介质的干燥过程特点，阐述了目前国内外的多孔介质干燥机理，总结了相关的多孔介质干燥模型，为多孔介质褐煤热力脱水模型化提供理论支持.@阐述了煤中微量有害元素的赋存状态和洗选脱除机理，指出微量有害元素在选煤过程中的迁移行为取决于其赋存状态和有机亲和性，以无机态或矿物质结合态为主的有害元素大部分能被脱除，总结概括了常规洗选方法脱除煤中微量有害元素的研究状况，指出常规洗选方法一定程度上脱除煤中微量有害元素，重点分析了磁选脱除煤中有害微量元素的研究进展.@系统论述了煤炭分质利用技术的有关问题，以分质利用技术科学理念的提出及工艺路线分析为基础，结合我国陕北地区丰富的低变质煤炭和盐等资源优势，提出了煤炭分质利用-新型盐化工利用模式、煤炭分质利用-煤基替代石化产品模式和煤炭分质利用-煤制天然气利用模式三种以煤炭分质利用技术为核心的陕北资源综合高效利用技术，并对其进行了技术及效益分析，对于指导我国低变质煤炭利用具有重要意义.@通过对陕北榆林地区煤低温干馏应用现状的实地考察，发现干馏过程产生的煤气热值偏低，影响焦油产出和煤气高效利用.为优化生产工艺，提出富氧干馏实验方案.通过理论计算及实验数据分析，结果表明，富氧干馏完全可行，富氧干馏能够降低煤气中氮含量，提高有效可燃成分含量，使煤气热值大幅度提高，解决了由于低热值煤气无法有效利用而放空所造成的环境污染和资源浪费问题.@采用非等温热重法对内蒙和印尼两种褐煤的热解特性进行了研究，探讨了升温速率对热解过程的影响，然后用Doyle积分法对褐煤的热解进行了动力学分析.研究表明，两种褐煤的热失重过程都分为四个阶段，第一阶段（室温～200 ℃）为干燥脱气阶段，其他三段为煤热解阶段.升温速率对热失重过程略有影响，通过动力学分析所得的热解动力学参数能很好地反映煤的热解情况.@采用热重法（TG）考察了六枝（LZ）、遵义（ZY）和吴家坪（WJP）原煤、脱灰煤及其脱黄铁矿煤的燃烧性能，并对其燃烧性能进行了动力学研究.研究表明：LZ，ZY和WJP脱灰煤的着火温度和燃烧峰温都较其原煤低，其燃烧特性指数较其原煤高，这是由于脱灰煤的燃烧活化能E较其原煤低的缘故.ZY和WJP脱黄铁矿煤的燃烧特性指数S与其脱灰煤相比基本没发生变化，这是由于脱黄铁矿煤的燃烧活化能E和指前因子A都较其脱灰煤大大增加，是二者相互影响的结果.对煤的燃烧行为进行动力学研究发现：LZ，ZY 和WJP原煤、脱灰煤及其脱黄铁矿煤在燃烧区间的某一温度段满足一级反应模型，且线性相关性较好，相关系数大都在0.98以上.@主要利用热分析法研究了催化剂NaClO4，MnO2和BaCO3对劣质煤燃烧性能的影响.结果表明，三种催化剂均可以提高劣质煤的挥发分释放量；各催化剂对煤粉的着火特性和燃尽指数都有不同程度的促进作用，其影响大小排序为：NaClO4>BaCO3>MnO2和BaCO3>MnO2>NaClO4；加入各催化剂后，煤粉的放热量均得到了提高.主要作用机理是：催化剂促进煤中挥发分的析出，降低煤的着火温度并且促进氧气与焦炭的充分接触，从而加速煤的燃烧过程.@以鄂尔多斯烟煤为例，利用间歇反应釜，在超临界水条件下考察了反应温度、水煤比以及K2CO3添加量等因素对煤气化反应的影响.结果表明，温度对煤的转化率和气相收率有重要影响，且转化率和气相收率随温度的升高而增加；增加水煤比会提高煤转化率和气相收率，但其对气体组成和煤转化率影响的幅度随水煤比的增加而减小；在5%~20%（质量分数）煤催化剂添加条件下，煤转化率随催化剂添加量的增加而迅速增加.在研究考察范围内，煤颗粒尺寸在80目~150目范围内，最佳的反应条件是：反应温度为650 ℃，水煤比为20∶1，K2CO3添加量为20%（质量分数）煤.相应的反应结果是：煤转化率达到84%以上，气相收率高于3 000 mL/g daf coal，其中氢气收率为1 900 mL/g daf coal，甲烷收率为450 mL/g daf coal.@针对无井式煤炭地下气化在深部盲孔中点火的特点，研究了化学液体凝固点火剂和点火方法.利用基体燃料甲醇、凝固剂硬脂酸、催化剂甲醇钠、助燃剂铝粉和碳粉、氧化剂高氯酸钾、黏结剂硝化棉、增塑剂石蜡以及稳定剂大苏打制取了性能稳定、燃烧焓为14 246.5 kJ/kg的化学点火剂.点火实验表明，在点火开始后75 min煤层温度达到其燃点；点火后85 min出口气体可燃组分(H2+CO+CH4)含量超过20%，煤层点火成功.@设计并模拟了以Shell和GSP技术为气头的IGCC系统，包括对合成气中的CO进行95%深度变换和不进行变换的不同方案.结果表明，Shell气化为气头的带深度变换和无变换的IGCC系统分别具有34.8%和41.8%的系统热效率.深度变换的优点在于能大规模降低CO2排放，碳的捕获量占系统总碳量的92.5%（Shell，深度变换），而无变换的IGCC方案，这一比例为0-2%.@Texaco气化炉内发生着强烈的传热、传质过程和复杂的化学反应，以质量守恒、能量守恒和化学反应平衡为基础，建立了Texaco气化炉的简化平衡模型.运用Labview软件强大的数学计算和分析功能进行编程，仿真研究了不同水煤浆浓度和氧煤比下合成气各组分的含量，仿真结果与相关实验结果吻合较好.以合成气有效成分（CO+H2）的含量为目标函数，对气化参数进行了优化.研究结果对气化炉的工业操作具有理论指导意义.@为探索小龙潭褐煤气化灰熔聚物及结渣的熔融特性，采用化学分析法和X射线衍射法从煤灰成分和矿物质组成的角度分析了气化炉结渣、灰熔聚物和矸石灰熔融性差异的原因.结果表明，炉内结渣的灰熔点最低，灰熔聚物居中，矸石灰最高.灰分中总碱性组分含量由结渣、灰熔聚物到矸石灰依次减少，导致三种物质的灰熔点依次增加.钙黄长石和钙长石等含钙化合物间形成低熔点共融物是结渣灰熔点低的原因；矸石灰中石英石的含量明显高于灰熔聚物，与矸石灰中莫来石的“骨架”作用导致矸石灰的灰熔点比灰熔聚物高.三种物质灰熔融性差异是由于流化床气化过程中矿物质的迁徙转化引起的.@应用标准k-ε模型、DPM模型和物质输运与化学反应模型求解了一台旁通式循环流化床脱硫塔内的动量、能量及组分方程，模拟结果和实验数据符合较好.模拟研究了两种脱硫塔的脱硫效率和流动阻力，进一步研究了空床气速和循环倍率对旁通脱硫塔脱硫效率的影响.结果表明，旁通式脱硫塔的脱硫效率和阻力特性要优于无旁路脱硫塔；旁通式脱硫塔的脱硫效率随空床气速的增加呈现先略有增加后降低的趋势；当循环倍率从20增大到50时，脱硫效率随之有明显的增加，当循环倍率大于50时，脱硫效率随循环倍率的增大略有增加.@采用连续式超临界水反应装置，以褐煤和焦化废水配制的水煤浆为原料，考察了温度(450 ℃~600 ℃)和水煤浆浓度(20%~50%)对褐煤-焦化废水在超临界水中连续气化制氢的影响.结果表明，在褐煤-焦化废水超临界水共气化制氢过程中，存在明显的协同效应.在浆浓度为20%，600 ℃，25 MPa条件下，褐煤焦化废水共气化的氢气产率和碳气化率比相同条件下二者单独气化的加权平均值分别增加了141.9 mL/g和6.1%.反应温度是影响褐煤焦化废水超临界水共气化制氢的关键因素，随着反应温度从450 ℃提高到600 ℃，氢气的体积分数与产率分别由21.5%和85.3 mL/g增加到42.3%和371.8 mL/g，碳气化率由18.2%增大到29.8%.碳的气化率随水煤浆浓度的升高而降低，最高进浆浓度可达50%（质量分数），无堵塞现象发生.@采用间歇式高压釜，模拟示范工程反应条件，在不同反应温度和停留时间下，考察了神东煤直接液化性能.结果表明，随着反应温度的提高，转化率增加，油产率先增加后降低，气产率增加，沥青质产率减少；随着停留时间的增加，转化率增加，油产率和气产率均增加，沥青质产率下降；适宜的反应温度和停留时间分别为455 ℃和120 min.@为了研究氢气在煤液化油中的溶解规律和煤液化反应过程中的氢耗，选择煤液化油中几种代表性物质的混合组分十六烷四氢萘、四氢萘喹啉、十六烷喹啉作为溶剂，利用平衡液相取样法气体溶解度测定装置，测定了氢气在上述溶剂中不同温度和压力下的溶解度数据（453.15 K~623.15 K，1 MPa~10 MPa），同时给出了氢气在这些混合溶剂体系中的溶解度规律.利用数学模型lnxH2=-aT+bT+clnT+dlnPH2+e（式中参数可由氢气在相应溶剂中的溶解度数据关联得到）和P/N/A方法计算相关溶解度数据，发现该数学模型的计算预测值与实验值的平均绝对误差（η）在5.52%左右，而通过P/N/A方法的计算，预测值与实验值的平均绝对误差较大，这表明该数学模型在计算氢气在有机混合溶剂中的溶解度方面具有很好的应用价值.@在间歇式高压反应釜中，用超临界甲醇对高温煤焦油进行抽提处理，并对产物进行族组分分离，考察温度、压力和时间等反应条件对反应过程特性的影响，用元素分析仪和FT-IR对富集产物进行分析.结果发现，在实验条件下，用超临界甲醇对高温煤焦油进行处理，可以在温和条件下使煤焦油实现一定程度的轻质化，轻油收率从原料煤焦油的65.10%升高至78.19%，H/C比原煤焦油中轻油组分提高了28.24%，比原煤焦油提高了109.62%.压力和温度对产物的分布影响很大，温度的升高不利于轻油组分收率的增加；升高压力，可以得到更多的轻油组分.反应时间对产物分布的影响不大.FT-IR表明，通过超临界抽提，可以使大量高附加值产品在轻油组分中得以富集，有利于煤焦油进一步的加工利用.@煤焦油是焦化企业的主要化工产品，其产量对焦化厂效益有着重要影响.通过对多种炼焦煤资源的考察，找出影响单种煤焦油产率的若干因素，并分析比较了各煤种挥发分、黏结指数和有机显微组分含量等参数对其焦油产率的影响.结合多个参数定义一个新指标——焦油指数，使用该指标表征单种煤的焦油产率，准确度优于其他任何单一参数.根据上述研究结果提出了配合煤焦油产率的预测方法，即配煤的焦油产率可以通过各单种煤的焦油产率和配煤比例加权得出.@以神府3#煤为原料，采用KOH-水蒸气活化法制备了煤基活性炭和氢气.考察了浸渍比、活化温度、活化时间对活性炭吸附性能和活化过程中氢气产量的影响，并对其活化机理进行了探讨.结果表明，活性炭碘值、亚甲基蓝值以及氢气产量受这些工艺参数影响很大，当浸渍比为0.5，活化温度为700 ℃，单元活化时间为10 min时，所制得的活性炭性能较好，碘值达到837 mg/g，亚甲基蓝吸附值达到431 mg/g，此时H2产量约33.1 mmol/g煤.@以重庆万盛高硫煤作为研究对象，选用硝酸预处理去除无机硫，并采用单因子法考察了煤浆浓度、反应时间、反应温度、丙二醇与氢氧化钾的配比对煤中有机硫脱除率的影响.结果表明，对于粒径小于0.075 mm的煤样，丙二醇氢氧化钾脱除煤中有机硫的适宜条件为：煤浆浓度0.05 g/mL，反应时间90 min，反应温度180 ℃，丙二醇与氢氧化钾的配比为1∶1.在此条件下，有机硫从0.72%降到0.35%，脱除率为51.4%.@粉煤灰通过碱熔融预处理，采用水热法(HT)和微波辅助水热法(MW)均合成了单一的NaP1型沸石，研究了溶液pH值和吸附时间对两种沸石产品去除废水中铜离子效果的影响，探讨了沸石产品去除铜离子的吸附机理.研究表明，合成的两种沸石产品对铜离子具有较强的脱除能力，pH值为6，沸石用量10 g/L，吸附30 min时，铜离子去除率均可达95%以上.铜离子的吸附过程符合Langmiur吸附等温方程式，两种沸石产品的静态饱和吸附量分别为70.08 mg/g和53.30 mg/g.@在固定床反应器中考察了USY(超稳Y分子筛)和过渡金属改性USY催化低浓度乙醇脱水制乙烯反应，并通过BET，XRD和NH3-TPD等手段对改性前后的催化剂进行表征.结果表明，Co/USY的催化反应性能较好.当硝酸钴浸渍液质量分数为3%时，催化反应效果最好，乙醇转化率达到93.2%，乙烯选择性达到95.7%.Co/USY催化低浓度乙醇脱水制乙烯反应中乙烯的选择性对反应温度敏感，乙烯选择性由220 ℃的24.0%骤然提高到250 ℃的95.7%，在280 ℃时乙烯选择性达到100%.并且考察了Co/USY的初期稳定性，发现在反应102 h后催化剂仍具有良好的活性.@利用预处理后的气化炉排灰对焦化废水进行了深度处理，通过吸附实验研究了处理焦化废水的工艺条件，并对其吸附原理进行了初步探讨.研究结果表明，通过筛分和浮沉实验能够有效分离出灰分，富集排灰中的富含碳灰渣，其含碳量可达到80%；富含碳灰渣具有较快的吸附速率，在2 h左右达到吸附饱和；富含碳灰渣用量为30 g/L时CODCr去除率可达到88%；Freundlich吸附等温式能较好地描述吸附过程.富含碳灰渣具有较大比例的中孔结构，有利于吸附处理焦化废水，吸附速率大.@以油页岩三种工艺过程产生的残渣（油页岩固体热载体法干馏半焦、油页岩抚顺炉法干馏半焦和油页岩电厂循环流化床细渣）为研究对象，结合不同煅烧温度下的XRD特征研究了煅烧温度、煅烧时间和反应粒度对SiO2利用率的影响规律.结果表明，只有油页岩固体热载体半焦需要煅烧活化，850 ℃下煅烧0.5 h可获得SiO2最大碱浸出率为80%；抚顺炉干馏半焦和热电厂灰渣勿需煅烧活化，其SiO2利用率分别约为75%和60%.@以Fe(NO3)3和Na2S分别作为催化剂前体和原位硫化剂，在20 ℃下分别用水、甲醇（M）、N-N二甲基甲酰胺（DMF）和二甲亚砜(DMSO)对神华烟煤溶胀12 h，同步溶胀担载催化剂后的烟煤脱除溶剂后与轮古常渣（LGAR）和杜84超稠油（Du84）在2∶1油煤质量比，8 MPa冷氢压，420 ℃，1 h的条件下进行加氢共处理.结果表明，神华烟煤经过溶胀处理后与两种重油共处理的液化率都明显提高，煤的转化率明显增大；三种有机溶胀剂相比，DMF同步溶胀促进液化效果最好，其次为DMSO，甲醇最差.两种配油相比，Du84比LGAR更适合煤-重油共处理.XRD分析表明，同步溶胀担载法制备的溶胀煤载铁催化剂以非晶态和高分散的状态存在于溶胀煤表面，在共处理中催化剂最终转化为Fe1-xS.在煤-重油共处理中，经DMF同步溶胀-担载的催化剂失活，结晶相对不明显.@对王家沟（WJG）长焰煤和焦煤（JM）两种原料煤进行了微波共热解实验研究，考察了两种煤配比不同时热解产物的收率及成分变化.结果表明，微波热解条件下，随着混煤中JM比例的增大，焦油收率在逐渐减少,而固体焦的灰分含量与硫含量逐渐增加.SEM照片也表明，固体焦表面的微孔结构越来越多,微孔的边界越来越清晰.煤气中CO2，CO，CH4和CnHm含量在3 min以前随热解时间的延长均逐渐增加，随后逐步减少.随着混煤中JM配比的增大，热解煤气中CO2和CO含量逐渐减少，但CH4和CnHm含量在3 min以前变化不是很明显，在3 min~15 min区间逐渐增加.@利用XRD和FTIR对平朔煤和神东煤的惰质组和镜质组结构进行了测试，并利用TG/MS对其热解脱挥发分行为进行了升温速率为20 ℃/min条件下的在线测试.通过XRD测定，揭示了煤的类石墨结构特征，计算了样品的晶格结构参数: d002，dγ，Lc，La，Me和fa.利用FTIR测定，计算了表征煤结构特征的三个重要参数：脂氢与芳氢比率、脂肪侧链的链长和芳香氢取代情况，揭示了样品的富氢程度、脂肪链的连接及芳核氢的取代情况.样品的热失重和挥发分析出行为与其结构特征相关，重点分析了C1~C4轻质烃类、氢气、苯和苯基的析出行为及机理.@为了发展褐煤综合利用技术和优化利用方法，应用正交筛选实验设计与均匀实验设计方法对霍林河褐煤进行了热水干燥的实验研究，并对正交筛选实验设计与均匀实验设计的结果应用SPSS11.5软件进行分析.确定了影响霍林河褐煤热水干燥的主要影响因素，大大减少了对高度不显著因素的实验研究，减少了实验次数，节约了实验成本和实验时间，并且确定了热水干燥主要影响因素与次要影响因素的最优实验水平.@利用水平管式炉对不同变质程度煤进行了热解和气化实验，并利用傅里叶红外气体分析仪对热解和气化过程中主要含氮产物的释放规律进行了研究.结果发现，煤的变质程度对煤热解和气化过程中HCN的释放具有重要影响，而对NH3的释放影响较小.对于低变质程度煤来说，挥发分含量较高，而挥发分的深度裂解是HCN产生的主要来源.因此，低变质程度煤热解过程中转化为HCN的燃料氮份额高于高变质程度煤；对于不同变质程度煤在热解过程中转化为NH3的燃料氮份额则大致相当.对不同变质程度煤在CO2气氛条件下气化反应过程中含氮产物生成规律的研究发现，焦炭氮几乎全部转化为NO；转化为NH3的燃料氮份额有所增加；除印尼褐煤外，转化为HCN的燃料氮份额也有所增加；此外，对CO2气化过程中NO的生成机理进行分析，认为焦炭氮的直接氧化可能是NO产生的主要来源.@涌入煤层的水量是煤炭地下气化过程中十分重要的影响因素，利用地下气化模型实验平台对涌水条件下的气化过程进行研究.结果表明，平均温度直接反应了煤气组分和热值的高低，煤气有效成分H2，CO，CH4和热值基本上与气化区平均温度呈正相关.在模型实验中，鼓风量和涌水量的最佳比值为2.5∶1，临界比值为1.4∶1，涌入水分解率基本稳定在10%，并且随着涌入水量的提高，分解率在下降，分解的水量基本不变.@以K2CO3为催化剂，利用自行设计的加压固定床反应器进行了神木煤焦-水蒸气催化气化反应动力学研究，并采用n级速率方程和Langmuir-Hinshelwood速率方程考察了水蒸气分压的影响.系统压力为3.5 MPa，气化反应温度分别为600 ℃，650 ℃和700 ℃，其中600 ℃下水蒸气分压分别为1.24 MPa，1.83 MPa和2.88 MPa；650 ℃和700 ℃下的水蒸气分压分别为1.24 MPa，1.83 MPa和2.34 MPa．研究发现，随气化温度的提高和水蒸气分压的增加，煤焦的水蒸气气化反应活性明显提高.采用n级速率方程得到煤焦与水蒸气的反应级数为0.732，活化能为102.63 kJ/mol；采用L-H方程得到活化能为109.23 kJ/mol，其速率方程可以更精确地描述反应气体压力对气化反应的影响.@采用GJ-2型共振搅拌反应釜，首先研究了一定条件下煤液化转化率随时间的变化关系.结果表明，煤液化反应过程中存在着初始高活性反应阶段，而且煤在该阶段完成了绝大部分液化反应；接着研究了氢气在煤液化初始高活性阶段的作用机理.结果如下：1) 在无催化液化条件下，氢气在煤液化初始高活性阶段几乎不参与煤液化反应；2) 煤液化初始高活性阶段氢气能够快速溶解于煤液化溶剂中，因此氢气的溶解过程不是其未有效参与煤液化反应的主要原因；3) 在煤液化初始高活性阶段添加高分散性铁系催化剂和助剂硫，氢气在催化剂作用下参与了煤液化反应，进而使液化总转化率提高7%以上.@为探讨超声波辐射溶胀在煤炭直接液化过程中的积极作用，以吡啶为溶胀剂对神华煤进行了超声波辐射条件下的溶剂溶胀处理，通过对溶胀过程中不同溶胀时间煤样的溶胀度与质量损失情况测定以及超声波辐射溶胀煤与自然溶胀煤的液化实验比较，发现超声辐射有助于煤的溶胀作用，煤液化转化率提高了3%~4%.实验表明，超声溶胀能够进一步提高煤催化加氢直接液化的反应性能.@利用高压反应釜，采取程序控制升温的方法，以义马煤为原料，循环油为溶剂，Fe2O3为催化剂和S为助催化剂，在不同反应时间、温度和初始氢压下，测定了义马煤直接液化效果的影响因素.结果表明，随着温度升高，转化率呈减小趋势，而油产率随着反应温度的增加呈现出先增加后减小的趋势，在380 ℃时油产率达到最大值；随着初始压力的增加，转化率和油产率都有所增加，但增加幅度很小，在9 MPa时油产率达到最大值；随着反应时间的增加，转化率和油产率都有所增加，在120 min时油产率和转化率均达到最大值.@研制了一种复合催化剂，考察了催化剂对神东煤直接液化的催化活性.主要研究了催化剂粒度等因素对直接液化反应的影响，并与煤炭科学研究总院自主研发的“863”催化剂进行对比.结果表明，随着复合催化剂粒径变小，煤液化的转化率和油产率增加；中间产物沥青烯和前沥青烯组分产率基本不变，气产率和氢耗率降低.与“863”铁基催化剂相比，小于74 μm的复合催化剂催化效果要优于后者.该催化剂中含有一定镍，镍的强加氢作用使得煤液化反应转化率和油产率增加.@将自制的煤沥青粉添加到重油中制得浆体燃料煤沥青油浆，对成浆性和流变性的影响规律进行了研究.结果表明，在相同温度下，煤沥青油浆的表观黏度随煤沥青粉添加量的增加而增大，剪切速率相同时黏度随温度的升高而减小.添加不同质量分数制得的煤沥青油浆在同一剪切速率下的黏度随温度的升高而减小，且随温度的升高黏度减小趋势逐渐变小，当煤沥青粉添加量≤12％时，煤沥青粉添加量对煤沥青油浆的流变性影响较小.随着煤沥青粉添加量的增加，煤沥青油浆的低位发热量稍有下降，但降低幅度较小.@以煤焦油蒸馏所得馏分为萃取溶剂，对煤在微波辅助条件下的萃取过程进行研究，主要考察了不同溶煤比和微波辐射时间等因素对萃取率的影响.结果表明，当溶煤比为3∶1且微波辐射为25 min时的萃取率最高，可以达到25.51%，有望为低温煤焦油的合理利用提出一种新途径.萃取残煤的FT-IR和SEM分析检测表明，萃取后残煤样的H/C降低，但煤的大分子结构没有受到破坏.@采用元素分析、红外光谱、XRD及扫描电镜等分析手段对煤焦油QI进行了组成结构的定性分析.结果表明，煤焦油QI主要由焦粉、煤粉、热解碳和高温缩聚产物组成.煤焦油QI经氯化锌溶液浮选分离后，定量地确定了焦粉、煤粉、热解碳和高温缩聚产物在煤焦油中的含量.相关分析数据表明，无烟装煤技术、7.63 m焦炉本身的结构特点和加热制度是造成煤焦油中QI含量偏高的主要原因，其中因高温作用而产生的热解碳及高分子聚合物对QI的贡献占主导地位.@通过氧化栲胶与钒离子以及HS-之间相互反应研究了栲胶在脱硫过程中的作用.对氧化栲胶与钒离子的作用进行研究，结果发现：氧化栲胶和四价钒以及五价钒之间存在络合作用；对氧化栲胶和HS-的作用进行研究，结果发现：两物质之间存在化学反应，反应过程中HS-的浓度随反应时间延长而减少，呈现出先快后慢的趋势；HS-的转化率随着氧化栲胶初始浓度的增大而增大；HS-被氧化栲胶氧化并未生成单质硫，而是生成了一种含硫的有机物.@采用TG-DTG和DTA（热重-热重微分和差热）技术分析研究了褐煤、烟煤以及无烟煤混煤的燃烧特性，获取了混煤燃烧的特性参数，如着火温度（Tb）、最大失重温度（Tm）以及燃尽温度（Tf）.TG-DTG结果表明，升温速率为20 ℃/min时基本能够反映三种煤样的热解特性；DTA结果表明，无烟煤与褐煤之比为3∶7时，烟煤与褐煤之比为3∶7时混煤具有较好的燃烧特性.@针对煤层气热值低的特点，设计了一台煤层气旋流燃烧器，采用数值模拟方法研究了不同热负荷及过量空气系数对燃烧性能的影响，并计算了燃烧污染物的生成.结果表明，在燃烧区域存在逆压梯度，加强了烟气的扰动，有利于形成稳定的高温区，提高燃烧效率.燃烧器负荷调节范围大，低负荷时仍能保持较高的燃烧温度和燃烧效率.过量空气系数为1.05时燃烧温度最高，此时NOx生成最多，仅为25.1 mg/m3.@在水平管式炉上进行了模拟空气和O2/CO2气氛下的煤燃烧特性实验，并利用傅里叶红外光谱仪对烟气成分进行了在线测量，分析了煤种、气氛和温度等对污染物（SO2和NO）排放的影响.结果发现，SO2主要以单峰形式析出，而NO的析出大多数为双峰；煤种对污染物排放的影响较大，硫和氮含量高的煤种相应地SO2和NO的析出量较多；O2/CO2气氛下，SO2和NO的生成总量随着O2浓度的增加而减小；温度（800 ℃~1 000 ℃）对SO2和NO排放的影响不甚明显.但850 ℃时的析出峰峰值最大，释放量也较其他温度多，故850 ℃有利于SO2和NO的析出.@以贫煤为原料，硝酸盐为添加剂，制得中孔发达的活性炭.利用N2吸附脱附曲线对样品孔隙结构进行了表征，并考察了其吸附性能(碘值和亚甲蓝值).结果表明，未加添加剂时，可以得到中孔孔容0.287 4 mL/g，中孔率达72.43%的活性炭；加入添加剂后，微孔孔容和中孔孔容提高了0.05 mL/g左右.结果还表明，实验用硝酸盐有利于微孔的形成，能促进微孔向中孔的发育，提高总孔容；利用不同浓度的添加剂对活性炭的孔隙可进行定向调变.@为研究焦化厂氨法脱硫废液与电厂烟气脱硫液混合后发生的变化，以及混合脱硫液与电厂烟气接触后发生的一系列反应，利用两种不同的脱硫液进行配比，通过采用化学分析方法及仪器分析方法进行实验室实验.结果表明，焦化厂氨法脱硫废液与电厂烟气脱硫液混合后，焦化厂氨法脱硫废液中的氨盐转化为游离氨，可提高脱除烟气中SO2的效率，反应过程无沉淀生成.同时加速了电厂沉降池的沉降速度，为工业化应用提供了良好的理论依据.@考察了吸附平衡时间、污水浓度、液固比、反应温度和pH值对碳酸钠活化煤系高岭土吸附城市生活污水中有机物的影响，在此基础上又研究了吸附等温线.结果表明，当吸附平衡时间为2 h，液固比为60 mL/g，pH为6时，活化煤系高岭土对城市生活污水中有机物的吸附率达到最大，且加热不利于吸附反应的进行.碳酸钠活化煤系高岭土对城市生活污水中有机物的吸附行为更符合Langmuir方程，其吸附是以化学吸附为主.@从我国炼焦煤资源和炼焦工业现状角度论述了二者间存在的矛盾.概述了国内外诸如提高焦炉炭化室高度、捣固炼焦、煤调湿、配型煤炼焦、干熄焦以及利用焦炉处理有机废弃物等措施扩大炼焦煤源的总体情况，以及这些措施对焦炭提质的作用效果，展望了今后焦化工业的技术发展趋势.@为探寻煤结构中小分子噻吩类有机硫的特性以及其与煤性质的关系，以苯并噻吩和二苯并噻吩为研究对象，采用热抽提及GC-MS（色质联用仪）研究不同变质程度煤中可抽提的噻吩类有机硫含量和种类，从而得到原煤中噻吩类有机硫与煤中各性质参数的关系.研究得出，不同煤种中抽提出来的二苯并噻吩的量要高于苯并噻吩的量；原煤中可抽提噻吩硫的量随着碳含量的增加呈现降低的趋势；随着挥发分产率和O/C摩尔比的升高而升高，而与煤中全硫含量没有关系.@采用自制石英弹簧热天平(ZL 00247922.2)对三种淮南煤二氧化碳气化特性进行了实验研究.结果表明，三种淮南煤的二氧化碳活性关系为李嘴孜煤＜李一煤＜潘一煤.由于实现淮南煤完全气化需要较长的时间，根据三种淮南煤不同气化行为特性，若在一定气化转化率时转换为燃烧过程即“部分气化燃烧”，既可以缩短反应时间（减小气化炉的体积），又可实现碳的完全转化.@应用欧拉双流体模型模拟了某化肥厂现运行的灰熔聚流化床煤气化炉（用ICC表示）内的气固两相流动行为,得出了所模拟ICC的合理流化气速与喷动气速的速度范围及匹配关系：流化气速不能太小，否则布风板区域会出现死区；流化气速也不能太大，否则将失去ICC的设计运行特点.当流化气速一定时，随喷动气速的增加，搅动混合增强，但过大的喷动气速会使床内的流动结构出现腾涌，不利于ICC的高效安全运行.@基于化工系统流程模拟软件的应用，初步预测出水煤浆气化炉出口的合成气组成和温度，模拟计算结果与文献基本吻合；此外，通过模拟得到的数据，分析了气化炉的主要操作参数对气化结果的影响，为气化炉的操作优化提供一定的参考依据.@研制了一种复合催化剂，考察了催化剂对神东煤直接液化的催化活性，主要考察了催化剂粒度等因素对直接液化反应的影响，并与煤炭科学研究总院自主研发的“863”催化剂进行对比.研究结果表明，随着复合催化剂粒径变小，煤液化的转化率和油产率增加；中间产物沥青烯和前沥青烯组分产率基本不变，气产率和氢耗率降低.与“863”铁基催化剂相比，小于74 μm的复合催化剂的催化效果要优于后者.该催化剂中含有一定的镍，镍的强加氢作用使得煤液化反应转化率增加，油产率增加.@采用平衡液相取样法气体溶解度测定装置测定了氢气在萘中的溶解规律，并采用间歇式微型反应釜研究了氢气在无催化煤液化中的反应机理.结果表明：1) 氢气在萘中的溶解随着温度和压力的升高而增加，溶解速率先快后慢，在5 min时达到最大溶解量的76.21%左右，直到30 min达到平衡；2) 在萘溶剂的无催化煤液化反应中，氢气的溶解不是控制步骤，溶解氢参与液化反应的速度才是控制步骤；3) 在较短时间的萘溶剂无催化煤液化时，氢气在萘溶剂中的预溶解提高了无催化煤液化的总转化率，其主要原因是部分预溶氢提前活化，使得煤液化反应初期活性氢增加；4) 在较长时间的萘溶剂无催化煤液化时，预溶氢对总转化率的提高很小，但促进了液化产物的进一步裂解加氢轻质化.@采用双珠级配与三珠级配模型，探讨了球料比、研磨时间、温度、入料尺寸和研磨速度对灵武煤制水煤浆成浆性的影响，分别采用干法配浆与湿法配浆的方法进行实验，利用DV-1+PRO数字式黏度计和Rise-2008型激光粒度分析仪对配置浆料的黏度和粒度进行测试.结果表明，当入料尺寸<1 mm，球料比为6∶1，研磨速度为72 r/min时，水煤浆的浓度可以达到68%.10#自制添加剂的使用可以获得性能稳定的水煤浆浆体.@针对煤粉中含有的高价金属离子会降低水煤浆的成浆性问题，采用了三聚磷酸钠作为金属离子调节剂与几种阴离子型分散剂复配后，进一步提高分散降黏性能.通过测定分散剂在煤粒表面的吸附量、Zeta电位及吸附层厚度，揭示了三聚磷酸钠对脂肪族分散剂（SAF）、木质素系分散剂(GCL3S)及萘系分散剂(FDN)的分散协同增效作用机理.结果表明，三聚磷酸钠与SAF复配同时增加了煤粒之间的静电排斥力和空间位阻，使分散剂在煤粒表面的Zeta电位和吸附层厚度均增大；与GCL3S复配主要增加了煤粒之间的静电排斥作用；对FDN是通过增加分散剂在煤粒之间的空间位阻效应，促进分散降黏性能的提高.@利用造纸黑液和褐煤制备了水煤浆，讨论了最高成浆浓度、流变性、稳定性和加入添加剂种类及用量各因素对黑液煤浆性能的影响.实验结果表明，褐煤和造纸黑液可以制成性能良好的煤浆；制得的煤浆均表现出优越的流变性和稳定性；稀释5倍的黑液制得的煤浆综合性能最好；加入分散剂和稳定剂后，可大幅降低煤浆的黏度，同时也提高了稳定时间.@列举了某钢厂引进的澳大利亚几个矿点焦煤，按国内常用煤炭工业指标以及煤岩指标应划为优质焦煤，将其简单按优质焦煤配用，配用效果并不理想.通过膨胀度、流动度及焦炭显微结构分析，发现其与国内优质焦煤存在较大差异，将其进行优化配用，焦炭质量得以稳定.@研究了典型煤料范各庄1/3焦煤在不同堆密度条件下胶质层指数和最终收缩度及胶质层体积曲线的变化规律.结果表明，范各庄1/3焦煤堆密度从0.8 t/m3增加到1.1 t/m3时，煤料的胶质层指数Y由17.7 mm增加到24.5 mm， 增加了7.8 mm，提高了44.1%；其最终收缩度由25.2 mm降到-7.9 mm，增加131%，表明煤料结焦后的体积变化为正膨胀性能.在煤料堆密度增加后，其胶质层体积曲线由 “之”字型向“之”与“山”混合型及“山”字型转变，表明煤料的表观黏结性能得到明显改善，且在密度较高时由1/3焦煤向肥煤性能靠近.@根据粉尘云最低着火温度的测试原理，自行建立了H2/CO/CH4/CO2混合燃气着火温度测定实验系统.基于该实验系统，研究了初始条件为常温常压下的H2/CO/CH4/CO2混合燃气着火特性，分别测得不同混合比例以及不同一次风率下混合燃气的着火温度.结果表明：燃气着火温度随H2含量的增加而降低，随CH4含量的增加而升高，CO含量的增加对燃气着火温度的影响具有双重性.系统热力条件一定，燃气的着火温度基本不变，与一次风率无关.测得H2，CO以及CH4的着火温度分别为563 ℃，667 ℃和790 ℃.@煤矸石是我国排放量最大的一种固体废弃物，其中含有丰富的氧化铁资源，为了高效提取煤矸石中的氧化铁，从化学反应动力学角度出发，对硫酸浸取煤矸石中Fe2O3的动力学进行研究.结果表明，该反应的动力学符合未反应收缩芯模型，反应的动力学方程是：1-（1-XB）2/3＝kt，反应频率因子是13 240，反应活化能是5.8×104 J/mol，过程速率为流体液膜扩散速率控制.@就添加煤灰对低灰高挥发分煤发热量的影响，及煤灰添加量和煤灰中硫含量对煤发热量的影响进行研究.结果表明，添加煤灰可有效解决低灰高挥发分煤测发热量时易喷溅的问题.煤灰中硫含量对煤发热量的影响较小，煤灰加入量为0.1 g/g煤时，可保证测量的准确性和可靠性.@把氢氧化钾活化的石油焦基活性炭进行浓硫酸氧化，并对氧化物进行热处理，得到不同氧含量的活性炭，并用氮气物理吸附和XPS对活性炭的孔及其表面化学官能团进行了表征.研究了二氧化碳在不同氧含量活性炭上的吸附平衡容量随温度的变化以及氧含量对于二氧化碳吸附容量的影响.结果表明：在25 ℃~175 ℃和0.001 MPa~1.5 MPa的范围内，二氧化碳在活性炭上的吸附可以用Langmuir方程很好地描述，饱和覆盖度和黏附系数均随温度的升高而下降，吸附热随活性炭的氧化和热处理变化很小.随活性炭O/C比的增加，饱和覆盖度下降，而黏附系数增加.适合二氧化碳吸附的活性炭应具有适中的O/C比，O/C比太大和太小均不利于二氧化碳的吸附.@选择了三种不同基体炭为主体，经成型、炭化与浸渍制备的样品为对象，采用扫描电镜(SEM)，XRD和热导率测定等分析手段，分别研究了石墨化前后C/C复合材料的微观结构形态及导热性能变化.结果表明，炭化样品的视密度为1.61 g/cm3~1.70 g/cm3，石墨化度较低，且热导率较小.以D8 μm单束丝经两维编制的样品呈现出整齐排列，热传导各向异性比为4.7倍.采用非编制纤维束黏结压制成型的样品以及石墨粉压制成型的样品，其导热性能在两维方向上表现为各向同性.2 700 ℃石墨化后样品的视密度在1.61 g/cm3~1.69 g/cm3，没有显著变化.热导率随石墨化度提高而增大，最大增幅达到石墨化前的15倍.单束丝样品热传导各向异性比从4.7扩大到6.3.非编制纤维束黏结压制成型样品的导热性仍保持各向同性，径向为222.27 W/（m·K），轴向为243.40 W/（m·K）；此外，在室温~300 ℃范围内，2 700 ℃石墨化后C/C复合材料的热导率均随温度升高呈现出不同程度的下降趋势.@应用热再生及热氧化再生法研究了活性炭担载氧化铁脱硫剂（Fe/AC）的再生性能.选用氮气、氮气加水蒸气、氮气加氧气以及氮气加氢气四种气氛分别在350 ℃，400 ℃，450 ℃和500 ℃四个温度点上考察了脱硫剂再生性能.发现在高于硫沸点（446 ℃）的450 ℃和500 ℃时， 氮气加水蒸气和氮气加氧气的热氧化再生效果较好，脱硫剂的活性位能够较好地被还原，经三次再生后仍能保持较好的脱硫性能.@实验采用共沉淀法制备铈掺杂铁锰氧化物脱硝催化剂，对催化剂进行了XRD，TPR和比表面积表征和测试，并对不同铈含量的催化剂进行脱硝性能研究.结果表明,催化剂中添加氧化铈后无规则和非晶态粒子增多，催化剂的低温还原能力有所增强.当稀土氧化物添加量在1%～10%之间时，比表面积呈现递增趋势，添加6％氧化铈的催化剂孔容最大.脱硝实验表明，铈含量增大提高了催化剂在低温区脱硝活性.在500 ℃以后，随温度的继续增高，催化剂的NOx脱除率开始降低.@为提高从油页岩热解煤气中回收的粗苯产品的经济效益，研究了对回收的粗苯进行精制的分离序列，模拟常规精馏序列和热耦合精馏序列分离粗苯的过程并计算其能耗和热力学效率.结果表明，在轻组分含量较高的粗苯精制分离序列中，完全热耦合精馏序列仍然具有较好的节能效果.其能耗比常规精馏序列中能耗最小的直接分离序列节能约35%，热力学效应也由7.4%提高到11.6%.@采用二氧化碳为潜伏酸化剂代替强酸,结合醋酸的高选择性分离方法，研究以油页岩制油残渣为原料，低腐蚀低能耗条件下制备高品质白炭黑的工艺方法，并揭示工艺条件对白炭黑产品的粒径分布影响规律.经X射线荧光光谱分析、红外光谱分析、X射线衍射和扫描电镜分析，对产物白炭黑进行了表征.结果表明，采用均相化学沉淀法，由残渣碱提取液硅酸钠溶液制备白炭黑的最佳工艺条件为：反应温度50 ℃, 硅酸钠溶液浓度为0.0 274 g/mL，CO2流速为20 mL/min，表面活性剂聚乙二醇6 000的用量为0.007 g/mL， 此工艺条件下得到的白炭黑粒径最小，为20 nm~30 nm，经醋酸分离提纯后的白炭黑纯度为98.4%.@针对林业加工剩余物中常见的松木和慈竹两种生物质，采用非等温热重分析法研究了其热解及动力学特性，考察了不同CO2浓度和升温速率下的热解特性，采用不同反应模型进行动力学特性分析.结果表明,随着CO2浓度增大，低温热解区失重率变化较小，而高温热解区失重率和最大失重速率显著增大；随升温速率的升高，高温热解区存在热解滞后现象；N级反应模型和体积收缩反应模型分别适用于低温和高温热解区动力学参数的求解.@利用Aspen Plus软件建立生物质化学链气化制取合成气模型，对铁基生物质化学链气化制取合成气进行模拟计算，分析气化过程中温度和压力等因素变化对生物质气化制取合成气的影响，探讨了氧载体存在对生物质气化过程的影响.结果表明，H2和CO是生物质化学链气化产生的合成气中最主要的两种产物，气化温度的提高对气化过程是有利的，而压力的提高降低了气化效果，气化温度在800 ℃~850 ℃较为适宜；载氧体的存在能显著提高合成气的产率.@
The paper studied the distribution characteristic of EPA-PAHs in the pyrolysis gas of coals, the coals were low rank coals which suit for underground gasification and the pyrolysis experiment was carried out at 600 ℃. The relationship between the concentration of EPA-PAHs and the elemental composition of the coals was discussed. The results showed that, following with the elevation of coal rank, the concentration of low-ring PAHs decrease, while the concentration of high-ring PAHs and the total amount of EPA-PAHs in the pyrolysis gas rise. Naphthalene, acenaphthene, acenaphthylene, fluoranthene, pyrene and benzo(a)anthracene were the major component of EPA-PAHs. The three-rings PAHs take the highest percentage of 67-57%. When the carbon content is 76.98％, H/C molar ratio is 0.94, O/C molar ratio is 0.16 and the volatile content is 43.32%, the total amount of EPA-PAHs released from said coal reached the highest level.@Based on space arrangement, size and running parameters of equipments and pipes in CH4-CO2 reforming with carbonaceous catalyst, this paper establishes calculation model of frictional resistance and local resistance, analyzes pressure loss of equipments and pipes by model, and optimizes the size of some equipments and pipes. The result shows that O2 accumulator tank, reheating furnace and O2 pipes have much pressure loss.After optimization, total pressure loss of system reduced from 8 260.6 Pa to 3 289.9 Pa. When entrance pressure is 40 MPa, exit pressure was 0.036 7 MPa.@This thesis is aimed at developing new Mn-Cu sorbents with aluminate sol. The thesis also investigated the influence of sintering temperature, reduction time, sol amounts and space velocity on the sorbents’ desulfurizating behaviour. The experiment results indicated that 900 ℃ is the best sintering temperature and the pre-reduction process of 0.5 h in N2 and H2 would significantly improve the desulfruizing behaviour. The addition of aluminates sol not only prolonged the breakthrough time but also boosted the desulfurization depth. The behaviour of different sorbents’ to space velocity are disparate. However, the breakthrough time in low space velocity is much longer than in the higher one in general.@The coke mechanical strength is an important index of coke quality, and an accurate predictive model of coke mechanical strength can ensure the coking production going well. Predicting the coke mechanical strength by support vector regression and detailedly analyzing the different forecasting effects with the different indexes of the blend coal and the coking process, the effective characteristic parameters are founded to establish the coke mechanical strength model. With the characteristic parameters selected, when 85≤M25≤90 or 6≤M10≤12, the predictive accuracy of the support vector machines model is high, the predictive error is small, the  correlation is strong, and the generalization ability of the prediction model is great.@The reflectance distribution of coal vitrinite and other coal properties of eighteen individual coals of Shuicheng Steel which are classified into six groups has been determined and analyzed. The analytical results of coal properties and coking tests for the eighteen individual coal samples have been analyzed and evaluated. The test results show the coals of Baohua group are the main factor which influences coke quality of Shuicheng Steel. So it is suggested the coals of Baohua group are divided into three sub-groups and stacked separately in three coal piles for coal blending. Three optimum coal blend schemes have been put forward based on reflectance distribution of coal vitrinite and common property parameters of coal. The coke quality is improved obviously and much superior to that of current production coal blend at Shuicheng Steel. The research shows that using the reflectance distribution diagram of coal vitrinite is an effective means of guiding optimization of coal blending and especially effective for controlling and stabilizing coke property at high temperature. It is useful and more convenient to guide coal blending by using reflectance distribution diagram of coal vitrinite when there is a lot of kind of coals and/or there are mixed coals for blending.@Aimed at overcoming the problem of high water content in semi-coke product and large water consumption in the production process in the north of Shaanxi Province, the technological scheme of the pyrogenous coal gas used as semi-coke quenching medium to quench and extinguish the hot semi-coke was proposed in this paper. Based on the low-temperature carbonization process carried out in the shaft internal heating type furnace, the material balance, heat balance of semi-coke is calculated and energy consumption is analyzed. The results showed that the new process with semi-coke dry quenching technology could save almost 203 kg water and 643.30 MJ per ton of semi-coke, with the semi-coke sensible heat effectively recycle, as a result, water content in product can be obviously reduced. Meanwhile, the theoretical semi-coke yield can be improved because of the decrease of water gas reaction. The technology shows a good application foreground.@Phenols in L-tar and H-tar of low temperature coal tar from Shanbei was extracted by soda wash method. The L-tar and H-tar were distilled into 170 ℃-240 ℃, 240 ℃-270 ℃ and 270 ℃-300 ℃fractions. And the total phenol content in these fractions were evaluated. The minimum amount of soda that completely reactioned with certain fraction oil was determined by the minimum soda-oil ratio. The best extraction condition was got by the orthogonal experiment. The yields of crude phenols from the fractions of L-tar were 29.21%, 19.70%, 16-95% under the best extraction condition, and the yields were 95.05%, 93.19%, 90.30%, corresponding to the total phenols in the fractions. For H-tar, the yields of crude phenols were 58.40%, 40.99%, 41.55%, and the yields were 91.19%, 87.74%, 85.83%, corresponding to the total phenols in the fractions. It is proved that phenols were extracted completely from low temperature coal tar by soda wash method through GC/MS analysis of soda washed oil.@The sulfur fixation characteristics of co-combustion wheat straw, cotton stalk, corn stalk and high-sulfur low quality coal respectively were researched with quick intelligence sulfur analyzer. The influence of different mixing ratios, temperature and the composition of biomass ash to sulfur fixation ratio was analyzed. The results of experiment indicate that temperature make major impact on sulfur fixation ratio, the total sulfur fixation ratio decreases with temperature rising. In the same temperature, higher content of biomass makes better sulfur fixation effect. Sulfur fixation effect is different using different biomass. The contents of chlorine and alkali metal in biomass make great impact on sulfur fixation effect.@A series of coal-based activated carbons were prepared from different coal rank of Taixi anthracite and Shenhua bituminous by KOH activation. Pore structure of activated carbons was investigated by nitrogen adsorption. The influence law and mechanism of coal blending to the pore structure of activated carbons were studied. The results showed that the  high specific surface area activated carbons(2 817 m2/g-3 134 m2/g) can be prepared with different ratio of coal blending. The ratio of coal blending was the main factor to influence the pore size distribution of activated carbons. With the increasing of the ratio of high rank coal in coal blending, the pore size distribution of activated carbons narrowed, and the ratio of mesopore volume decreased. The difference of the structure and properties of raw coal is the main reason to cause the difference of pore structure of coal-based activated carbons of different coal rank. The pore size distribution of activated carbons can be adjusted effectively by coal blending.@Hollow carbon nanoparticles with particle size of 20 nm-40 nm have been synthesized in a metal-containing system using N,N-dimethyllformamide (DMF) as the carbon source via detonation-assisted chemical vapor deposition. More significantly, it was found that hollow carbon nanoparticles can be self-assembled synthesized without metal catalyst. In this process, the structures and sizes of the carbon nanoparticles are heavily depending on the ratio of explosive and carbon source. If the ratio of expolsive∶DMF is appropriate, hollow carbon nanoparticles are over 95%, and their particle size is around 10 nm with a narrow size distribution.@Using the gangue as raw materials, the process synthesis of gangue-based adsorbent by self-transformation of gangue were studied under hydrothermal conditions; meanwhile, crystallization directing agent was added under low temperature and ultrasonic conditions. Its adsorption properties were primarily studied by means of static nitrogen-adsorption capacity method so that the nitrogen-adsorption isotherm, specific surface and pore distribution were measured under hydrothermal, crystallization directing agent at low temperature and ultrasonic conditions. The crystal phase of products was analyzed by XRD spectrum. The adsorption isotherm of gangue-based adsorbents synthesized by the two alternative methods was obtained by the adsorbent experiment of phenol. The results show that the specific surface area and adsorption capacity of the gangue-based adsorbent were effectively enhanced by crystallization directing agent at low temperature and ultrasonic method. XRD and particle size distribution spectrums show that the diameter of the products synthesized by crystallization directing agent at low temperature and ultrasonic method was far lower than that of the products synthesized by the traditionally hydrothermal method. The products have uniform granularity likewise. The crystallization temperature was evidently decreased by the energy supply of ultrasonic.@This manuscript designed, simulated and carried 3E assessment of energy consumption, CO2 emission and economic cost of three dimethyl ether production systems in China, which are based on gas-phase methanol dehydration process (conventional process), gas-phase methanol dehydration integrated with coal gasification process (coal gasification process), and polygeneration process integrating coal gasification and wind power water dehydration (polygeneration process). And sensitivity analysis is performed on sensitive factors affecting the economic costs of dimethyl ether such as coal price, methanol price and equivalent capacity factor of coal-wind combined system.@Fe-Mo/ZSM-5 has a good NOx catalytic activity. In this basis, we compared the preparation methods of catalyst powder, catalyst additives, carriers and other factors on the honeycomb catalyst reduction. The results show that the catalytic activity prepared monolithic catalysts by gas phase ion exchange method is the best, at 350 ℃, the catalytic activity can be reach more than 90%. In high temperature（350 ℃-600 ℃）catalytic activity remained at 100%. The addition of K+ catalyst additives help increase powder catalytic activity. Powder catalyst impregnated on the carrier and roasting 2 times is the best.@This article use immersion method to make catalyst using active carbon supported acetate zinc, studied general immersion method and ultrasonic immersion method respectively, and got the optimum conditions of ultrasonic immersion method: dipping time 30 min, sound frequency 28 MHz, soaking temperature 45 ℃. The zinc acetate content of the catalyst made in this condition has raised 7% and specific surface has raised 30% compared to the catalyst made in general immersion method. Experimental results reveal that the catalyst made in ultrasonic immersion method has remarkable improvement compared to the catalyst made in general immersion method, and the catalyst activity improved about 34.54 at 180 ℃.@Pyrolysis characters of Daqing oil shale was carried out by TG analysis, including the rate of heating speed and final temperature. It is concluded that major factor on pyrolysis is temperature. With the increase of temperature, the yield rate of volatile matter improves. And the pyrolysis character temperature of oil shale and maxium pyrolysis volecities were increased remarkabley. A kinetic model was built according to the DTG curves. The varieties on functional group of oil shale and semi-coke were analyzed by FTIR, which suggested that the functional groups of oil shale were similar to coal. The absorbance of simi-coke functional groups was decrease gradually with the increase of final temperatures.@The development of coal to olefin technology made coal-based ethylene process producing PVC become an option. In this paper, different technology processes of carbon emissions (direct and indirect carbon emissions) were calculated and analyzed. Compared to coal-based ethylene PVC (pure boiler model) production process, calcium carbide and coal-based ethylene PVC (boiler+gas turbine mode) show lower carbon emissions. In addition, little mercury pollution was produced by the latter, so that there was certain advantage in the comprehensive degree of CO2 emission reduction, energy conversion efficiency, cost and clean production etc.@The effect that the phosphorus in the municipal wastewater was adsorpted by roasting temperature, sulfuric acid concentration and coal-measures kaoline consumption was studied, then the adsorption isothermal, adsorption dynamics and adsorption thermodynamic were studied too. The result showed when the roasting temperature was 700 ℃; the sulfuric acid concentration was 70% and the coal-measures kaoline consumption was 0.75 g (per 50 mL water), the adsorption rate could be arrived the highest respectively.The action that the phosphorus in the municipal wastewater was adsorpted by sulfuric acid-activated coal-measures kaoline more fitted in the Freundlich model. Kinetic analysis showed that the adsorption rate was mainly governed by liquid film diffusion, and the adsorption process released heat.@There is lots of lignite in China and most of the lignite is used directly in power generation nearby. However, the application of lignite in power generation results in a high capital cost and low combustion efficiency because of its high moisture content. Thus the dewater of lignite is very important. The moisture content of lignite can be decreased by drying with the changes in its internal composition and structure. Based on its high porosity, it is suggested to model the drying process as a porous media in this paper. Therefore, the drying process characteristics of porous media is firstly addressed. Moreover, the current drying mechanism of porous media and its future trend are introduced detailedly.@The modes of occurrence and cleaning mechanism of hazardous trace elements in coal were illustrated and pointed that the migration behavior of trace elements in coal were dominated by their organic affinities; the trace elements associated with inorganic minerals can be removed; meanwhile summarized the research situation of removing hazardous trace elements by conventional washing methods and pointed the trace elements can be removed by conventional methods; focused on the analysis of research progress of removing hazardous trace elements by magnetic separation.@Issues related to coal grading utilization technology were discussed systematically in this paper. Based on the scientific concept of grading quality proposal and process route analysis, in addition to combined with Shanbei’s resource superiority of abundant  low rank coal and salt, three types of Shanbei resources’ comprehensive and efficient utilization technologies centered with coal grading utilization technology such as coal grading utilization-novel salt chemical engineering utilization mode, coal grading utilization-coal-based substitution for petroleum chemicals mode, coal grading utilization-SNG utilization mode were proposed. And the technical and cost-effect analysis have also been carried out. This work is significant for guiding the use of low rank coal in China.@In view of that the gas calorific value is low, the experimental program of the oxygen enriched carbonization is proposed based on on-the-spot investigation of coal low-temperature carbonization application present situation in Yulin Northern Shaanxi. The theoretical calculation and the analysis of the experimental data have proved that the oxygen enriched carbonization is feasible. The oxygen enriched carbonization can decrease the nitrogen content and increase the effective combustible component content in the gas, it causes the gas calorific value significantly increased and have solved the problem of environmental pollution and resource-wasting because the low calorific value gas was utilized effectively and released into the air.@The pyrolysis characteristics of mongolia lignite and indonesian lignite were investigated, and the influence of heating rate on the weight loss process were also discussed. The kinetic of the lignites pyrolysis were analysed with Doyle integration. The studys show that the weight loss process of the two lignites can be divided into four stages, in which the first stage(R.T.-200 ℃) is the process of drying degasification, and other stages are the pyrolysis process. The heating rate has slight effect on pyrolysis curve, and the kinetic parameters which was got by Doyle integration can reflect the pyrolysis condition well.@In this study, the combustion behavior of coals and their treated coals, Liuzhi (LZ), Zunyi (ZY) and Wujiaping (WJP) raw coals, their deashed coals and depyrited coals, was investigated by a thermogravimetric analyzer (TGA92), and the kinetic model about coal combustion was also studied. For the deashed coals, the temperatures of kindling point and combustion peak all decrease compared to their raw coals, which may be related to lower activation energy in the deashed coals. For the ZY and WJP depytied coals, the combustion characteristic index is almost same to that of their deashed coals, the reason should be that the activation energy and pre-exponential factor, which co-affect the temperature of kindling point, combustion peak, the average and maximum ratio of coal combustion, all increased intensely in those depyrited coals. It is found that the kinetic model of coals combustion is first order reaction in a definition region of whole combustion range, and the most of correlative linearity factors is higher than 0.98.@The influence of the inferior coals with NaClO4, MnO2, or BaCO3 on the characteristics of coal combustion was investigated by thermo-gravimetric(TG) analysis. The results indicated that the catalysts can enhance the release of volatile matters of the coals, furthermore, the ignition and burnout characteristics of the coal with catalysts are improved to some extent, on which the catalytic activity of the catalysts are in the order of NaClO4>BaCO3>MnO2 and BaCO3>MnO2>NaClO4 respectively. Simultaneously, the catalysts can increase the quantity of heat releasing of the coal. The function principle of the catalysts to the inferior coals is that the catalysts can promote the release of volatile matters and the contact of oxygen and coke, thus, the ignition temperature of the coal is decreased and the process of coal combustion is accelerated.@The Erdos bituminous coal is gasified with K2CO3 as the catalyst in supercritical water (SCW) using a batch tank reactor. The effects of temperature, H2O/coal ratio, and amount of K2CO3 loadings are tested and investigated. Experimental results indicate that temperature has significant effect on the coal conversion and gas yield, and both the conversion rate and gas yield increase with increasing temperature; greater water/coal ratio can increase the coal conversion rate and gas yield, but the effect is less profound as the water/coal ratio increases; in the range of the catalyst loading between 5%-20%coal, the coal conversion increases appreciably with increasing catalyst loading amount. In this investigation, the optimum operating conditions are found at 650 ℃, 25 MPa, coal particle size within the range of 80 mesh-150 mesh, water/coal mass ratio of 20∶1, and K2CO3 concentration of 20%coal, and the coal conversion, gas yield, hydrogen yield, and methane yield are 84%, 3 000 mL/g daf coal, 1 900 mL/g daf coal and more than 450 mL/g daf coal respectively.@The solidified liquid chemical ignition agent and ignition method are investigated in consideration of characteristics of the ignition in deep blind hole of the non-well underground coal gasification. The chemical ignition agent with stable performance and a combustion enthalpy of 14 246.5 kJ/kg is prepared with methanol as main fuel, stearic acid as coagulant, sodium methoxide as catalyst, aluminum and carbon powder as combustion improver, potassium perchlorate as oxidizer, nitrocellulose as binder, paraffin as plasticizer and sodium thiosulfate as stabilizer. The ignition test result shows that the coal seam temperature reaches ignition point 75 min after ignition; 85 min after ignition combustible component (H2+CO+CH4) composition of exit gas exceeds 20% and this indicates that the coal seam is successfully ignited.@IGCC systems based on Shell and GSP gasification are designed and simulated, including a deep shift with 95% of CO conversion and no shift. The results show that the IGCC systems with the deep shift and without the deep shift based on the Shell gasification has the thermal efficiency of 41.8% and 34.8% respectively. The advantage of the system with the deep shift is that can greatly decrease CO2 vent. The ratio of carbon capture to total carbon is 92.5%. However, to the IGCCs with no shift, this ratio is 0.2%.@Intensive heat transfer, mass transfer and complex chemical reactions have been occurred in Texaco gasifier. In this paper, based on mass balance, energy balance and chemical equilibrium, a simplified mathematical model has been established for Texaco gasifier, and using the powerful Labview software, the effect of coal-water slurry concentration and oxygen-coal ratio on the content of each synthesis gas component are  simulated, the simulation results agree well with the experimental results, and also taking the content of the effective ingredient (CO+H2) of synthesis gas as an objective function, the gasification parameters are optimized. This study provide technical support for the optimization operation of industrial Texaco gasifier.@In order to understand the fusion characteristics of the agglomerates from the fluidized-bed gasification, the experiment was conducted to investigate the differences of ash fusion temperatures (AFTs) of the slag in the gasifier, spherical agglomerates and coal gangue ashes. It was analyzed from the aspects of coal ash ingredients and mineral crystal phase composition by chemical analysis and X-ray diffraction method (XRD). The results show that the AFTs of three ash residues are elevated from slag, spherical agglomerates to coal gangue ashes. The changes of ash compositions contribute to the variations of AFT, the decreasing of the total basic composition in three ash residues make AFTs increase, and vice versa. Low temperature molten matrix formed by gehlenite, anorthite and other calcium compounds make the AFTs of slag lower than the other two; the content of quartz in coal gangue ashes is higher that of spherical agglomerates and the skeleton role of mullite lead to the AFT of coal gangue ashes is higher than that of spherical agglomerates. The fusion characteristics differences of three ash residues are mainly caused by the migration and conversion during the process of Xiaolongtan lignite fluidized-bed gasification.@Momentum, energy and composition equations of a new CFB desulfurization tower with gas bypass are solved by standard k-ε model, DPM, species transport and finite-rate chemistry model, and numerical simulation results agree well with the experimental results. The characteristics of desulfurization and flow resistance of two desulfurization towers are researched by numerical simulation, and the influence of gas velocity and circulation rate to desulfurization efficiency of bypassing desulfurization tower is also researched. The results show that both desulfurization and flow resistance characteristics of bypassing desulfurization tower are better than those of non-bypassing desulfurization tower. When gas velocity increases, desulfurization efficiency of bypassing desulfurization tower slightly increases and then decreases; desulfurization efficiency increases clearly when circulation rate of desulfurizing agent increases from 20 to 50, but it only has a slight increase when circulation rate is more than 50.@Hydrogen production from lignite and coking waste water was performed in a continuous supercritical water reactor with feeding of coal water slurry. The effects of reaction temperature (450 ℃-600 ℃) and slurry concentration (20%-50%) were investigated. The results showed that the hydrogen yield and coal gasification efficiency in the co-gasification of lignite and coking waste water were higher than the separate gasification of them at the same conditions; the reaction temperature was a key parameter in the co-gasification, and the hydrogen concentration and yield increased from 21.5% and 85.3 mL/g to 42.3% and 371.8 mL/g by increasing the temperature from 450 ℃ to 600 ℃; 50% coal-water-slurry was continuously transported and stably gasified without plugging problems; carbon gasification efficiency of the co-gasification increased by increasing temperature and decreasing the slurry concentration.@The direct liquefaction performance of Shendong coal was systemactically investigated in a batch autoclave. The results showed that with increasing of temperature, the total conversion and gas yield are also increasing, PAA yield is decreasing, oil yield is increasing and then decreasing; with increasing of reaction time, the total conversion, gas yield and oil yield are also increasing, PAA yield is decreasing; the suitable reaction temperature is 455 ℃, and reaction time is 120 min.@In order to research the regular pattern of hydrogen dissolved in coal liquefied oil and hydrogen consumption in the coal direct liquification process, data on the high-pressure solubility of hydrogen in hexadecane-1,2,3,4-tetrahydronaphthalene, 1,2,3,4-tetrahydronaphthalene-quinoline, hexadecane-quinoline at temperatures from 453.15 K to 623.15 K and pres-sures from 1 MPa to 10 MPa were determined with an experiment-established apparatus that measured the solubility in vapor-liquid phase equilibrium sampling way. Meanwhile, the regular pattern of hydrogen dissolved was revealed in these mixed solvent system. A mathematical model based on Pierotti method and Henry law is proposed. Calculation of solubility of hydrogen in these mixed solvent system with the mathematical model that the expression of model is lnxH2=-aT+bT+clnT+dlnpH2+e, in which related parameters in model is obtained by regression of known solubility data for different solvents showed that the average absolute deviation(η) between regression values and experimental results is around 5.52%, while the average absolute deviation between calculation of solubility of hydrogen in these mixed solvent system with P/N/A model and experimental results is larger. The study indicated that the mathematical model has best application value in counting solubility of hydrogen in organic solvent mixtures.@In the batch autoclave, high temperature coke-oven coal tar was extracted by supercritical methanol, and separated products using clan component separation, investigated the affect to the reaction characteristics impacted by reaction conditions such as temperature, pressure, time, etc. and analyzed the enrichment products with FTIR and elemental analyzer. The results showed that processing high temperature coal tar with supercritical methanol, coal tar in mild conditions can be upgraded in some extent, the yield of light oil was up to 78.19% comparing with 65.10% from coal tar in raw materials, H/C ratio increased 28.24% comparing with the light oil in raw coal tar and increased 109.62% comparing with the raw coal tar pressure and temperature have a great influence on the distribution of the product. The rising temperature is not conducive to increasing the yield of light oil fractions; lifting pressure can gained more light oil component; reaction time has little effect on product distribution in experimental conditions. FT-IR shows that after supercritical extraction, a large number of high value-added products can be enriched in the light oil fractions and that is conducive to further processing and utilization of coal tar.@Coal tar is the major chemical product of coking plant, so its yield has great influence on the benefit of coking plants. By studying different kinds of single coal, several factors such as volatile component, caking index and macerals were found to affect the tar’s yield. The tar index which contained the above three parameters was first defined and was proved to be effective to characterize the tar’s yield of single coal. According to above research, a new method was proposed to anticipate the tar yield of blending coal.@Activated carbons and hydrogen were prepared by KOH activation combined with steam activation from Shenfu 3# coal. Effects of ratio of KOH to the coal, heat treatment temperature, activation time on activated carbons performance  and hydrogen product were studied. Activation mechanism was also discussed. The results indicated that iodine number is 837 mg/g, methylene blue adsorption value is 430 mg/g with the activated carbon prepared at 700 ℃ for unit activation time 10 min, with addition of KOH whose ratio to the coal is 0.5. Under the same condition, about 33.1 mmol for each gram of coal is released during the activation.@The removal behavior of organic sulfur in Wansheng high sulfur coal has been investigated. The inorganic sulfur has been removed by nitric acid. The effects of the concentration of coal slurry, the extraction time and temperature, the ratio of 1,2-propanediol to potassium hydroxide on desulfurization efficiency were studied in single factor method. The optimized desulfurization conditions were concentration of coal 0.05 g/mL, reaction time 90 min, reaction temperature 180 ℃ and 1∶1 volume ratio of 1,2-propanediol to potassium hydroxide, as coal granule size was 0.075 mm. Under these conditions, the organic sulfur has come down from 0.72% to 0.35%, and the coal defulfurization efficiency can come up to 51.4%.@Single-phase NaP1 zeolite(ZFA) was synthesized through hydrothermal method(HT) and microwave assisted hydrothermal method(MW) from coal fly ash(CFA) pretreated by Na2CO3 fusion, the effects of pH value and adsorption time on the Cu2+ removal efficiency were investigated. The results showed that the two ZFAs through HT and MW also have high removal efficiency of Cu2+, at 25 ℃, solution pH value of 6, sorbent dose of 10 g/L, and contact time of 30 min, the Cu2+ removal efficiency is over 95%. The adsorption of Cu2+ on the two ZFAs fits the Langmuir isotherm well and the greatest adsorption capacity of HT-ZFA and MW-ZFA was 70.08 mg/g and 53.30 mg/g.@USY and transition metal modified USY (M/USY) were used as catalyst to investigate the dehydration of low concentration ethanol to ethylene. The physical and chemical properties of the catalysts were characterized by nitrogen adsorption-desorption (BET), X-ray powder diffraction (XRD) and ammonium temperature-programmed desorption (NH3-TPD) techniques. The catalytic performance reached the best value when the cobalt concentration as 3% at ethanol concentration of 20%(percent of volume), reaction temperature at 250 ℃ and the weight hourly space velocity (WHSV) of 2.37 h-1. Temperature of reaction had a significant impact on the ethylene selectivity，and which increased from 24.0% of 220 ℃ to 95.7% of 250 ℃. When temperature is 280 ℃, the ethylene selectivity is up to 100%. The catalyst Co/USY has fine stablility and high activity after reacting 102 h.@The research on the thorough treatment of the coking waste water has been carried out with slag of gasifier by pretreatment, in which the process condition of treating coking waste water was studied and the adsorption principle was preliminarily investigated. The results show that carbon-containing materials could be concentrated and ash could be separated effectively by screening and float-sink test and the content of carbon could reach 80%. The adsorption process had a big adsorption rate and reached adsorption saturation in 2 h. The removal rate of chemical oxygen demand could reach 88% when the concentration of carbon-rich slag was 30 g/L. The adsorption process could be described well with Freundlich isotherms equation. The char with the larger proportion mesopore was beneficial to adsorb the coking waste water, which had a bigger adsorption rate.@The aim of the present study was to experimentally investigate the influence of calcination on SiO2 utilization ratios of oil shale residues. Three kinds of residues were selected from different processing methods including retorting carbocoal by solid heat carrier method, retorting carbocoal of Fushun-type and fine residues from a circulating fluidized-bed of a power station. Effects of calcination temperature, calcination time and particle size were analyzed with XRD patterns. Results show that a maximum SiO2 leaching rate of 80% can be received from the carbocoal by solid heat carrier method after calcination activation at 850 ℃ for 0.5 h, while those for the carbocoal of Fushun-type and residues from a power station are 75% and 60% respectively, without the need of calcinations.@Fe(NO3)3 as catalytic precursor and Na2S as in-situ presulfurizer were impregnated on the Shenhua bituminous coals which were synchronously swollen with H2O, methanol, N-N dimethylformamide （DMF） or dimethyl sulfoxide（DMSO） at 20 ℃ for 12 h. Then the swollen coals were prepared by vacuum drying. The co-processing of swollen Shenhua coal and two heavy oils（LGAR and Du84） was carried on under the condition of the mass ratio of 2∶1 oil to coal, 8 MPa cold hydrogen pressure，420 ℃and 1 h. The coprocessing of the swollen bituminous coal and LGAR or Du84 was significantly improved on the coal liquefaction. Among the three swelling solvents, the improvement of DMF was the highest, that of DMSO was the better and methanol were the lowest. Du84 was favor in the coprocessing than LGAR. By XRD analysis, the iron catalysts on the swollen coal with Fe(NO3)3 synchronously impregnated with the solvents were amorphous and highly dispersed on coal surface and could transform into Fe1-xS in the coprocessing. During the coprocessing, the deactivation of the catalyst synchronously impregnated on swollen coal with DMF was not clear.@The microwave co-pyrolysis of Wangjiagou (WJG) long flame coal and coking coal (JM) were carried out in this study to know about the changes of yield and composition of coal pyrolysis product with the different ratio of two raw coals. The results showed that under microwave pyrolysis conditions, the tar yield was gradually reduced with the proportion of JM coal increases, while the ash content and sulfur content of solid coke increased, and the SEM pictures showed the area of porous surface in the solid structure of coke was bigger, the porous borders became increasingly clear. The content of CO2, CO, CH4, and CnHm were gradually increased with the pyrolysis time before 3 min then started to decreased. With the JM mixing ratio increase, the CO2, CO levels have diminished, but the change of CH4 and CnHm content was not obvious before 3 min, while increased in the 3 min-15 min interval.@XRD and FTIR have been applied to the investigatin of structural characterization of vitrinite and inertinite macerals of PS and SD coal,and the thermal devolatilisation behavior were seperated at heating rate of 20 ℃/min by TG/MS. XRD spectrum revealed the similar structure as graphite of coal and the crastallite structural parameters were determined: d002（nm）,dγ（nm）,Lc（nm）,La（nm）,Me and fa. The ratio of aliphatic hydrocarbon and aromatic hydrocarbon,the length of aliphatic hydrocarbon side chains and the substitutional condition of aromatic rings were determined by FTIR. This study reveals the rich hydrogen condition, aliphatic hydrocarbon side chains linking condition and the substitutional condition of aromatic rings of the sample. The TG and the thermal devolatilisation behavior have relation with the characterization of coal structure. The thermal devolatilisation behavior and generation mechanism of C1-C4  light hydrocarbon, hydrogen,benzene and phenyl were specially analyzed.@In order to develop the technology of lignite comprehensive utilization and create new methods to optimize the utilization, hot water drying of lignite of Huolinhe used the method of screening experiment of orthogonal and uniform design was studied. Meanwhile, the result of screening experiment of orthogonal and uniform design based on SPSS11.5  was analysed. The result find the main factors of hot water drying of lignite of Huolinhe, reduce the research on the factors which are not great important, reduce a lot of experiments, save the cost and time of experiments, and determine the optimized levels of main factors and secondary factors.@Pyrolysis and gasification study of four different rank coals were carried out in a horizontal tube reactor, and the major nitrogenous products were analyzed by a FTIR gas analyzer. It is found that coal rank has a critical influence on fuel-nitrogen ratio converted to HCN during pyrolysis and gasification, while affects NH3 little. Because the deep decomposition of volatile is the major resource of HCN production, the lower rank coal has a higher volatile content which would lead a high HCN fuel-nitrogen ratio, but fuel-nitrogen ratio converted to NH3 is similar for different ranks coals. The different ranks coals gasification in CO2 atmosphere shows that, most of the char-nitrogen is converted to NO, and the fuel-nitrogen converted to NH3 is increased compared with pyrolysis in Ar atmosphere, and the fuel-nitrogen converted to HCN is increased for different ranks coals except Indonesia lignite. We analyzed NO production in CO2 gasification, and recognized the direct oxidation of char-nitrogen might be the major mechanism of NO production.@The water inflow into coal seam is a very important influence factor of UCG, the process of UCG under water inflow was studied in this paper by UCG model test platform. The research shows that (the average of temperature field) could direct response the high or low of gas component and low heat-value. The relationship between gas component, low heat-value and  was positive correlation. In the model test, the optimal ratio of blast volume to influx water was 2.5∶1 and the critical ratio was 1.4∶1, the decomposition rate of water inflow was stable at 10%. With the improvement of velocity of water inflow, the decomposition rate of water  inflow was dropped, but the decomposition of the water was unchanged.@One kind of bituminus coal named Shenmu coal with potassium carbonate as catalyst was gasified with steam on a self-made pressurized fixed-bed reactor at pressure of 3.5 MPa. The steam partial pressure were 1.24 MPa, 1.83 MPa and 2.88 MPa at 600 ℃, while were 1.24 MPa, 1.83 MPa and 2.34 MPa at 650 ℃ or 700 ℃. A kinetic reaction equation was proposed based on an n order and Langmuir-Hinshewood expression by evaluation the carbon conversion behavior. The results showed that the gasification activities significantly increased with increasing of reaction temperature and steam partial pressure. In the n order expression, the order n was 0.732 and the activation energy was 102.63 kJ/mol; In the L-H expression, the activation energy was 109.23 kJ/mol. It was found that L-H expression was more accurate than the n order expression in describing the effect of steam partial pressure on reaction.@In this paper, the reaction between total conversion and time was investigated by liquefaction of Yanzhou coal using a 17 mL tubular resonance agitation microautoclave reactor under certain condition. It was found that coal liquefaction existed an initial stage of high reactivity. During this stage, most of the liquefaction reaction was completed. Then the reaction mechanism of hydrogen for the initial high reactivity stage was studied by coal liquefaction. The results show that: 1) without catalyst, in the initial high reactivity stage of coal liquefaction,hydrogen could not participate coal liquefaction reaction; 2) in the initial high reactivity stage of coal liquefaction, hydrogen soluted in coal liquefaction solvent rapidly. Thus the main reason that hydrogen did not participate the liquefaction reaction effectively is not the solution process; 3) adding high dispersion iron catalyst with sulfur promoter in the initial high reactivity stage of coal liquefaction, hydrogen, activated by the catalyst impregnation, was able to participate coal liquefaction reaction. By which the total conversion increased more than 7 percent.@Shenhua coal was swelled in an ultrasonic generator with pyridine as the swelling agent. In order to investigate the effects of ultrasound swelling on coal liquefaction, the loss of coal and swelling rate were determined and the IR spectra was analyzed. The ultrasonic swelling of coal can enhance the reaction of direct liquefaction of catalytic hydrogenation further by contrasting the liquefaction of coal swelled by ultrasonic wave radiation and the naturally swelled coal. The liquefaction conversion rate of Shenhua coal increases 3%-4% after the treatment of ultrasound irradiation.@Study of Yima coal direct liquefaction under different reaction time, temperature, and initial hydrogen pressure was probed into. The experiment was investigated by reaction kettle with circulation oil and Fe2O3  and S catalyst. The results indicated that the best reaction conditions were at 380 ℃, 9 MPa, 120 min according to the oil yield , and the conversion of liquefaction decreased with the temperature, but the oil yield of liquefaction increased firstly and then decreased with the temperature, and the conversion and oil yield of liquefaction increased with the initial cool hydrogen pressure and the reaction time.@A kind of composite catalyst of direct coal liquefaction has been prepared as the catalyst of Shendong coal. The affect of particle size of the catalyst on direct liquefaction has been carried out. Conversion and oil yield increased with the decreasing of the diameter of the composite catalyst, meanwhile the intermediate asphaltenes and preasphaltenes remain unchanged, and the gas yield and hydrogen consumption decreased. After the catalysts are grinded into less than 74 μm, the yields of the composite catalyst are superior to those of “863” catalyst. The products get much lighter, and the conversion increases, which show the high hydrogenation of the nickel in the composite catalyst.@Adding self-made coal pitch powder to heavy oil could be obtained coal pitch oil slurry (CPOS), and the influence law of viscosity and rheology behavior were analyzed. The results showed that the viscosity of CPOS would increase with the higher dosage of the self-made coal pitch powder at the same temperature. The viscosity of CPOS with different concentration would decrease with the increase of temperature at the same shearing rate. With the increase of temperature, the decreasing trend of viscosity was gradually reduced.When the concentration of coal pitch powder was ≤12%, it has little effect on the rheology behavior of CPOS. With the increase of coal pitch powder’s concentration, net calorific value of CPOS appeared reduction, but the diminished rate was little.@Using coal tar distillates as solvent, coal microwave-assisted extraction was investigated in this paper. On the basis of experiment, the effect of solvent/coal ratio, microwave radiate time on the extraction yield was discussed. The liquid yield can reach up to 25.51% at the optimal extraction conditions with solvent/coal ratio of 3∶1 and radiating time of 20 min, which implies a new utilization way for low carbonization coal tar. Dry ash-free basis coal and its residues were examined with FT-IR and SEM, which indicated that residual-coal’s (H/C) is decreased and the macromolecular network of coal is not ruined after extraction.@The characters of QI in coal-tar are analyzed by ultimate analysis, FTIR, XRD and SEM etc, and it is showed that the QI is made up of coal powder, coke powder, pyrolytic carbon and condensation polymerization products. The content of each QI part in coal-tar is determined by floating QI in different density zinc chloride liquids. The related analysis data show that high QI in coal-tar is mainly caused by smokeless charging, the structural characters and heating system of 7.63 m coke oven, but the macromoleclar polymer makes the greatest contribution to QI, which is formed by high temperature condensation reaction.@The effect of tannin extract in tannin extract desulfurization was investigated using UV-vis absorption spectroscopy and Foulier transferred infrared (FTIR) method. The study of interaction between tannin extract of oxidation state (TEos) and vanadium ion show there exists complex reaction between TEos and tetravalent vanadium ion/pentavalent vanadium ion. The study of reaction between TEos and bisulfide ion show: the reaction consists of two steps: the fast reaction and the slow reaction; concentration of HS- decreases with reaction time, and the reaction rate appears first quick back slow trend; the conversion of HS- increase with the increase of initial concentration of TEos; HS- reacts with TEos to form organic compounds containing sulfur, not to generate elemental sulfur.@The combustion characteristics of three different ranks of coals (lignite, bituminous coal and anthracite) and their blend were studied by using the differential thermal-thermogravimetric analysis (DTA-TG). The results of TG curves indicated that the best heating rate was 20 ℃/min. Some combustion parameters, such as ignition temperature (Tb), maximum combustion rate temperature (Tm) and char burn-out temperature (Tf) was obtained. The differential thermal analyzer (DTA) curve can be used to estimate the heat released during the combustion process, which corresponds to the high heating value of the coal. The results of DTG and DTA indicated that the optimum ratio of coal blending for anthracite/lignite and bituminous coal/lignite were 3∶7 and 3∶7 respectively.@A swirled burner is designed for burning low heat value of coal-bed methane. The influence of heat load and excess air coefficient on combustion performance is studied by numerical simulation, and combustion pollutant is calculated. Results show that counter pressure gradient is existed in the burning zone, and its existing can strengthen the flue gas disturbance，generate a high temperature zone and increase the combustion efficiency. The designed burner has a wide range of load adjusting. High combustion temperature and combustion efficiency can be kept even in the low load. The combustion temperature is the highest in the numerical simulation when the excessive air coefficient is 1.05, but the generation amount of NOx is only 25.1 mg/m3 at this condition.@Experiments about the characters of coal combustion are done on the leveling-tube furnace in both air and oxygen-enriched atmosphere. The Fourier infrared spectrometer is applied to do the on-line measurement of the smoke. Different kinds of coals and different atmospheres have effects on the discharge of pollutant(SO2 and NO). Results of the experiments show that the precipitation curve of SO2 is almost single peak while NO’s is mostly double peak. The kinds of coal have great influence on the pollutant discharge, kinds of coal which is rich in sulphur and nitrogen will have more SO2 and NO precipitation respectively. In O2/CO2 atmosphere, with the increase of O2 concentration, the precipitation of SO2 and NO reduced significantly. The temperature(800 ℃-900 ℃) does not have significant influence on the precipitation of SO2 and NO, but the peak-to-peak value reached the maximum and the size of precipitation was the biggest when the temperature was 850 ℃. As a conclusion, we can claim that at temperature of 850 ℃, SO2 and NO are more easily separated out from the coal in O2/CO2 atmosphere.@Mesoporous activated carbons were prepared from a lean coal in the presence of additive. Then the iodine value, methylene blue value and the nitrogen adsorption/desorption isotherms of activated carbon were characterized. The results show that the obtained activated carbons have great mesoporous volume without impregnating additive. The mesoporous volume can reach 0.287 4 mL/g and its ratio is up to 72.43%; both of microporous and mesoporous volume increase about 0.05 mL/g with additive, suggesting that the additive can benefit for the micropore forming and promote the mesopore growth, increase the total volume; the pore size distribution can be modulated by impregnating different amout of additive.@The ammonia desulphuriztion waste liquid used in the process of flue gas desulphurization of power plant was studied in this paper. The proportion of the two kinds of desulphurization liquid was optimized and the liquids were tested with chemical analysis and instrumental analysis methods in laboratory. The results showed that the ammonium salt in the mixed liquid with proper proportion was converted to free ammonia, the elimination efficiency of SO2 in the flue gas was increased, there was no precipitation during reaction, and the sedimentation rate of sedimentation tank in power plant was accelerated.@The effect that the organic matter in the municipal wastewater was adsorpted by sodium carbonate-activated coal-series kaoline with the time of adsorption equilibrium, the concentration of wastewater, the liquid-solid ratio, reaction temperature, pH changed was studied, then the adsorption isothermal was studied too. The result showed that when the time of adsorption equilibrium was 2 h; the liquid-solid ratio was 60 mL/g; pH was 6, the adsorption rate that the organic matter in the municipal wastewater was adsorpted by sodium carbonate-activated coal-series kaoline could arrive the highest, and heat was bad for the adsorption reaction. The reaction accorded to Langmuir equation, and the adsorption reaction was main chemisty.@Based on the status of caking coal resources and domestic coking industry, their confliction is discussed in the paper. The different measures of enlarging coking coal resources and coke quality enhancement such as heightening the chamber of coke oven, stamping charged coke-making, coal moisture controlling, coke-making with briquetted coal, coke dry cooling and the disposal of waste plastic and waste tire with coke oven, as well as their effects on coke quality improvement are all summarized in the article. The prospect of trend of coking industry is also given in the end of the paper.@In order to get the relationship between character of micromolecular thiophenes organosulfurs and coal properties, benzothiophene and dibenzothiophene were investigated as target compounds, and thiophenes organosulfurs were extracted from the raw coal by Gerhardt Soxtherm and analyzed by GC-MS. The relationship between thiophenes organosulfurs extracted and coal property were discussed. The results showed that the amount of dibenzothiophene was higher than benzothiophene which extracted from same raw coal; the amount of thiophenes organosulfurs extracted from the raw coal decreased with the increase of carbon content and in coal. And the amount of thiophenes organosulfurs extracted increased with the increase of both volatile yields and the O/C ratio. But the total sulfur content in the coal has no immediate with the amount of thiophenes organosulfurs.@The home-made quartz spring thermal balance (ZL 00247922.2) was used to investigate the CO2 gasification characteristics of three Huainan coal. It was shown that gasification active relationship of three Huainan coals in CO2 is LZ coal＜LY coal＜PY coal. It is suggested that the process of part gasification shift to combustion at the shift point of certain gasification conversion is a better choice to make complete carbon conversion while reducing the commercial gasifier volume. @Eulerian-Eulerian two-fluid model was used to simulate the gas-solid flow behaviors in certain chemical fertilizer company’s running ash-agglomerating fluidized bed gasifier .The range and proper matching relations between fluidized and spouting gas velocity were showed from the simulating results.It shows fluidized gas velocity can neither be too small, which may lead to dead districts around the gas distributor, nor too big because the designing and operating characteristics of ICC will be lost. With the increasing of spouting gas velocity, the mixing churning is enhanced under a certain fluidizing gas velocity.However, spouting gas velocity which exceeds some value results in the flow structure of slugging and is not conducive to the operating of ICC efficiently and safely.@Based on the application of chemical process simulation software, initial to predict water coal slurry gasified exported synthesis gas composition and temperature, the results are consistent with the literature.Through the simulated data to analyze how the main operating parameters of the gasifies effect the gasification，the basis for the actual operation was provided.@A kind of composite catalyst of direct coal liquefaction has been prepared as the catalyst of Shendong coal. The affect of particle size of the catalyst on direct liquefaction has been carried out. Conversion and oil yield increased with the decreasing of the diameter of the composite catalyst, meanwhile the intermediate asphaltenes and preasphaltenes remain unchanged, and the gas yield and hydrogen consumption decreased. After the catalysts are grinded into less than 74 μm, the yields of the composite catalyst are superior to those of “863” catalyst. The products get much lighter, and the conversion increases, which show the high hydrogenation of the nickel in the composite catalyst.@In this paper,the solubility of hydrogen in naphthalene was measured by using vapor-liquid phase equilibrium sampling method. The reaction mechanism of hydrogen for direct coal liquefaction was investigated by liquefaction of Yanzhou coal using a 17 mL tubular resonance agitation microautoclave reactor. The results show:1) that hydrogen solubility in naphthalene increases with the increase of temperature and hydrogen partial pressure, and the solution rate overall appears first quick back slow trend. Hydrogen solubility within 5 min has reached 76.21% of the maximum under certain temperature and hydrogen partial pressure, then it continues to increase slowly and achieves the maximum for 30 min；2) that the control step of coal liquefaction without catalyst in naphthalene is not the solution rate of hydrogen but the reaction rate of dissolved hydrogen participating in liquefaction; 3) that hydrogen pre-solution in naphthalene increases the total conversion of shorter coal liquefaction without catalyst, which is because partial dissolved hydrogen was activated in pre-solution process, resulting in the increase of active hydrogen in the initial stage of liquefaction reaction；4) that hydrogen pre-solution in naphthalene has a little contribution for the total conversion of longer coal liquefaction without catalyst, but it promotes the further hydrocracking and upgrading of liquefaction products.@In this experiment the model of double balls gradation, three balls gradation and four balls gradation be used. The effects of slurry ability on factors of ball milling ratio, ball milling time, pretreatment temperature, rotation speed, cylinder size and types of additives be investigated. The dry coal particle gradation and water coal particle gradation method be operated. The viscosity and size distribution are analyzed by using DV-1+PRO digital viscosity indicator and Rise-2008 laser particle size analyzer respectively. Additionally, the stability of slurry be testified. The results show that the concentration of coal water slurry is up to 68% during the processing condition of raw materials size is smaller than 1 mm, ball milling ratio is 6∶1, rotation speed is 72 r/min. At the same time ,mixing with No.10# additive can get stable coal water slurry. @Because of high valence metal ions contained in coal would reduce the perfor-mance of coal water slurry, sodium tripolyphosphate was selectd as a kind of adjustment agent to remix with different anionic dispersants to enhance the dispersing and viscosity-reducing ability. Through the experiment of adsorption mensuration，Zetapotential and the adsorption layer thickness of dispersant on the coal surface, it reveals the synergistic interaction mechanism of sodium tripolyphosphate with three different molecular structure dispersant SAF, GCL3S and FDN. The results show that sodium tripolyphosphate can help SAF increase electrostatic repulsion and steric repulsion between coal particles,which result in an increase of Zeta-potential and adsorptive layer thickness, to enhance its dispersing and viscosity-reducing ability, but mainly help GCL3S increase the electrostatic repulsion and help FDN increase the steric repulsion. @In this paper, black liquor and lignite are prepared into water-coal-slurry（CWS）, and discuss the factors affecting CWS forming properties, including the highest slurry concentration, rheological property, stability and different kinds and amouts of additive agents. The experimental study on slurry showed that lignite and black liquor can be made into CWS, which has good performance. All of the CWS prepared have a good rheological property and stability. The slurry which dilution multiple of the black liquor is 5 have the best comprehensive performance. It can reduce the viscosity of CWS substantially when adding dispersant and stabilizing agent.@There are big differences between imported coal and local coal. This paper showed the coal was imported from several Australian mines in a steel works, according to commonly domestic industrial index and petrology indexes of coking coal, the coking coal from Australian should belong to high quality coal, when it was blended simply replaced highquality local coal, the coke strength wasn't ideal. Through expansion degrees, fluidity and coke microstructure analysis, it was found  there are many differences between the imported coal and the blending coal.They must be optimized so as the coke quality was stable.@To fundamentally understand the relationship between the bulk density of coking coal and the caking property will be of great help to develop new stamp coking technology. This paper investigated the evolutionary change of the caking property indices of 1/3 coking coal from Fangezhuang under the different conditions including bulk density, max thickness, final contraction value and volume curve of the gel layer and so on. Experimental results exhibited that when the bulk density was improved from 0.8 t/m3 to 1.1 t/m3, the caking properties were enhanced obviously with max thickness increment by 44.1% from 17.7 mm to 24.5 mm and the final contraction value reduced by 131% from 25.2 mm to -7.9 mm. The volume change of coal sample displayed characteristics featuring positive expansion. The microscopic coking properties can be improved greatly by increasing the bulk density of coking coal. The volume curve of gel layer varied from a single zigzag type to e type or a mixture of e type and zigzag type. The macroscopic coking properties of the 1/3 coking coal were approaching to that of fat coal when the bulk density of the test coal sample was improving.  @According to the methods for determining the minimum ignition temperature by dusts, an experimental system was designed independently to test the ignition temperature of hydrogen-carbon monoxide-methane-carbon dioxide mixtures. Ignition characteristics of hydrogen-carbon monoxide-methane-carbon dioxide mixtures were studied at atmospheric temperature and pressure on the system. Ignition temperatures were obtained respectively at different mixing rations and primary air ratios. The results show that the ignition temperature for gas decreases with the hydrogen contents increasing, but increases with the methane adding. Especially, the effects of carbon monoxide increase on the ignition temperature of gas are indeterminable. Ignition temperature keeps invariable, and is unrelated to primary air ratios when the thermal conditions of the system are fixed. Hydrogen, carbon monoxide and methane’s ignition temperatures are separately 563 ℃, 667 ℃ and 790 ℃ by experiments.@Coal gangue is the largest emissions of solid waste in our country, which is rich in iron oxide. In order to abstract the iron oxide from coal gangue efficiently, from the perspective of chemical kinetics, the research on kinetics of sulfuric acid leaching Fe2O3 out of coal gangue was carried out. The result shows that this reaction kinetics coincident with the unreacted shrinking-core model, the kinetic equation is 1-（1-XB）2/3=kt, the reaction frequency exponent is 13 240,the reaction energy is 5.8×104 J/mol,and the diffusion rate of the fluid liquid membrane control the process rate.@The impact addition coal ash on the calorific value of low ash and high volatile coal was studied. The influence of the amount and the sulphur content of coal ash on calorific value of coal was investigated. And the results showed that the problem of splashing of low ash and high volatile coal during calorific value test was effectively solved by addition coal ash. And there was a little effect of calorific value with sulphur content in coal ash. The quantity of coal ash was confirmed 0.1 g/g coal, while the calorific value of coal can ensure the accuracy and reliability.@Activated carbon from petroleum coke by KOH activation was oxidized by concentrated sulfuric acid at 170 ℃ for 3 h, followed by heat treatment under protection of nitrogen at 450 and 750 ℃ for 3 h. The as-activated carbon, oxidized activated carbon and heat-treated carbon with different oxygen contents were characterized by nitrogen adsorption and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, and their adsorptive capacities for CO2 at 25 ℃ to 175 ℃ and 10 mbar to 15 000 mbar were investigated. It was found that their BET surface areas and pore size distributions were similar while their surface oxygen contents were different depending on the oxidation and heat treatment conditions. The adsorptive capacities for CO2 in the experimental conditions can be well fitted by Langmuir equation. The monolayer capacity and sticking coefficient decreased with adsorption temperature and the heat of adsorption changed little with the oxidation or heat treatment. The monolayer capacity decreased and sticking coefficient increased with O/C atom ratios. Suitable activated carbon should have a moderate O/C ratio for a better adsorption for CO2. @Three samples made from different matrix carbon, after forming, carbonized and dipping process were chosen to study the microscopic structures and thermal conductivity of the block C/C composites before and after graphitization. They were separately measured by such means as SEM, XRD and thermal conductivity measurement. The results show that the apparent densities of the carbonized samples are 1.61 g/cm3-1.70 g/cm3 and the thermal conductivities are relatively low. The microstructure of the sample made by D 8 μm single cabon fiber weaving in two dimensions is in order and its anisotropic index of the heat conduction is about 4.7. But the thermal conductivity of samples produced by non-woven fiber bundle molded under pressure technology and graphite powder molded under pressure technology behave the isotropic characteristics in two dimensional direction. After 2 700 ℃ graphitization, the apparent densities of the samples are 1.61 g/cm3-1.69 g/cm3, having no significant changes.The thermal conductivities increase significantly，the maximum growth is 15 times than before, and the anisotropic index of the heat conduction in the single cabon fiber weaving sample enlarges to 6.3. The thermal conductivity of the sample made by non-woven fiber bundle molded under pressure technology remains isotropic, which is the highest, with 222.27 W/（m·K） in radial and 243.40 W/（m·K） axial respectively. In addition, from the room temperature to 300 ℃,the thermal conductivities of C/C composites decline gradually with the raise of the temperature.@The regeneration of a spent actived carbon impregnated with Fe was investigated using thermal regeneration and thermal oxidation regeneration methods. At four kinds of temperatures(350 ℃,400 ℃,450 ℃ and 500 ℃),We chose four kinds of gases(N2,N2+H2O,N2+O2 and N2+H2) to study the regeneration of desulfurizer.The investigation results show that thermal oxidation regeneration by N2+H2O and N2+O2 is better than thermal regeneration by N2 and N2+H2, particularly, at relatively high temperatures (450 ℃ and 500 ℃, which are higher than the boiling point of sulphur).After there regeneration by N2+H2O and N2+O2 at 450 ℃ and 500 ℃，desulfurizer also showed good performance.@Ce promoted Fe-Mn metal oxides nanosized particles have been prepared by co-precipitation approach. The products were characterized by powder X-ray diffraction (XRD), temperature programmed reduction (TPR) and BET study. It was found that the samller crystal size of iorn-manganese oxide can be achieved through CeO2 doping. And samples prepared with Ce pormoted show higher surface areas at calcinations temperature. At the reaction temperature range of 200 ℃400 ℃, the Ce promoted samples exhibited much better activities for SCR. But at high temperatures, the Ce promoted catalysts showed lower activities for SCR of nitric oxide with ammonia.@To enhance the economic effectiveness of the crude benzene recovered from oil shale raw coke oven gas, this paper study the separation sequences for the crude benzene, simulate the process of conventional sequences and thermally coupled distillation sequences and calculate energy consumption and thermally efficiency of these separation sequences. The result shows that thermally coupled distillation sequences is the most effective energy-saving separation sequence to separate the crude benzene mixture in which light component is the major fraction. Compared with the direct sequence of conventional distillation, the result of energy consumption analysis indicates that thermally coupled distillation sequence could save energy up to 35% and its thermodynamic efficiency is enhanced from 7.4% to 11.6%. @The work resorted CO2 replace strong acid as latent acidifier and highly selective separation method of acetic acid purifying, took residue of oil shale as raw material investigate preparation of high quality silica on the conditions of low corrosion and energy consumption, discover technological conditions influences on particle size of product. Obtained silica researched by means of XRF, IR, XRD and SEM, optimum technological conditions of preparation silica from NaSiO3 solution leached from residue of oil shale determined by homogeneous chemical precipitation method and the results as following, the reaction temperature is 50 ℃, the concentration of sodium silicate 0.027 g/L, CO2 flow rate is 20 mL/min, the dose of surfactant is 0.007 g/mL of volume of total system.The particle size of silica obtained on the optimum technological conditions get minimum value of 20 nm-30 nm and purity is 98.4% after acetic acid purifying. @The pyrolysis and kinetic characteristics of two kinds of biomass left during forestry processing (pine,sinocalamus affinis mcclure) were studied with non-isothermal thermogravimetric analysis method. Effects of CO2 concentration and heating rate on pyrolysis characteristics were investigated. Kinetic parameters were analyzed with two different reaction models. The results indicate that with the increase of CO2 concentration, the changes of weight loss ratio were small in the low temperature zone, but the weight loss ratio and maximum weight loss rate increased in the high temperature zone. An increase of the heating rate also tended to slightly delay pyrolysis processes towards higher temperatures. It was found that nth order reaction model was better to solve the kinetic parameters in the low temperature zone. However, contracting volume reaction model was better in the high temperature zone.@Simulation of syngas production from biomass gasification with Fe2O3 is carried out with Aspen Plus software, the effects of gasification temperature, operation pressures, and the presence of oxygen carrier on the distribution of the gas components are investigated. The results show that, H2 and CO are the primary products in the syngas of biomass chemical looping gasification. The increase of gasification temperature is beneficial to gasification process but the increase of react pressure is of no advantage for gasification process, and the optimal gasification temperature is between 800 ℃ and 850 ℃. The existence of oxygen carrier can improve the yield of syngas. @
2017
根据溶胀测量原理，结合位移传感器，设计了一种可以在高温高压条件下测量煤样在溶剂中溶胀的装置.测量获得了不同颗粒粒度B3煤样在神华循环油中、N2气氛下溶胀比随温度的变化曲线，同时考察了初始压力、气氛和煤阶对煤样高温溶胀特性的影响，并采用非等温溶胀动力学方程对溶胀数据进行拟合分析.结果表明，不同颗粒粒度B3煤样的溶胀比随温度的升高而增大，在300 ℃时达到最大溶胀比，随着温度的进一步升高，溶胀比减小，煤层高度开始降低.增大初始压力和H2气氛下有利于煤样的溶胀.煤样在四氢萘中的溶胀比较在循环油中大.非等温溶胀动力学拟合分析表明，煤在溶剂中溶胀遵循简单级数反应机理函数，活化能在20 kJ/mol~60 kJ/mol之间.@以内蒙褐煤为研究对象，于固定床反应器上，考察了粒径对褐煤热解过程中的产气率以及各气体组分含量的影响，通过XRD以及物理吸附等手段研究了热解后各煤焦的微观结构特性，并采用热天平探讨了不同粒径煤焦水蒸气气化反应活性的差异.研究表明，当原煤粒径增大，原煤热解产气率有所下降；对于各组分，CO，H2，CH4含量均随原煤粒径增大而减小，但CO2呈相反趋势.对于粒径越大的原煤，由于挥发分脱除不够完全，生成的煤焦碳化程度较低，使得煤焦石墨化程度越低，比表面积也越小；另外，不同粒径煤焦的水蒸气气化反应活性随着粒径的增大而明显降低.@以三种不同升温速率下准东原煤样品的热解失重数据为研究对象，应用分布活化能模型(DAEM)法进行动力学计算，分析了此种方法在煤热解整体动力学研究中的适用性.结果表明，由于升温速率对热解过程的影响以及反应机理的转变，DAEM法对煤热解二次脱气阶段失重数据的适用性较差；失水脱气及二次脱气阶段失重的取舍对各转化率所对应的活化能值具有不同的影响，而对活化能分布函数则影响不大；在几乎整个热解过程中，频率因子和活化能之间均呈现明显的动力学补偿效应，且其具体表现形式仅取决于煤种，而与所选取的温度计算范围关系不大.@在自主搭建的千克级流化床装置上进行了油房梁煤(YFC)与秸秆(JG)的共热解反应，考察了掺混比和温度对共热解油品收率和品质的影响.结果表明：在压力为0.1 MPa，输送气量为15 L/mim，流化气量为25 L/min，下料速度为1.5 kg/h的条件下，当油房梁煤与秸秆以0.7∶0.3的质量比混合，温度为600 ℃，反应气氛为N2时，收率较高，为19.18%，此时对应的协同效应度最大，为35.87%，且共热解油品较煤焦油硫的质量分数由0.60%降低至0.31%，酚系物主要集中在苯酚(16.82%)、对甲酚(21.92%)和邻苯二酚(16.56%)等11种酚类物，便于油品中酚系物的提取和利用.@采用高压反应釜对内蒙古褐煤(IML)进行了不同温度的水热处理，并利用电子顺磁共振(EPR)波谱仪考察了水热处理对褐煤热解焦油中自由基的影响.结果表明，经过水热处理后，煤热解焦油中自由基的含量明显降低，在处理温度为260 ℃时达到最小值，自由基含量降低了66.67%；随着处理温度的升高，焦油的g因子值不断减小，峰宽增加，但在300 ℃时峰宽低于原煤焦油的峰宽.结合气相色谱质谱联用仪(GC-MS)对焦油的组分进行了测定，结果显示，经过水热处理后，焦油中酚类物质减少，单环芳烃的质量分数由15.10%上升至18.24%，多环芳烃的质量分数由12.79%上升至13.95%.通过在一定的保存时间内(40 d)持续对焦油中自由基含量的分析，发现经过水热处理后的热解焦油中，自由基的含量在保存过程中增加的趋势较原煤焦油缓慢，并且更早趋于稳定.@在3×500 mL固定床中试装置上进行了中压(氢气分压10 MPa)神木全馏分中低温煤焦油加氢实验，并考察了反应条件对加氢产品组成和性质的影响.确定最佳的操作条件为：总液体体积空速为0.2/h，氢油体积比为1 500∶1，加氢保护剂、精制催化剂和裂化催化剂床层平均温度分别为280 ℃，380 ℃和400 ℃.进一步通过研究反应条件对技术经济性的影响，发现技术经济性最高时采用的操作条件与中试实验结果相一致.原料和产品价格对技术经济性影响的大小程度为产品价格>煤焦油价格>氢气价格.以目前价格为基础，原料和产品价格均提高35%后，中压全馏分煤焦油加氢技术可实现盈利.@以洗油/Span80-Tween80/水相制成W/O型S2-和Fe2+前驱体乳液，双乳液经硫化制备铁基假均相催化剂，并对乳液稳定因素、乳液法制催化剂机理、催化剂稳定性及其对西沟煤的液化性能进行了研究.结果表明：稳定乳液的制备条件为油水质量比9∶1，Fe2+乳液和S2-乳液复配乳化剂的加入量(质量分数)分别为15.61%和18.36%，HLB值(亲水疏水平衡值)分别为7.3和6.7，机械搅拌速率6 000 r/min，乳化时间15 min，乳化温度20 ℃~30 ℃.所制假均相催化剂体系，沉降速率为5.24×10-7 cm/h.TEM表征得到催化剂粒径在100 nm左右，呈球形形貌.该催化剂用于西沟煤加氢液化，油产率较使用普通商用Fe2O3时提高4.04%.@在30 mL油品加氢实验装置上，进行煤直接液化全馏分油中重质油(＞320 ℃)加氢实验，考察反应温度、压力和体积空速变化对加氢生成油物性的影响.结果表明，油品的脱硫率和脱氮率与反应温度和反应压力成正比，与体积空速成反比；升高反应温度和反应压力或降低体积空速，都有利于加氢油品中单环芳烃和双环芳烃质量分数的增加、多环芳烃质量分数的减少.计算得到的油品供氢指数(IPDQ)增加，从而溶剂供氢能力增加.不同加氢条件下得到的油品物性表明，反应温度为380 ℃，压力为19 MPa，体积空速为0.8/h时，得到的重质馏分油作为煤液化循环溶剂使用时供氢性最好.@实验研究了两种典型活性炭对对二甲苯的气相吸附与脱附性能，分析了活性炭的孔隙结构、吸附与脱附温度对对二甲苯吸附量的影响规律.结果表明，随着吸附温度升高，活性炭吸附对二甲苯能力降低，吸附温度在30 ℃时，可以获得较高的吸附值；活性炭的中孔尺寸为1 nm~2 nm部分所占比表面积及比孔容越高，其吸附对二甲苯的性能越好.同时，两种活性炭气相吸附对二甲苯的量是其吸附升华萘量的1.10倍，表明用活性炭吸附对二甲苯方法来间接评价活性炭对萘的吸附量是可行的.@向神东煤灰中添加Al2O3，通过煤灰熔融性测试，分析Al2O3对神东煤灰熔融温度的影响；通过激冷实验、X射线衍射(XRD)、热重分析及热力学软件FactSage，探究Al2O3对神东煤灰熔融特性的影响机理.结果表明，Al2O3始终起到提高煤灰熔融温度的作用.在Al2O3添加量(质量分数，下同)较低时，煤灰熔融温度升高趋势较为平缓；随着Al2O3添加量继续增大，煤灰熔融温度急剧升高.通过XRD检测及热力学软件FactSage模拟分析发现，Al2O3添加量较大时，在煤灰熔融过程中其与原煤灰中的SiO2(以石英形式存在)形成了莫来石(3Al2O3·2SiO2)，从而造成了煤灰熔融温度急剧升高.@针对褐煤燃烧过程中产生的NO及还原气体，采用热重红外联用技术研究尾矿加入后褐煤燃烧特性、NO生成量及还原气体的变化.结果表明，尾矿的加入对水分析出温度和挥发分燃烧温度的影响较小，但焦炭的起始燃烧温度相对降低，促进了焦炭燃烧阶段的进行.褐煤燃烧过程产生的还原气体主要为CH4，NH3，CO及脂肪烃类(—CH2)，尾矿的加入催化了NO与还原气体的反应，低温条件下以NH3还原NO为主，且尾矿催化存在选择性，其对CO还原NO的催化强度较其他几种气体弱.@对抽提完腐植酸的云南昭通褐煤残渣进行热解，通过热解气产率、焦油产率和半焦产率研究其热解特性，考察温度、升温速率和热解气氛对褐煤残渣热解的影响，并对每组热解实验得到的气体产物进行气相色谱分析，研究热解气的主要成分和含量，用气质联用仪对焦油进行成分分析.结果表明，温度是影响褐煤残渣热解的最重要因素，温度越高，热解气和焦油产率越大，热解气中H2和CO越多，焦油中脂肪族物质增多，芳香族物质芳环数增大；升温速率越低，气体和焦油的产率越大；热解气氛对产物分布有着较大的影响，不同的热解气氛影响着热解气和焦油中主要组分的含量.@在5 L厌氧发酵罐内，控制温度为30 ℃，pH值为6.5，进行为期10 d的厌氧发酵产氢实验，对实验过程中液相的pH值、VFA(挥发性脂肪酸)摩尔浓度和COD值进行实时监控分析，并进行纤维素酶活性和氢化酶活性的检测.结果表明，氢气最大体积分数可达到52.3%，氢气最终产率为13.7 mL/g.pH值一直下降，最低降至5.46；VFA摩尔浓度基本呈上升趋势，与pH值变化相对应，发酵类型属于丁酸型发酵.COD值呈现先上升后下降的趋势，最高值为4 368 mg/L，且最终COD降解率为51.10%.纤维素酶活性在反应第4天出现最高值0.016 9 mg/(mL·h)，氢化酶活性最高值出现在反应第6天，为0.568 mmol H2/(min·mg).@利用线性升温模拟褐煤由低温氧化到自燃的快速自热过程，结合FTIR，对比分析褐煤氧化自热过程中化学结构的变化.褐煤的氧化自热过程经历了四个特征温度，即自热起始温度(tsp)、交叉点温度(tcp)和燃烧温度(tc1，tc2).研究表明：褐煤氧化自热期间，—CH3和—CH2—的减少以及n(—CH3)∶n(—CH2—)的升高显示出氧更易攻击—CH2—；Ar—O—CO—R和R—O—CO—R随着氧化自热的加剧逐渐增加，而在tc1后发生水解；褐煤氧化自热初期不断增加的Ar—CO—Ar在tcp后大量分解生成气体氧化产物；褐煤的氧化自热经历tc1后，起初相对稳定的芳香族CC快速减少；Ar—COOH在tsp后逐渐增加，而在tc1后由于脱羧、脱水与酯化等反应的参与快速降低；Ar—COO—随着煤氧化自热的加剧而逐渐增加，在tc1后由于分解而减少.@将镜质组随机反射率Rran分为5个子区间，各区间所占百分比标记为R1，R2，R3，R4和R5，以这5个指标作为实验变量，在满足捣固炼焦对配合煤质量要求的前提条件下，实施了35组5 kg试验焦炉捣固炼焦实验.结果表明：R1，R2，R3，R4和R5这5个指标与w(Vdaf)值、Rmax值、G值和Y值之间都有着较强的线性相关性，相关系数R分别为0.933，0.976，0.858和0.564；采用R1，R2，R3，R4和R5预测焦炭反应性，预测精度高；R1含量增加会明显劣化焦炭热态强度，R3和R4含量增加会提高焦炭热态强度，同时，R1，R2，R3，R4和R5对CRI的影响程度大小为R1>R3=R4>R5>R2.通过调整R1，R2，R3，R4和R5的含量，使其分别为25%~35%，20%~30%，10%~20%，10%~25%和5%~15%，可以有效改善焦炭热态强度.@针对新疆准东煤钠含量偏高，锅炉燃用时易发生水冷壁结渣、受热面高温腐蚀和烟道沾污积灰等情况，对准东煤的煤质特性进行分析，采用阳离子交换树脂洗涤准东煤，利用树脂的离子交换功能，使树脂的交换基团中的阳离子与准东煤的钠离子发生置换反应，达到脱钠的效果，并研究洗涤温度与洗涤时间对准东煤脱钠效果的影响.结果表明：在4 h，60 ℃的恒温洗涤条件下，准东煤脱钠效果达到最佳，可溶性钠脱除率达到90%以上，ts提高124 ℃，煤质特性得到改善.@运用X射线衍射(XRD)、X射线光电子能谱(XPS)分别研究了焦炭中无机硫和有机硫的类型，尝试用一种新方法分析热解焦中形态硫，即碘量法测定焦中无机硫化物含量、且可以直接测定焦中有机硫含量的方法，并运用此方法考察了钙基添加剂对高硫煤高温热解后形成的焦中形态硫分布的影响规律.结果表明：钙基添加剂改变了煤热解后焦炭形态硫的分布，一方面，通过高温固硫作用，提高了焦中无机硫化物含量所占比例(其中无机硫化物主要以CaS形式存在)；另一方面，通过促进煤中有机硫的分解，降低了焦炭中有机硫含量所占比例.@为了提高煤热解焦油的产率和品质，在小型流化床实验台上分别考察了N2，N2+H2，CH4+N2，CH4+H2等气氛及前置Ni/Al2O3催化剂对流化床煤热解的影响，结果表明：H2气氛会减少半焦产率，增加焦油产率；CH4气氛在800 ℃时反而会增加半焦产率，同时高温下CH4的分解对焦油产率的增加有促进作用，相比于N2气氛，焦油产率提高了35.8%；CH4+H2气氛下半焦焦油产率的总体趋势同H2气氛下相同.还原性气氛有利于焦油的轻质化：H2，CH4+N2，CH4+H2气氛下800 ℃时，轻质焦油的占比分别较N2气氛提高了29.1%，15.2%，24%.在CH4+N2和CH4+H2气氛下，采用前置Ni/Al2O3催化剂后，焦油产率都得到不同程度的提升.CH4+N2气氛下600 ℃时，催化剂可以使焦油产率较无催化剂时提高40%；CH4+H2气氛下800 ℃时，催化剂对CH4的催化效果更好，热解气中CH4含量明显减少，而焦油产率较无催化剂时提高了37%.Ni/Al2O3催化剂可以进一步提高焦油的品质，并且有利于焦油中芳香烃的生成.@采用自制的低温热解装置研究褐煤与甘蔗渣(SB)共热解过程中添加甘蔗渣对褐煤热解特性的影响.结果表明：随着甘蔗渣掺混比的增加，热解油产率呈现先增大后减小的趋势.在甘蔗渣掺混比为20%(质量分数，下同)时，热解油产率达到最大值16.7%，比褐煤单独热解得到的焦油产率增加了13.7%，与焦油计算值产率出现0.57%的最大正偏差.热值分析得出共热解过程有利于褐煤和甘蔗渣的能量富集，共热解半焦比原煤半焦的热值大；焦油的FTIR谱表明，添加甘蔗渣会促进褐煤中—OH和—CH3官能团的断裂和分解，会使甘蔗渣中羧基官能团以其他含氧官能团形式转移到焦油中，有利于焦油轻质化；热重分析表明，热解过程分为三个阶段，甘蔗渣的添加对褐煤的快速热解阶段影响显著，使褐煤的最大失重速率增加，提高了8.96%，最大失重速率所对应的热解温度降低了98.8 ℃，甘蔗渣的添加一定程度上促进了热解反应的进行.@在滴管炉上研究不同煤种(褐煤、烟煤、贫煤和无烟煤)与生物质(稻壳)混燃NOx的排放特性，分析不同燃烧气氛、生物质掺混比例和氧气体积分数对混燃NOx排放特性的影响.结果表明：在20%O2/80%N2气氛下，不同煤种和生物质混燃时，NOx沿程分布均呈现出先增大后减小的变化趋势，烟煤/稻壳的NOx排放量最高；在氧气体积分数为20%条件下，O2/CO2气氛比O2/N2气氛下NOx的排放量降低；在30%O2/70%CO2气氛下，随着混燃中生物质掺混比例的增加，不同煤种NOx的排放量逐渐降低，褐煤的NOx排放量下降最显著，由130.029 mg/m3下降到49.674 mg/m3；在O2/CO2气氛下，随着氧气体积分数的升高，NOx排放量增加.氧气体积分数由20%升高到30%，烟煤单燃时NOx排放的增加量较小，生物质和烟煤混燃时NOx排放的增加量较大.@在预设的超声条件下对不同煤-油共炼原料进行预处理，并在相同的反应条件下使用实验室自制的铁系催化剂进行煤-油共炼反应，考察煤液化率的变化，对液体产物进行元素和馏程分析以及对固体产物进行工业四组分分析，确定超声波预处理对煤-油临氢共炼的影响.结果表明：经过超声波预处理后，共炼原料结构发生改变，分别对油浆及使用安徽煤与油浆所配油煤浆进行超声处理，再进行共炼反应，安徽煤的液化率分别提高9.85%和12.42%；分别对煤焦油及对使用安徽煤与煤焦油所配油煤浆进行超声处理，再进行共炼反应，安徽煤的液化率分别提高7.99%和18.65%，固体产物的灰分、挥发分降低，固定碳含量增加，质量有所提高；液体产物的馏程分布基本没有改变.达到了在提高煤液化率的同时、保证共炼产物质量不变的目的.@使用KOH作为活化剂，以煤液化沥青为碳源，制得比表面积在3 000 m2/g以上的活性炭材料.使用X射线衍射(XRD)、扫描电镜(SEM)、氮气吸附和脱附等方法对炭材料的物理化学特性进行了表征.结果表明：煤液化沥青基活性炭(ACCLA)对H2，CH4和CO2的吸附量最高分别为24.85 mmol/g(77 K，400 kPa)，4.62 mmol/g(298 K，400 kPa)和3.57 mmol/g(298 K，100 kPa)，发现超级活性炭在气体吸附方面表现出优异的性能和良好的应用前景；同时，对多孔结构特性与吸附量之间的对应关系进行了讨论.发现在测试条件下，H2在吸附量受材料比表面积大小影响很大，而对于CH4和CO2孔径尺寸的作用更显著.@基于分析法及黑箱模型理论，针对规模为14亿m3/a的煤制合成天然气的工艺设计，对其主要工段进行计算分析，得出不同工段及整个工艺的损失状况.结果表明：气化工段的普遍效率最低，甲醇洗工段的普遍效率最高，分别为84.75%和98.90%，系统的损失主要发生在气化工段，占整个工艺损失的77.78%；变换、甲醇洗和甲烷化工段分别占整个工艺损失的5.49%，4.04%和12.68%；在气化工段，增加副产蒸汽压力对于提高效率效果并不明显，提高效率应着重改善气化炉和洗涤冷却器的操作条件；对于甲烷化工段，增加副产蒸汽压力能明显提高效率，同时也能增大副产蒸汽量.@在固定床反应器中对溶胶凝胶法制备的锰铈催化剂进行脱硝实验、氧化实验和脱附实验.结果表明：MnOx/γ-Al2O3催化剂在300 ℃达到最佳脱硝效率，添加CeO2后，最佳脱硝效率对应温度降至250 ℃.CeO2的添加提高了低温条件下催化剂表面的氧化活化能力，但温度高于300 ℃时，NH3会发生过度氧化生成N2O副产物.MnOx负载量的增加会使NH3在催化剂表面的吸附量增多，且会增加NO在多种活性位上的吸附，从而使催化剂在更宽的温度范围内均表现出较高的催化效率.@对6株细菌和硝酸氧化的山西临汾褐煤进行菌-煤匹配降解实验，筛选出降解优势菌恶臭假单胞菌.在单因素试验的基础上，通过正交试验优化了恶臭假单胞菌降解临汾褐煤的工艺条件，得出的影响权重为：煤样粒度>煤浆质量浓度>培养时间>接种量.较优降解工艺条件为：煤样粒度<75 μm，煤浆质量浓度0.200 0 g/10 mL，培养时间14 d，接种量1.0 mL/10 mL.此条件下的降解转化率达到46.81%.对降解后的煤残渣和降解产物进行红外检测，结果表明：煤残渣在氧化煤既有波数处的吸收大部分已消失或者变弱，说明煤中的有机大分子已被恶臭假单胞菌降解成小分子，包含在降解后的黑色油状滤液中.滤液分级萃取物的GC-MS总离子流色谱证明了降解液中含有丰富的小分子有机物，且大多为脂肪烃、酯、羧酸及芳香族化合物.@采用静态体积法测试了298.15 K，313.15 K和328.15 K时，CH4和N2在太西煤基炭分子筛(T-CMS)及13X沸石上的吸附量，并使用Langmuir模型对吸附量数据进行了线性拟合，分析了拟合参数饱和吸附量qm和吸附平衡常数b值的变化.结果表明：随着温度的升高，CH4在T-CMS上的饱和吸附量qm稍有减少，但变化不大，N2在T-CMS上的饱和吸附量qm呈增大趋势；CH4和N2在13X沸石上的饱和吸附量qm均呈减小趋势，CH4和N2在T-CMS及13X沸石上的吸附平衡常数b值均随温度的升高而减小；CH4和N2在T-CMS上的分离系数均大于其在13X沸石上的分离系数，分离系数均随温度升高而减小.吸附热力学分析表明，CH4和N2在T-CMS上的等量吸附热平均值分别为27.30 kJ/mol和22.43 kJ/mol，而在13X沸石上的等量吸附热平均值分别为12.96 kJ/mol和10.41 kJ/mol，两种吸附剂对CH4的吸附作用均强于其对N2的吸附作用，且均属于物理吸附.@以沁水盆地中南部霍尔辛赫井田的不同煤体结构煤为研究对象，用盐酸(HCl)、醋酸(HAc)和氢氟酸(HF)对煤样进行酸化处理，并运用低温灰化和X射线衍射等方法，对酸改造前后煤样的质量变化率、煤-水接触角和表面张力进行测试计算分析.研究表明：盐酸和醋酸作用后煤样的质量变化率在0.1%左右，而氢氟酸作用后煤样的质量变化率却高达7%；不同酸的作用对象不同，氢氟酸可与煤中大部分无机矿物质发生反应，效果最为显著；盐酸酸化后，煤-水接触角由59.75°减小为33.25°，表面张力由54.42 mJ/m2增至66.45 mJ/m2，含水性增强；而醋酸和氢氟酸酸化后，煤-水接触角由59.75°分别增至85.00°和84.50°，表面张力由54.42 mJ/m2分别减至39.34 mJ/m2和39.65 mJ/m2，疏水性增强；煤样经酸化处理后，煤-水接触角和表面张力变化明显.@利用量热法分别对褐煤、脱灰褐煤和常见矿物质的润湿热进行测定，考察水分复吸对褐煤润湿性的影响，并对干燥褐煤水分复吸动力学进行分析.结果表明：褐煤中有机质的润湿热远大于其矿物质的润湿热，是褐煤润湿放热的主体.褐煤中含氧官能团越多，润湿热值越大.酸洗脱灰降低了褐煤的亲水性.芒来褐煤脱灰后，润湿热由101.61 J/g降至66.79 J/g，褐煤矿物质中高岭石的润湿热高于方解石和石英的润湿热；干燥褐煤的水分复吸符合二级动力学模型，相关系数大于0.99；褐煤复吸水分越多，其润湿热越小，芒来褐煤复吸水分增加到28.76%(质量分数)时，其润湿热由101.61 J/g降至5.04 J/g.水分复吸过程中，在表面形成的单层吸附或团簇吸附是褐煤润湿热降低的主要影响因素，而孔隙吸附或毛细凝聚吸附对其润湿热影响较小.@利用TG-DTG热分析仪对神府粉煤热解特性进行实验研究，考察升温速率、煤样粒径和载气流速对神府粉煤热解过程的影响，并通过正交实验确定最大失重速率的最佳条件.热重实验结果表明：升温速率、煤样粒径和载气流速对热解失重均有影响.升温速率和载气流速增大，热解失重量减少.粒径对热解失重率的影响呈抛物线分布，最大热解失重量存在最佳粒径，本实验所研究的粒径小于0.84 mm的神府煤，热解过程中最佳粒径为0.25 mm~0.42 mm.正交实验结果表明：升温速率是影响煤热解过程的主要因素，其次是粒径，载气流速对热解影响最小；当神府煤的煤样粒径为0.25 mm~0.42 mm、升温速率为30 ℃/min、载气流速为120 mL/min时，热解失重速率最大，为4.95 %/min.@以自制的ZSM-5为载体，制备了NiW/ZSM-5及磷改性PNiW/ZSM-5负载型催化剂，通过XRD，ICP，BET，NH3-TPD和SEM等检测手段对催化剂进行系列表征.结果表明：绝大部分Ni，W和P活性组分被引入到载体上，且分散均匀，改性后分子筛的强酸性位数量明显减少.利用热重-红外联用(TG-FTIR)装置对神东煤在不同催化剂上的热解性能进行评价.结果显示，与原煤热解相比较，催化剂NiW/ZSM-5和PNiW/ZSM-5均使神东煤热解的最大失重峰温提前了8 ℃，失重率分别增加了1.2%和2.0%.FTIR谱显示，在ZSM-5作用下气相产物析出量无明显增加，而在NiW/ZSM-5和PNiW/ZSM-5催化剂作用下，CH4、CO、NH3、轻质脂肪烃和芳香烃的析出量增加明显，其中以PNiW/ZSM-5催化剂效果最佳.@设计了适合于地下催化热解/气化的错时喷射催化剂添加装置，在卧式热解反应器中使用四种典型催化剂对新疆淖毛湖长焰煤进行地下催化热解模拟实验.结果表明：四种催化剂可有效提高热解气中H2和CO组分及气态产物产率，催化活性由大到小依次为8% Na2CO3溶液(8%为质量分数，下同)，10%Ca(OH)2溶液，10%CaO粉末，6%FNC(复合催化剂(Fe2O3-Na2CO3-Ca(OH)3))；活性较高的Na2CO3溶液和Ca(OH)2溶液使热解气中H2组分提高了19%(体积分数)，CO组分增加1.2倍，CH4组分在低温热解区有所增加，但在600 ℃以上热解时无明显效果.半焦和焦油产率较催化前分别下降30%和20%~70%，煤气产率提高1.4倍~1.6倍.从催化活性和成本分析，在地下催化热解过程中主催化剂可选择Ca(OH)2溶液，并配置活性最高的Na2CO3溶液作为辅助催化剂.@构建了SAPO-34分子筛中不同尺寸的硅区Sin(n=5，8，9，11，12，13，14)，并运用色散力修正的密度泛函理论(DFT-D)方法研究了SAPO-34分子筛中不同尺寸硅区形成的难易，以及所形成硅区对SAPO-34分子筛的稳定性和酸性的影响.计算结果表明：在SAPO-34分子筛中，含Si5和Si9的硅区容易形成.硅区尺寸越大，SAPO-34分子筛的结构越稳定，酸性越强.同时给出了预测含有不同硅区的分子筛中各酸性位强弱次序的规则.@对煤直接液化柴油(diesel of direct coal liquefaction，DDCL)和煤间接液化柴油(diesel of indirect coal liquefaction，DICL)的性质进行了分析，通过调和试验考察了二者的相容性、煤液化调和柴油的性质规律及其对润滑性改进剂的感受性；并通过发动机台架试验考察了煤液化调和柴油的动力性、经济性和排放性能.结果表明：DDCL与DICL有很好的相容性；煤液化调和柴油的密度和十六烷值与其中DICL的质量分数呈线性关系，能够实现二者的优势互补；其对润滑性改进剂具有良好的感受性；在国Ⅳ发动机上有很好的动力性，单位质量油耗略有优势，常规排放满足国Ⅳ排放标准，且在NOx、烟度和PM排放方面有较大优势.@采用4种水样(含采油污水)对新疆地区3种低阶煤展开成浆特性、浆体流变特性及稳定性实验研究.结果表明：乌苏红山煤、乌苏四棵树煤和徐矿4煤的成浆质量分数分别可达66.5%，61.0%和53.4%.在污水制浆中，以含油量较高的重力除油入口水较合适，可促进成浆，相比重力除油出口水制浆，乌苏红山煤和乌苏四棵树煤浆体表观黏度分别可降低30.3%和66.8%，徐矿4煤成浆质量分数提升1.1%；重力除油入口水还可提高浆体热值，简化污水处理.3种煤浆稳定性差异较大，其中乌苏四棵树煤浆稳定性最好；影响浆体稳定性的主要是煤质和添加剂，水样对煤浆稳定性的影响较小.@基于等体积浸渍法和固硫理论，研究了以表面负载不同金属氧化物的活性氧化铝作为型煤添加剂的固硫效果，并通过SEM分析和XRD分析，分别考察了不同活性氧化铝的孔结构变化、原煤煤灰和负载CaO的活性氧化铝型煤煤灰的物相变化.结果表明：活性氧化铝和负载不同金属氧化物的活性氧化铝对型煤燃烧中SO2减排效果由高到低依次为负载CaO的活性氧化铝、负载CuO的活性氧化铝、负载BaO的活性氧化铝和活性氧化铝.通过SEM分析发现，活性氧化铝改性后提高了孔结构的热稳定性.通过XRD分析发现，负载CaO的活性氧化铝在型煤燃烧过程中会与SO2反应，生成耐高温络合物3CaO·3Al2O3·CaSO4，阻碍了部分CaSO4的分解，从而提高了其固硫性能.经实验对比发现，负载CaO的活性氧化铝的固硫效果比传统固硫剂CaO更优.@提出了一种梯级筛分和内加热流化床结合的新型CMC(coal moisture control)工艺(EN-CMC工艺)，其用高比热和高密度的热水作为载热介质，分离原有热烟气的载热和载湿功能，可彻底改变原有流化床CMC工艺的能质流程，并且与马钢投产运行的186 t/h新日铁流化床CMC工艺和宝钢投产运行的330 t/h蒸汽滚筒式CMC工艺(STD工艺)进行能效对比.结果表明：通过EN-CMC工艺处理后，减少焦炉供热量2.78×105 kJ/t(干煤)，折合9.50 kgce/t(干煤)，节能效果达到6.92 kgce/t(干煤)，比新日铁流化床CMC工艺的节能效果增强53.4%.@半干法脱氯是通过碱基物质将燃煤烟气中的大部分HCl固定到飞灰中，同时将大幅度减少的脱硫(flue gas desulfurization，FGD)废水作为碱基溶剂回喷烟道，从而可实现脱硫废水零排放.通过搭建实验台对碱基物质与烟气中HCl和SO2的反应效率随n(Na+)/n(Cl-)的变化进行了实验研究.结果表明：碱基物质与HCl的反应效率与n(Na+)/n(Cl-)呈正相关，且随n(Na+)/n(Cl-)的增大，其增长趋势逐渐变缓，在n(Na+)/n(Cl-)为4.8时，反应效率已经达到70%以上.针对一台660 MW燃煤机组进行计算，采用半干法烟气脱氯后，脱硫废水量显著下降，由8.01 m3/h降为2.31 m3/h；利用脱硫废水作为碱基溶剂回喷空气预热器后烟道，烟气温降较小，仅为2.49 ℃.半干法脱氯系统简单，运行成本较低，不会对粉煤灰的综合利用造成显著的不利影响.@以天然水镁石(Mg(OH)2)浆液为原料，在固液质量比1∶6，反应温度40 ℃，反应压力1.01×105 Pa，模拟烟道气的CO2体积分数为15%的条件下进行碳捕集，同时产出副产品碱式碳酸镁(4MgCO3·Mg(OH)2·4H2O)，此方法不仅降低了捕集成本，而且副产高附加值产品.对反应过程中体系的pH值和物质组成进行了检测，探讨了不同气速对反应时间的影响，并对最终产物进行了滴定分析和热失重分析.结果表明：反应终止的pH值为7.73~7.74，较适宜的气速为60 mL/min，此时CO2回收率达40.87%.最终产物碱式碳酸镁的镁含量达到43.16%(质量分数)，失重量达到56.26%，符合碱式碳酸镁产品的行业标准.@利用MATLAB语言开发了简单易用的图形用户界面(GUI)程序VirtualFringe，此程序采用阈值与灰度的调整、高斯模糊、傅立叶变换、二值化、骨架提取、分枝剪切与修剪等方法，从煤的HRTEM图像中抽取出煤微观芳香片层的条纹结构，并通过条纹的外接矩形拟合，分析得出芳香片层的相对位置、角度和长度等信息.利用传统人工分析方法和固态13C NMR结构参数测定，证实了此程序的准确性与可靠性.本程序获得的煤芳香片层结构参数可以用于大尺度煤分子聚集体模型的构建工作.@一定比例的六次甲基四胺(HMT)和钼酸铵(AHM)反应生成络合物，将络合物简单焙烧，成功制备了β-Mo2C.将上述络合物与霍林河(HLH)脱灰煤机械混合后热解，在煤热解的同时，原位生成担载γ-MoNxCy的活性半焦(ASC).采用XRD，SEM，HRTEM和元素分析等方法对催化剂进行表征，并对其在甲烷化反应中的催化行为进行考察.结果表明：尽管β-Mo2C的CO转化率较高，但CH4选择性较低且活性不够稳定；而在担载γ-MoNxCy的活性半焦中，由于活性半焦提高了金属活性组分Mo的分散度及C部分取代N所造成的晶格畸变提高了催化剂本身的催化活性，两者共同作用使单位质量Mo上CO转化速率由β-Mo2C的2.22 mol/(h·g)增加到17.47 mol/(h·g)，同时CH4选择性由β-Mo2C的33.52%(质量分数，下同)增加到49.54%.担载γ-MoNxCy的活性半焦在合成气气氛下实现了煤催化加氢热解与甲烷化反应的耦合.@为提高流化-输送床耦合装置气力分级过程中煤颗粒的品质，采用正交实验法，选择耦合装置的表观气速、进料口位置和进料速率三个参数为因素，每个因素取三个水平，考虑因素之间的交互作用，选取L18(37)正交表得到18组方案.运用计算颗粒流体力学(CPFD)软件，对煤颗粒气力分级过程进行数值模拟，结合气固流化-输送床耦合装置气力分级实验对分级过程进行研究，并以煤颗粒最优分级效率为指标，由极差综合分析法得出，耦合装置的输送床表观气速是影响煤颗粒气力分级的主要因素，输送床表观气速为8.30 m/s、进料口位置为输送床下部以及进料速率为22.5 kg/(m2·s)的最优组合.@在催化剂装量100 mL的中型试验装置上，以煤焦油为原料，通过加氢方法得到了清洁柴油，柴油密度为0.83 g/cm3~0.86 g/cm3，十六烷值为42~52，硫含量低于2 μg/g；在千吨级固定床费托合成工业试验装置上，以合成气为原料，经费托合成高选择性地得到了液体烃类，在原料气转化率高于93%时，C5+选择性超过86%；在百万吨级工业装置上，以费托合成油为原料，通过加氢提质得到了密度低于0.77 g/cm3、十六烷值为76~81、硫含量低于1 μg/g的清洁柴油组分，同时还可以得到高品质液蜡、喷气燃料和溶剂油.煤炭分级利用过程中产生的煤焦油和荒煤气，通过合适的加工路线均可以得到硫含量满足国五标准的清洁油品.@采用完全液相法制备以TiO2-AlOOH为复合载体，Ni和W为活性组分的浆状加氢催化剂，考察n(H2O)∶n(Al)对Ni-W催化剂结构与催化性能的影响，并利用XRD，BET，NH3-TPD等手段对催化剂进行表征.采用GC-MS，TG和元素分析对原料及产物的馏分分布及组成进行分析，结果表明：n(H2O)∶n(Al)为75时制备的Ni-W催化剂，产物中轻组分含量最高，加氢脱硫(HDS)活性及产物油的n(H)∶n(C)最高，对煤焦油加氢处理具有较优的加氢效果.@以HMCM-22分子筛为载体，化学键合固载吡咯烷酮离子液体，并用于催化合成聚甲醛二甲醚(DMMn).XRD，FTIR及SEM结果表明：吡咯烷酮离子液体可以较好地固载于HMCM-22分子筛上.优选合成聚甲醛二甲醚的反应条件为：催化剂用量为总反应物质量的2.0%，甲缩醛与多聚甲醛的质量比(醇醛比)为2∶1，反应温度为120 ℃，反应时间为6 h，离子液体负载量为2.0.产物中的甲缩醛转化率和DMM3-8选择性分别可达55.41%和30.87%，与纯离子液体和分子筛催化剂的反应效果相比，DMM3-8收率得到较大提高，且反应结束后催化剂和产物可自动分离为两相，可直接回收催化剂循环使用.重复使用4次后负载型分子筛催化剂仍能保持很高的活性.@以煤液化沥青为原料，炭黑、石油焦、石墨和针状焦为成核剂，在410 ℃恒温5 h条件下，采用热聚合法制备中间相炭微球，并研究四种成核剂在相同热处理条件下得到的中间相炭微球，作为锂离子电池负极材料的性能.结果表明：以炭黑和石墨为成核剂可以制备得到粒度分布均匀、表面形貌较好的中间相炭微球.由电性能测试结果可知，首次可逆容量和首次效率分别为353.9 mAh/g与92.9%和346.5mAh/g与92.6%.对比商品化中间相炭微球指标，发现以炭黑和石墨为成核剂制备得到的中间相炭微球，其性能与国内同类产品的性能相近.@以神木煤与黏结煤为实验对象，探究神木煤与黏结煤配伍的配比对炼焦黏结特性的影响规律以及达到完全融合状态的配煤条件.在此基础上，研究了神木煤与气煤、肥煤和焦煤配煤时，其黏结性能与wO∶wH的关系.结果表明：随神木煤配比增加，配煤黏结性变差，配煤GRI值快速下降且其实验值远低于单种煤加和计算值；在一定的神木煤配入比例内，Y值与加和计算值基本吻合；配煤wO∶wH的影响与神木煤比例的影响一致；神木煤与气煤、肥煤和焦煤配伍时，当配煤达到完全融合状态时，神木煤的最大配比分别为30%(质量分数，下同)，50%和40%，配煤Y值≥10，且神木煤与气煤、肥煤、焦煤配煤的焦渣特征指数分别大于4，5，4.@根据干熄焦炉内焦炭颗粒不同堆积情况，计算了焦炭对环形风道内墙产生的横向推力，并考虑炉内循环气体流动对内墙产生的压差，耦合热应力与结构应力，采用有限元方法对环形风道内墙耐火材料应力进行仿真模拟，分析了环形风道内墙损毁的应力因素.结果表明：随冷却风量增加，环形风道内墙温度梯度变大，热应力增加；热应力为结构应力的两倍以上，是内墙耐火材料变形开裂的主要因素.为避免内墙的继续开裂与外鼓，在环形风道内安装三角支撑梁，并通过阻力计算确定了合理的闸板开度，以保持炉内热工制度的稳定.@以粒度为2.0 mm～3.2 mm的兰炭末为原料，采用水蒸气高温活化法制备颗粒活性炭，研究活化温度对活性炭结构与性能的影响，阐述活化过程中活性炭孔结构的形成机理，并利用SEM和全自动吸附仪对活性炭的表面形貌、比表面积和孔结构等进行分析表征.结果表明：随着活化温度的升高，活性炭的收率持续减小，碘吸附值呈现先增大后减小的趋势.当活化温度为900 ℃时，活性炭的收率为59.81%，其碘吸附值最大可达到812.86 mg/g，BET比表面积和孔容分别为529.66 m2/g和0.298 9 cm3/g.当活化温度为600 ℃时，水蒸气活化过程以通孔作用为主导，700 ℃～800 ℃时为造孔阶段，而800 ℃～1 000 ℃范围内主要进行扩孔反应.@通过响应曲面模型的建立，考察变量因素之间的相互作用，在减少实验操作次数的基础上，模拟优化出最佳的提取条件.选取碱提工艺中的碱液质量浓度、液固体积质量比和溶出时间作为变量因素，以腐植酸的提取率为响应值，进行了三因素三水平的Box-behnken的中心组合设计试验.结果表明：预测的最优碱提工艺条件为碱液质量浓度0.049 8 g/mL，液固体积质量比10.44 mL/g，溶出时间3.4 h；腐植酸的预测提取率为17.51%，验证实验的平均提取率为17.05%，与模型预测值相吻合.@进行了不同成分粉煤灰活性钨极氩弧焊实验，得到低碳钢Q235A焊接母材焊缝，利用万能试验机对焊缝的拉伸性能进行了检测，并利用静态腐蚀性能测试和电化学腐蚀性能测试对焊缝的耐蚀性进行了检测.结果表明：加入粉煤灰作活性剂得到的焊缝的抗拉强度与无粉煤灰时得到的焊缝的抗拉强度相比无大变化；对于静态腐蚀性能测试，在15% H2SO4溶液、10%NaOH溶液和3.5%NaCl溶液中，粉煤灰1活性焊缝的耐蚀性较常规焊缝的耐蚀性分别提高了1.90倍、1.29倍和1.81倍，粉煤灰2活性焊缝的耐蚀性较常规焊缝的耐蚀性分别提高1.44倍、1.20倍和1.47倍；对于电化学腐蚀性能测试，粉煤灰1活性焊缝和粉煤灰2活性焊缝的腐蚀速率均小于常规焊缝的腐蚀速率.粉煤灰作活性剂可以使材料力学性能不变，并细化焊缝显微组织，增强结构耐腐蚀性.@为了降低碳化钙合成温度，研究了碳(C)和氧化钙(CaO)合成碳化钙(CaC2)过程所涉及反应的热力学，通过平衡常数法计算得到临界温度等热力学数据.计算结果表明：氧化钙与焦炭最低反应温度为氧化钙的塔曼温度(1 442 ℃)，但由于反应物浓度低，反应速度缓慢；提高反应温度至1 882 ℃，固态氧化钙可与碳反应生成碳化钙，并随着碳化钙的积累，局部产生相变，发生界面反应，表现为液态氧化钙与碳反应生成碳化钙，临界反应温度降低为1 753 ℃.继续升高温度至2 222 ℃，生成的碳化钙能自催化氧化钙与碳反应生成碳化钙，但是当氧化钙过量而碳含量不足时，生成的Ca蒸气不能及时被碳吸收，则会造成Ca的流失，降低电石品质.计算结果进一步表明：降低CO分压可大幅度降低电石的临界生成温度，当CO分压为0.01 MPa时，固态氧化钙与碳的临界反应温度可降低至1 700 ℃，此时CaC2的理论平衡摩尔分数为92.9%.不同条件下氧化钙与碳对比反应结果验证了热力学的分析，并且Ar气氛下1 620 ℃就可以合成CaC2也验证了低温合成电石的可能.@为探究西部煤的加氢液化反应性能，对新疆淖毛湖煤和内蒙古不连沟煤在间歇高压反应釜中进行了加氢液化实验，借助固体13C-NMR和FTIR分析手段，对比研究了不同类型碳和官能团在两种煤及反应中间产物沥青质(PAA)中的分布.结果发现：淖毛湖煤的转化率和油产率分别为96.33%和47.86%，明显高于不连沟煤的转化率(76.18%)和油产率(23.44%).煤中脂肪碳和芳香碳所占比例是造成加氢液化反应转化率差异的主要因素，脂肪类和芳香类官能团的含量与反应性的关系分别呈正相关和负相关；液化油产率与原料煤中亚甲基碳和次甲基碳含量有关；与原煤相比，沥青质中的脂肪碳比例减少而芳香碳比例增加，说明脂肪碳是加氢过程中发生裂解加氢的主要活性结构.@在纤维素上负载K2SO4和K2CO3，采用热重-红外联用(TG-FTIR)对负载钾盐的纤维素与煤共热解特性进行了研究，并采用红外光谱表征了热解前后样品的化学结构.结果表明：在900 ℃热解后，焦样中含C，H，O有机官能团和高岭石的峰消失，其中有机官能团的消失与气体产物释放有关，高岭石的消失是由于热转化生成偏高岭石和石英.纤维素与煤共热解过程中发生了协同反应.钾盐的添加对共热解反应中焦炭产率、最大反应速率、反应温度区间和活化能等都有较大影响，还促进了CO和CO2的产量增加，并且使它们产生的温度区间移向低温区，其中K2CO3的作用更明显.K2SO4对酸类和酮醛类等含CO官能团的产物生成具有促进作用，而K2CO3具有抑制作用.钾盐对共热解CH4气体的生成有不同程度的抑制作用.@基于密度泛函理论和过渡态原理，使用Dmol3模块在分子水平上研究了含有吡啶型氮和吡咯型氮的Armchair和Zigzag型煤焦边缘模型热解过程中释放NH3的过程，并从能量和热力学角度分析煤焦中哪种氮的存在形式容易热解释放NH3.所涉及的基元反应均寻找到了过渡态，并得到每一步反应的活化能.通过吉布斯自由能的比较和反应能量对比发现，含有吡啶氮的煤焦模型第一步加氢吸附是放热的，而第二步加氢吸附则为吸热的；含有2-吡啶酮的吡咯氮煤焦模型氢的吸附过程是吸热的；无论是含有吡啶氮还是吡咯氮，Armchair煤焦模型相对于Zigzag煤焦模型来说更容易开环析出NH2基团；含有2-吡啶酮的吡咯氮煤焦模型相对于含有吡啶氮的煤焦模型来说更容易加氢析出NH2，进而形成NH3分子；四条反应路径中含有吡咯氮的Armchair模型最容易产生NH3.@以褐煤A为原料煤，以马瑞常压渣油为原料油，采用实验室合成的油溶性铁镍复合催化剂在高压釜中模拟煤/重油浆态床加氢共炼反应进行活性评价.采用XRD，SEM和TEM等表征手段分析催化剂的硫化产物及煤/重油加氢共炼体系产生的固体残渣，探究该复合催化剂与单金属催化剂之间产生活性差异的原因.结果表明：相比于油溶性单金属铁、油溶性单金属镍催化剂，油溶性铁镍复合催化剂具有更高的干基无灰煤转化率，可达87.37%.油溶性铁镍复合催化剂的硫化产物结晶度低，颗粒表面粗糙，分散度高，不仅存在铁、镍的单金属硫化物，而且形成了铁镍混晶的硫化物(Fe-Ni-S混晶).油溶性铁镍复合催化剂作用下得到的固体残渣，粒径小，结构松散，芳香度低，进一步证实油溶性铁镍复合催化剂促进了煤的深度转化.@利用制备液相技术对传统柱层析方法进行了改进，并采用正戊烷、二氯甲烷、乙酸乙酯/乙腈、甲醇四种溶剂作为流动相，实现了对霍林河褐煤650 ℃下热解产出煤焦油的不同组成的窄组分分离，利用GC-MS手段对各个分离组分进行了组成分析.结果表明，实验所用低温煤焦油以芳烃、含氧及含氮化合物为主要成分，含量分别为22.47%，31.19%和17.66%；还含有10%左右的杂多原子化合物及低于10%的烷烃和烯烃.同时各组分的组成表明，低温煤焦油的各个窄组分的分离原理是流动相按照化合物的极性及分子结构进行分组分离.@以少动鞘脂单胞菌和红城红球菌对氧化的内蒙古褐煤(氧化煤)进行了降解实验研究.通过测定这两种细菌每天降解氧化煤后离心液相产物的pH值和降解率，发现降解率与pH值有密切的联系，当pH值在8.1~8.2之间，两种细菌均表现出较好的降解效果；当pH值大于8.4时，细菌的生物活性降低，导致氧化煤被降解效率受到抑制.少动鞘脂单胞菌和红城红球菌的最大降解率分别为50.86%和52.86%，说明这两种细菌均能有效降解氧化煤，其中红城红球菌的降解率高于少动鞘脂单胞菌的降解率.通过紫外光谱(UV)、红外光谱(IR)和气相色谱-质谱联用(GC-MS)等方法对降解的液相产物进行分析，结果表明，两种细菌对氧化煤降解的液相产物主要包含酯类和酰胺类物质.@采用KOH-HNO3联合法对自制煤基电极进行改性处理，主要研究了KOH添加量对煤基电极材料结构和吸附性能的影响.采用扫描电子显微镜(SEM)、傅立叶红外光谱(FTIR)和N2吸附法对煤基电极的形貌特征、表面官能团及孔径分布进行分析表征.研究表明：随着KOH添加量的增加，煤基电极材料的碘吸附值逐渐增大，而抗压强度与收率则逐渐减小，比表面积、总孔容和微孔孔容逐渐增大.当KOH添加量为15%(质量分数)时，碘吸附值达810.8 mg/g，抗压强度为4.47 MPa，活化收率为59.5%，比表面积为377 m2/g，总孔容为0.187 cm3/g，微孔孔容为0.160 cm3/g，微孔率达到85.56%.微孔和中孔数量及表面含氧官能团的增加，导致形成发达的蜂窝状孔结构，有利于电解液进入形成双电层结构.电化学测试表明，KOH添加量越大，煤基电极的扩散阻抗越小，比电容越大.以煤基电极为阴阳极，活性炭为粒子电极，采用三维电极体系处理氰化废水，当电压为4 V、时间为5 h时，处理后的废水中离子的去除率均达到95%以上.@以七种高铁煤灰为研究对象，采用高温黏度计测试煤灰的黏温特性，按煤灰黏温特性的特征对样品进行分组，采用X射线荧光光谱仪(XRF)、X射线衍射仪(XRD)和扫描电子显微镜及能谱(SEM-EDS)研究黏温特性与熔渣矿物质的关系.结果表明：高铁煤灰存在低灰熔点高黏度现象，样品的黏温特性曲线均呈现出结晶渣或接近结晶渣的特征，且存在不同程度的波动.Fe含量与煤灰黏温曲线的波动程度有一定的关联，随着煤灰中铁钙镁比(w(Fe2O3)/w(CaO+MgO))的增加，其黏温曲线的波动增大.当铁钙镁比<0.7时，煤灰黏温曲线没有波动或波动较小；当铁钙镁比在0.7~1.0之间时，煤灰黏温曲线有一定的波动，波动主要集中在黏度值为15 Pa·s~60 Pa·s之间；当铁钙镁比>2.0时，煤灰黏温曲线有较大的波动.样品熔渣的背散射(BSE)照片表现出明暗相间部分，明暗不同的区域元素的富集程度不同.Fe和Mg主要富集于明亮区域，Si和Ca主要富集于较暗区域，Al在两种区域中均有较多分布.研究证实高铁煤灰黏温曲线波动与铁尖晶石或镁铝铁氧化物的生成有关.@对负载复合金属催化剂的活性半焦脱除烟气中NO进行了非等温动力学研究，并对其反应机制进行了探讨.使用热重分析仪进行程序升温脱硝实验，采用Flynn-Wall-Ozawa(FWO)，Kissinger-Akahira-Sunose(KAS)和Coats-Redfen(CR)非等温动力学方法，计算纯活性半焦和负载金属催化剂的活性半焦脱硝的表观活化能.使用X射线衍射仪(XRD)对催化剂脱硝前后的金属活性相进行了分析.结果表明：在活性半焦上负载铜铁复合金属催化剂后，降低了脱硝反应的表观活化能、反应所需温度和反应能耗；当活性半焦的碳转化率≤0.3时，脱硝过程主要由化学反应控制，当碳转化率＞0.3时，脱硝过程转向扩散控制为主；通过XRD结果分析可知，金属催化剂的低价态活性相具有较高的催化活性，随着脱硝反应的进行，金属活性相被氧化成为活性较低的高价态；复合金属氧化物铁酸铜能在反应过程中分解成为活性更高的金属活性相，提高了脱硝性能.@以加氢半焦为原料，利用下落床和固定床装置，高温水蒸气活化直接制得廉价的活性焦，并对其进行高浓度和低浓度气化废水处理实验.在优化的制备条件下，分别考察了活化时间对活性焦吸附指标和废水吸附性能的影响.结果表明：随着活化时间由5 s增加到120 min，所制备活性焦的苯酚吸附值和碘值先增加后略微下降，总比表面和总孔容增加.未活化的加氢半焦吸附指标较低且废水吸附效果较差.采用下落床活化，活化时间为5 s时，活性焦吸附性能提高不明显；而采用固定床活化，活性焦吸附性能明显提高.当活化时间为90 min时，活性焦的苯酚吸附值和碘值达到最大值，分别为97 mg/L和588 mg/L，总比表面积和总孔容分别可达675.53 m2/g和0.631 2 cm3/g.当活化时间>30 min时，自制活性焦对高低浓度气化废水中COD、总磷、TOC的去除率和吸附容量与市售活性焦相近，而活化时间在30 min~120 min范围内变动导致COD、总磷、TOC的去除率和吸附容量变化范围均<5%，活化时间对高低浓度气化废水中COD、总磷、TOC的去除率和吸附容量均影响不大.@采用热重分析法对生物质三组分(纤维素、半纤维素和木质素)进行O2/CO2燃烧特性实验，分析了不同气氛(O2/N2和O2/CO2)、氧体积分数(10%，21%和40%)和升温速率(10 ℃/min，20 ℃/min和30 ℃/min)对三组分O2/CO2燃烧特性的影响.结果表明：与O2/N2气氛相比，在O2/CO2气氛下三组分燃烧过程存在不同程度的延迟，主要体现在焦炭燃烧阶段；由于木质素焦炭质量分数较高，因此其燃烧延迟相较于纤维素和半纤维素更加明显.O2/CO2气氛下，由于三组分氧含量较高，氧体积分数增大对三组分挥发分燃烧阶段影响较小；而氧体积分数增大对焦炭燃烧阶段产生了明显的影响，使其向低温区移动，综合燃烧特性明显改善.O2/CO2气氛下，升温速率增大，三组分燃烧过程整体向高温区移动；在挥发分析出燃烧阶段，纤维素与半纤维素的失重速率显著增加，在焦炭燃烧阶段，木质素失重速率显著增加；三组分综合燃烧特性得到改善.相比于纤维素与半纤维素，木质素综合燃烧特性指数较低，综合燃烧特性相对较差.@
According to the swelling measurement principle, combined with a linear variable differential transformer (LVDT) deformation transducer, an apparatus for measuring coal swelling in solvent at elevated temperature and pressure was made. Changes of swelling ratio of the different particle size B3 coal in N2 atmosphere in Shenhua recycle oil were measured. The effect of initial pressure, atmosphere, and coal rank was investigated, and non-isothermal swelling kinetic equation was used to fit the swelling data. The results show that the changes of swelling ratio of B3 increase with temperature increasing, achieve the maximum at 300 ℃ and decrease because of the coal cracking. The higher initial pressure and H2 atmosphere are helpful to coal swelling in solvent. The swelling ratios of the coals in tetralin are relatively higher than that in recycle oil. The non-isothermal swelling kinetics analysis show that the coal swelling in the solvent follows a simple series reaction mechanism and the activation energy is between 20 kJ/mol and 60 kJ/mol.@The effects of particle size on gas yields and gaseous compound contents were investigated by Inner Mongolia lignite pyrolysis tests performed in fixed-bed reactor. The structural characteristics of chars were determined by methods of XRD and physical adsorption. Reactivities of chars of different particle sizes with steam were studied by a thermogravimetric analyzer. The results show that the pyrolysis gas yield decreases as the particle size increases. For gaseous compound contents, the content of CO2 increases with particle size, but contents of CO, H2, CH4 show opposite trends. The degree of graphitization and the specific surface area of the char with relatively large particle size are relatively low, due to the incomplete devolatilization of the char. In addition, the reactivity of char gasification with steam decreases as the particle size increases.@The weight loss data of temperature programmed pyrolysis of Zhundong raw coal at three heating rates were investigated and the kinetic parameters were calculated by using distributed activation energy model (DAEM) method. The applicability of this method in global kinetics research of coal pyrolysis was analyzed. The main conclusions are as follows: due to the effect of heating rate on pyrolysis process as well as the change of reaction mechanism, the applicability of DAEM method to the weight loss data of secondary degassing stage of coal pyrolysis is weak; inclusion or exclusion of the weight loss in the dehydration and degassing stage or the secondary degassing stage, has different effects on the activation energy values corresponding to various degrees of conversion, but little effect on the activation energy distribution function; the relationship between frequency factor and activation energy presents obvious kinetic compensation effect in the almost entire pyrolysis process, and the expression form of this effect only depends on coal type and is not associated with the selected range of temperature for calculation.@The pyrolytic reaction of YFC, straw and their mixture, and the effect of temperature and mixing ratio on the oil yield and quality were investigated on a self-built kilogram class fluidized bed. The results show that the corresponding highest oil yield is 19.18% with reaction pressure 0.1 MPa, conveying gas 15 L/mim, flow gas 25 L/min, the feeding speed 1.5 kg/h, mixing ratio 0.7∶0.3 (mass ratio), temperature 600 ℃, reaction atmosphere N2, and synergistic effect has a maximum value 35.87%. Then the corresponding sulfur content (mass fraction) reduces to 0.31% from 0.60%, and phenolic compounds are mainly concentrated in phenol (16.82%), p-cresol (21.92%), catechol (16.56%) and other 11 kinds of phenolic compounds for extraction using.@Inner Mongolia lignite was treated at different temperatures in an autoclave. The effect of hydrothermal treatment on free radical in lignite tar was investigated by EPR (electron paramagnetic resonance) spectrometer. The results show that the content of free radical in tar decreases obviously after hydrothermal treatment and reach minimum at 260 ℃ (decrease 66.67%). With the increase of hydrothermal treatment temperature, the g factor value of EPR spectra of tar is decreased and the linewidth of that is increased. However, the linewidth of EPR spectra of treated lignite tar at 300 ℃ is lower than that of raw coal tar. Combined with gas chromatography and mass spectrometry (GC-MS) for the determination of tar components, it shows that the relative content (mass fraction) of phenols decreases while monocyclic aromatic hydrocarbons in tar increase from 15.10% to 18.24%, polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons in tar increase from 12.79% to 13.95%. Moreover, the free radical in tar was analyzed by EPR continuously within a certain time (40 d). The results show that the content of free radical in tar after hydrothermal treatment increases more slowly and reaches stably earlier than that in the raw tar in the preservation process.@The pilot plant test of hydrogenation of Shenmu middle and low temperature coal tar was performed in 3×500 mL fixed bed reactors under hydrogen pressure of 10 MPa, and the effects of reaction conditions on the yields and properties of products were investigated. The optimized product distribution is obtained at the total liquid hourly space velocity (LHSV) of 0.2/h, H2 and oil volume ratio of 1 500∶1 and the average reaction temperature of pre-hydrogenation, hydrofining and hydrocracking catalyst is 280 ℃, 380 ℃ and 400 ℃. Compared to the pilot-plant tests, the same reaction conditions are used to obtain the maximum technical economic profit. The degree of influence on raw material and product prices for technical economy follow in the order of product price>coal tar price>hydrogen price. Base on the current prices, the process of whole fraction coal tar hydrogenation at medium pressure would be profitable, when the prices of the raw materials and products are further increased by 35%.@W/O type Fe2+ and S2- precursor emulsion were prepared with wash oil/Span80-Tween80/water, double-emulsion was mixed to prepare iron based pseudohomogeneous catalysts by vulcanization, and the emulsion stability factor, the mechanism of catalyst prepared by emulsion method, catalyst stability and the performance of Xigou coal liquefaction were investigated. The results show that the stable emulsion preparation conditions is m(oil)∶m(water)=9∶1 in Fe2+ and S2- emulsion system with the suitable dosage (mass fraction) of emulsifiers, which are 15.61% and 18.36% respectively, HLB values are 7.3 and 6.7 respectively; stirring rate is 6 000 r/min; emulsion mixing time is 15 min, and emulsion temperature is 20 ℃-30 ℃. In the pseudohomogeneous catalysts emulsion system, the sedimentation rate of catalysts granule is 5.24×10-7 cm/h, calculated by Stokes equation. TEM results exhibit that the average particle size is about 100 nm and the morphology of catalyst particles is similar to spherical particles. When Xigou coal is applied as objects to direct coal liquefaction experiments, in the pseudohomogeneous catalytic system, the oil yield is 4.04% higher than that by commercial Fe2O3 catalyst.@The catalytic hydrogenation experiments of the heavy coal derived fraction (＞320 ℃) were carried out under different conditions. The influence of temperatures, pressures and liquid space velocities were investigated in 30 mL hydrogenation reaction device and the properties of hydrogenated products were examined. It is found that the rate of desulfurization and denitrification of the heavy fraction is positively related to temperature and pressure in the hydrogenation, and negatively related to the liquid space velocity. The results also show that the content of monocylic aromatics and binuclear aromatics in hydrogenation products increase and the content of polycyclic aromatics decrease with the elevated temperature and pressure and with decented liquid space velocity. The hydrogen donation ability of hydrogenation products increase with the proton donor quality index increasing. The hydrogenation products characteristics show that temperature 380 ℃, pressure 19 MPa, liquid space velocity 0.8/h are optimized hydrogenation conditions in which products show the best hydrogen donation ability for coal liquefacion.@In this study, two types of activated carbon have been used to investigate their capacity to adsorb and desorb p-xylene. The experimental results showed that the saturated adsorption capacity of activated carbon for aromatic hydrocarbon molecules increased as the specific surface area increased with a specific pore volume of 1 nm-2 nm, but it decreased as the adsorption temperature increased. A relatively high adsorption value was obtained at 30 ℃. In addition, the adsorption of p-xylene is 1.1 times as much as the adsorption of naphthalene on two types of activated carbons. This study indicates that it is a feasible manner to appraise the naphthalene adsorption of the developed activated carbon by analysis of its adsorption of p-xylene.@The influence of Al2O3 on Shendong coal ash fusion temperature was investigated by adding various amounts of Al2O3. The impact mechanism of Al2O3 on Shendong coal ash fusion characteristics was explored using quench experiments, XRD, TG-DSC and thermodynamic software FactSage. The results show that with the increase of addition amount of Al2O3, the ash fusion temperature (AFT) rises gentle first and then zooms up. Through XRD and thermal analysis software FactSage, it is found that Al2O3 reacts with SiO2 derived from the original coal ash composition (in the form of quartz ) to form mullite (3Al2O3O2SiO2) in ash fusion process, which resulting in the sharp rise of coal ash fusion temperature with a higher added amount of Al2O3.@Point at NO and reduction gases generated from lignite combustion, the TG-FTIR was used to study the change of the combustion characteristic, NO generation and the reducing gas with the addition of tailings. The results show that the addition of tailings has no effect on the temperatures of water generation and the volatile combustion, but the initial combustion temperature of coke is reduced, so the phase of coke combustion has been promoted. The reduction gases generated from lignite combustion are CH4, NH3, CO and —CH2. The reaction between NO and reduction gases has been catalysed with tailings. At the low temperature, the main reaction is between NH3 and NO. The catalyst of tailings has selectivity, the catalyst effect on the reaction between CO and NO is not obvious compared with other reducing gases.@The pyrolysis of lignite residue after humic acid extraction in Zhaotong region of Yunnan Province was carried out, and the pyrolysis characteristics were analyzed through the pyrolytic gas yield, tar yield and semi-char yield. The effects of temperature, heating rate and pyrolysis atmosphere on residue pyrolysis were explored, the major components and content of pyrolysis gas were obtained by gas chromatography, and the composition of tar was revealed using gas chromatography-mass spectrometry. The results show that the temperature is the most important factor to affect residue pyrolysis, the higher of temperature, the greater yield of pyrolysis gas and tar, the more H2 and CO contained in pyrolysis gas, the more aliphatic compounds included in tar, and the number of aromatic ring in aromatic compounds will be increased accordingly; the lower of heating rate, the greater yield of gas and tar; pyrolysis atmosphere has prominent influence on product distribution, the content of major components of pyrolysis gas and tar is affected by different pyrolysis atmospheres.@An experiment of hydrogen production through anaerobic fermentation was carried out under the condition of pH 6.5 lasting for 10 days, with temperature controlled at 30 ℃ in a 5 L anaerobic fermentation tank. The pH value, VFA molar concentration and COD value of the liquid phase during the experiment process were real-time monitored; meanwhile, cellulase activity and hydrogenase activity were monitored. The results show that the maximum volume fraction of hydrogen can reach 52.3% and the final production of hydrogen is 13.7 mL/g; pH value keeps dropping until it reaches the minimum value 5.46; VFA molar concentration basically tends to increase corresponding to the change of pH value, it belongs to butyric acid-type fermentation; COD value increases first then decreases, with maximum value 4 368 mg/L and the final COD degradation rate is 51.10%; the highest value 0.016 9 mg/(mL·h) appears in the fourth day for the active reaction of cellulase while the highest value 0.568 mmolH2/(min·mg) for the hydrogenase activity appears in the sixth day.@A rapid self-heating of lignite during low temperature oxidation and spontaneous combustion was monitored by programmable changing oven temperature. Changes of chemical structure of the coal during self-heating was investigated by FTIR analysis. Temperature of the coal in air increased monotonically, successively exceeding the separation point temperature (tsp), the crossing point temperature (tcp) and combustion temperatures (tc1, tc2). The decrease of methyl and methylene and increase of n(—CH3)∶n(—CH2—) during self-heating of lignite indicate that the more methylene is attacked by oxygen during oxidation. Ar—O—CO—R and R—O—CO—R increase progressively, and decrease after tc1 in response to hydrolysis of the esters. The increasing Ar—CO—Ar during self-heating decomposes to generate gaseous oxidation products above tcp. Aromatic CC insignificantly changes up to tc1, and decreases thereafter. After coal temperature reaches to tsp, Ar—COOH increases gradually, and then decreases above tc1 because of the decarboxylation, dehydration and esterification. Ar—COO— increases gradually during self-heating, but decreases above tc1 because very high oxidation temperature enhances the decomposition of the group.@The respective percentage of five subintervals of vitrinite random reflectance was defined as R1, R2, R3, R4 and R5 indicators. 35 groups of 5 kg test coke oven stamping coking experiments were carried out, with the five indicators as experimental variables and on the condition of meeting the blended coal quality requirements in tamping coking process. The results show that there is strong linear correlation between the five indicators and content of the dry ash-free volatile matter w(Vdaf), the mean maximum reflectance of vitrinite (Rmax), the caking index (G) and the maximum thickness of plastic layer (Y). The correlation coefficient is 0.933, 0.976, 0.858 and 0.564, respectively. And there is high prediction accuracy by using R1, R2, R3, R4 and R5 to predict the coke reactivity index. Moreover, the coke reactivity index improves obviously for the increasing of the content of R1, and reduces for the increasing of the content of R3 and R4. Meanwhile, the degree of impact of R1, R2, R3, R4, R5 on the coke reactivity index is R1>R3=R4>R5>R2. Therefore, the thermal strength of coke can be effectively improved by adjusting the respective content of R1, R2, R3, R4 and R5 to 25%-35%, 20%-30%, 10%-20%, 15%-25% and 5%-15%.@Zhundong coal is a typical high-sodium coal, which makes slag on cold water wall, high temperature corrosion in heated wall,pollution and dust contamination in flue pipe prone to take place when coal is burning in power plant. The characteristic of Zhundong coal was analyzed, cation exchange resin method was used to wash coal. The exchange function of resin made the displacement reaction occur between the cation in exchange group and sodion in Zhundong coal, so that the sodium in coal could be removed. The effect of temperature and time on the desulphurization efficiency of Zhundong coal was studied. The results show that the removal effect in condition of 4 h, 60 ℃ is optimum, sodium removal rate reaches to 90% and the soften temperature (ts) increase by 124 ℃, and the coal characteristics are improved.@The inorganic sulfur and organic sulfur in coke were investigated and a method for determination of sulfur forms was established using X-ray diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy analysis methods.With this method, effects of Ca-based additives on the distribution rule of sulfur forms in coke was researched during high sulfur coal pyrolysis. The results indicate that the distribution rule of sulfur forms in coke is changed by Ca-based additives. The proportion of inorganic sulfur content is improved through sulfur retention ability (inorganic sulfur mainly exists in form of CaS) and the proportion of organic sulfur content reduces by promoting the decomposition of organic sulfur in coke.@In order to improve the yield and quality of coal tar, the effects of atmosphere and Ni/Al2O3 catalyst on coal pyrolysis characters were investigated in a fluidized bed in H2, CH4, N2 and mixed atmosphere. The results show that H2 can reduce semicoke yield and increase tar yield; CH4 can increase semicoke yield at 800 ℃. Due to the decomposition of methane, compared with N2 atmosphere, CH4 can increase tar yield by 35.8%. In CH4+H2 atmosphere, semicoke and tar yield have the same trend with H2 atmosphere. Reducing atmosphere is beneficial to improving the quality of the tar. In H2, CH4+N2, CH4+H2 atmosphere, light tar ratio increases by 29.1%, 15.2%, 24%, respectively. The Ni/Al2O3 catalyst placed before the reaction segment can improve semicoke and tar yield to different degrees. At 600 ℃, compared with coal pyrolysis in CH4+N2 atmosphere without catalyst, adding Ni/Al2O3 into CH4+N2 atmosphere increases tar yield by 40%. In CH4+H2 atmosphere, the Ni/Al2O3 has better catalytic effect on CH4 at 800 ℃, and CH4 in the pyrolysis gas decreased significantly, meantime tar yield increases by 37% compared that of without catalyst. Ni/Al2O3 can further improve the quality of the tar and is beneficial to the formation of aromatic compounds.@Low-temperature co-pyrolysis of lignite and sugarcane bagasse(SB) was undertaken in a homemade carbonization apparatus to study the effect of different SB ratio on pyrolysis characteristics in lignite. The results show that with the increase of SB blending ratio, the pyrolysis tar yield shows a trend of decrease after the first increase, and the peak value is 16.7% when the blending ratio of SB is 20% (mass fraction, the same below), which is 13.7% higher than that of lignite pyrolysis alone, and shows the maximum positive deviation of 0.57% to the calculated value of tar yield. The date analysis of lignite, SB and the blend was studied by caloricity analyzer. Results show that co-pyrolysis is conducive to the centralization of energy in lignite and bagasse, and the heat value of co-pyrolysis semicoke is higher than that of lignite pyrplysis alone. FTIR indicates that the addition of SB can promote the decomposition and fracture of —OH and —CH3 functional groups in lignite, and carboxyl functional groups in SB can be transferred to the tar in the form of other oxygen-containing functional groups, which is conducive to the conversion of heavy components in tar to the light ones. Thermogravimetric analysis shows that the pyrolysis process is divided into three stages and the presence of SB has a significant effect on the stage of rapid pyrolysis, the maximum weight loss rate of lignite increases by 8.96% and the pyrolysis temperature corresponding to the maximum loss rate decreases by 98.8 ℃. The addition of SB facilitates the pyrolysis reaction to a certain extent.@NOx emission characteristics of different kinds of coal (lignite, bituminous coal, lean coal and anthracite) / biomass (rice husks) blends combustion were studied using drop tube furnace. The effects of atmosphere, blending ratio of biomass, oxygen volume fraction on NOx emission characteristics were investigated in details. Experimental results show that: NOx emissions present a trend of firstly increasing and then decreasing for different coal/biomass blends along the furnace height. NOx emission of bituminite/rice husk co-combustion is the highest in the atmosphere of 20%O2/80%N2. NOx emission in O2/CO2 atmosphere is lower than that in O2/N2 atmosphere in the condition of 20% oxygen volume fraction; with increasing of the blending ratio of biomass, NOx emission gradually decreases, and that decreases most significantly for the lignite and biomass co-combustion, which decreases from 130.029 mg/m3 to 49.674 mg/m3 in the atmosphere of 20%O2/70%CO2; with the oxygen volume fraction increases, NOx emission increases. When the oxygen volume fraction increases from 20% to 30% in O2/CO2 atmosphere, the increase of NOx emisson of bituminous coal reduces, however the increase of NOx emission of rice husk/bituminite co-firing improves.@Coal-oil co-hydroprocessing pretreatment experiment proceeded by using lab’s self-made iron-based catalyst to figure out the coal liquefaction rate. Analysis of liquid products, especially on its proceeding elemental and distillation range distribution was made. Industrial four component analysis of solid products was also made and the effect of ultrasonic pretreatment on coal-oil co-hydroprocessing was obtained. The results show that the structure of co-processing raw materials has changed through ultrasonic pretreatment. Liquefaction rate of Anhui coal has improved by 9.85% and 12.42% after processing oil slurry by ultrasonic and compounding oil-coal slurry with oil slurry respectively. Similarly, to the coal tar after ultrasonic treatment and oil-coal slurry compounded by oil-coal slurry, by using same sample,liquefaction rate has improved by 7.99% and 18.65% respectively. Obviously, ash content and volatile matter in solid product have decreased, and fixed carbon has improved after processing, while the distillation range distribution of liquid products has been basically stable. The coal liquefaction rate has improved and the quality of co-processing products remains unchanged.@Activated carbons were prepared with coal liquefaction asphaltene as carbon source. After the optimization of the synthesis process, activated carbons with specific surface area more than 3 000 m2/g was successfully obtained. The physical and chemical characteristics of activated carbons from coal liquefaction asphaltene (ACCLA) were also investigated with X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscope (SEM) and nitrogen adsorption-desorption methods. The adsorption of H2, CH4 and CO2 on these activated carbons were also tested, the relationship between the texture properties and adsorption capacity was discussed. The as-prepared samples show excellent performance and good application prospects in gas adsorption. It is found that the maximum adsorption of H2, CH4 and CO2 is 24.85 mmol/g (77 K, 400 kPa), 4.62 mmol/g (298 K, 400 kPa) and 3.57 mmol/g (298 K, 100 kPa), respectively. The relationship between the texture properties and adsorption was also discussed. Under test conditions, it is found that the adsorption of H2 is greatly influenced by the specific surface area of the material, and the pore size has a more significant effect on the adsorption of CH4 and CO2.@Based on exergy analysis method, for an actual process of coal to SNG with an annual scale of 1.4×109 m3, the distribution of exergy loss in each unit and in the whole process were investigated. The results show that general exergy efficiency of gasification unit is the lowest, 84.75%, and that of rectisol unit is the highest, 98.90%. The prime exergy loss occurrs in gasification unit, reaching to 77.78% of total exergy loss. The exergy losses in shift unit, rectisol unit and methanation unit are 5.49%, 4.04% and 12.68% of total exergy loss, respectively. In gasification unit, increasing byproduct steam pressure could not impact exergy efficiency effectively, it is more important to optimize the operating condition of gasifier and scrubber cooler. In methanation unit, higher byproduct steam pressure could improve exergy efficiency obviously and increase steam yield.@The denitrification performance experiments, oxidation experiments and desorption experiments have been carried out over MnOx/Al2O3 and MnOx-CeO2/γ-Al2O3 prepared by sol-gel process in a fixed bed reactor. The results show that MnOx/γ-Al2O3 catalysts reach highest NO removal efficiency at 300 ℃, after adding CeO2 into the catalyst, the optimum temperature reduces to 250 ℃. The addition of CeO2 improves the activation ability of the catalysts at low temperature, but can cause excessive oxidation of NH3 which generates by-products like N2O when the temperature is higher than 300 ℃. The increase of the MnOx content can raise adsorption quantities of NH3 over the catalysts, and can also promate NO adsorbtion on different active sites, therefore the catalysts have high NO removal efficiency in wider temperature range.@The degradation matching experiments of Shanxi Linfen lignite with six kinds of bacteria had been investigated, showing that Pseudomonas putida is the most effective degrading bacterium. Based on single factor experiments, the degrading process conditions of Pseudomonas putida and Linfen lignite were optimized by orthogonal experiments. The results show that the effect-weight order of the factors for degrading rate is coal particle size > coal slurry mass concentration > incubation time > inoculum size, the best degrading technological conditions are coal particle size <75 μm, coal slurry mass concentration of 0.200 0 g/10 mL, incubation time of 14 d, inoculum size of 1.0 mL/10 mL. Under this technological conditions, the conversion rate reaches 46.81%. The coal residue and degrading product were tested, the infrared analysis shows that the absorption of coal residue at the wavenumber of oxidized coal has been disappeared or weakened, which further indicates that organic macromolecular in coal has been degraded by Pseudomonas putida into micromolecule containing in the black oily filtrate derived from the degradation. The total ion chromatogram of fractional extraction product of degradation filtrate demonstrates that it contains abundant small molecule organics, which mostly include aliphatic hydrocarbons, esters, carboxylic acids and aromatic compounds.@Adsorption quantity of CH4 and N2 on T-CMS and 13X zeolite at 298.15 K, 313.15 K and 328.15 K were measured respectively, Langmuir model was used to fit the experimental data, and the change of fitting parameters, saturated adsorption capacity qm and adsorption equilibrium constant b, were analyzed. The results show that the qm of CH4 on T-CMS slightly decreases as the temperatures rise, but the variation is small; the qm of N2 on T-CMS increases; and the qm of CH4 and N2 on 13X zeolite decreases. However, the adsorption equilibrium constant b increases with the rising of temperature. Separation coefficients of CH4 and N2 on T-CMS are larger than that on 13X zeolite, and both decrease with the increase of temperature. The analysis of adsorption thermodynamics shows that the average adsorption isosteric heat of CH4 and N2 on T-CMS are 27.30 kJ/mol and 22.43 kJ/mol respectively, but that on 13X zeolite are 12.96 kJ/mol and 10.41 kJ/mol respectively. The studied adsorbents have stronger adsorption effect on CH4 than that on N2, which both belong to physical adsorption.@The coal samples with different deformed degrees, collected from Huoerxinhe coalmine in Qinshui coal basin were treated by the different acids, including hydrochloric acid (HCl), acetic acid (HAc) and hydrofluoric acid (HF). Mass change rate and coal-water contact angel were measured, and the surface tension was calculated by low temperature ashing and X-ray diffraction methods. The results show that the mass change rate of the coal is about 0.1% by HCl or HAc treatment, while the mass change rate of the coal is 7% by HF treatment; the reaction objects are different for each acid, most of the minerals in the coal can react with HF, which is the most effective treatment method; after HCl treatment, the coal-water contact angel shows a obviously decreasing trend from 59.75°to 33.25°, but the surface tension increases from 54.42 mJ/m2 to 66.45 mJ/m2 to cause a stronger wettability. After HAc and HF treatment, the coal-water contact angel shows a correspondingly increasing phenomenon from 59.75° to 85.00° and 84.50°, the surface tension decreases from 54.42 mJ/m2 to 39.34 mJ/m2 and 39.65 mJ/m2 respectively. In general, the water-coal contact angel and surface tension of coal change significantly after the acid treatment.@The wettability of lignite and demineralized lignite and conventional mineral matter were evaluated by calorimetric measurement. The effects of moisture re-adsorption on the wetting heat of lignite were investigated and the moisture re-adsorption behavior of dried lignite was analyzed by dynamics models. The results show that wetting heat of organic components in lignite is much higher than that of mineral matter in lignite, indicating its dominated role for heat released of wetting process. The lignite with more content of oxygen-containing groups has a higher value of wetting heat. After the treatment by acid solution, the wetting heat of lignite decreases. For the Manglai lignite, the wetting heat decreases from 101.61 J/g to 66.79 J/g after demineralition. Among the mineral matter in lignite, wetting heat of kaolinite is higher than that of calcite and quartz. The moisture re-adsorption behavior was fitted properly by second-order dynamical model, and the correlation coefficient is greater than 0.99. With the increasing content of moisture readsorbed, wetting heat of lignite decreases. When the moisture re-adsorption reaches to 28.76%, wetting heat of the Manglai lignite decreases from 101.61 J/g to 5.04 J/g. The monolayer or cluster of water molecules adsorbed on surface of lignite is devoted to wetting heat decreasing, while the influence of water adsorbed in pores or capillary condensation is not obviously.@The pyrolysis process of Shenfu pulverized coal at different heating rate, with different diameter and at different flow rate of carry gas was studied by TG-DTG thermogravimetric analysis. The optimal condition of maximum weight loss rate was determined through orthogonal experiments. The thermogravimetric experiment results show that heating rate, diameter and flow rate of carry gas have effect on the pyrolysis weightlessness. It is found that the pyrolysis weightlessness decreases with the increase of heating rate and flow rate of carrier gas. The effect of diameter on pyrolysis weightlessness is a parabola distribution, so there is an optimal diameter when the pyrolysis weightlessness is a maximum. During pyrolysis the optimal diameter of Shenfu coal (d<0.84 mm) is 0.25 mm-0.42 mm. The results of orthogonal experiment show that during coal pyrolysis, the main factor is heating rate, next is diameter and then flow rate of carry gas. The fastest pyrolysis weight loss rate is 4.95%/min when diameter is 0.25 mm-0.42 mm, heating rate is 30 ℃/min, flow rate of carry gas is 120 mL/min.@NiW/ZSM-5 and PNiW/ZSM-5 supported catalysts were prepared on self-made ZSM-5 carrier. Catalysts were characterized by XRD, ICP, BET, NH3-TPD and SEM techniques. The results indicate that most of the active components of Ni, W and P have been successfully introduced into the carrier and disperse evenly, and the amount of strong acid sites decreases after modification. The catalytic properties of different catalysts on Shendong coal were evaluated by thermogravimetry-infrared (TG-FTIR). Compared with raw coal pyrolysis, NiW/ZSM-5 and PNiW/ZSM-5 catalytic pyrolysis can descrease the maximum weight loss peak temperature of Shendong coal by 8 ℃, increase the weight loss rate by 1.2% and 2.0%. The FTIR analysis results show that although ZSM-5 have no significant increase in the amount of gas-phase products, the contents of CH4, CO, NH3, light aliphatic and aromatic hydrocarbons increase significantly with NiW/ZSM-5 and PNiW/ZSM-5 catalysts, and PNiW/ZSM-5 catalyst has better advantages compared to NiW/ZSM-5.@Interleaved catalyst injection unit suitably for underground pyrolysis and gasification was designed. Four sorts of typical catalysts were used in the horizontal pyrolysis reactor for the simulation test of underground catalytic pyrolysis on the long flame coal of Naomaohu in Xinjiang. The results show that these four sorts of catalysts can efficiently improve the composition of H2 and CO, and the yield of gaseous products. The descending order of their catalytic activity is 8% Na2CO3 solution (8% is mass fraction, the same below), 10%Ca(OH)2 solution, 10%CaO powder, 6%FNC (compound catalyst (Fe2O3-Na2CO3-Ca(OH)2)). For Na2CO3 and Ca(OH)2 of high activity, these two catalytics increase the composition of H2 by 19% (volume fraction) in the pyrolysis gas and CO by 1.2 times respectively, and increase the composition of CH4 in the low temperature pyrolysis, but without sustainable effect during the pyrolysis over 600 ℃. The yield of semicoke and tar decreases by 30% and 20%-70% respectively, and gas yield can increase by 1.4-1.6 times compared to the yield before the catalytic pyrolysis. On the analysis of the aspects of catalytic activity and cost, Ca(OH)2 can be selected as the major catalyst for underground catalytic pyrolysis, and Na2CO3 of highest activity can be considered as promoter.@SAPO-34 molecular sieve with different sizes of Si islands Sin (n=5, 8, 9, 11, 12, 13, 14) was constructed and investigated using dispersion-corrected density functional theory method in order to study the formation of Si islands, and the effects on the stability and acidity of SAPO-34 molecular sieve were studied. It indicates that the Si islands including Si5 and Si9 are easy to form in SAPO-34 molecular sieve. In addition, the larger the Si island is, the more stable the structure is and the more acidity the Bronsted sites are. The rule is proposed to judge the acidic strength in SAPO-34 molecular sieve with different sizes of Si islands.@The properties of diesel of direct coal liquefaction (DDCL) and diesel of indirect coal liquefaction (DICL) were analyzed, the miscibility of the two types of diesel, the properties of blending diesel and the effect of lubricity additives on the two types of diesel were studied by the blending experiment, and the mobility, economy and emission performance of the blending diesel were investigated by engine bench test. The results show that DDCL is well dissolvable with DICL, and the density and the cetane number of the blending diesel are both linearly related to the mass fraction of DICL. It indicates that the two types of diesel have complement advantages with each other very well. The blending diesel has good sensibility to the lubricant. It is found that the blending diesel of coal liquefaction has good dynamic performance, less fuel consumption per unit mass and less pollutant emissions on China Ⅳ engine. The regulated emissions of the blending diesel fuel meet China Ⅳ emission standard. It has great advantage in the emissions of NOx, smoke intensity and particulate matter.@The properties of coal water slurry (CWS) prepared by low-rank coal and oil-field sewage were investigated. The results show that the maximal CWS mass fraction for each coal follows: Wusuhongshan coal (66.5%)>Wususikeshu coal (61.0%)>Xukuang 4 coal (53.4%). Compared with the CWS prepared by oil-free sewage, the CWS prepared by oil-bearing sewage for each coal have lower viscosity, which decrease by 30.3% and 66.8% for Wusuhong-shan coal and Wususikeshu coal respectively, and have larger mass fraction, which increase by 1.1% for Xukuang 4 coal. It indicates that the use of oil-bearing can promote the mass fraction and calorific value of CWS, as well as simplifying the treatment of oil-field sewage. Among three kinds of CWS, the Wusuhongshan CWS has the largest stability due to its high ash content. The stability of CWS is largely affected by coal type and additive, while the type of water or sewage shows little effect.@Based on the isometric impregnation and the theory of sulfur-fixation, the sulfur retention of activated alumina as briquette additive and loading with different metal oxides on the surface was studied. The changes of pore structure before and after modification were analyzed by using SEM, and the changes of phase transformation of raw coal ash and briquette ash were analyzed by using XRD, while activated alumina loading with CaO was used as the briquette sulfur fixing agent. The results show that the effect on reduction of SO2 emission by activated alumina loading with different metal oxide is activated alumina loading with CaO>activated alumina loading with CuO>activated alumina loading with BaO>activated alumina. The SEM analysis shows that loading different metal oxides on the surface of activated alumina has improved its heat stability. It is found by using XRD that CaO loading on activated alumina can react with SO2 and generate 3CaO·3Al2O3·CaSO4 with thermostability, which hinders the decomposition of CaSO4, thus can improve the sulfur retention effect. Compared with the sulfur retention effect of CaO, the sulfur retention effect of modified activated alumina is better in the experiment.@A new CMC technology of cascade sieving and fluidized bed with immersed heating tubes (EN-CMC technology) was proposed. The energy and mass flow of the original fluidized bed CMC technology was completely changed by means of hot water as heat carrier which had high specific heat and density, and the previous heat and moisture carrying function of exhaust gas was divided. The energy efficiency among three kinds of CMC technologies was compared, including EN-CMC technology, 186 t/h Nippon steel fluidized bed CMC technology in MA steel and 330 t/h steam drum-type CMC technology in BAO steel. The results indicate that after the process of EN-CMC, coke oven heating quantity can decrease by 2.78×105 kJ/t (dry coal (DC)), with amounts to 9.50 kgce/t(DC). The energy-saving effect reaches 6.92 kgce/t(DC), which is 53.4% higher than Nippon steel CMC technology.@Semi-dry dechlorination technology is put forward to attach most chlorine in coal-fired flue gas to fly ash by spraying in alkaline solution to realize the zero emission of desulfurization waste water. Simultaneously, drastically reduced FGD (flue gas desulfurization) waste water was used as the solvent of alkali, which could help to realize the target of zero emission of desulfurization waste water. Effects of n(Na+)/n(Cl-) on reaction efficiencies of base material with HCl and SO2 were analyzed. It shows that the reaction efficiency of HCl is positively correlated with n(Na+)/n(Cl-). As n(Na+)/n(Cl-) continues increasing, there is a slower growth of HCl reaction efficiency. When n(Na+)/n(Cl-) is 4.8, reaction efficiency of HCl increases beyond 70%. For a 660 MW unit, after semi-dry dechlorination, the amount of FGD waste water decreases significantly from 8.01 m3/h to 2.31 m3/h, and the decrease of flue gas temperature is only 2.49 ℃ when waste water is sprayed back as the solvent of alkali. The system of semi-dry dechlorination is simple and the cost is relatively low. There is no significantly negative effect on the comprehensive utilization of fly ash after semi-dry dechlorination.@Brucite(Mg(OH)2) as raw material, the carbon capture by absorbing carbon dioxide (15%, volume fraction) of simulated flue gas was carried out under the condition that the solid-liquid mass ratio was 1∶6, the reaction temperature was 40 ℃ and the reaction pressure was 1.01×105 Pa. The cost of capture was reduced by deputy producting high value-added products such as basic magnesium carbonate (4MgCO3·Mg(OH)2·4H2O). The changes of pH value and substance composition during the reaction were determined, the influence of gas velocity on reaction time was discussed, and the final product was analyzed by titration and thermogravimetric analysis. The experimental results show that the pH value of the termination reaction is 7.73-7.74, the suitable gas velocity is 60 mL/min, and the recovery rate of CO2 is 40.87%. The final product basic magnesium carbonate magnesium content reaches 43.16% (mass fraction of MgO), and its weight loss reaches 56.35%. Above results are complied with the industry standard of magnesium carbonate products.@An easy-to-use graphical user interface (GUI) program, VirtualFringe, was developed using MATLAB programming language. The aromatic fringes were extracted by the steps of thresholding and gray adjustment, Gaussian blur, Fourier transform filtering, binary image conversion, skeletonization and branches trim. And the parameters of positions, angles of declination and lengths were defined by fitting the enclosing rectangles of fringes. The reliability of this application has been confirmed by manual image analysis and structural parameters derived from solid state 13C NMR technique. The size and distribution of aromatic sheets obtained by VirtualFringe, can be used in the construction of large scale molecular coal model that meaningful molecular weight distribution and diversity of coal molecule have been incorporated.@The complex of hexamethylentetramine (HMT) and ammonium molybdate (AHM) was simply decomposed and bulk β-Mo2C was successfully prepared. In the meantime the complex was mechanically mixed with HLH de-ashed lignite, then the activated semi-coke (ASC) supporting γ-MoNxCy was generated in situ in the process of coal pyrolysis. The synthesized carbides were characterized by XRD, SEM, HRTEM, and elemental analyzer, and their catalytic performances on methanation were evaluated. The results show that the bulk β-Mo2C catalyst exhibits high conversion of CO(XCO), but the selectivity of CH4 (SCH4) is low and the catalytic activity is not stable; as for the activated semi-coke supporting γ-MoNxCy, because of the improved dispersion of Mo and the improved catalytic activity on account of more lattice defects caused by lattice distortion of γ-MoNxCy, the XCO on unit mass of Mo greatly increases from 2.22 mol/(h·g) on bulk β-Mo2C to 17.47 mol/(h·g) on activated semi-coke supporting γ-MoNxCy. In addition, the SCH4 increases from 33.52% on bulk β-Mo2C to 49.54% on activated semi-coke supporting γ-MoNxCy. The above results reveal that methanation can be coupled with catalytic hydropyrolysis of coal under syngas atmosphere on activated semi-coke supporting γ-MoNxCy.@In order to improve the quality of pneumatic classification of coal in the coupling device for fluidized bed and conveying bed, orthogonal test method was used to select three parameters, such as the apparent gas velocity of conveying bed, the feed inlet position and the feed rate, and each factor was taken at three levels, taking into account the interaction between the factors, and the L18(37) orthogonal array was chosen to be the 18 groups. Based on the computational particle fluid dynamics (CPFD) software,the pneumatic classification of coal was simulated, the pneumatic classification of coal in the coupling device for fluidized bed and conveying bed was studied using experimental measurements, and the optimum separation effect of coal particles was taken as the index. By comprehensive analysis of range method, the apparent gas velocity of conveying bed is the main factor affecting the pneumatic classification of coal and the best combination scheme for the pneumatic classification, which is the apparent gas velocity of conveying bed is 8.30 m/s, the feed inlet position is the lower part of the conveying bed, the feed rate is 22.5 kg/(m2·s).@Coal tar can be hydrogenated to produce diesel with density 0.83 g/cm3-0.86 g/cm3, cetane number 42-52 and sulfur lower than 2 μg/g in 100 mL pilot plant, while liquid hydrocarbons can be produced by waste gas F-T synthesis with a feedstock gas conversion rate above 93%, selectivity of C5+ hydrocarbons above 86% in a 3 000 t/a fixed-bed F-T synthesis industrial plant, and further synthesis oil can be hydro-upgraded to gain diesel oil with density lower than 0.77 g/cm3, cetane number 76-81. Beyond that, waste gas can be used to produce high quality liquid wax, jet fuel and solvent oil. Choosing suitable process, coal tar and waste gas generated during the classification utilization of coal can produce clean and high value oils with sulfur content met the requirement of China V clean oil standards.@Slurry hydrogenation catalyst with TiO2-AlOOH as the composite carrier and Ni and W as active components were prepared by a complete liquid phase method .The effect of n(H2O)∶n(Al) on the structure and catalytic properties of Ni-W catalysts were investigated and the catalysts were characterized by XRD, BET, NH3-TPD and so on. The fraction distribution and composition of raw materials and products were analyzed by GC-MS, TG and ultimate analylzer, the results show that the content of light component, the hydrodesulfurization (HDS) activity and the n(H)∶n(C) in the products are the highest when n(H2O)∶n(Al) is 75 in the catalysts. It indicates that Ni-W catalyst with n(H2O)∶n(Al) 75 has better hydrogenation effect on coal tar hydrotreating than that of the other value of n(H2O)∶n(Al).@Pyrrolidone acid ionic liquids ([Hnmp]HSO4) was immobilized on HMCM-22 molecular sieves by chemical method and used as the catalyst for the synthesis of polyoxymethylene dimethyl ethers (DMMn). The catalyst was characterized by XRD, FTIR and SEM. The results show that the pyrrolidone acid ionic liquids ([Hnmp]HSO4) can be stability immobilized on HMCM-22. The optimum reaction condition is that the catalyst amount of 2.0%(mass fraction), feed mass ratio m(DMM)/m(PF) of 2.0, reaction temperature 120 ℃ and reaction time 6 h, m(Ionic liquid)/m(HMCM-22) of 2.0. The conversion of PF and selectivity of DMM3-8 reach 55.41% and 30.87%, respectively. Compared with the reaction effects of pure ionic liquids or molecular sieve, the yield of DMM3-8 is improved quite a lot. The catalyst can be separated from product phase naturally and exhibits high stability upon reusage. It still remains high activity even after being reused for four times.@Mesocarbon microbeads were prepared by thermal polymerization using coal liquefaction pitch as raw materials and carbon black, petroleum coke, graphite and needle coke as nucleating agents at 410 ℃ for 2 h. The properties of mesocarbon microbeads as negative electrode material for lithium ion battery were studied. Results show that with carbon black and graphite as nucleating agent, the mesocarbon microbeads with uniform particle size distribution and good surface morphology can be prepared. The results of electrical performance tests show that the initial reversible capacity and the initial efficiency of mesocarbon microbeads are 353.9 mAh/g, 92.9% and 346.5 mAh/g, 92.6% respectively. Compared with the similar products in the domestic market, the mesocarbon microbeads prepared by carbon black and graphite as the nucleating agent are similar to those of similar products in China.@Shenmu coal was blended with caking coal and the compatibilities of Shenmu coal in blended coal samples were explored. For this purpose, the influence of blending ratio on the coking property and the coal blending parameters in the completely bonding state of char were obtained. Meanwhite, the relationship between the wO∶wH in blended coal and the coking pro-perty were discussed. The results show that an increase in blending ratio of Shenmu coal results in a rapid decrease in the GRI value of the blending coal, and the experimental GRI value is far less than weighted GRI value, while in the Shenmu coal blending range, experimental Y value can well fit the calculated value of single coal. The effect of wO∶wH in blended coal on the caking property is in agreement with that of Shenmu coal blending ratio. In addition, in order to obtain completely bonding state coke, the largest percentage of Shenmu coal blended with gas coal, fat coal and coking coal are 30%, 50% and 40% , respectively. The Y value is equal to or bigger than 10 and the char residue characteristic index is bigger than 4, 5, 4 when Shenmu coal is blended with gas coal, fat coal and coking coal respectively.@The transverse thrust loads of the annular gas channel inner partition caused by cokes were calculated based on the different packing situation of coke particles in the coke dry quenching. Stress fields of the annular gas channel inner partition were simulated by the finite element method with considering the pressure caused by the circulate cooling gas and coupling structure and thermal. The damage of refractories was analyzed from stresses. Results show that the temperature gradients and thermal stresses of annular gas channel inner partition increase with the increase of cooling gas flow rate; thermal stress is the main factor for deformation and crack of inner partition refractory materials because it is larger more than two times of structural stress. In order to avoid the further cracking and even collapse of inner partition, triangle support beams in the annular gas channel are installed. Then the suitable openings of different outlet plates for coke dry quenching are determined based on the calculated resistances to maintain the stability of furnace thermal system.@Granular activated carbon was prepared by steam-activated high-temperature method using blue-coke powder with particle size of 2.0 mm-3.2 mm as raw material. The effects of activation temperature on the structure and properties of activated carbon were studied and the formation mechanism of pore structure of activated carbon was discussed. The surface morphology, specific surface area and pore structure of activated carbon were characterized by SEM and automatic adsorption apparatus. The results show that with the increase of the activation temperature, the yield of activated carbon continue to decrease, and the iodine adsorption value increases first and then decreases. When the activation temperature is 900 ℃, the yield of activated carbon is 59.81%, the iodine adsorption value is 812.86 mg/g, the BET specific surface area is 529.66 m2/g, and the pore volume is 0.298 9 cm3/g. The steam activation process is dominated by through-hole when the activation temperature is 600 ℃. The pore-forming stage is at 700 ℃-800 ℃, and the hole-expanding reaction is mainly carriy out at 800 ℃-1 000 ℃.@Through establishing the response surface model, the interaction among different variables was investigated, and on the basis of reducing the operating times, the optimum extraction conditions were simulated. Taking three major factors, alkali mass concentration, liquid-solid ratio and leaching time as independent variables, the extraction rate as the response value, three factors and three levels of Box-behnken central composite test was adopted. The results show that the optimum condition as follows: alkali mass concentration is 0.049 8 g/mL, liquid-solid ratio is 10.44 mL/g, leaching time is 3.4 h and the predicted extration rate reach to 17.51%. As the experimental extration rate is 17.05%, the actual value is in a good agreement with the model predicted value.@The welding seam of Q235A steel from the experiment of A-TIG (tungsten intent gas) was get, the tensile property of welding seam was checked using universal testing machine, and the corrosive property was checked through static corrosion test and electrochemical corrosion test. The results show that when fly ash is added as active agent, the weld seams have no big change in tensile strength compared with the tensile strength without surfactant; in static corrosion test, when fly ash 1 as surfactant，the corrosion resistance of the welding seam increases 1.90 times, 1.29 times and 1.81 times in 15% H2SO4, 10%NaOH and 3.5%NaCl solution than that of conventional weld seam respectively; when fly ash 2 as surfactant, the corrosion resistance of the welding seam increases 1.44 times, 1.20 times and 1.47 times in 15% H2SO4, 10%NaOH and 3.5%NaCl solution than that of conventional weld seam respectively; In electrochemical corrosion test,the corrosion rate of the active welding seam is smaller than that of conventional weld seam. The results show that adding fly ash as active agent can maintain the mechanical properties of the material and refine the microstructure to enhance the corrosion resistance.@In order to explore the possibility of the synthesis of calcium carbide at low temperature, the thermodynamics of calcium carbide synthesis from calcium oxide and carbon were studied, and the influence of reaction conditions on the CaC2 theoretical equilibrium concentration were discussed. Thermodynamic analysis results indicate that the lowest critical production temperature of CaC2 is the Taman temperature of CaO (1 442 ℃) and the reaction is very slow because of the restricted diffusion of the reactants. When the temperature is 1 882 ℃, CaC2 can be synthesized from solid CaO and C. With the increase of CaC2 content, solid CaO would change into liquid and the critical temperature of production will drop to 1 753 ℃. When the temperature is 2 222 ℃, CaC2 can act as an auto-catalyst to promote the formation of calcium carbide. When the content of CaO is excessive, the Ca vapor can not be absorbed by C in time, which can cause the loss of Ca and the quality reduction of calcium carbide. The further results show that the theoretical equilibrium molar fraction of CaC2 reaches 92.9% when the temperature is 1 700 ℃ and CO pressure is 0.01 MPa. The thermodynamic analysis is verified by the experiments and CaC2 is synthesized when the temperature is 1 620 ℃ at Ar atmosphere.@In order to study the hydrogenation liquefaction reactivity of western coal, liquefaction experiments of Naomaohu (NMH) coal and Bulian’gou (BLG) coal were carried out in high pressure batch autoclave. FTIR and 13C-NMR were used to study the distribution of functional groups and different kinds of carbon in the coal and the pre-asphaltene and asphaltene (PAA). The results show that the conversion rate and the oil yield of NMH is 96.33% and 47.86%, respectively, which is significantly higher than 76.18% and 23.44% of BLG. The proportion of aliphatic carbon and aromatic carbon in coal is the main factor affecting the conversion rate of hydrogenation liquefaction. The proportion of aliphatic functional groups is positively correlated with the reactivity while the proportion of aromatic functional groups has negative effect. High methylene carbon and methane carbon content are favorable to oil yield. The aliphatic carbon content in PAA is lower than that in raw coal, which indicates that the aliphatic carbon is the active structure in hydrogenation liquefaction process.@K2SO4 or K2CO3 was loaded on a microcrystalline cellulose material. The co-pyrolysis characteristics of cellulose loaded with catalyst and coal were investigated by TG-FTIR, and the chemical structure of the samples before and after pyrolysis at 900 ℃ was characterized by FTIR. The FTIR results show that the absorption peaks of carbon-containing, hydrogen-containing and oxygen-containing functional groups and kaolinite disappear after pyrolysis at 900 ℃. The disappearance of organic functional groups is due to the release of gaseous products. The change of kaolinite is caused by thermal transformation into metakaolinite and quartz. Synergistic effect is observed during the co-pyrolysis of cellulose and coal. The load of potassium salt has a great influence on the char yield, the maximum reaction rate, the reaction temperature range, and the activation energy during the co-pyrolysis. The presence of potassium salt also results in an increase in CO and CO2 yields. Moreover, the temperature ranges of CO and CO2 generation shift to lower temperatures with the addition of potassium salt, particularly the K2CO3. In addition, K2SO4 has a positive effect on the evolution of products containing CO functional groups such as acids and ketals, while K2CO3 has a negative effect on it. K2CO3 and K2SO4 have different extent of negative effect on the release of CH4.@Molecular modeling research based on transition state theory and density functional theory was performed to investigate the elemental reactions between hydrogen and the chars containing pyridinic-nitrogen or pyrrolic-nitrogen. Which the form of the nitrogen in char is more easily to release NH3 was studied from the point of energy and thermodynamics. The transition states of every elementary reaction were found. The enthalpy and activation energy of every step were also calculated. The results show that the first step in the hydrogenation adsorption is exothermic for Armchair and Zigzag char model containing pyridinic-nitrogen.However the second step in the hydrogenation adsorption is endothermic. As for Armchair and Zigzag char model containing 2-pyridine the hydrogen adsorption is endothermic. Whether pyridine-nitrogen or pyrrole-nitrogen, the Armchair configuration char is more easily to release NH2 than the Zigzag configuration char. Secendly the pyrrolic-nitrogen char containing 2-pyridine is more easily to release NH2 than the char model containing pyridinic-nitrogen. Finally the Armchair configuration char containing 2-pyridine is the pathway which is most easy to release NH3 in the four pathways designed in the paper. The formation of NH3 which is the NOx precursor is revealed in the paper.@A kind of lignite A and atmospheric residue from Merey were chosen as raw materials. The reaction activity of the synthesized oil-soluble iron-nickel composite catalyst in the lab were evaluated during the coal/heavy oil co-processing in a autoclave. The catalysts’ sulfides and the solid residues after the co-processing were analyzed by XRD, SEM and TEM, to explain the activity difference among the composite catalyst and the single metal catalysts. Results show that the oil-soluble iron-nickel catalyst has a higher coal conversion of 87.37%, compared with the oil-soluble single metal catalysts of iron and nickel. The sulfide of the iron-nickel composite catalyst has low crystallinity and coarse surface, forming not only the individual metal sulfides but also the iron-nickel mixed crystal sulfide (Fe-Ni-S mixed crystal). The solid residue obtained from the iron-nickel composite catalyst exhibits small particle size, loose structure, and low degree of aromaticity, which further prove the promotion for the deep conversion of coal.@Silica-gel column chromatography was improved utilizing the preparative liquid chromatography technology with four mobile phases (n-pentane, dichloromethane, acetic ether/ethyl cyanide and methyl alcohol) to separate and quantify the group components in the low temperature coal tar (LTCT) derived from Huolinhe lignite prolysis at 650 ℃, and each eluted fraction was identified by gas chromatography-mass spectrometer (GC-MS). Results show that the main components in LTCT include aromatics, oxygen-containing and nitrogen-containing compounds, which account for 22.47%, 31.19% and 17.66% of the total mass of the LTCT, respectively. The mass fraction of polyheteromatics is approximately 10% while both the contents of alkanes and alkenes are less than 10%. The results from the LTCT components demonstrate that the improved method shows desirable performance for the separation of group components in coal-based liquid according to their polarity and molecular structures.@Oxidized Inner Mongolia lignite was degraded by two kinds of bacteria Sphingomonas Polyaromaticivorans and Rhodococcus Erythropolis. The pH value and degradation rate of centrifugal liquid product of degradated oxidized lignite were detected every day. The results show that the degradation rate is closely related to the pH value, when the pH value is in the range of 8.1 and 8.2, both bacteria show better degradation effect, and the degradation rate is inhibited when the pH value is greater than 8.4. The degradation rates of Sphingomonas Polyaromaticivorans and Rhodococcus Erythropolis is 50.86% and 52.86%, respectively, which indicate that both of these bacteria can effectively degrade oxidized lignite, and the degradation rate of Rhodococcus Erythropolis is higher than that of Sphingomonas Polyaromaticivorans. By ultravio-let spectrum (UV), infrared spectroscopy (IR) and gas chromatography-mass spectrometry (GC-MS) techniques, the liquid products of degradation were analyzed. The results show that the liquid products of degradation mainly include esters and amides.@Using KOH-HNO3 combined method to modify the coal-based electrode, the effects of KOH addition on the structure and adsorption properties of coal-based electrode materials were mainly studied. The appearance, surface functional group and pore size distribution were characterized by scanning electron microscopy (SEM), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) and N2 absorption method. The results show that the iodine adsorption value of coal-based electrode material gradually increases, while the compressive strength and yield decrease gradually, and the specific surface area, total pore volume and pore volume increase gradually as the KOH addition increases. When the KOH addition is 15% (mass fraction), the iodine adsorption value reaches 810.8 mg/g, the compressive strength is 4.47 MPa, the activation yield is 59.5%, the specific surface area is 377 m2/g, the total pore volume is 0.187 cm3/g, the pore volume is 0.160 cm3/g, and the porosity is 85.56%. With the increase in the number of micropore, mesopore and oxygen-containing functional groups on the surface，coal-based electrode material will form a well-developed honeycomb pore structure, which is conducive to the entering of electrolyte and the formation of electric double layer structure. Electrochemical tests show that the greater the KOH addition, the smaller the diffusion resistance of the coal-based electrode, and the larger the specific capacitance. The self-made coal-based electrode materials is used as the anode and cathode, and activated carbon is used as a particle electrode to treat cyanide wastewater，when the voltage is 4 V and the time is 5 h, and the removal rates of ions in wastewater is more than 95% by three-dimensional electrode system.@Seven kinds of high-iron coal ash were selected as samples. The viscosity-temperature characteristics of high-iron coal ash were tested by high-temperature rotational viscosimeter. The samples were grouped according to the viscosity-temperature characteristics of coal ash. X-ray fluorescence (XRF), X-ray diffraction (XRD) and scanning electron microscope coupled with energy dispersive spectroscopy (SEM-EDS) were adopted to study the relationship between the viscosity-temperature characteristics and slag mineral. The results indicate that although the ash melting temperatures of high-iron coal ashes employe in this study are low, their critical viscosity temperatures are oppositely high. The viscosity-temperature curves of these samples show the characteristics of crystal slag and exhibit different fluctuation. The mass fraction of iron is related to the fluctuation of coal ash viscosity-temperature curve. With the increase of the ratio of w(Fe2O3)/w(CaO+MgO), the viscosity-temperature curves of coal ashes show more obvious fluctuation, which is mainly due to the formation of hercynite or magnesium aluminium iron oxide. When the ratio of w(Fe2O3)/w(CaO+MgO) is lower than 0.7, the viscosity-temperature curve shows none/little fluctuation. When the ratio of w(Fe2O3)/w(CaO+MgO) is between 0.7 and 1.0, certain fluctuation concentrated on viscosity value from 15 Pa·s to 60 Pa·s is exhibited. When the ratio of w(Fe2O3)/w(CaO+MgO) is higher than 2.0, significant fluctuation on the viscosity-temperature curve is observed.The brightness difference of back scattered electron (BSE) images indicates the variation of element enrichment. Fe and Mg are mainly enriched in brighter area, Si and Ca are mainly enriched in darker area, and Al is detected in these two areas.@The kinetics of reaction between NO and carbon during flue gas denitrification catalyzed by activated-char-supported composite metals were investigated under non-isothermal conditions. The apparent activation energy of the catalytic denitrification reaction by activated-char was calculated using Flynn-Wall-Ozawa (FWO), Kissinger-Akahira-Sunose (KAS) and Coats-Redfern (CR) methods using TGA data. The catalyst phases before and after denitrification reaction were analyzed using X-ray diffraction (XRD). The results show that the apparent activation energy of the denitrification reaction and the reaction temperature decrease after loading of copper and iron composite metal catalysts onto chars. When the carbon conversion of the activated char is less than 0.3, the denitrification process is limited by chemical reaction rate. When the carbon conversion is higher than 0.3, the denitrification process turns to diffusion controll. During the denitrification process, the deactivation of the catalysts is caused by the oxidation of the active metal phases.@Cheap activated coke was directly prepared by using drop-tube reactor and fixed bed reactor under optimum preparation condition with high temperature steam activated method from hydrogenation char, and was used as adsorbent to treat high and low concentration gasification wastewater. The results show that with increasing activation time from 5 s to 120 min, the adsorption for iodine and phenol adsorbance of activated coke both first increase and then decrease slightly, while the specific surface and total pore volume of activated coke increase. Hydrogenation char without activation has poor performance both in adsorption index and treatment for wastewater. Activated coke prepared by using drop-tube reactor with activation time of 5 s has not obvious change in adsorption properties, while adsorption properties of activated coke prepared by using fixed bed reactor increase obviously. When activation time is 90 min，the adsorption for iodine and phenol of activated coke reaches the highest, 97 mg/L and 588 mg/L respectively, and the specific surface and total pore volume of activated coke reach 675.53 m2/g and 0.631 2 cm3/g respectively. When activation time is more than 30 min, the activated coke has good performance on the removal rate and absorption capacity of COD, phosphorus and TOC, similar to commercially available activated coke, while with the activation time changing from 30 min to 120 min, the variation range of removal rate and absorption capacity of COD, phosphorus and TOC are less than 5%, the activation time has little influence on the removal rate and absorption capacity of COD, phosphorus and TOC.@O2/CO2 combustion characteristics of cellulose and hemicellulose and lignin were studied using thermogravimetric analyzer. The influence of the combustion atmosphere (O2/CO2, O2/N2), oxygen volume fraction (10%, 21% and 40%) and heating rate (10 ℃/min, 20 ℃/min and 30 ℃/min) on O2/CO2 combustion characteristics were investigated. The results show that the three-biomass components combustion process appeare varying degrees of delay in O2/CO2 atmosphere compared that in O2/N2 atmosphere and it mainly reflects in the coke combustion stage. The lignin combustion delay is more obvious than that of cellulose and hemicellulose, due to the higher lignin coke content. In O2/CO2 atmosphere, the increase of oxygen volume fraction has less influence on volatile matter combustion, due to the high oxygen content of the three biomass components. However, there is a remarkable impact on coke combustion with the increase of oxygen volume fraction, and the coke combustion stage moves to the low temperature zone, the comprehensive combustion characteristics improve significantly. In O2/CO2 atmosphere, the combustion process of three biomass components move towards higher temperature zone with the heating rate increasing. There are significantly increasing of weight loss rate of cellulose and hemicellulose in the stage of volatile separating out; in the stage of coke combustion, the weight loss rate of lignin increase significantly. The comprehensive combustion characteristics of three biomass components improve. Compared with cellulose and hemicellulose, lignin combustion reactivity and combined combustion characteristics are relatively poor.@
2009
运用灰色关联原理定量表征了煤的性能参数：硫分、挥发分、灰分和发热量对聚类分析结果的影响程度.结果表明，在不同权值条件下，可得到一致的结果，实验选取四种性能参数的相对关联系数的大小顺序恒为：硫分、挥发分、灰分、发热量.实验验证可得到一致结果.因此，在实际研究和聚类分析过程中，应该控制四个参数中硫分和挥发分的检测精度和准确度.@主要采用加压热天平进行了不同工况(压力、温度)下煤焦样品的制备，并利用元素分析仪对煤焦进行了元素分析，研究了不同热解压力和温度下煤热解过程中C和H的转变规律.在1 000 ℃时，随热解压力的增加（从常压到5 MPa）煤焦产量增加，煤焦中的nC/nH（C/H摩尔比）也增加，从而增加了转化到煤焦中的碳量Cchar，而Hchar则先减小而后趋于恒定.在常压和加压下（3 MPa）时，随着热解温度的提高（500 ℃~1 000 ℃），热解煤焦的产量都减少，煤焦中的nC/nH增加，转化到煤焦中的碳量Cchar和氢量Hchar都减小.但加压热解与常压热解相比，煤焦产量的减小速率要小，煤焦中的nC/nH在650 ℃~800 ℃的增加速率要大，从而使得转化到煤焦中的碳量Cchar较大.这主要是由加压热解加快了半焦和焦油的二次反应而引起的.nC/nH随热解压力的变化表明加压热解加快了煤焦微晶结构的有序化，这对煤焦的反应性将产生重要影响.@对煤中硫在还原性气氛下热解的迁移规律进行了实验研究.以一种中硫煤为研究对象，在一套常压固定床反应器上进行程序升温实验，热解产物在高温下与净化的空气混合后并充分燃烧，经由溶液吸收进行电解滴定，得到实验过程煤中硫的连续释出规律曲线.实验结果表明，煤中硫在H2气氛下的释出比例比在N2气氛下的释出比例要高，H2气氛下的释出比例为71.9%，N2气氛下的释出比例为32.8%.引起两者释出比例差异的主要原因是：在高于500 ℃的高温条件下，H2能够与煤（煤半焦）中的硫进行反应，而在N2气氛下煤（煤半焦）中的硫却不能随温度的升高而进一步释出.@采用Aspen Plus流程模拟软件对某拟建的IGCC示范工程的德士古煤气化炉进行数值模拟，通过考虑碳的不完全转换对计算流程进行了改进，并运用CPD模型预测煤热裂解的产物分布.研究了煤气化炉的重要操作参数（即水煤浆浓度、氧煤比、气化压力和气化温度）对气化结果的影响.在计算区间内，发现高浓度水煤浆浓度范围内，随浓度的增加，煤气的主要成分(H2+CO)的总含量增加.气化温度增大到1 400 ℃左右时，煤气的主要成分随气化温度的进一步增加会趋于一个恒定值.@分别以富氧和富氧水蒸气为气化介质，进行了大雁褐煤的地下气化模型实验.研究了鼓风量和汽氧比对煤气组成、气化稳定性以及煤层气化速率的影响，并进行了富氧水蒸气地下气化过程的物料衡算.实验结果表明，通过采取合适的气化参数，大雁褐煤的地下气化过程可以稳定进行.@使用流程模拟的方法计算了两种煤气化技术用于合成氨的能耗并分析了能耗产生差异的原因，提出比较和选择煤气化技术要基于具体的应用场合并确定合理的比较范围，从能耗角度为选择煤气化技术提供依据.计算结果表明，在水蒸气含量高的反应气氛下，氧煤比由灰熔点控制，反之，由碳转化率控制；GEGP气化技术单位H2煤耗和氧耗均较高，多消耗的煤和氧转化成了煤气中的水蒸气，GEGP气化炉内发生了部分变换反应，降低了变换装置的负荷；GEGP气化技术单位H2的能耗低于SCGP气化技术.@为了考察气化炉炉侧喷嘴入口位置对炉内流场和颗粒浓度分布的影响规律，在新型水煤浆气化炉冷模三维实验台上进行了大量的实验研究，并与数值模拟计算结果进行了对比，结果表明，当喷嘴距气化炉顶部0.9 m时，气化炉炉内流场分布最合理，颗粒浓度分布最均匀；实验测试结果和数值模拟计算结果非常接近，进一步验证了数值模拟计算结果的准确性.实验测试结果为气化炉的设计和运行提供了参考.@以煤液化油衍生油为溶剂，在热萃取装置上研究了大唐胜利褐煤等低阶煤的热萃取性能，考察了热萃取温度、热萃取时间、溶煤比、溶剂类型和煤种等因素对煤热萃取性能的影响，同时对大唐胜利褐煤在热萃取过程中氧元素的脱除情况进行了研究.结果表明：煤的热萃取率随温度升高而明显增加，由340 ℃时的18.7%（daf）增加到430 ℃时的59.5%（daf），而固体热萃取物回收率在390 ℃时达到最高值32.4%（daf），反应停留时间以60 min为宜，溶剂与煤的合适质量比为5∶1，在煤液化加氢循环溶剂中具有较高的热萃取率.热萃取过程中大唐胜利5#煤中氧元素的脱除率可达23%（daf）.@神华集团有限责任公司为实施新疆煤炭转化战略，对位于新疆自治区吐鲁番州托克逊县的黑山煤进行了煤直接加氢液化研究，分别在0.5 L的高压釜和0.12 t/d的连续装置上进行了直接液化实验.结果表明，黑山煤具有良好的液化性能和优异的成浆性能，在可输送的黏度范围内可制得浓度高达50%的油煤浆，且能长周期稳定运转并取得较高的油收率和较低的气产率.高浓度煤浆的稳定输送特性可大大提高煤液化反应器的处理能力.@用傅立叶变换红外光谱考察了水介质液化煤反应前后产物的变化，以1HNMR和GC-MS为手段考察了不同反应温度下液化产物结构组成的变化.实验结果表明，不同反应温度对产物组成变化存在影响，且在液化油中发现有酚类物质.用重水交换实验证实了产物中确实有酚类存在，对煤液化工艺条件的优化具有一定的指导意义.@在温度323.2 K~623.2 K，压力2 MPa~10 MPa的反应条件下，根据气液平衡原理，利用高压反应釜测定了氢气在煤焦油中的平衡溶解度.讨论了温度和压力对氢气在煤焦油中平衡溶解度的影响.在不同的温度和压力条件下，氢气在各煤焦油中平衡溶解度的变化趋势不同.这些物性数据填补了国内数据库有关煤焦油方面的空白，为煤焦油在浆态反应器中催化加氢的工业化设计提供了基础物性数据.@利用模压半炭化成型工艺，在大气环境下制备了焦炭颗粒增强的沥青基炭复合材料，并借助光学显微镜和扫描电镜对其微观组织和断口形貌进行了观察.结果表明：根据焦炭颗粒增强沥青基炭复合材料的原料结构和制备工艺，利用光学显微镜和扫描电镜，可以清楚地辨别出沥青基炭复合材料中的增强体炭、基体炭和孔隙相三种基本相结构.而且黏结剂炭除了填充增强体炭中的孔隙外，还将每一个增强体颗粒包裹起来，从而在沥青基炭复合材料中形成了一个网络状的连续基体.@以8种不同种类单种煤焦炭为原料，在氮气气氛下，测定了30 ℃～1 300 ℃范围内的焦炭热膨胀性能.依据焦炭自身的特性，提出了适合焦炭的热膨胀性能测定方法和热膨胀性能参数.根据测得的焦炭热膨胀性能参数，探索了焦炭热膨胀性能、焦炭热强度及煤变质程度之间的关系.研究发现，依据所提出的参数可以将焦炭热膨胀性能分为三个阶段，并且提出了焦炭收缩阶段为微裂纹产生的观点.在焦炭热膨胀对热强度影响方面，发现热膨胀性能参数与焦炭热强度成正比关系.在煤的变质程度对焦炭膨胀性能影响方面，发现最大线性膨胀Lf与挥发分Vdaf成二次曲线关系，在Vdaf为30％左右Lf取到最大值.最大线性膨胀Lf与煤的黏结性成正比关系，但是会受到挥发分的影响.@将某型号无烟煤粉碎后浸渍过渡金属Cu和Co的硫酸盐溶液，经过烘干、焙烧及研磨处理，研究不同过渡金属硫酸盐催化剂对煤的燃烧性能的影响.采用燃点测定仪测其着火点，X射线衍射仪物相分析.结果表明，过渡金属硫酸盐能改变煤粉的燃烧反应历程，加速煤粉燃烧反应速率，大幅度降低着火点.@为了充分利用含氧煤层气，采用硫化物氧化法，利用热重和固定床反应器研究了含氧煤层气脱氧过程中温度、流速及催化剂等因素的影响.研究结果表明，在固定床上，硫化钠作为脱氧剂，低于500 ℃的条件下，可有效降低含氧煤层气中的氧含量.利用硫化钠脱氧的过程中，分子筛相对其他金属离子催化剂有明显的催化效果.整个脱氧反应过程受外扩散影响较大，小流量有利于提高反应转化率，但Na2S反应转化率总体偏低.@研究了X射线衍射（XRD）法测定炭/炭复合材料石墨化度的原理和方法.实验结果表明：由于试样中含有不同石墨化度的组分，致使碳石墨的衍射线呈现明显的不对称，用不同方法所确定的峰位得到的石墨化度值差异很大，比较而言，通过拟合定位更接近材料真实情况，考虑了各组元的信息；另外，对C(002)峰进行多重峰分离处理，以各子峰的相对含量作权重，可以很明显地看出试样中不同石墨化度成分所占的比例，最终得到一个较为合理的石墨化度值.@研究了稀土化合物LaF3的引入对固体超强酸催化剂SO2-4/ZrO2性质的影响.用热台偏光显微镜及X射线衍射方法分析了固体超强酸在焙烧过程中形态结构变化及晶相转变过程.研究发现，LaF3引入对固体超强酸形态结构及晶相转变产生了影响.使用差示扫描量热（DSC）及热重（TG）技术分析了固体超强酸的热稳定性.引入LaF3提高了固体超强酸的结晶温度及催化剂中SO2-4分解温度.红外光谱分析表明，引入LaF3后固体超强酸更易于脱除其中所含的水分.同时考察了LaF3引入对固体超强酸酸强度、SO2-4含量及萘齐聚反应的影响.@为了拓宽煤系高岭土的应用前景，利用正交实验考察了反应条件对煤系高岭土吸附城市生活污水中磷的影响，确定了各因素对煤系高岭土吸附城市生活污水中磷的影响顺序依次为：煤系高岭土的用量、搅拌速度、反应时间、反应温度、pH值和生活污水的相对浓度，得到了最佳的反应条件为煤系高岭土的用量为6 g，搅拌速度为45 r/min，反应时间120 min，反应温度35 ℃，生活污水pH为4，生活污水相对浓度为0.50.在此条件下煤系高岭土吸附城市生活污水中的磷含量达96.80%.@燃煤排放的CO2是温室效应的最大贡献者，煤基能源系统也就成为实现CO2零排放的重点研究对象.分析了国内外零排放煤基能源系统的研究进展，归纳了目前煤基能源系统实现CO2零排放的三种途径：基于IGCC系统的开拓研究，包括燃烧后分离与回收、燃烧前合成煤气处理与分离以及以IGCC为基础的煤基动力化工多联产系统；CO2接受体气化法为基础的煤基能源系统和化学链式煤气化煤基能源系统.@催化剂是SCR烟气脱硝技术的核心，减缓催化剂的失活速率，延长催化剂的寿命对于降低SCR系统的运行成本有着非常重要的意义.描述了国内外文献中涉及的SCR催化剂的失活现象，列举了导致催化剂失活的各项因素，比较了碱金属、碱土金属、As和P及HCl等物质的影响规律及因素，并在此基础上总结了各类文献中提到的中毒机理：碱金属通过减少Bronsted酸性位的数量和削弱Bronsted酸性位的酸性导致催化剂中毒，碱土金属则能够在催化剂表面沉积进而造成孔结构的堵塞，催化剂的砷中毒是由气态的砷的化合物不断聚积，堵塞进入催化剂活性位的通道引起的，而磷对于催化剂的影响体现在其能够减小活性位的数量上.针对特定的失活机理，可以通过优化催化剂的特性来减缓催化剂的失活速率.@利用射频等离子体，在淮南气煤中加入二茂铁制备洋葱状富勒烯（OLFs），然后加入不同体积分数的氧气对OLFs进行表面氧化修饰.生成的产物用场发射扫描电子显微镜、高分辨透射电子显微镜和红外光谱进行分析，结果表明，由淮南煤和二茂铁在射频等离子体条件下可生成内包铁纳米颗粒的OLFs；经含氧等离子体修饰后，OLFs表面被氧化，当氧气体积分数为3%和4%时，OLFs的表面引入了新的羟基和羧基官能团，且氧气体积分数为4%时引入的官能团最多.简单分析了其生成机理.@在常压固定床反应器上考察了氢气分压对煤热解残焦中硫释出的影响，并通过差减微分法求取了反应的宏观动力学参数.研究结果表明：不同的氢气分压对反应具有一定的影响.氢气分压在0.02 MPa～0.1 MPa范围内，较高的氢气分压条件下，煤焦中有机硫与氢气的反应速率较快.通过动力学计算得出：不同的氢气分压下对应的反应级数、活化能和指前因子均不相同.实验结果表明，氢气与热解残焦中硫的作用是一个复杂的过程，反应过程可能受气体扩散控制.@在煤炭地下气化过程中，热解反应生成的半焦孔隙结构性质是影响气化过程的重要因素.对大雁褐煤、协庄烟煤、昔阳无烟煤及其热解半焦的比表面积、孔容积和孔径进行了测定,总结出了不同煤种、不同热解温度和不同热解气氛下半焦孔隙结构变化的规律.结果表明，半焦的表面结构特性受热解温度和热解气氛双方面的影响，改变热解终温或气氛，孔径分布特征变化幅度不大.@提出了三种从费托合成油品中脱酸和含氧化合物工艺.借助Aspen Plus模拟软件对三种工艺进行了优化设计，并对三种工艺的优劣进行了比较.结果表明，萃取精馏法工艺比较复杂；共沸精馏法在工艺上比萃取精馏法简单，而且达到同样的分离目标所需的工艺条件温和，节约了成本；非均相共沸精馏与均相共沸精馏相比，所需的溶剂比较低，而且溶剂回收更容易实现，从而降低了成本，但是，非均相共沸精馏的缺点在于其溶剂回收率不如均相共沸精馏高.@主要对SJ型低温干馏炉生产半焦的过程进行了物料、热量衡算及过程能耗分析.结果表明，SJ型内热式低温干馏炉的半焦理论转化率为63.926%，焦油产率为6.079%，煤气产率为598 m3/t；炉体的热效率为88.90%，热工效率为84.08%，且炉体散热损失仅为4.82%，过程能耗在13.38%～17.92%之间，结合所用低变质煤的成分特征，可说明该过程属于低能耗、高产率、高附加值的洁净生产过程，适合该煤种的综合利用.@通过中度加氢，可以使无黏结性的神华煤转变为具有较强黏结性产物，反应具有良好的脱氧效果，并使产物的热值得到了提高.显微组分照片表明有中间相小球体的产生，结合产物THF不溶物焦油产率计算发现，中度加氢过程中生成了可以在热解过程中产生胶质体的新的活性组分，配煤实验表明，产物可以在炼焦工业得到应用. @采用二次精馏-结晶法和精馏-共沸精馏法研究了从洗油中分离精制β-甲基萘.结果表明：1) 仅通过普通二次精馏的方法或二次精馏冷却结晶的方法很难从洗油中分离出较高纯度的β-甲基萘；2) 利用适当的共沸剂，采用精馏共沸精馏的方法，可以从洗油中分离精制出较高纯度的β-甲基萘；3) 提出的精馏共沸精馏法，具有工艺简单、产物纯度高、没有污染、共沸剂可以循环使用和成本低等特点.@对某厂17.5万t/a焦油加工装置的蒸馏工序近两年生产的热量供应情况进行跟踪调查，利用夹点原理的热级联算对两年的数据进行分析，发现有0.289 6 GJ/t以上的热量可以被回收利用，根据该厂目前的情况，提出了使用热管换热器来回收低位能量，利用夹点技术来设计改造工程的换热网络，加强保温设备的安装，仅蒸馏工序，全年可产生110多万元的节能效益.@以宁夏地区两种烟煤和两种无烟煤为原料，用浮沉方法得到灰分在40％左右的煤粉，然后在马弗炉900 ℃制焦，再用HCl-HF酸制取脱灰焦.通过比较煤焦脱灰前后热重燃烧曲线的特征参数的变化和转化速率的快慢，分析了内在矿物质对煤焦燃烧特性的影响.结果表明，内在矿物对两种烟煤焦前期的着火有阻碍作用，对后期燃尽有一定促进作用；内在矿物质对两种无烟煤焦的着火有促进作用，对后期燃尽有阻碍作用.@研究了镁基助熔剂对皖北刘桥二矿混煤（AQ007）灰熔融特性的影响，并在添加镁基助熔剂前后分别对AQ007煤灰在不同热处理温度下的矿物组成进行了XRD和红外光谱分析.结果表明：导致AQ007煤灰熔点高的主要原因是1 000 ℃以上形成的莫来石引起的；加入镁基助熔剂可以降低AQ007煤灰的熔融温度；在高温下镁基助熔剂与煤灰中其他铝硅酸盐矿物发生反应，生成钙镁橄榄石、镁铝石、镁橄榄石和堇青石等低温共熔化合物，从而使煤灰熔点明显下降.@以胜利煤与木屑为原料，采用Fe2O3催化剂和S助催化剂，用高压反应釜，研究了配比、温度、反应时间及初始氢压等因素对两者共液化的影响.研究结果表明，木屑能促进煤的转化，当木屑与煤的质量比为1∶9时，油产率达到最大值；在实验条件范围内，转化率和油产率均随反应温度、反应时间和初始氢压的增大而增大.@用机械混合法制备了Mn-Fe-Ca脱硫剂，通过XRD，SEM和H2-TPR等手段研究了焙烧温度对脱硫剂的织构、物相和还原性能的影响，并在固定床反应器中考察了焙烧温度对脱硫剂脱硫性能的影响.结果表明，1 050 ℃下焙烧后的脱硫剂有较好的机械强度和脱硫性能，脱硫精度最高可达4×10-6，硫容量可达33.3%.焙烧温度的改变，可以改变脱硫剂的微观结构和反应活性.@用溶胶凝胶自燃法制备了具有纳米特性的Ni-Zn-Fe复合氧化物脱硫剂，在300 ℃～500 ℃具有较高的脱硫活性.考察了不同煅烧温度下前驱体粉末的活性、不同高岭土添加量以及不同淀粉添加量对成型脱硫剂有效硫容的影响.结果表明，前驱体粉末的煅烧温度为500 ℃时硫容最高，高于500 ℃煅烧活性下降；高岭土加入脱硫剂中可以防止粉化，且在30%～40%添加量时脱硫剂有效硫容最高；脱硫剂中加入淀粉可以提高硫容，若添加量过高则会使脱硫剂严重粉化，5%的淀粉加入量为最好.@通常煤中含有0.1×10-6~0.15×10-6的汞，在燃烧和气化过程中被排放到空气中.由于其高挥发性和毒性，特别是会对神经系统造成影响，所以成为人们关注的一种重要的重金属元素.对河南省田庄选煤厂的一种T煤进行了分选，根据分选产品的TGA和DTG曲线分析了煤样的燃烧特性，通过对不同温度段元素汞和氧化态汞的采集和测定，研究了不同分选产品的汞释放行为.结果表明，末原煤、末中煤和末精煤具有相似的燃烧和汞释放行为.烟气中元素汞的含量大于氧化态汞的含量.通过物理分选，煤样中部分无机汞可以被富集到重产品中.@分别选用焦作无烟煤、山西烟煤、陕西神木烟煤、平顶山烟煤四种原煤和其生物质型煤，通过不同煤种原煤和生物质型煤的热重分析实验，计算原煤和生物质型煤的着火、稳定燃烧和燃尽特性指数.分析得出：灰分和挥发分是影响生物质型煤燃烧特性及其燃烧特点的主要因素.@循环流化床锅炉是一种高效低污染的先进燃烧设备，应用广泛.但由于其具有煤种适用性广和燃烧稳定的特点，广泛用于燃烧劣质煤、石煤和煤矸石，因此，二氧化硫和氟化物排放污染控制问题不容忽视.75 t/h和200 t/h循环流化床燃烧固氟技术应用表明，流化床燃烧燃烧温度十分适合石灰石燃烧固硫固氟的要求，在循环流化床锅炉燃烧时添加石灰石可显著降低锅炉出口烟气中二氧化硫和氟化物的排放浓度及排放量，具有同时脱出二氧化硫和氟化物的作用，具有显著的经济效益、环境效益和社会效益.@以神府3#煤为原料，氢氧化钾为化学活化剂，水蒸气为物理活化剂，探讨了物理化学耦合活化法制备煤基活性炭的工艺条件和耦合活化机理，考察了氢氧化钾与煤的浸渍比、活化温度及总活化时间对活性炭性能的影响.结果表明，当活化温度为700 ℃，碱渍比为0.5，活化时间为60 min时，活性炭的性能较好，碘吸附值为837 mg/g，亚甲基蓝吸附值为409 mg/g， BET比表面积943 m2/g，总孔容积达0.31 cm3/g，煤副产氢气约58 mmol/g.@以无烟粉煤为原料，采用有黏结剂冷压成型方法，制备了几种型煤产品，并对无烟粉煤的显微硬度、可磨性、真密度、视密度、孔隙率最高内在水分和孔结构等物理性质进行了分析测试，重点研究了无烟煤的物理性质对型煤抗压强度的影响.结果表明，随无烟煤的反射率、显微硬度、真密度和视密度等指标的增加与可磨性的降低，型煤抗压强度均显示出增加的趋势，这与高压无黏结剂成型时，型煤强度与显微硬度关系相反.无烟煤的物理性质体现了煤的变质程度，因此，型煤抗压强度也与无烟煤的变质程度密切相关.研究结果还表明，不同煤阶无烟煤的孔结构分布和最高内在水分不尽相同，都影响无烟煤被黏结剂黏结的程度，从而影响无烟煤型煤的抗压强度.@对山东兖州矿业集团北宿煤样进行热处理实验研究，利用振动样品磁强计VSM，测定在不同加热温度条件下微粉煤的比磁化率.通过对粉磨并经过热处理的100目以下的微粉煤进行比磁化率测定，以及对煤质进行分析，发现加热温度及加热环境对粉煤比磁化率有着一定的影响，微粉煤热处理后煤质变化对其磁性的影响较为显著.实验结果为干法磁选脱硫选前磁性强化提供了有价值的实验研究理论依据.@利用粉煤灰酸法提取硫酸铝的残渣为原料，采用固相合成法进行4A分子筛的合成.并对其制备工艺条件和产品性能进行了实验研究，得到相应的较佳工艺条件为：粉煤灰酸渣∶氢氧化铝∶氢氧化钠=10∶4∶15；焙烧温度800 ℃～860 ℃，焙烧时间2 h～3 h；凝胶形成温度为55 ℃，时间2 h；晶化温度90 ℃～95 ℃，时间4 h～6 h.并对产品进行了XRD，SEM及IR等结构表征，与标准4A分子筛进行比较，结果显示所合成的产品为4A分子筛.@以煤矿的废弃物煤矸石为原料，研究了368 K~400 K温度范围内，煤矸石在水热体系中自转变合成了纯度和结晶度均较高的矸石基吸附剂的过程，并对其吸附性能作了初步探讨.用氮吸附静态容量法，测得该矸石基吸附剂的氮吸附等温线、比表面和孔分布曲线.通过矸石基吸附剂对苯酚的吸附实验，给出矸石基吸附剂对它的吸附等温线. 并指出合理的吸附温度、大的比表面和适当的膜化工艺对提高矸石基吸附剂的吸附量都是有效的.@采用低浓度水相分散聚合的方法合成了粒径在230 nm~250 nm的聚丙烯腈球，对其依次经过冷冻干燥、氧化及炭化工艺，用扫描电镜对炭化后的样品形貌进行了观察.结果表明，聚丙烯腈球炭化后转化为粒径在170 nm~190 nm之间的炭纳米球.炭纳米球经1 500 ℃，2 300 ℃及2 800 ℃的高温处理后，X射线衍射仪分析表明，在2 300 ℃处理温度以上可以得到石墨化度明显增加的炭纳米球.@黏结性是评价炼焦用煤结焦性的一项重要指标.近年来通过动态黏弹性测定、针入度测定和高温in-situ NMR等煤黏结性评价方法，考察了加热速度对煤高温熔融特性的影响.研究发现，对原煤快速加热预处理至330 ℃～380 ℃，可以大大提高原煤黏结性.通过溶剂萃取等研究，认为快速加热预处理改善原煤黏结性的机理可能是减弱了煤大分子聚合强度，使其在高温熔融阶段可以产生更多的低分子物质.@采用热重和红外分析法从升温速率与样品粒径的相关性等方面对平朔煤和神东煤的热解特性进行研究，并从动力学上进行分析.结果表明，随升温速率增大，煤样热解反应的初始温度、终止温度以及最大失重速率对应的温度都逐渐升高，但对粒径较小的煤样来说，这些特性温度增加的幅度较大，而最大失重率没有表现出一定的规律性；煤样粒径对热解也有一些影响，但最大失重速率与样品粒径的关系不大.随升温速率增大，热解活化能和频率因子呈现出先增大后减小的趋势.@运用等温热重技术，以CO2为气化剂，在常压和1 000 ℃～1 300 ℃温度范围内，考察了义马煤焦的气化反应性.结果表明，随着气化温度的提高，义马煤焦的反应性和反应速度呈现出增加的趋势，但在灰熔融温度附近出现不同的情况.碳还原率为50%时，1 000 ℃～1 100 ℃和1 100 ℃～1 300 ℃的气化反应活化能分别为140.97 kJ/mol与20.84 kJ/mol.@利用热重分析仪研究了CO2气氛下的生物质半焦、煤焦及其混合焦的反应性，结果表明，在相同条件下，木屑半焦的气化反应性明显高于褐煤半焦.且参与反应的两种半焦，其反应性均随反应速率而提高，而温度也是影响其气化活性的重要因素.研究还发现，在温度高于1 173 K的条件下，混合物半焦的气化反应性较单一组分半焦的反应性差.@为进一步优化焦炉煤气非预混燃烧直接制备合成气的工艺参数，对焦炉煤气在贫氧条件下发生非预混燃烧的过程进行数值模拟研究，得到了反应器内温度及产物组成分布的详细分布状况.模拟结果表明，反应在靠近氧气入口的区域内发生.从数值模拟的结果来看，反应器壁温对反应结果有非常重要的影响：提高反应器壁温有利于提高合成气的选择性，但是煤气中甲烷的转化率有所降低.因此，反应器壁温是能够控制本工艺总体反应效果的重要参数，工艺优化过程中应该特别注意.@用Fluent软件对焦炉煤气非催化部分氧化制取合成气的反应器内的温度场、浓度场和平衡气体组成进行了数值模拟.结果表明，氧气与焦炉煤气比是决定气化温度和出口合成气成分的关键.随着氧气与焦炉煤气比的增加，气化温度升高.在氧气与焦炉煤气质量比为0.14时,反应器出口的有效气体(H2+CO)含量达到最大值，焦炉煤气中的CH4几乎完全转化.在距反应器喷嘴0.05 m处反应器内达到了最高温度3 300 K，在0.1 m处H2和CO及CO2均达到平衡，CH4在该点降到最低点. @气化炉是IGCC系统中的关键部件之一，与其他部件紧密相关.基于整个IGCC系统研究气化炉特性，首先利用Thermoflex软件对某200 MW级IGCC示范工程建立系统模型，从系统的角度出发，对不同气化参数（水煤浆浓度、气化压力、氧煤比和碳转化率）的IGCC系统进行计算，并分析对气化结果的影响.结果表明，水煤浆浓度和氧煤比对气化结果的影响较大.@选取Peng-Robinson（PR）方程与perturbed-chain SAFT（PC-SAFT）方程，采用单流体混合规则，重点考察了在费托合成工艺条件下的小分子气体(CO，H2，CO2，N2，CH4和C2H6)与高碳烷烃（C20，C28和C36）体系的气液相平衡.结果发现，在对不同碳数高碳烷烃溶剂采用单一交互作用参数时，PC-SAFT与PR方程计算的液相浓度与实验值的总平均偏差分别为1.39%与1.98%.而不考虑交互作用参数时，其误差分别为25.18%与16.195%.对各系统的交互作用参数进行了研究，结果表明，随温度和烷烃碳数的升高，PC-SAFT方程的交互作用参数缓慢升高，而PR方程的交互作用参数则下降，且幅度较大.因此，考虑交互作用参数时，PC-SAFT方程具有更好的计算精度和可外推性.@在对比大量样品和实验数据的基础上对煤直接液化油窄馏分样品的计算方法进行了研究和讨论，通过与冰点降低法分析结果相比，考察了NEDOL法计算煤直接液化油窄馏分样品分子量的准确性.结果表明，用NEDOL法计算四种煤直接液化油窄馏分样品的分子量时，47个样品的计算结果与冰点降低法测定结果十分接近，对神华油样品来说，两种方法的平均误差为-1.7；对胜利油样品来说，两种方法的平均误差为-1.3；对内蒙油样品来说，两种方法的平均误差为-3；对黑山油样品来说，两种方法的平均误差为-2.7.NEDOL法可直接用于计算液化油平均分子量.@通过对21种不同变质程度的煤种进行成浆性能的实验，分析了煤种的不同理化特性对煤样的成浆性能的影响.结果表明，水煤浆的粒度堆积效率都能达到较好的堆积效率，各水煤浆样在低剪切速率条件下的表观黏度差别较大，最大为埔连塔煤11.71 s-1，4 235 mPa·s.各煤样的成浆浓度随其可磨性指数的增加而呈曲线上升趋势，随其内水分的升高而降低.各水煤浆样的稳定性都很好，都超过了60 d，半数达到了90 d.@离子液体作为一种新型的工业溶剂，尚未应用到煤化工领域.以离子液体——[Emim]BF4作为煤直接液化的溶剂，选用神华煤样和胜利煤样，在常压低温条件下，测定离子液体煤浆体黏度，为离子液体中煤的液化作基础研究.结果表明，煤油比越小，煤浆体系初始黏度越低，且黏度随温度的升高而降低；在50 ℃～65 ℃之间煤浆黏度受溶胀的影响，发生明显的变化.@采用X光电子能谱法（XPS）研究了我国内蒙胜利褐煤中有机氧的赋存形态，将其分为碳氧单键类、羰基基团和羧基基团三种类型，与元素分析法结合得到不同形态含氧官能团在胜利褐煤中的绝对含量，与化学分析法测试煤中含氧官能团进行比较.在容积为0.5 L震荡式高压釜中对内蒙胜利褐煤在液化预反应阶段氧的脱除进行了研究，实验所选温度为330 ℃，360 ℃，400 ℃和430 ℃，分别考察三种催化剂（MnO2，Fe2O3和MoO3）的脱氧效果，并与无催化剂的脱氧效果进行比较，结果表明，氢压1 MPa无催化剂在360 ℃～400 ℃的液化预反应条件下，脱氧率较高.@以中/低温煤焦油460 ℃以下馏分为原料，在30 mL小试加氢反应装置上对其进行加氢改质，制备清洁燃料油.加氢反应过程中系统压力为8 MPa～15 MPa，反应温度为400 ℃～460 ℃，氢/油体积比为1 800～2 000，煤焦油原料全部转化，产品油平均体积收率大于106％，进一步分离后获得汽油馏分（≤170 ℃）和柴油馏分(>170 ℃)，其中汽油馏分和柴油馏分分别占总体积的22.75％和77.25％（该比例随不同煤焦油来源而不同），无任何尾油残留，且均达到国家标准中93#汽油和0#柴油规定的各项技术指标；此外，煤焦油和产品中硫含量的分析结果表明，产品油中硫的含量大大降低，完全可以达到清洁燃料油的标准.@以除去喹啉不溶物的中温煤沥青为原料，分别在不同的反应温度和保温时间下制备了中间相炭微球(MCMB)；在磁场条件下制备了有序结构针状焦；通过扫描电镜(SEM)考察了不同反应条件下中间相炭微球和针状焦的形貌，讨论了中间相形成影响因素对针状焦结构的影响.结果表明，中间相形成阶段的反应温度、保温时间和体系黏度对针状焦的结构和性能具有重要影响，磁场对针状焦的流线型结构有促进作用.@采用综合热分析仪研究了两种煤粉在三种不同粒径范围下氧浓度对其燃烧特性参数的影响，并计算得到各工况下的动力学参数.结果表明，随着氧浓度增加，燃烧DTG曲线向低温区移动，着火及燃尽温度降低，燃尽时间缩短，综合燃烧指数明显提高，燃烧特性得到改善，尤其对粒径较大的煤粉改善更为明显；煤粉燃烧反应低温段的反应活化能和频率因子比高温段低，反应级数较小；不同氧浓度下，煤粉燃烧活化能和频率因子间存在动力学补偿效应.@从单个荷电颗粒的受力分析入手，建立了线筒型荷电器内适合FLUENT软件求解的单个煤粉颗粒运动轨迹的数学模型.模型涉及的方程包括：颗粒荷电方程、电场与电荷守恒方程、气体质量与动量守恒方程、颗粒质量与动量方程等.根据模型，利用FLUENT软件对荷电器中荷电颗粒的运动轨迹进行模拟，通过用户自定义函数-UDF编程引入电场力，最终得到不同颗粒粒径、荷电电压、射流流速下的运动轨迹仿真，并得出规律性结论.@为克服燃煤发电过程排放的NOx对人体和环境的危害，低氮煤粉燃烧器得到广泛的使用.但如果低氮煤粉燃烧器利用不当，会造成飞灰碳的大幅增加.利用筛分法和烧失量法研究双通道低氮煤粉燃烧器飞灰碳的分布特性，利用压汞仪和XRD分析飞灰碳的失活程度，从而研究双通道低氮煤粉燃烧器飞灰碳升高的原因.结果表明，双通道低氮煤粉燃烧器飞灰碳为双峰分布，小粒径飞灰碳失活不明显，大粒径飞灰碳失活明显.分析原因后认为：小粒径煤粉颗粒在燃烧区域停留时间过短，没有完全燃烧；大粒径煤粉颗粒在高温乏氧区域停留时间过长导致的失活是双通道低氮煤粉燃烧器飞灰碳升高的主要原因.@通过对全国部分省市（地区）煤田煤样中总硫和汞含量的研究分析，以及对煤中硫与汞的赋存状态、不同成煤时期硫与汞的含量分布进行探究，发现高硫煤中的汞与硫化物关系密切，且与黄铁矿存在密切的伴生关系.结果表明，煤中汞的含量一般为100 ng/g～450 ng/g，平均含量220 ng/g.利用数学统计分析方法和数学软件等对煤样中的总硫与汞含量进行相关性模型研究，探索了煤中总硫与汞含量的数学模型，结果表明，在置信度为0.95条件下（α=0.05），煤样中的汞含量与含硫量存在很好的相关关系.@采用自制热解装置对北宿煤进行热解，此装置与传统热解装置相比具有处理量大和操作简便等优势，能够与磁选实验相结合，热解温度400 ℃～700 ℃，氮气流量0.1 L/min，保温时间为30 min，主要研究热解温度对煤粉磁选脱硫效果的影响.结果表明：适当提高热解温度对磁选脱硫是十分有利的，且500 ℃时效果最佳，热解后半焦与原煤相比磁选脱硫率提高近40%；利用XRD分别对原煤、500 ℃半焦及半焦磁选后的精煤进行分析，发现半焦中有强磁性矿物磁黄铁矿（Fe1-xS）生成，精煤中已无黄铁矿，说明热解磁选脱硫技术能够有效脱除煤中无机硫.依据GB/T215-2003分析试样中硫的形态，发现煤中有机硫含量高且以噻吩硫形式存在，给实现北宿煤低温预处理磁选高效脱硫造成了困难.@将四苯基卟啉钴负载于纳米TiO2上得到的催化剂催化CO还原NO.在空速为10 000 h-1，NO和CO进口浓度分别为500 mg/m3和5 000 mg/m3，O2含量为4%时取得了85%的转化率.SO2对催化剂的毒化作用不明显；H2O的竞争吸附使反应活性有所降低，但脱附H2O后可以恢复；SO2和H2O同时存在时，催化剂活性缓慢下降，但真空热处理后可以基本恢复.反应机理分析表明，NO2较NO更容易被CO还原，NO的还原产物为N2O和N2，随着温度的升高，生成N2的选择性增强；NO2的还原产物为N2.该催化剂可用于不同时含有SO2和H2O的一些烟（废）气NO催化CO还原.@以永城天然焦为前驱体，KOH为活化剂制备高比表面积活性炭，并将其作为超级电容器的电极材料.采用N2吸附和X射线衍射（XRD）对活性炭的比表面积、孔结构及微晶结构进行了表征，用恒流充放电、循环伏安和交流阻抗等电化学测试手段评价了其电化学特性.在碱炭比为4∶1，800 ℃活化1 h的条件下制备出比表面积2 441 m2/g，孔容1.5 cm3/g，中孔率67 %的活性炭.该活性炭电极在3 M KOH水溶液及1 M (C2H5)4NBF4/碳酸丙烯酯（PC）电解液中具有高的比电容（分别达到252 F/g，163 F/g），低的扩散阻抗（分别为0.5 Ω和6.8 Ω）.@以鸡西矿区粉煤灰为原料，详细研究了合成粉煤灰基吸附剂的方法及其合成动力学模型，分析了不同反应时间内产品的结晶度.通过待定系数法确定出各方程速率常数和整合动力学方程，最终得到用粉煤灰制备粉煤灰基吸附剂的动力学模型.采用模型方程，对实验晶化曲线进行拟合，得到如下结论：粉煤灰基吸附剂结晶反应发生在凝胶后期；此外，在晶化后期，凝胶溶解速率的快慢决定了晶体生长速率和在有限晶化时间内产品结晶度的大小.从整体动力学实验数据来看，能与模型曲线较好地吻合，说明此动力学模型能较好地描述实际晶体生长规律.@以苯胺和苯为模型，考察了其在载体活性炭（AC）和炭基金属吸附催化剂（CuO/AC）上的吸附行为，并对吸附了苯胺和苯的AC和CuO/AC进行程序升温脱附实验（TPD）.结果表明，CuO/AC的苯胺脱附量显著小于AC，且起始脱附温度高于AC的脱附温度.CuO的担载改变了苯胺的吸附状态，使得苯胺和CuO/AC之间的吸附更加牢固；CuO担载前后的苯的脱附行为差别不大，表明其吸附状态没有变化.@用自制的KFM-A 型煤粉快速加热装置在空气氛围下对兖州煤等六种煤样从室温快速加热到380 ℃左右.对处理后的煤粉进行了黏结指数的测定，发现快速加热可以明显提高不黏煤和弱黏煤的黏结性.通过CS2和CS2-NMP混合溶剂萃取实验，发现快速加热处理后煤样的溶剂萃取率都有所提高，且萃取率变化和煤的黏结性变化有良好的相关关系.由此推断，快速加热预处理可以弱化煤大分子之间以及分子内部的凝聚结构，使其在高温域时，可以生成更多的流动性低分子物质，导致黏结性的改善.@采用压汞法和氮气吸附容量法测试了甲醇萃取前后大雁块状褐煤的微孔结构，结果表明，萃取后大雁褐煤孔隙率从16.4%增加到了18.53%，在3 nm～80 nm的微孔径范围内，比表面积增加了2.6倍，孔容增加了2倍，但随孔径的分布却和原煤具有相似的规律，比表面积和孔容的增加只是微孔数量增加的结果.根据分析得到煤中微孔的最可几孔径，利用煤的胶态分子团结构模型观点，计算出大雁褐煤基本结构单元的粒径在8.9 nm左右.同时发现，在煤炭地下气化过程中，使用甲醇不仅能够提高气化煤层的渗透性，而且煤比表面积的增加也使得气化反应活性得到增强，提高了地下气化效率.@用N2等温吸附（77 K）法考察了热解条件对淮南煤焦孔隙结构的影响.测量了淮南原煤、淮南快焦和淮南慢焦的BET比表面积，并由BJH模型计算得到了孔容积、平均孔径及孔径分布.结果表明，快速热解和慢速热解都可以使煤孔隙结构发达，加速孔的生成和发展，且热解温度越高，趋势越明显，但慢速热解对煤焦孔隙结构的影响更加显著.应用分形维数的概念，结合吸附/脱附曲线得到了煤焦的分形维数，结果表明快速热解和慢速热解都可以增加煤焦的分形维数.@以神府煤和攀枝花煤为对象进行煤微波辅助抽提研究，所用溶剂有甲醇、乙醇、丙酮、乙酸、四氢呋喃、乙二胺和DMF等.结果表明，前四种溶剂对攀枝花煤的抽提率较高，后三种溶剂对神府煤的抽提率较高，其中乙二胺对神府煤的抽提率可达70.76%.抽提残煤的元素分析、官能团测定及FT-IR分析表明，各残煤H/C和O/C比略有降低而N/C明显升高；含氧官能团含量较脱灰煤有所增加，总酸性基及羟基含量提高；另外，利用GC/MS检测脱灰神府煤四氢呋喃抽提物，正己烷可溶物含较多的脂肪烷烃，甲苯可溶物中则含各种芳香族化合物，四氢呋喃可溶物中只检测到一种含氧杂原子化合物.@为研究褐煤低温改质过程中气固两相间换热特性，以大型CFD数值模拟软件Fluent为平台，采用SIMPLE算法和Eulerian模型, 以锡林浩特10 mm小颗粒褐煤为例，对气固两相流动的传热传质特性进行了数值模拟.模拟结果与实际工况基本一致，气相流速对炉内各截面的温度分布影响较大，对研究发生炉内的换热特性具有一定的理论指导意义.@利用煤低温氧化实验系统，研究了在温度为293 K~673 K，空气流量为100 mL/min和程序升温速率为3 K/min的条件下，山西浑源烛煤发生热解时C1~C4低分子有机烃的临界解析温度Tm，解析速率ψ和解析表观活化能Ea.结果表明，CH4，C2H6，C2H4，C3H8，C3H6，i-C4H10和n-C4H10 7种有机烃的Tm为：473 K，521 K，433 K，526 K，498 K，503 K和529 K；lnψ与1/T之间满足直线关系，符合典型的Arrhenius S A动力学特征；其Ea为28.492 kJ/mol，13.506 kJ/mol，28.096 kJ/mol，41.786 kJ/mol，68.489 kJ/mol，76.763 kJ/mol和73.287 kJ/mol. 7种有机烃的Tm，ψ和Ea具有不同的变化特征，根据这些特征，可用来预测煤的富氧低温热解特征及其自燃倾向性.@建立了一个新的测定煤中砷含量的方法，其消解过程在自制聚四氟乙烯消解罐烘箱中完成.对煤样的消解条件（温度、时间及试剂等）、氢化发生的条件（硼氢化钾浓度、酸性介质的种类与浓度）及煤本体中其他元素的干扰进行了详实的考察，确定了最佳分析条件.用标准参考煤样（GBW11116）中砷含量对该方法进行了验证，本方法的测定值为33.30 μg/g，而标准参考值为(34±2) μg/g，结果十分一致.用本方法也测定了5种煤中砷含量，相对标准偏差均小于5%.此方法可靠，定量准确，经济性好，利于推广应用.@利用X-射线荧光分析仪、X-射线衍射仪、光学显微镜、扫描电子显微镜等手段研究了Texaco气化炉炉渣的化学组成、物相组成、岩相结构和显微结构；并利用气化炉渣为主要原料制备了墙体材料，采用碳热还原氮化法合成了sialon粉体，结果表明：1) Texaco煤气化炉炉渣主要化学成分为SiO2，Al2O3，CaO和残余碳，其中含有很高的玻璃相和不定形物质；2) 气化炉渣为多孔结构，残余碳多为海绵状多孔结构，不定形玻璃相较为致密；3) 当气化炉渣磨细粉添加量达到70%时经烧成可制得MU7.5以上墙体材料，烧成试样体积密度较低，可望保温隔热；4) 利用气化炉渣为主要原料，通过碳热还原氮化可合成主要成分为Ca-α-sialon和β-sialon的粉体.@为了实现煤炭的高效洁净转化，利用自行发明的电热还原煤气化炉，以煤和石英砂为原料制备大量富含CO的燃气，同时伴生高附加值的载能材料，研究了煤种和气化工艺对燃气的组成及酸碱性的影响，并用XRD和SEM对载能材料进行测试.结果表明，燃气中以CO气体为主，平均含量可达70%，CO+H2平均含量达85%，CO+H2+CH4平均含量达90%，使用无烟煤、烟煤焦炭或焙烧料法可提高燃气中CO气体的含量.载能材料是SiC，含量为98.45%，其中3C-SiC占4.12%，6H-SiC占89.81%，4H-SiC占4.42%，晶体的自形程度也比较高，多为厚板状结晶.@在多喷嘴对置式气化炉热模实验平台上，利用内窥式工业电视、高温热偶和质谱仪等，研究了酒精发酵废液煤浆的气化特性.结果表明，酒精废液煤浆所形成的撞击火焰结构稳定，气化效果良好，随着氧煤比的增加，气化温度与合成气有效成分均相应升高.由此证明将酒精发酵废液与煤混合制浆气化是解决发酵废液污染排放的有效途径.@在热天平装置中研究了生物质焦、煤焦以及生物质焦与煤焦混合物的水蒸气气化特性.采用程序升温热重法对生物质焦（稻秆焦、高粱秆焦和玉米秆焦）、神木煤焦以及生物质焦与煤焦混合物进行了水蒸气气化实验.结果表明，生物质焦和煤焦在一定温度下的气化速率为：高粱焦>稻秆焦>玉米焦>神木煤焦.并对三种生物质焦、煤焦、生物焦和煤焦混合物的水蒸气气化反应进行了动力学分析，分析认为，连续反应模型可以在一定程度上反应焦样的水蒸气气化反应动力学.@油煤浆的黏度变化是煤直接液化工艺设计的重要参数之一.实验配制油煤浆的溶剂为催化裂化(FCC)油浆（或回炼油）与循环溶剂的掺混体，与传统的循环溶剂差异较大.研究了常温常压条件下各因素对这类油煤浆黏度的影响规律，得到油煤浆浓度为45%和50%条件下FCC油浆（或回炼油）掺混体系满足液化输送的配制条件.分析了FCC油浆（或回炼油）的掺混比、油煤浆浓度、温度对油煤浆黏度的影响规律，结果表明，煤浆的黏度随溶剂黏度的增大而增大，随油煤浆浓度增大而升高.温度对浆体的黏度影响较大，黏度随温度升高而降低，通过对实验数据的数学回归，建立了一定温度范围内黏度随温度变化的定量关系式.@以丙酮、甲醛及亚硫酸钠为原料，采用磺化缩聚法通过控制缩合剂和磺化剂的用量，合成一系列具有不同分子量和不同磺化度的脂肪族磺酸盐水煤浆分散剂（SAF）.神华煤作为一种低阶煤，内在水分含量和氧含量过高，成浆性能较差.采用德国Haake流变仪测定SAF作为分散剂对低阶神华煤制浆的流变性能，结果表明，SAF的分子量和磺化度是影响其分散降黏作用的主要因素.SAF对水煤浆的分散降黏能力优于萘磺酸盐甲醛缩合物系分散剂，适宜的分子量（特性黏度为 7.03~10.87）和较高的磺化度（1.64 mmol/g）有利于提高SAF对水煤浆的分散降黏性能.采用Herschel-Bulkley模型对掺SAF的水煤浆浆体的流变曲线进行拟合，研究了SAF的分子量和磺化度对水煤浆流变性的影响.@离子液体作为一种新型溶剂，在煤化工领域尚未应用.以离子液体——[Emim]BF4作为煤溶胀的溶剂，在常压常温条件下，从溶胀时间、溶剂性质以及温度等因素来研究煤在离子液体中的溶胀性能.结果表明，煤样在离子液体中的溶胀度是随温度的升高和时间的延长呈现先增大后减小的趋势；溶胀度在反应温度为50 ℃和溶解8 h后达到最大；红外谱图显示经过离子液体处理后，煤样的分子结构发生改变.@采用煤镜质组反射率分布并结合常规煤质指标，对稳定和控制水钢焦炭质量进行了实验研究.对水钢的18个煤样进行了反射率及常规指标的检测、煤质分析与评价和炼焦实验；对水钢的生产方案及建议方案进行了40 kg焦炉炼焦实验，并对其进行了分析；使用煤镜质组反射率分布并结合常规煤质指标为水钢制定了三个优化配煤方案，焦炭质量提高，完全满足生产要求.研究结果表明，煤镜质组反射率分布图是指导炼焦配煤的有效手段，对稳定和控制焦炭的热性质效果十分明显，对炼焦配煤煤种多和有混煤情况尤其适用和有效.@通过对炼焦过程产生的多环芳烃(PAHs)和NOx浓度进行监测，得到PAHs和NOx的产生规律及其产生的相关性.结果显示，PAHs主要在煤的升温阶段产生，在结焦初期的1 h～3 h 产生的多环芳烃最多，整个炼焦过程中的产生量逐渐减少；随炼焦时间延长，NOx浓度先增大后减小，在最初的第4 h～第6 h出现峰值；在炼焦过程前期，PAHs和NOx的产生量呈负相关性，通过指数拟合，得到不同煤种和配煤情况下PAHs与NOx最大产生量的关系式.@选取6种典型炼焦煤用二氯甲烷作萃取剂经索氏提取和K-D浓缩，采用硅胶柱层析纯化，利用高效液相色谱法(HPLC)对其中含有的16种多环芳烃(PAHs) 进行测定，研究了不同煤种中PAHs的分布.结果表明，6种煤中PAHs主要以3环、4环和5环形式存在；此外还发现PAHs总量随煤化度提高而减少，随挥发分含量和氢碳摩尔比增大而增加；且PAHs含量与煤中碳含量和氧碳摩尔比也存在一定关系.@低浓度煤层气热值和浓度达不到工业利用的要求，工业利用时需要对其中的甲烷进行浓缩.由于煤层气含有氧，给浓缩工艺的安全性造成危害，因此在浓缩之前必须将氧除去.阐述了现行正在研究的几种除氧方法的特点，并采用管式炉实验装置对低浓度煤层气除氧进行了实验研究.结果发现，除氧温度小于700 ℃时，甲烷损失率小于10%，甲烷的裂解是造成甲烷损失的主要原因.通过焦炭燃烧法除氧，氧气浓度能够降至1%以下.@采用溶剂分离的方法对煤沥青进行组分分离，并通过TG，DTG以及DSC对煤沥青及α树脂、β树脂和γ树脂进行了分析.结果表明，煤沥青中重组分的热失重开始温度及最大失重速率温度较高，煤沥青与β树脂和γ树脂在400 ℃～500 ℃范围内均出现两个放热峰，α树脂在400 ℃～500 ℃范围内只有一个放热峰.@在小型固定床加氢装置上，用加氢精制催化剂和加氢裂化催化剂对陕北的中低温煤焦油进行加氢改质工艺研究.着重考察反应温度、反应压力、氢油体积比和液体体积空速对加氢效果的影响，得到了优化的工艺条件：反应压力14 MPa，反应温度390 ℃，氢油体积比1 600∶1，液体体积空速0.25 h-1.加氢改质产品切割得到汽油、柴油和尾油馏分，分别占产物质量的9.82%，73.12% 和16.43%.汽柴油馏分经过简单处理后可以得到合格的产品，加氢尾油可以作为优质的催化裂化或加氢裂化原料.@以太原某热电厂粉煤灰为原料，采用碱熔融法，考察了碱度、晶化温度和晶化时间对合成Na-X沸石的影响.结果表明，在粉煤灰/NaOH为1∶1.2（摩尔比），熔融温度550 ℃，NaOH浓度为3.75 mol/L（即加水40 mL），晶化温度90 ℃，晶化时间6 h的条件下合成纯度较高的Na-X沸石；粉煤灰通过碱熔融法合成的Na-X沸石质量明显优于传统水热法.@采用甲醛对煤沥青进行聚合改性，然后经热聚合工艺制备中间相炭微球（MCMB），并对MCMB的结构及性能进行了研究.采用偏光显微镜和XRD对MCMB的结构进行分析，采用SEM对所制备的MCMB形貌进行分析，采用TGA对MCMB的热行为进行分析.结果表明，所制备的MCMB收率达35.1%，其平均粒径约为10 μm，MCMB表面聚集了粒径小于0.5 μm的小球；粒径较小的MCMB在偏光显微镜下不呈现各向异性；MCMB的平均微晶层间距d002为0.342 0 nm，平均微晶高度Lc为3.42 nm，平均微晶大小La为2.38 nm；MCMB的5％（质量分数）热分解温度为618 ℃，整个过程的总失重率为15.12%.@为降低生物质气化气中焦油含量，在小型固定床反应器上，进行了生物质焦对焦油模型化合物甲苯的催化裂解反应的实验研究，考察了热解焦粒径、裂解温度、气相停留时间和反应气氛对甲苯裂解率的影响.结果表明，高温条件下，热解焦对甲苯的裂解具有明显的催化作用.950 ℃时，所用的两种热解焦对甲苯的转化率分别达到了98%以上，同时发现，较长的气相停留时间更有利于甲苯的裂解.水蒸气或CO2能与甲苯和碳发生反应，提高甲苯的转化率，延长焦的催化活性；另外，动力学计算得出，生物质焦对甲苯催化裂解的活化能约为73 kJ/mol.@
The quantitative effect of the four different property parameters of coal on the cluster analysis of coal category was investigated by grey relational principle in this paper. The results indicated that the relative order of effect of the four parameters from big to small at different weight was always sulfur content, volatile component, ash content and caloric value, respectively; and the verification test proved it to be right. Consequently, the detection accuracy and procession of sulfur content and volatile component of coal samples should be strictly controlled in experimental study and the cluster analysis of coal category.@The C and H conversion of coal during coal pressurized pyrolysis was investigated. It was found that the second pyrolysis of char and tar was enhanced with pressure increasing. At 1 000 ℃, with the increasing of pressure, the char production, and the nC/nH and the C quantity converted to char was increased, but the H quantity converted to char was firstly decreased and then showed no change with increasing pressure. At atmospheric and pressurized pyrolysis, with the increasing of temperature, the char production was decreased, and the nC/nH was increased, and the C quantity and H quantity converted to char was decreased. Comparing with atmospheric pyrolysis, the pressurized pyrolysis showed less decreasing ratio of char production, larger increasing ratio of nC/nH in the temperature range of 650 ℃800 ℃, and so more C was converted to char. It might be dued to the enhancing of second pyrolysis for pressurized pyrolysis. The variation of nC/nH with pressure showed that the ordering of crystalline structure was enhanced under pressure pyrolysis, which would influenced the char reactivity greatly.@The migration of sulfur and the  coal reductive pyrolysis was studied used a fixed-bed reactor. First, coal sample was holding in the quartz reactor undergoing the temperature program pyrolysis. The product was mixed with the purify air and burnt under the high temperature, then be absorpted by the acidic solution for the coulometric titration. Therefore a continuous release curve of sulfur in coal under the reductive pyrolysis was obtained. Experimental results show that the release proportion of sulfur in coal in the atmosphere of H2 was higher than that in the atmosphere of N2, the release proportion of sulfur were 71.9% and 32.8% respectively at the atmosphere of H2 and N2. Mainly reason for the difference each other is caused by: when the temperature is over 500 ℃, H2 can react with sulfur in coal (semi-coke), but the atmosphere of N2 can not further react with the sulfur in coal (semi-coke) at this temperature.@Aspen Plus software is used to simulate a Texaco gasifier of an IGCC demonstration project. By considering incomplete carbon conversion to improve simulation flowsheet and using CPD model to predict production of coal thermal decomposition, the effect of some important operation parameters such as coal concentration of water coal slurry, oxygen/coal ratio, pressure and temperature in coal gasifier on the gasification production has been studied. The results show that within the calculation range, the percentage of main components increases as the coal slurry concentration increases within high coal concentration. And main components tend to be a constant value when temperature is about 1 400 centigrade.@With oxygen and oxygen-steam as gasification medium, the model test of underground gasification of Dayan lignite were conducted. The studies were focused on the influence of oxygen blast and steam/oxygen ratio on the gas composition, gasification stability and rate. In the same time, the mass balance of oxygen-steam gasification process was conducted. The results show that the underground gasification of Dayan lignite has high stability form to use suitable parameters.@Based on process simulation, calculated and analyzed the energy consumption of two kinds of gasification technologies when they are used in synthetic ammonia industry, and indicated that choice and compare of gasification technologies should be in a specified application situation and proper compare scope. The calculated results show that when steam is excessive in reaction condition the oxygen-coal ratio is controlled by ash fusibility, or by carbon conversion ratio. GEGP technology consumes more coal and oxygen per unit hydrogen, and the more consumed coal and oxygen convert to steam in coal gas. More shift reaction occurs in GEGP gasifier and reduces the load of shift unit. GEGP technology consumes less energy per unit hydrogen relative to SCGP technology.@In order to examine the effect of different height of furnace side nozzle upon the distribution of flow field, particle concentration, the 3-D flow field in a new type CWS gasifier at cold state was analyzed using experimentation method, and contrasted this results with numerical simulation results. The optimization distribution was observed with the height 0.9 m far from the furnace top. Experimentation study results and numerical simulation results is very near, attest to the numerical simulation is exact, which can be seen as a guidance for designing and operating of this type gasifier.@Thermal extraction of some low rank coals was studied on thermal extraction device using coal derived liquids. The influences of temperature, residence time, solvent-coal ratio, solvent and coal rank on thermal extraction yield were studied. Furthermore, the deoxidization yield of coal in the process of thermal extraction was investigated as well. The results show that the thermal extraction yield of coal increased from 18.7%(daf) at 340 ℃ to 59.5%(daf) at 430 ℃. However, the maximal the solid extract yield 32.4%(daf) at 390 ℃ can be obtained . The optimal residence time and ratio of solvent to coal was 60 min and 5∶1 respectively. Using the coal liquefaction recycle solvent, higher coal thermal extraction yield was obtained. 23% oxygen content of Datang Shengli No.5 lignite was removed during the processing of thermal extraction at 390 ℃.@As a step of the implementation the coal conversion strategy of Shenhua Group Corporation in Xinjiang, direct liquefaction of the coal from Xinjiang Heishan district was carried out. The coal liquefaction tests were conducted in 0.5 L autoclave and 0.12 t/d continuous unit respectively. The test results show that Heishan coal can be easily liquefied and boasts such excellent performance as higher oil yield and lower gas yield while being made into coal slurry with a concentration as high as 50% (within the viscosity range ensuring good transportability) as well as enabling long-term stable running. The stable transportability of high concentration coal slurry can dramatically enhance the capacity of the reactors. @The diversification of hydroliquefaction production after reaction were analyzed by FTIR. The change of structure and component with different reaction temperature were surveyed by 1HNMR and GC-MS. We could concluded that the production component is varied by reaction temperature and hydroxybenzene is found in oil. The existence of hydroxybenzene in the hydroliquefaction production is proved by 1HNMR spectra which added D2O into the sample solution. All above is very meaningful to hydroliquefraction craft.@According to equilibrium principle of gas and liquid, equilibrium solubility of hydrogen in coal tar were measured using a high-pressure agitated autoclave over the temperature range from 323.2 K to 623.2 K and pressure range from 2 MPa to 10 MPa. The influence of temperature and pressures on equilibrium solubility of hydrogen in coal tar has been discussed. The changing current of hydrogen’s equilibrium solubility in different temperature and pressure are different in each coal tar. These data make up for the blank of the domestic data base about the field of coal tar oil, and  provide the foundation data for the industrialization design of coal-tar oil catalyze hydrogenation in slurry reactor.@Coke particles reinforced pitch-based carbon composites（CRPCCs） with high density and low cost were fabricated under atmospheric environment by an efficient mould pressing and semi-carbonization shaping technologies. And microstructures and fracture morphologies of the CRPCCs were observed under optical microscope and SEM. The results show that reinforcing carbon, matrix carbon and holes phase can be distinguished clearly under optical microscope and SEM according to raw material structures and fabrication processes of CRPCCs. And bonding carbon coats or wraps every reinforcing particle besides it fills the holes in the reinforcing particles; hence bonding carbon shapes a continuous network-like matrix in CRPCCs.@The thermal expansion of 8 different coke was measured between 30 ℃1 300 ℃ in N2. Based on coke’s own characteristics, the parameter and measurement of coke expansion are given. Based on parameter measured, this paper explores the relationship between the expansion of coke and CSR, CRI, coal. Through research the result shows: 1) the thermal expansion of coke can be divided into three stages and pointing out the shrinkage stage means micro-cracks generating. 2) The parameters of thermal expansion are increasing with the increasing of coke heat strength. 3) The relation between Lf and Vdaf is quadratic function. When Vdaf comes up to 30%, the Lf can get maximum. Lf is increasing with the increasing of Bond of coal, but which is affected by Vdaf.@One type of anthracite powder was dried, roasted and grinded after being dipped by transition metal Cu and Co sulfate solution with the purpose of the research of impact on combustion properties resulted by the different transition metal sulfate. The results got from ignition point detector and X-ray diffraction phase analysis,showed that the transition metal sulfate changed coal combustion process, speeded up the coal combustion rate, significantly reduced ignition point.@In order to make use of the oxygen-bearing coal mine methane (CMM) effectively, sulfide oxidation is introduced, and the impact of reaction temperature, flow velocity, catalyst and other factors on the deoxygenation process is investigated using TG technology and fixed-bed reator. The results show that oxygen content is obviously reduced by using Na2S as deoxygenation reagent under the temperature of 500 ℃. In the whole reaction process, molecular sieves, compared with other metal ion zeolite catalysts,have significant catalytic efficiency. The process of reaction is deeply influenced by external diffusion, and small flow velocity is propitious to improve the reaction rate of conversion, but it’s still a little low for Na2S.@The principle and measurement method for graphitization degree of carbon-carbon（C/C）composites by X-ray diffraction were investigated. The results show that there exist different graphitized components in C/C composite, and so the profiles of diffraction pattern are asymmetrical. Graphitization degree has more obvious differences among different methods of search peaks，and the common characterizes of the graphitization degree are only evaluated by the best graphitized component of all C/C components. Considering hard graphitized component, it is more suitable to fit profile of peaks. In addition, through multiple-peak separating, the separated peaks could be used to calculate graphitization degree directly. The integral intensity obtained from every single-peak could be calculated according to the relate content of every component, and it is very reasonable to investigate the true graphitization degree of C/C composite．@The effect of LaF3 introduction on properties of solid superacid SO2-4/ZrO2 was studied in this paper. The crystal transformation and morphology of solid superacid SO2-4/ZrO2 and SO2-4/ZrO2-LaF3 were investigated with polarized microscope and XRD when they were calcinated. It was found that there was some influence of LaF3 introduction on crystal transformation and morphology of solid superacid. The thermal stability of solid super acid was determined by using DSC and TG technique. The crystal transforming temperature of ZrO2 and decomposing temperature of SO2-4 increased sharply due to LaF3 introduction. The IR analysis showed that water in solid super acid containing LaF3 was easy to removed. The effect of LaF3 introduction on acid strength, SO2-4 concentration and naphthalene oligomerization were also investigated in this paper.@There are abundant coal-series kaolinite in our country, but these resources have not been utilized reasonably. For widening applied prospect of the coalseries kaolinite, effects of reactive conditions on phosphorus of the urban domestic sewage absorbed by coal-series kaolinite were inspected in this article by the orthogonal experiment, and effect order of all factors were determined: the dosages of the coal-series kaolinite, the stir velocity, the reactive time, the reactive temperature, pH, relative thickness of the domestic sewage, in the same time, the first-rank reactive conditions were obtained: the factors were respective 6 g/mL, 45 r/min, 120 min, 35 ℃, 4, and 0.50. Under these conditions, the contents of the phosphorus in the urban domestic sewage absorbed by coal-series kaolinite could be up to 76.80%.@Greenhouse effect mostly results from CO2 emission by coal combustion, so coal-based energy system is the main fields to realize near zero emissions. The international situation of coal-based energy systems with near zero emissions currently was analyzed, and concluded that there are three approaches to realize CO2 near zero emission of coal-based energy systems: exploit study of IGCC, including recovery and separation after combustion, disposal and recovery of synthesis gas before combustion, and coal-based poly-generation system for power and chemical products based on IGCC; coal-based energy system based on CO2 acceptor gasification and that on chemical-looping gasification.@Catalyst is the core of SCR de-NOx technology, to decrease the deactivation rate and prolong catalyst life has significant meanings on decreasing the operation cost of SCR system. This paper has described the phenomenon of catalyst deactivation, given all the influence factors of deactivation, specialized effects of alkaline metal, alkalineearth metal, As, P, Pb and HCl on SCR catalyst, and based on the effects, deactivation mechanism is discussed. The conclusions are that alkaline metal could decrease the quantity of Bronsted acid sites and change surface acidity of Bronsted active sites, alkaline-earth metal could block the pore structure of the catalyst, deactivation of arsenic is caused by accumulation of gaseous arsenic compounds, and phosphorus has obvious effects on catalyst active sites. Aimed at specific deactivation mechanisms, we can optimize catalyst performance to decrease the deactivation rate.@Onion-like fullerenes (OLFs) were prepared in radio frequency plasma (Ar atmosphere) from Huainan coal with ferrocene as catalyst precursor, and then modified by in-situ oxidation through the introduction of oxygen into Ar plasma. The morphologies and structures of the products were characterized by field emission scanning electron microscopy, high resolution transmission electron microscopy and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy. The results reveal that the OLFs formed in Ar plasma were oxidized when the content of oxygen in atmosphere was increased to a threshold value. OLFs(OH)n and OLFs(COOH)n were formed when the percent of volume of O2 was 3% or 4%, with more functional groups introduced when the percent of volume of O2 was 4%. The formation mechanisms of the modified products were also discussed.@A fixed-bed reactor has been used to study the effect of the hydrogen partial pressure on the removing of sulfur in char. The kinetic parameters were calculated used differential method and the results shows that the hydrogen partial pressure has the effect on the reaction of hydrogen and organic sulfur in coal char. Under the hydrogen partial pressure from 0.02 MPa to 0.1 MPa, the higher hydrogen partial pressure lead the faster reaction rate of hydrogen and organic sulfur in char. Calculation results also shows that under the different hydrogen partial pressures corresponded the different reaction order and the activation energy, so the experimental results indicate that the reaction of hydrogen and organic sulfur in char is a complex process, and the reaction is controlled by the diffusion of hydrogen from gas flow to particle surface of coalchar.@In the process of underground coal gasification, the pore structures of semi-coke are the impact of the important factors. In this paper, the specific surface area, pore volume and aperture of Dayan brown coal, Xiezhuang bituminous coal and Xiyang anthracite were determined, the author have summed up the various laws of the pore structures of semi-coke at various temperatures and in the reactive atmosphere. The results showed that the pore structures of semi-coke were influenced by the temperature and the atmosphere. Changed the end of the temperature and the atmosphere, the aperture had not changed distinctly.@Three technologies of removing acids and oxygenates from oil of Fischer Tropsch synthesis were developed. The advantages and disadvantages of these technologies were compared by Aspen Plus simulation software. The results show that the azeotropic distillation process is easier than extractive distillation process. Because of its milder process parameters, the equipment cost is lower. Compared with homogeneous azetropic distillation, the ratio of solvent to feed is lower, and the solvent can be recovered easily. But the recovery ratio of solvent for hete@It’s mainly analyzed that the material balance, heat balance calculation and energy consumption of the production process of semi-coke by SJ-low-temperature carbonization furnace. The results showed that, the theoretical semi-coke yield of SJ-low-heat oven is 63.926%, tar yield is 6.079%, gas yield is about 598 m3/t; with thermal efficiency of 88.90%, heat efficiency of 84.08%, and heat loss of furnace surface of 4.82%, and the energy consumption for process is between 13.38% and 17.92%. Compared the composition characteristics of the low metamorphic coals, it’s real a low energy consumption, high-yield, high value-added clean production process for the comprehensive utilization of this coal, which has great guiding significance to the sustainable development of the semicoke industry in Northern Shaanxi.@According to moderate hydrogenation Shenhua coal which is low rank and none caking ability can converse to product with high caking ability, what’s more, the oxygen in the raw coal was better removed, and the heat of the product was improved. Under the microscope, the mesophase small sphere could be seen, combine with the calculation of tar yield of the THF insoluble, it indicated that new active component which could converse to plastic mass was generated. The products were blended with coal and the result proved that it can be useful in the coking industry.@β-methylnaphthalene is an important chemically raw material which exists mainly in gas absorber oil distillation cut of coal tar. A new process of separating and pefining β-methylnaphthalene from gas absorber oil was investigated by birectification-crystallization and rectification-azeotropic distillation in the paper. The results show that it is very difficult to obtain acenaphthene with high purity from gas absorber oil only by rectification time after time or by birectification-crystallization, and yet acenaphthene with high purity can be obtained from gas absorber oil easily by means of the process of combining rectification with azeotropic distillation, and that the process has many characteristics such as simple process, higher purity, no pollution, recycle use of azeotrope former, lower cost and so on.@Used the heat-grade unite calculation of the pinch technology to analyse the dates of the two years' production heat supply of a factory with 175 000 t annual processing plant in tar distillation section, it was found that more than 0.289 6 GJ/t energy can be reused. According to the present situation, heat-pipe technology was advanced to recover the exhaust heat and low potential energy, the pinch technology to design the heat exchange network of the new project and stress on the installation of the heat preservation fixture, only the working procedures of distillation can produce the energy benefit of one million and onehundred thousand yuan annual.@Four different metamorphic degree Ningxia coals were selected for this study. The ash content of coal about 40% obtained with float-sink method and prepared chars in muffle furnace at 900 ℃, then acid-washed by HCl-HF. The effect of  included minerals on char combustion characteristics were analyzed by comparing burning curves and their characteristics indexes of the four chars and their demineralized chars. The result indicated that included minerals in the bituminous chars hampered ignition and accelerated burnout, but the included minerals in the anthracite chars accelerated ignition and hampered burnout.@The effect of calcium-based flux on the melting characteristics of coal ash from coal blends using the Liuqiao No.2 Coal Mine in Wanbei (AQ007) was investigated. The change of the compositions of mineral under various temperatures before and after adding magnesium-based flux into AQ007 was employed by XRD and FT-IR. Results shows that mullite formed under over 1 000 ℃ has an effect on increasing the melting point of coal-ash, and this is the major reason which leads to high melting point of AQ007 coal-ash. The coal ash fusion point will be decreased by adding magnesium-based flux. The low temperature eutectic mixtures such as monticellite, ringwoodite and pyrope are easily formed between magnesium and compounds under high temperature, which will remarkably decrease coal ash fusion point.@Shengli coal and the sawdust were selected as the experiment materials. The impacts of the ratio, the reaction temperature, the reaction time and the initial cool hydrogen pressure on the co-liquefaction were investigated in the batch autoclave with the addition of the hydrogen donor solvent and the catalyst. The results indicate that the best weight ratio of sawdust∶Shengli coal is 1∶9 according to the oil yield, and the conversion and oil yield of the co-liquefaction increase with the temperature, reaction time and hydrogen pressure.@Desulfurization of coal-gas at high temperature is the critical technology improving energy utilizing efficiency. Mn-Fe-Ca sorbents were prepared by mixing methods and effect of calcination temperature on texture, phase, reducibility of Mn-Fe-Ca sorbents was investigated by XRD, SEM and H2-TPR. The effect of calcination temperature on desulfurization performance of Mn-Fe-Ca sorbents were studied in fixed bed reactor. The experimental results show that H2S could be desulfured to 4×10-6 and sulfur content was 33.3% by the sorbents calcined at 1 050 ℃ which also had good mechanical intensity and desulfurization performance. The change of calcination temperature can effects the micro-structure and reactivity of the sorbents.@A kind of Ni-Zn-Fe based oxide desulfurizer of nano-properties was prepared by sol-gel self-combustion method, which has a higher reactivity at 300 ℃500 ℃. The activity of precursor powder at different calcination temperatures and the influence of kaolin and starch additional on the effective sulfur capacity of shaped desulfurizer were investigated. The results indicate that the precursor has a maximum sulfur capacity as the calcination temperature is 500 ℃. As kaolin addition amounts to 30%-40%, the effective sulfur capacity of shaped desulfurizer is the highest. 5% starch can function most effectively.@Mercury is contained in coal (about 0.1×10-6-0.15×10-6) and it is emitted to the atmosphere in the process of combustion and gasification. Mercury ( Hg ) is a major concern among hazardous heavy metals because of its high volatility and high toxicity, especially due to its neurological health impacts. A bituminous coal was processed at the Tianzhuang Coal Preparation Plant in He'nan Province. The objective of this study is to conduct detail studies that analyze the charateristic combustion of different products by TGA-DTG and the emission behavior of Hg by collecting and detecting the concentration of elementary mercury and the oxidized mercury at different range of temperature in smoke. The results indicateded that the fine raw coal, the fine middling coal and the fine cleaned coal have the similar rule of combustion and emission behavior of mercury. The content of elemental mercury is more than oxidized mercury in smoke. By physical separation method mercuric inorganic compound is enriched in middling coals.@In order to study on the ignition characteristic, combustibility and burnout characteristic of the biomass briquette, the combustion parameters was studied of the Jiaozuo anthracite, Shanxi bituminous, Shaanxi Shenmu bituminous, Pingdingshan bituminous and their briquettes by the thermo-gravimetric analysis, and it was found that the ash and volatility were main effects on combustions of the biomass briquettes and the biomass briquettes’ combustions characteristic.@Circulating fluidized bed combustion boiler is an efficient lowpollution combustion of the art equipment, wide range of applications. However, due to its wide applicability of coal, combustion stability characteristics of the widely used low quality coal combustion, and coal gangue, the fluoride emissions of sulfur dioxide pollution control and can not be ignored. 75 t/h and 200 t/h circulating fluidized bed combustion technology-fluoride: fluidized bed combustion temperature is very suitable for burning limestone burning sulfur-fluoride requirements in the circulating fluidized bed combustion boiler add limestone can significantly reduce the export of boiler smoke emission of sulfur dioxide and fluoride concentrations and emissions at the same time with fluoride and sulfur dioxide away from the limitations of the role, with significant economic, environmental and social benefits.@Activated carbons were prepared by KOH activation combined with steam activation from Shenfu 3# coal. Coupling-activation mechanism was also discussed. Effects of ratio of KOH to the coal, heat treatment temperature, total activation time on activated carbons perfor-mance were studied. The results indicated that iodine number, methylene blue adsorption value, BET surface area and total pore volume of the activated carbon prepared at 700 ℃ for 60 min, with addition of KOH which ratio to the coal is 0.5, are 837 mg/g, 409 mg/g, 943 m2/g and 0.31 cm3/g respectively. Also, a large amount of hydrogen about 58 mmol for each gram of coal is released during the activation, up to more than 60% of total gaseous products.@Several briquettes were prepared using fine anthracite and binder with cold briquetting process. The physical properties of anthracites such as micro hardness, hardgrove grindability index, true relative density, apparent relative density, porosity, moisture holding capacity and pore structure and so on have been analyzed. The effects of physical properties of anthracites on compressive strength of briquette have also been researched. The results show that hardgrove grindability index decreases, compressive strength of briquette increases with increasing reflectance of coal maceral, microhardness, true relative density and apparent relative density of anthracite. The physical properties of anthracites reflect coal rank. Therefore, compressive strength of briquette relatives well also with coal rank. The results also show that pore volume distribution of anthracites with different ranks and moisture holding capacity are different from each other, which effects the caking degree between anthracite and binder, thus effects the compressive strength of briquette. The results above will have great significance on developing differrent briquettes using anthracites, improving quality of briquettes and selecting briquette binders.@Sample of Shandong Yanzhou Coal Mining Group North places by heat treatment was for a pilot study. Using vibrating sample magnetometer VSM, the magnetic susceptibility of micro-pulverized coal was measured at different heating temperature conditions. Through trial and after grinding heat treatment of 100 mesh of the following micro-pulverized coal than for susceptibility determination, as well as coal quality analysis, it was found that the pilot heating temperature and heating coal on the environment than a certain magnetic susceptibility, micro-pulverized coal heat treatment after the coal quality change its magnetic effects are more significant. The result would provide the basis of studying the dry magnetic separation which will be used in desulfurization from fine coal.@The paper studies the process of preparation of 4A-molecular sieve with sulfate residue as raw material from fly ash extraction of aluminum, using solid-phase synthesis method to compose 4A-molecular sieve. The paper also studies the better corresponding conditions of preparation and performance is fly ash acid residue∶aluminum hydroxide∶sodium hydroxide=10∶4∶15; baking temperature is 800 ℃-860 ℃, baking time 2 h-3 h; gel formation temperature is 55 ℃, time 2 h; crystallization temperature is 90 ℃-95 ℃, time 4 h to 6 h. The products structural characterization tested by XRD, SEM, IR and so on. Comparison with standard 4A-molecular sieve, the results showed that the synthetic product is the 4Azeolite.@The study that porous glass beads were synthesized using the gangue was used as raw in this experiment to study the process that the zeolite-based adsorbent with high crystallinity and purity was synthesized by self-transformation of gangue in vapor phase of ethylamine and water at a range of 368 K-400 K and the preliminary study on its adsorption feature was made. The adsorption properties of the zeolite-based adsorbent were characterized by adsorption isotherm, specific surface area and pore distribution with the help of N2 adsorption. The zeolite-based adsorbent was investigated with XRD and small-opening consideration and so on. And the adsorption isotherm of whom to phenol was obtained. Results indicated that the zeolitebased adsorbent synthesized from the transformation process was gray and had better adsorption. The paper pointed out that the proper adsorbing temperature and larger specific surface area were effective means to increase the adsorption of the zeolite-based adsorbent.@Polyacrylonitrile(PAN) nanospheres latex with an average diameter size between 230 nm and 250 nm was synthesized by dispersion polymerization. After freeze drying, the PAN particles were stabilized in air at 250 ℃ and then carbonized in nitrogen at 1 000 ℃. Scanning electron microscopy study showed that all PAN nanospheres were carbonized to carbon nanospheres with the diameter range of 170 nm190 nm. The carbon nanospheres were also treated at 1 500 ℃, 2 300 ℃ and 2 800 ℃ respectively. X-ray diffraction study showed that above 2 300 ℃ the graphitization degree of the samples appeared a distinct increase.@Thermoplascity is an important index to evaluate the caking properties of coal. In recent years, the effect of heating rate on coal fusibility to higher temperature was studied using several evaluation method, such as dynamic viscoelasticity, needle penetrometry and high temperature in-situ NMR imaging. It was found that the thermoplascity of coals was enhanced when the coals are rapidly preheated to 330 ℃-380 ℃. By the studies such as solvent extraction, it was speculated that aggreagated structure of coal can been weakened by rapid preheating and produce more low molecular weight substances when the slow heating rate was applied through the following thermoplastic stages.@The pyrolysis characteristics of Pingshuo coal and Shendong coal were studied in detail from the relativity of heating rate and coal particle size and kinetics aspects by means of TG-DTG and FTIR technique. The results show with heating rate increasing the reaction characteristic temperature of coal pyrolysis, such as the initiative, terminative and maximum rate temperature increase gradually, and yet, the final weight loss percent does not indicate definite rule. The change trend of characteristic temperature is more obvious for the coal samples with small particle size than that for big particle size samples, but the biggest weight loss rate has nearly nothing to do with the sample sizes. As pyrolysis rate increase the activation energy and frequency factor increase firstly and then decrease.@The CO2 gasification reactivity of Yima coal char were investigated by an isothermal thermo-gravimetric analysis at ambient pressure and at temperatures from 1 000 ℃ to 1 400 ℃. The results showed that general gasification reactivity and reaction of chars increased with gasification temperature, but some different phenomenon appeared near coal ash fusion point. When conversion was 50%, the average apparent activation energies of chars respectively were 224.03 kJ/mol and 31.47 kJ/mol at 1 000 ℃-1 100 ℃ and 1 100 ℃-1 300 ℃.@The gasification of biomass coke, char and the mixture of biomass and coal in a thermogravimetric apparatus(TGA) was investigated．The results show that under the same conditions, the reactivity of sawdust char was significantly higher than that of lignite char. And the reactive of two char increased with the conversion rate, and the temperature also affect the gasification activity heavily. At the same time, the study also found that when the temperature is higher than 1 173 K, the mixture of semi-coke gasification reactivity is worse than that of single-component semi-coke.@Non-premixed combustion of coke oven gas under low oxygen condition was investigated through computational fluid dynamic (CFD) simulation coupled with radiation heat transfer. Temperature profile and product distribution in reactor were obtained from simulation. Calculated temperature profile indicates that oxygen react strongly with coke oven gas in region near the oxygen nozzle and the temperature in this region increase sharply. Noticeable influence of reactor wall temperature on product distribution could be found in simulation results. Higher selectivity of syngas could be archived at higher reactor wall temperature, while conversion rate of methane in coke oven gas was suppressed simultaneously. So reactor wall temperature should be treated as a key parameter and optimized well in this process.@The temperature field ,concentration field and equilibrium gas composition in reactor which is used to produce syngas by the method of non-catelytic partial oxidation for COG were simulated by the software Fluent. The results show that the oxygen to COG mass ratio is a key factor to deciding the gasification temperature and syngas composition at the export. By the increasing of the ratio, the gasification temperature improves also. When the ratio is 0.14, the content of effective gas (H2+CO) reaches to the maximum, the CH4 in COG almost transformed completely. The temperature in the reactor reaches to the maximum 3 000 K when it is 0.05 m from the nozzle of the reactor, the contents of H2, CO and CO2 become to be balanced while the distance increased to 0.1 m, and CH4 decreased to the minimum.@The gasifier is one of the most important equipments in IGCC system, and it closely related with the others, so the study of the gasifier characteristics is based on the whole IGCC system. The system model of 200 MW IGCC demonstration project was established using Thermoflex software firstly, from the view of the system, the IGCC systems with different gasification parameters (coalwater slurry concentration, gasification pressure, O/C ratio and the carbon conversion) were calculated, the effects on the gasification result were analyzed. It shows that the coal-water slurry concentration and the O/C ratio have great effect on the gasification result.@This work has investigated the gas (including CO, H2, CO2, N2, CH4 and C2H6)-heavy alkane （C20，C28 and C36）systems in the condition of Fischer-Tropsch synthesis. Peng-Robinson (PR) equation of state (EOS) and perturbed-chain SAFT (PC-SAFT) EOS are used to calculate the vapor-liquid data with van der Walls one-fluid mixing rule. The results show that the total absolute average deviations are 1.39% and 1.98% with one optimized interaction parameter, 25.18% and 16.19% with no interaction parameter for PC-SAFT and PR EOS respectively. Moreover, the temperature and carbon number (CN) of solvent effect on the interaction parameter has been studied for the considered systems. With the temperature and CN increasing, the interaction parameters of PC-SAFT EOS increase mildly and these of PR EOS decrease distinctly. Therefore, PC-SAFT EOS with one interaction parameter is more accurate and predictive in estimating the vapor-liquid equilibrium of gas-heavy alkane systems.@In order to meet the needs of the rapid industrialization of direct coal liquefaction project, the calculation method for molecular weights of direct coal liquefaction oil narrow boiling range fractions were studied based on the comparison of a great deal of experimental solvent samples and their molecular weights. In comparison with the results of freezing point depress method, the precision for calculating the molecular weights of coal liquefaction oil by NE-DOL method was investigated. For Shenhua oil, average error is -1.7 between results of NEDOL method and freezing point depress method. For Shengli oil, average error is -1.3. For Neimeng oil, average error is -3. For Heishan oil, average error is -2.7. The calculation results by NEDOL method are close to that of freezing point depress method. NEDOL method can be used to calculate molecular weights of direct coal liquefaction oil narrow boiling range fractions.@The slurrying experiments are done with 21 different metamorphose coals. The influence of coal’s physical chemistry property to its slurrying quality is analysed. The results show that all the CWS samples have high particle accumulation efficiency. The CWS’ apparent viscosity differ sharply from each other at 11.71 s-1. The Bulianta coal’s CWS has the highest apparent viscosity, which is 4 235 mPa·s. The slurrying concentration is high when the coal’s HGI is high. The slurrying concentration is low when the coal’s Mad is high. The CWS have good stability, all samples’ stability is over 60 d, and half of the samples’ stability is over 90 d.@Ionic liquid is a new kind of solvent, but it has not been applied to coal chemical industry. Ionic liquid was firstly used as coal-direct liquefaction solvent in this paper. Viscosity of Shenhua coal slurry and Shengli coal slurry was measured at atmospheric pressure. The results show that viscosity is lower with more solvent and temperature has an influence to it. When temperature increases, viscosity of coal slurry declined. Because of swelling viscosity has a special situation between 50 ℃ and 65 ℃.@The forms of organic oxygen in Shengli lignite are studied by XPS. Three kinds of oxygen functional groups are classified in the method: single-bond, carbonyl group and carboxyl group. The absolute content of different oxygen functional groups is obtained by XPS combined with ultimate analysis and compared with chemistry analysis. The elimination limit of CO and CO2 has been calculated during coal liquefaction prereaction. The elimination of oxygen functional group in Shengli lignite during preliquefaction is studied in 0.5 L shaking-style autoclave at the temperature range of 330 ℃, 360 ℃, 400 ℃ and 430 ℃. Deoxidization effect at the presence of three kinds of catalysts including MnO2, Fe2O3 and MoO3 is observed and compared with that of non-catalyst. The results show that higher oxygen elimination is obtained at H2 pressure 1 MPa, temperature range 360 ℃-400 ℃，non-catalysts.@Clean fuel was prepared from the middle/low-temperature coal tar via hydro-catalysis route on a 30 mL hydrogenation reactor under the effect of series of catalysts. The pressure and temperature as well as H2/oil ratio were set as 8 MPa-15 MPa, 400 ℃-460 ℃, 1 800-2 000 respectively during the reaction. All of the coal tar was converted and the volume receive of clean oil product was higher than 106%. And then the product oil was separated as gasoline and diesel with the ratio as 22.75% and 77.25% respectively (the ratio is changeable with the different raw coal tar). There was no residual oil left during the hydrogenation process. The obtained gasoline and diesel was up to the grade of national standard. In addition, the analysis result of the sulfur content was greatly decreased compared to the raw material during the conversion process which could be used as clean fuel.@In this paper a series of mesophase carbon microbead(MCMB) were prepared from a coal tar pitch without quinoline insoluble at different temperature by varying the holding time. The needle coke was prepared from a coal tar pitch without quinoline insoluble under magnetic field. By analyzing morphologies of MCMB and needle coke with scanning electron microscope, the effect of mesophase formation factors on structure of needle coke were discussed.The results showed that the structure and properties of needle coke were determined by the temperature holding time as well as viscosity of forming mesophase. The magnetic field has a promoting effect for streamlined structure of needle coke.@Non-isothermal combustion experiments of two types of pulverized coal with three different particle size were conducted by synthesized thermogravimetry analyzer in different oxygen concentration. The changes of combustion characteristic parameters of pulverized coals in different atmospheres are analyzed and the kinetic parameters of every condition are calculated. The results show that DTG curves of coal combustion move to low temperature zones when O2 concentration increases. It indicates that both ignition and burnout temperature are lower, burnout time decreases, combustion characteristic index obviously increases, and combustion performance of pulverized coals are improved,especially for the larger particle size of pulverized coal. Activation energy, frequency factor and reaction order of low-temperature stage are lower than that of high-temperature stage. Kinetic compensation relationship exists between combustion activation energy and frequency factor in different atmospheres.@According to the force operating on a charged particle, built a mathematical model for the particle’s trajectory in the line-cylinder charging apparatus. The model involves in particle charging equation, electric field and charge conservation equation, gas conservation equations of mass and momentum, particle mass and momentum equation. Loading electrostatic field force into the model by the compiled UDF (user-defined function) and using the discrete phase model of the FLUENT software for simulation, shows the trajectory regularity about a charging particle of pulverized coal on different pole positive voltage, mean sieving particle size and jet flow velocity, and summaries some regular conclusions.@In order to decreasing the pulverized coal thermal power plant NOx emission damage to human and environment, low NOx pulverized coal combustors are utilized widely. But if the low NOx pulverized coal combustors are operated incorrectly, the fly ash carbon will increase significantly. In the paper, the screen separation and loss of ignition are used to study the fly ash carbon distribution, mercury intrusion and X-ray diffraction are used to study the fly ash carbon inactivation, so as to analysis the reasons of the very high fly ash carbon in dual channel low NOx pulverized coal combustors. It is showed that the dual channel low NOx pulverized coal combustor fly ash carbon distribution has two pinks and the big particle size fly ash carbon inactivation is more significant than that of the small. The author believed that incomplete combustion due to short residence time in combustion zone of small pulverized coal particle and the inactivation due to long residence time in anaerobic and high temperature zone of big pulverized coal particle lead to the increasing of fly ash carbon in some dual channel low NOx pulverized coal combustors.@Sulfur and mercury content in coal fields from some regions in China were analyzed. In addition, occurrence mode and the distribution of sulfur and mercury in coal were discussed, most likely occurrences modes of Hg in high-sulfur and high-Hg coals are in solid solution in pyrite. It is concluded that most Hg values in coal samples range from 100 ng/g to 450 ng/g, averaging 220 ng/g. Mathematical model about relation both total sulfur and mercury was gained by mathematical statistical method, the result showed that they had better dependency correlation in all coal samples at a 95% confidence.@Beisu coal was pyrolyzed in a pyrolysis device, which was studied the desulfurization effect of magnetic separation under different pyrolysis temperatures at 400 ℃-700 ℃. The nitrogen flow was 0.1 L/min and the holding time was 30 min.Compared with the traditional pyrolysis devices, it has many advantages, such as large capacity, easy operation and can combine with the magnetic separation experiments. The experiment results showed that appropriately increasement of pyrolysis temperatures were favorable for the magnetic desulfurization rate and especially pyrite sulfur was reduced well at 500 ℃, compared untreated sample to raise nearly 40%. According to XRD analysis of the raw coal, 500 ℃ semi-coke, the refined coal and the tailing coal after semi-coke magnetic separation respectively, it can find strong magnetic mineral pyrrhotite(Fe1-xS) in semi-coke, and no pyrite in refined coal. It demonstrates that pyrolysis-magnetic separation can remove the inorganic sulfur in coal. According to Chinese standards(GB/T215-2003), it found that organic sulfur existed considerably in the form of thiophene, so it is diffcult to improve Beisu coal magnetic desulfurization rate by low-temperature pyrolysis.@The reduction of NO by CO in the presence of oxygen in gas mixture and the dependence from reacting condition have been investigated on Co-TPP supported on nanometer titania catalysts. The results show that this catalyst yielded 85% NO conversion at 100 ℃ when the volume fraction of feeding gas is NO 500 mg/m3, CO 5 000 mg/m3, O2 4%, space velocity 10 000 h-1. In addition, only SO2 has little effect on NO reduction. At the same time, the competed adsorption of H2O reduced the NO conversion slowly, but the catalyst can be recycled after H2O desorption. In the presence of both SO2 and H2O, the catalyst was poisoned slowly but can be recycled after vacuum heat treatment. Mechanism of the reduction was also investigated, NO2 is  more easily to reduce than NO, both N2O and N2 were the products of NO reduction, and N2 occupied a higher proportion with increasing temperature. N2 is the dominant product of NO2 reduction. The Co-TPP /TiO2 catalyst can be used for NO reduction with CO in the absence of either SO2 or H2O.@Natural coke from Yongcheng was activated by KOH to prepare high-performance activated carbons as electrodes for electric double-layer capacitors (EDLCs). Specific surface area and pore structure of activated carbons was investigated and their EDLC properties were measured in 3 M KOH aqueous solution and 1 M (C2H5)4NBF4/propylene carbonate (PC) solution. The asprepared activated carbons exhibit large surface areas (2 441 m2/g), high capacitances (252 F/g in 3 M KOH aqueous electrolyte,163 F/g in 1 M (C2H5)4NBF4/ PC electrolyte) and low AC impedance.@This article discusses in detail the synthetical method, and synthetical kinetic model of fly ash-based adsorbent with fly ash in Jixi, and then it analyzes crystallization degree of production within the different time. This paper uses the undetermined coefficient method to determine velocity constant of each equation and merge the kinetic equations. Finally, the kinetic model of fly ash-based adsorbent with fly ash was obtained. Then using the model equation to merge testing crystallization curve, conclusions can be drawed that the crystallization reaction of fly ash-based adsorbent will happen in the later gel formation. Furthermore, the dissolve velocity of gel is either quick or slow, which decides the crystal growing rate and the crystallization degree within the limited time. From the whole testing data, it can consist with model curve fairly good, and it shows that the model can describe preferably the growth law of actual crystal.@In this paper, the adsorption and temperature-programmed desorption behaviors of aniline and benzene (as model compounds) on activated carbon (AC) and a copper oxide doped activated carbon (CuO/AC) were investigated. Results show that aniline desorption amount from CuO/AC is significantly lower than that from AC, and initial desorption temperature of aniline from CuO/AC is higher than that from AC. CuO addition changes adsorption state of aniline, which can make adsorption interaction between aniline and catalysts be stronger. CuO has no significant effect on desorption behavior of benzene, which shows state of benzene does not change.@Six kinds of non or low-coking coals were rapidly preheated from room temperature to about 380 ℃ using KFM-A rapid preheator at atmosphere. It was found that the coking index of coals increased markedly by the rapid preheating. Solvent extraction experiment showed that CS2 and CS2-NMP extraction yield of coals was enhanced by rapid preheating and was relative with the coking index clearly. It can be speculated that cohesion structure of coal is relaxed by rapid preheating and the kinetic property of coal molecule increases and so produce more low molecular weight substances when the slow heating rate was applied through the following thermoplastic stages.@Before and after being extracted by methanol, the micro-pore structure of block Dayan lignite of China was investigated using mercury intrusion porosimetry (MIP) and nitrogen gas adsorption method. The results show that the porosity goes from 16.4% up to 18.53%. In the micropore diameter range from 3 nm to 80 nm, the specific surface area and pore volume increased by 2.6 folds and 2 folds. But the methanol extraction could not change the micropore distribution obviously. The enlargement of the specific surface area and the pore volume of coal was mainly due to the increase of pore number in different pore size range. The radius of Dayan lignite colloid structure unit was calculated to 8.9 nm according to the most probability of pore radius. Due to the coal seam permeability and the specific surface area were enhanced by using methanol, then the reaction activity and efficiency of underground coal gasification were increased.@The effect of pyrolysis condition on pore structure of Huainan coal was investigated by N2 adsorption principle at 77 K. Specific surfaces of Huainan coal and char were mea-sured by BET model. Total pore volume, average pore size and pore size distribution were also obtained by BJH model. The results show that rapid pyrolysis and slow pyrolysis both can increase the specific area and pore volume and the tendency is more notable with the increase of the pyrolysis temperature. The effect of slow pyrolysis on pore development is stronger than rapid pyrolysis. Fractal theory was applied to describe the surface and pore structure of samples and the fractal dimensions were obtained by FHH equation. Results show that the rapid pyrolysis and slow pyrolysis both can increase the fractal dimension of coal.@The microwave-assisted extraction of Shenfu coal and Panzhihua coal have been discussed, using the following solvents: methanol, ethanol, acetone, acetic acid, THF, ethylene diamine and DMF. The experiment results showed that the extraction yield of Panzhihua coal using former four solvents were higher, and Shenfu coal’s using later three solvents were higher, extraction yield of ethylene diamine was 70.76%. Dry ash-free basis coal and its residues were examined with ultimate analysis, functional group, and FTIR, which indicated that H/C and O/C ratio of residues had a little decrease, and N/C ratio significantly increased. Compared to the deashed coal, oxygen-containing functional groups content of residues increased, total acidity and hydroxyl content enhanced. THF extracts of Shenfu coal were analyzed with GC/MS: hexane contained more alkanes, and more aromatic compounds in toluene, while only one oxygen-containing heteroatomic compound in THF.@To study heat exchange characteristic of lignite during upgrading process with low temperature, using the software of CFD based on Fluent platform, with SIMPLE algorithm and Eulerian model, taking Xilinhaote lignite particles of 10 mm as example, with the numeric analogue of computer, proceeded numeric research of G-S two phases heat exchange characteristic. The results of numerical simulation are almost corresponding with the operating mode, velocity of G-phases is the main factor effecting distribution of section temperature inside furnace body, providing theoretical guide for studying heat exchange characteristic in producer.@It will provide a theoretical suggestion for preventing the coal spontaneous combustion to investigate the low temperature pyrolysis characteristics of coal in O2-enriched conditions. The gas release critical temperatures Tm, the gas release rates ψ and the gas release apparent activation energies Ea of seven C1~C4 low-weight molecular hydrocarbons for Shanxi Hun-yuan cannel coal under the temperature range of 293 K~673 K and the air-supply flow rate of 100 mL/min were investigated by using a coal self-heating experimental facility. The results show that the gas release critical temperatures Tm for CH4，C2H6，C2H4，C3H8，C3H6，i-C4H10 and n-C4H10 were 473 K，491 K，423 K，513 K，490 K，503 K and 523 K respectively. The logarithmic release rates of hydrocarbons (lnψ) were linearly correlated with the reciprocal of absolute temperature (1/T), which were consistent with typical Arrhenius S A kinetic characteristics. The apparent activation energies were 28.492 kJ/mol，13.506 kJ/mol，28.096 kJ/mol，41.786 kJ/mol，68.489 kJ/mol，76.763 kJ/mol and 73.287 kJ/mol respectively. Tm，ψ and Ea for seven gaseous hydrocarbons demonstrated different characteristics, which will be useful for predicting the low temperature pyrolysis characteristics of coal in O2-enriched conditions and the property to coal spontaneous combustion.@A method for the determination of arsenic (As) in coal by the process of digestion and HG(hydride generation)-AFS (atomic fluorescence spectrometry) was presented in this paper. A home-made sealed Teflon container and an oven were used in the digestion process. The effects of the digestion conditions, including the digesting temperature, time and digesting agent, were discussed. The effects of hydrogenation conditions and interferences of other elements in coals, including the concentration of KBH4 and acid used, were also investigated. Optimum analysis conditions were ascertained. The method was validated by analysis of As content in standard reference coal (GBW11116) with satisfactory result and was successfully applied to the determination of As content in five coals with RSD<5%. The method is simple and precise and may be popularized.@X-ray fluorescence spectrometry(XRF), X-ray powder diffractometry(XRD), optical microscope(OM),scanning electron microscopy(SEM)were used to investigated the chemical composition, phase constituents, petrographical structure and microstructure of gasification slag from Texaco gasifier. Building materials were fabricated using gasification slag as main raw materials. Sialon powders were synthesized by carbothermal reduction nitrodation of gasification slag. The results showed that: 1) The main chemical constituents of gasification slag are SiO2, Al2O3, CaO and residual carbon. The main phase are vitreous glass and amorphous carbon, minor phase are quartz and calcite; 2) Gasification slag is porous. Residual carbon is sponge-like structure and vi-treous glass is dense; 3) Building materials above MU7.5 can be manufactured when 70% gasification slag fine is added. The sample fired which has lower volume density has characteristic of thermalresistance; 4) Sialon powders with Ca-α-sialon and β-sialon as main crystalline phases can be synthesized by carbothermal reduction method using gasification slag as raw materials.@Self-inventing multi-heat silicon carbide furnace is used in order to convert coal high-efficiently and cleanly, in which much fuel gas rich in CO is produced by using raw materials of coal and quartz. Meanwhile, high added value material is being produced. We not only study the influence of coal and gasification technology on gas products, but also test energy carrier material through XRD and SEM. The results show that fuel gas is mainly composed of carbon monoxide(CO), the average content of CO reaches up to 70%, the average content of the CO+H2 and CO+H2+CH4 reach to 85% and 90% respectively. We can improve the content of CO by using anthracite, coke or roasting method. The energy carrier material SiC (content of 98.45%) is obtained, among which the yields of 3C-SiC, 6H-SiC, 4H-SiC are 4.12%, 89.81% and 4.42% respectively. The crystal has a relatively high euhedral degree, most of which is thickly platelike crystal.@On hot-model experimental platform of opposed multi-burner gasifier, gasification characteristics of coal alcohol fermentation wastewater slurries were studied by using endoscopic industrial TV, high temperature thermocouples, mass spectrograph. The results showed that the impinging flames generated by the coal wastewater slurries were stable and the gasification efficiency was well; the gasification temperature and available gas component increased correspondingly with increasing the ratio of oxygen to coal. Therefore, it has been proven that cogasification of fermentation wastewater and coal is an effective method to solve the wastewater pollution.@Steam gasification characteristic of biomass char, coal char and the mixture of them was investigated in a thermogravimetric apparatus (TG). The results showed that the various chars behave various reaction rate as follows: Shenmu coal char < cornstalk haulm char < rice haulm char < broomcorn haulm char. The steam gasification reaction kinetics analysis of them showed that the homogeneous model reflected the char gasification kinetics with steam to some extent.@Viscosity of coal oil mixture(COM) is one of an important technological parameters during coal direct liquefaction. In this paper，FCC slurry(recycle oil) and recycle solvent mixture different from traditional recycle solvent were chosen for COM preparation. Some influencing factors for viscosity change of COM were studied at normal temperature and atmosphere, which includes the ratio of FCC slurry(recycle oil) to recycle solvent，COM concentration and temperature. Suitable transportation conditions for FCC slurry(recycle oil) mixing systems during liquefaction were achieved under the COM concentration of 45% and 50% respectively. The results show that viscosity of COM increases with solvent viscosity and the COM concentration increasing. Apparent viscosity decreases with temperature increasing，and the relation equation of viscosity-temperature was established by analysis and regression of experimental data.@A water-soluble aliphatic polymer, sulphonated acetone-formaldehyde resin (SAF) was synthesized by sulfonation and polycondensation reaction. SAF with different molecular and different degree of sulfonation were developed as dispersant for the preparation of highly-loaded coal-water slurry (CWS), which were obtained by controlling the quantity of condensating agent and sulfonating agent. Shenhua coal is a kind of low rank coal, the internal water content and oxygen content is too high, which makes it hard to make coal water slurry. The Haake rheometer was used to measure the rheological property and viscosity of CWS prepared from Shenhua coal. The results show that the molecular weight and the degree of sulfonation of SAF were found to be the key factors affecting its capability for reducing the viscosity of CWS. Comparing with other dispersants of CWS, SAF has much better dispersing effect than nathphalene sulfonate formaldehyde condensate. The suitable molecular weight (inherent viscosity is 7.03-10.87) and the higher degree of sulfonation (1.64 mmol/g) are more effective for reducing the viscosity of CWS, and the shear-stress/shear rate data for each CWS prepared with SAF were fit to three-parameter HerschelBulkley model. Based on the results, the SAF with medium molecular and higher degree of sulfonation is an effective and promising dispersant for highly-loaded CWS.@Ionic liquid is a new kind of solvent, but it has never been applied to coal chemical industry. Ionic liquid was firstly used as coal-direct liquefaction solvent in this paper. The swelling function was studied at ambient pressure and normal temperature. Effects of solvent, confecing time and temperature were discussed. It is found that swelling capacity is the most strong at 50 ℃ and 8 h later, but the swelling capacity along with elevatory temperature and time appeared to firstly increase and subsequently reduced. And the results indicated that molecular structure of coal sample had changed through FTIR analysis.@For stabilization and control of coke quality of Shuicheng steel the research by application of reflectance distribution of coal vitrinite and traditional coal property parameters has been done. The reflectance determination of coal vitrinite, analysis and evaluation of coal properties and coking test for eighteen coal samples have been carried out. The production coal blend in use and recommended coal blends at Shuicheng steel have been evaluated basesd on the test results obtained from coking tests on 40 kg test coke oven. By application of reflectance distribution of coal vitrinate and traditional coal property parameters three optimum coal blends have been put forward. The coke quality is improved and satisfied with demands of production. The research shows that using the reflectance distribution diagram of coal vitrinite is an efficient means of guiding coal blending and especially effective in controlling and stabilizing coke property at high temperature. It is convenient to guide coal blending by using reflectance distribution diagram of coal vitrinite when charged coal is blended by many kind of coals and/or mixed coals.@The generation chatacteristic and the relativity of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons(PAHs) and nitrogen oxide(NOx) were obtained by monitoring their generation in coking. The results show that the amount of PAHs mainly generated at the stage of coal temperature increasing is the maximum at the beginning 1 h-3 h of coking and is gradually reduced in the whole coking process. With the time prolonging the amount of NOx generated which peak value occurred at the stage from the fourth h to the sixth h is increased firstly and then reduced. The amounts of PAHs and NOx generated at the beginning stage have a negtive correlation and the relation of maximum amounts between PAHs and NOx for different coals and different blended coals was obtained by fitting an exponential curve.@The distribution characteristics of 16 polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons(PAHs) in 6 typical coking coals were investigated. The coal samples were extracted by the Soxhlet extractor with methylene chloride, concentrated by the K-D concentrator, and purified by silica gel technique, then PAHs in the coal samples were analyzed by a high performance liquid chromatographic(HPLC). Experimental results showed that most PAHs were present in the coal with 3-ring to 5-ring structure in the six coals; moreover, the higher coal rank is, the lower the total content of PAHs is. The coal with the high volatile content and H/C mole ratio contained higher PAHs. It was also discovered that there was correlation between PAHs content and carbon content, O/C mole ratio in the six coals.@The heat value and concentration of low concentration coalbed methane can’t meet the requirement of industry utilization. When it is industrially used, the methane in the gas needs to be concentrated. However, there is danger in the concentrating process because of the oxygen existing in the gas. So it is necessary to remove oxygen from the gas before being concentrated. The characteristics of several deoxidization methods, which are researching currently, are briefly represented; experimental study on the deoxidization of low concentration coalbed methane in a tubular furnace is also carried on in this paper. The results show that the percentage loss of methane is less than 10%, while the deoxidization temperature is less than 700 ℃, the pyrolysis of methane is the main reason of the loss of methane. The concentration of oxygen can be reduced to less than 1% after deoxidization by using coke combustion method.@Coal tar pitch were separated into α, β and γ resin by the method of solvent extraction. Coal tar pitch, α, β and γ resin were analyzed by TG, DTG and DSC. The results show that the heavy fraction has a higher temperature of initial weight loss and a higher temperature of maximum rate of weight loss than that of light fraction. Coal tar pitch, β and γ resin have two exothermic peaks in the region of 400 ℃-500 ℃, while α resin has only one exothermic peak in the region of 400 ℃-500 ℃.@Study on hydrogenation of medium and low temperature coal tar from Shaanxi was carried out in fixed-bed hydrogenation unit using catalysts possessing properties of hydrofining and hydrocracking. It has been emphasized to investigate the effect of reaction temperature, reaction pressure, volume ratio of hydrogen to oil, liquid hourly space velocity (LHSV) on hydrogenation. The optimum process conditions are: reaction pressure 14 MPa, reaction temperature 390 ℃，vo-lume ratio of hyrdogen to oil 1 600∶1 and LHSV 0.25 h-1. Under optimum conditions, mass fraction of gasoline was 9.82％, mass fraction of diesel oil was 73.12％, mass fraction of hydrogenation tail oil was 16.43％. Through a simple treatment,we can get qualified oil products from fraction of gasoline and diesel. The hydrogenation tail oil could be used as superior FCC or hydrocracking feedstock.@Na-X zeolites were successfully synthesized using the coal fly ash from a thermo-electric plant in Taiyuan by fusion method. The effects of treatment conditions, including NaOH concentration, operating temperature and hydrothermal reaction time, were investigated. The optimal synthetic conditions for Na-X were found to be as follows: ash/NaOH ratio is 1∶1.2, fusion temperature is 550 ℃，NaOH concentration is 3.75 mol/L (addition of 40 mL H2O), reaction temperature is 90 ℃ and reaction time is 6 h. The synthesizing Na-X zeolite by fusion method has higher purity and better crystallinity than that by conventional hydrothermal method.@Mesocarbon microbeads (MCMB) were prepared from coal-tar pitch by pyrolysis condensation of coal-tar pitch modified with formaldehyde in the presence of oxalic acid. The structures of the MCMB were characterized by polarized light microscopy and XRD. The morphologies of the MCMB were analyzed using SEM, and the thermal behavior of the MCMB was studied by TGA. The results indicate that the yield of MCMB, which have the average size of 10 μm, arrives at 35.1%. Moreover, there are a large number of microspheres with the size below 0.5 μm congregate together on the surfaces of the MCMB. The MCMB with low particle size don’t exhibit optical anisotropy under the polarized light microscopy. Furthermore, the interlayer space (d002) and crystallite height and crystallite size of MCMB are 0.342 0 nm, 3.42 nm, and 2.38 nm respectively. The characteristic degradation temperature at 5% mass loss is 618 ℃, and the total weight loss of the MCMB is 15.12%.@In this paper the effects of particle size, temperature, retention time and gas components on tar decomposition using toluene as model tar compounds were investigated. Tests were carried out in a fixed bed tubular reactor under atmospheric pressure using biomass char as catalysts. It was concluded that biomass char showed high catalytic activity. At 950 ℃ toluene conversion  achieve to 98% over two kinds of chars. Longer retention time lead to higher toluene conversion. Steam or CO2 can enhance toluene conversion and prolong the activity of char as they can react with toluene and carbon. Calculated by a simple first order kinetic model biomass char had an activation energy of 73 kJ/mol.@
2016
借助电感耦合等离子体原子发射光谱仪及管式炉实验系统对三种高钠准东煤进行实验研究.重点研究了煤中钠金属赋存形态及其在燃烧过程中的挥发特性.结果表明，三种准东煤中，金属钠以水溶钠和有机钠居多.钠的赋存形态对钠的挥发特性有一定影响，主要是可溶钠挥发到气相中，钠含量越高的煤，燃烧过程中钠的挥发量越高；煤中大部分钠的挥发发生在1 000 ℃之前，在此范围内，温度越高，钠金属的挥发率越高；在1 000 ℃前煤中钠会有大量集中挥发的现象，且水溶钠含量越高的煤，激增现象越明显.@由于煤化学吸附O2的过程是煤氧化反应的初始阶段，可通过抑制煤对O2的吸附来抑制煤的氧化自燃.应用Gaussian 03程序，采用密度泛函(DFT)方法，在B3LYP/6-31G(d，p)水平下研究分析Zn2+与煤中α位醛基结构的作用机理，并以活化能为指标表征Zn2+抑控煤中α位醛基结构氧化的效果，为煤炭自燃的阻化技术研究奠定基础.由计算结果可知，Zn2+的sp0.02d0.02轨道与C10H7CHO结构的20O原子的sp12.20d0.01轨道杂化形成σZn-O配位共价键，此配位共价键的二阶稳定化能为131.84 kJ/mol.当C10H7CHO结构氧化时，首先O2分子被物理吸附在—CHO基上，形成复合物complexⅠ，并释放30.86 kJ/mol的能量，然后复合物complexⅠ的分子间发生化学作用，导致O2分子被化学吸附在—CHO基上，所需活化能为Ea=66.87 kJ/mol；当煤中的活性α位醛基与Zn2+形成[ZnOHCC10H7]2+配合物后，—CHO基物理吸附O2分子释放的能量减少了19.38 kJ/mol，且化学吸附所需活化能增加了52.34 kJ/mol.因此，Zn2+对煤中α位醛基氧化具有明显的控制作用.@用水热提质的方法对我国两种典型低阶煤进行脱水提质，提质后低阶煤的水分含量大幅度下降、固定碳含量和热值升高.低阶煤经过提质后裂解特性曲线向高温方向移动，挥发分开始析出温度升高，昭通煤和准东煤的最大失重速率呈现不同的变化趋势，裂解最终失重率随着水热提质温度的升高而降低.通过对脱灰后低阶煤的裂解特性分析，发现脱灰过程可以增大低阶煤的裂解失重速率，而水热提质过程对低阶煤裂解特性的主要影响是减少低阶煤的轻质组分，使低阶煤的失重峰变窄.@针对燃煤电厂煤场燃料损耗，在电厂煤场和实验室开展了褐煤存储氧化特性的实验研究.煤场实验结果表明，随着现场煤堆堆放时间增加，煤的热值和水分含量减小，灰分含量增大；煤的大颗粒减小，小颗粒增加，平均粒度减小；实验室实验结果表明，随着褐煤存放时间增加，TG曲线变化趋势与现场实验结果相一致，DTG曲线向低温段偏移，失重峰值增大，动力学参数表观活化能E减小，频率因子A增大.@采用ReaxFF(reactive force field，活性反应力场)分子动力学方法模拟了褐煤在1 000 K~2 000 K下的热解过程，分析了热解温度对热解产物分布的影响，搜寻到了噻吩、硫酚和硫醚中硫元素迁移的基元反应以及热解产物中硫原子的存在形式.结果表明，热解温度是影响热解产物中硫元素分布的一个重要因素，高温会抑制硫从褐煤中逸出.在热解过程中，噻吩、硫酚和硫醚中的硫原子会通过硫自由基中间体进行相互转化.在热解结束时大多数硫原子以噻吩和硫醚的形式存在.@以循环流化床锅炉的循环灰为热载体对府谷烟煤进行了热解实验，考察了热解温度(470 ℃～630 ℃)对气液固产物产率和特性的影响，分析了原煤中的硫和氮在气液固三相产物中的分布.结果表明，随热解温度的升高，半焦产率降低，煤气产率从0.97%增加到5.44%，焦油产率从1.96%增加到8.07%；焦油中的轻油含量占80%(质量分数)以上，随热解温度的升高而降低.半焦的灰熔点在1 000 ℃以上.原煤经过热解后半焦中的硫含量可降到原煤中硫含量的70%（质量分数）左右，氮含量可降到原煤中氮含量的90%左右.@在箱式电阻炉装置上，进行典型新疆高钠煤五彩湾煤和加入胶体添加剂后混合煤样的热解实验，确定了五彩湾煤中钠在热解过程中的析出规律以及胶体添加剂对其的影响.结果表明，五彩湾煤原煤热解过程中，钠的析出量随着温度的升高而增大，钠的析出主要集中在700 ℃~900 ℃.适量添加硅溶胶能有效减少钠的析出，而铝溶胶的添加能促进钠的析出，且钠的析出量随着铝溶胶添加比例的增加而增大.@在1 kg/h规模的常压流化床气化实验系统上，在850 ℃，900 ℃和950 ℃，n(O)∶n(C)分别为1.0，1.1，1.2，1.3和1.4，生物质的质量分数分别为20%和40%的条件下，对某地PRB煤和一种生物质(美国竹柳)的共气化特性进行了研究.结果表明：随着温度的升高，H2含量(体积分数，下同)逐渐增加，CO和CH4含量及QHHV(合成气热值)逐渐减少，合成气产量和碳转化率增加较多.随着n(O)∶n(C)的增加，CO，H2，CH4含量和QHHV呈下降趋势；合成气产量和碳转化率增加.随着生物质比例的增加，CO，H2，CH4的含量先减少后增加，QHHV增加较多，合成气产量和碳转化率增加.n(O)∶n(C)为1.0时的炭黑量要高于n(O)∶n(C)为1.3时的炭黑量.@利用自行搭建的小型流化床实验台，研究了不同温度(650 ℃，750 ℃，850 ℃，950 ℃)和不同气氛(CH4，CO+H2)下铁基载氧体在化学链燃烧中的积炭特性，并研究了添加水蒸气和CO2对积炭特性的影响.结果表明：铁基载氧体在CH4与CO+H2气氛下均产生积炭，CO+H2气氛下积炭量较少，积炭程度较轻；在CO+H2气氛下，温度升高，积炭减轻，积炭量在850 ℃时最少；还原气氛中添加水蒸气和CO2能够抑制积炭，水蒸气的效果明显好于CO2的效果.@研究两种不同溶剂条件下，煤直接液化初级产品的物理化学特性，通过实沸点蒸馏装置，将样品油进行了实沸点切割，得到17个窄馏分，并考察了各窄馏分的密度、相对分子质量、元素组成及临界性质.结果表明，两种煤液化粗油馏分组成差别不大，得到的相应粗油窄馏分的密度、元素组成和相对分子质量等相差也较小.加氢后的循环溶剂条件下，煤液化粗油S和N元素含量较低；最后采用经验关联式对两种煤液化粗油窄馏分的假临界性质进行了计算.结果显示，两种油的假临界性质差别不大，且随切割馏程升高假临界温度和假临界体积逐渐增大，窄馏分的假临界压力逐渐减小.@在微型高压反应釜中，将五彩湾煤(WCW)及其镜质组(WCWV)和惰质组(WCWI)加氢液化，用气相色谱分析气体产物组成.结果表明，在380 ℃时，气体产率的次序为：镜质组>惰质组>五彩湾煤；在420 ℃时，气体产率的次序为：镜质组>五彩湾煤>惰质组；三种样品在液化过程中，C1~C4烷烃类气体(以下简称C1~C4)及COx气体含量随温度升高的变化趋势不同，对于WCW，C1~C4及COx气体含量随温度升高增加较明显；对于WCWI，C1~C4及COx气体含量随温度升高略有增加；对于WCWV，C1~C4及COx气体含量随温度升高反而降低；液化气体产物的分布特点为：C1~C4含量依次为CH4>C2H6>C3H8>C4H10，其总量约为COx气体的3倍，在C1~C4中CH4约占67%，C2H6约占22%，在COx气体中CO2含量约占69%，气相产物总体呈现出“富”烷烃、“富”甲烷及“富”二氧化碳的特性.@以吐鲁番长焰煤及其热解半焦为原料，经筛选采用AB复合黏结剂压制型煤，利用X射线衍射和扫描电镜研究型煤的成型机理.结果表明，AB复合黏结剂的最佳配比为：添加量11%，组分A和B质量比为5∶3，相应型煤具有较高的强度和良好的防水性；黏结剂加入煤中形成水化相C，其稳定存在且均匀分布在煤粒间并与煤粒紧密结合使型煤具有较高强度，半焦型煤中C水化相更多且与半焦颗粒结合更紧密，致使半焦型煤强度高于长焰煤型煤强度.@以高温煤焦油为原料，二甲苯和溶剂油为溶剂，采用溶剂沉降法对煤焦油中的喹林不溶物(QI)进行分离研究.考察了溶剂中芳脂比、溶剂比、沉降时间和沉降温度对精制焦油中QI含量及收率的影响.结果表明，在一定范围内，温度越高，时间越长，越有利于QI的脱除；随着芳脂比的逐渐增加，焦油中QI含量先下降后增加，焦油收率逐渐增加；随着溶剂比的增加，QI含量逐渐减少，焦油收率先增加后降低.当溶剂比为1，芳脂比为0.6，在75 ℃下沉降2 h，精制焦油收率可达到75.48%，QI脱除率达到87.7%，QI含量降至0.178%.@以酚醛树脂为改性剂，采用共混的方法对煤焦油沥青(煤沥青)进行改性.主要利用热重与傅立叶变换红外光谱联用仪(TG-FTIR)考察了不同共混比例改性煤沥青的热解特性.结果表明，随着酚醛树脂掺混量的增加，改性煤沥青中的n(H)∶n(C)逐渐减小；2 953 cm-1(—CH3)和2 924 cm-1(—CH2—)处透射峰强度逐渐减弱；1 512 cm-1(苯环CC)处的透射峰强度逐渐增强；1 232 cm-1(芳香醚键=C—O—C)处和1 101 cm-1(脂链醚键=C—O—C)处透射峰强度逐渐增强；随着酚醛树脂掺混量的增加，改性煤沥青的起始失重温度逐渐升高，最大失重速率逐渐降低；改性煤沥青热解挥发物在较宽的温度范围内析出；改性煤沥青的实际失重率大于理论失重率；酚醛树脂与煤沥青发生交联；酚醛树脂的添加使得芳香烃类、脂肪烃类和CH4的释放量减少，并且挥发产物的析出发生在更宽的热解温度范围；芳香烃类和CH4的释放量由低温向高温延伸.@测定了陕西神木中低温煤焦油轻油(L-tar)和重油(H-tar)的基本性质.通过常压蒸馏将煤焦油切割为<220 ℃，220 ℃~260 ℃，260 ℃~300 ℃和>300 ℃四段馏分.利用酸碱法对<220 ℃，220 ℃~260 ℃，260 ℃~300 ℃三段馏分进行酚类提取研究，测定了三段馏分的总酚含量及最小碱油比.通过正交实验确定最佳碱洗条件，在最佳条件下，轻油对应的馏分段的总酚收率分别为92.23%，89.99%和87.91%；重油对应馏分段的总酚收率分别为94.60%，91.88%和90.73%.考察了所提取的混酚替代苯酚合成酚醛树脂的性能，轻油和重油混酚树脂的黏度及固含量分别为3.18 Pa·s和3.73 Pa·s以及79.39%和82.15%.@采用正交实验，以宁夏灵武不黏煤、贵州贫煤和蔗渣焦为原料，添加一定量的添加剂，通过水蒸气活化法制得糖液脱色颗粒活性炭.最佳实验条件是，宁夏灵武不黏煤与贵州贫煤的质量比8∶2，外加煤总量20%的蔗渣焦、8%的聚磷酸铵和1%的磷酸钠，炭化温度550 ℃，活化温度930 ℃，烧失率70%.在上述条件下，制得的活性炭焦糖脱色率为97.1%，微孔孔容为0.37 cm3/g，中孔孔容为0.28 cm3/g，2.6 nm~4.8 nm内的孔容为0.06 8 cm3/g，平均孔径为2.81 nm.孔径分析表明，微孔结构不利于吸附糖液中的色素物质，中孔结构有利于脱色性能的提高，2.6 nm~4.8 nm内的孔容对脱色有显著影响.@以新疆煤为原料，采用水蒸气活化一步法制备出多孔炭材料，考察了活化时间和原料粒度对活化过程的影响，对比了活化前脱灰和活化后脱灰的优劣.结果表明，活化时间以120 min为宜，原料粒度在150 μm～180 μm时较优，活化后比表面积高达1 300 m2/g，收率为30%.样品脱灰适宜在活化后进行.将所制备的多孔炭材料应用于超级电容器，考察了其电容性能.结果表明，在6 mol/L KOH电解液中，三电极体系材料电容值可达149 F/g.两电极超级电容器具有良好的长循环稳定性，30 000次循环后容量几乎无衰减.@分别以真空低温热处理和酸碱脱灰的兰炭为基体，将苯胺引入其孔隙和表面，并引发苯胺原位聚合，制备出兼具双电层电容和赝电容特征的兰炭/聚苯胺.FTIR、兰炭工业分析和电容性能测试表明，对兰炭真空低温热处理能破坏小分子有机物与兰炭间的弱相互作用，有效去除兰炭中的小分子有机物，有效改善兰炭/聚苯胺的电容特性，比电容和能量密度分别提高到169.4 F/g和24.1 Wh/kg.对兰炭进行脱灰处理，会降低苯胺对兰炭的浸润性，减弱聚苯胺与兰炭间的界面作用，降低兰炭/聚苯胺的比电容.@利用X射线光电子能谱(XPS)，研究了神木烟煤及神木半焦中氮和硫赋存形态，并在热重-质谱(TG-MS)联用分析仪上，利用等效特征谱分析(ECSA)法对煤焦燃烧过程中的气体产物进行了定量分析，研究含氮、含硫气体在煤焦燃烧过程中的生成规律.结果表明，神木烟煤和神木半焦中有四种不同形态的含氮物质，分别为吡咯和吡咯酮氮、吡啶氮、季氮和氧化吡啶，不含胺类物质；神木半焦中各形态含氮物质的绝对含量都减小，而季氮和氧化吡啶相对含量增加；NOx前驱物主要是NH3和HCN，HCN的生成量要高于NH3；神木烟煤和神木半焦含有三种不同价态的硫(S1，S2和S3)，+6价S3最多，大部分硫以硫酸盐的形式存在，相比神木烟煤，神木半焦中S3和S1的绝对含量下降，而S2绝对含量增加；检测到的SO2前驱物有H2S和COS，神木半焦燃烧过程中没有检测到COS和SO2；神木烟煤燃烧过程中含氮、含硫气体生成量明显高于神木半焦，气体析出时间更早，气体析出时间段对应的温度区间更宽.@采用微波与氢氧化钠溶液协同法对乌海煤中硫进行脱除，通过正交实验确定了微波氢氧化钠溶液协同脱除煤中硫的最佳条件，考察了煤样粒度、氢氧化钠浓度、微波辐照时间和微波功率等因素对煤中硫脱除效果的影响，并对脱硫机理进行了分析.借助SEM，XRD，FTIR和XPS测试方法对实验前后的煤质进行了对比分析.结果表明，微波与氢氧化钠溶液协同可脱除煤中29.53%的硫分，煤的基本结构并未发生变化，煤中矿物含量减少.通过介电常数测试，研究了不同氢氧化钠浓度条件下的固体混合物对微波的介电响应情况，同时借助material studio软件模拟了电场效应对有机硫脱除的影响作用.@利用傅立叶红外对低温干燥前后低阶煤中官能团的演变进行了研究，并通过红外谱图的峰面积曲线拟合处理，分析了低阶煤中各官能团在干燥过程中的变化规律及干燥后低阶煤性质的演变.结果表明，在干燥过程中，随着温度的增加，脂肪族结构逐渐消失，脂肪侧链中亚甲基官能团比甲基官能团活泼，在干燥过程中最先被氧化；含氧官能团羧基、羟基、羰基及醚键含量均呈现降低趋势，其中羧基反应活性最好，其含量降低的速度最快，羰基性质最为稳定，其含量变化最为缓慢；芳香环C=C先增加后减少，伊敏煤中C=C在230 ℃时开始分解，天池能源煤中C=C在190 ℃时已开始大量分解.研究表明，在低温干燥过程中低阶煤的变质程度有所增加，可在一定程度上提高其煤阶.@以N-甲基吡咯烷酮为溶剂，380 ℃下分别萃取褐煤、长焰煤、气煤和肥煤制备无灰煤.通过元素、红外、热重分析及常温分级萃取实验考察无灰煤的化学结构变化，在唐山1/3焦煤中添加10%无灰煤，研究煤阶对无灰煤配煤效果的影响.结果表明：相比原煤，无灰煤烃类增多，黏结性增强，以非黏结性煤为原料所得的无灰煤黏结指数可达90以上.随着原煤煤阶升高，无灰煤脂肪烃和含氧物质减少，芳烃增多，平均分子量增大，热失重减少.在唐山1/3焦煤中配入无灰煤，混煤软化点降低，热塑性随无灰煤原煤煤阶提高而增强.@基于“相似相溶”原理，采用三氯甲烷溶剂萃取方法对不同煤级原生结构煤和共生构造煤进行超声-微波协同萃取，借助红外光谱、柱层析和色谱-质谱测试手段，对萃取物结构组成进行分析.研究表明：随煤级的增加，原生结构煤的萃取率全部小于共生构造煤，原生结构煤萃取率呈减少趋势，构造煤萃取率呈增加趋势，主要取决于演化过程中煤体结构的变化；萃取物呈阶段性、爆发性溶出，脂肪族类物质表现尤为明显，这与不同煤级煤中小分子的赋存形式有关；色谱-质谱测定与红外光谱分析预测结果基本一致，各煤级萃取物脂肪烃较多，芳香烃较少.从微观成烃理论和化学动力学原理对煤成烃成因进行探讨，用层析理论对烃类运移进行了描述.@以单颗粒煤粉燃烧破碎模型为基础，提出了以破碎比率概念来表征破碎程度，并以同心圆方式划分网格，由外向内依次按圆环形式模拟热解一次破碎过程.研究发现：煤颗粒粒径是影响煤颗粒破碎最重要的影响因素，粒径越小，反应的比表面积越大，相同膨胀应力产生的压强越大，破碎效果越明显；挥发分含量越高，热解析出过程中产生的膨胀应力越大，同时，气态的挥发分与固态的煤焦壁脱离产生更大的孔隙率，进一步降低了煤颗粒本身的屈服强度，破碎更容易产生；燃烧温度升高，起始阶段温度梯度增大，挥发分析出速度越快，膨胀应力越大，从而使破碎发生.@以内蒙东胜褐煤和澳大利亚Yallourn褐煤为研究对象，应用红外光谱对其主要分子结构进行分析，并进行了等温热解实验.主要对比考察了等温热解温度对两种褐煤热解气组成、产量和热值的影响.结果表明，两种褐煤的脂肪烃类结构及含氧官能团比较多；随着等温热解温度的升高，CO和H2的含量(体积分数)增加，CO2的含量(体积分数)明显减少，热解气的产量和热值增加； 东胜褐煤热解过程中获得的H2量较高，更适合作为热解制氢的原料.相同热解温度下，等温热解与程序升温相比，得到的煤气热值高，是一种比较有效的获得高热值的热解方法.@以综合计算法为基础，将地下气化过程分为干馏阶段和气化阶段，结合反应平衡计算法相关理论，引入二氧化碳还原反应、碳与蒸汽反应的平衡常数方程，并考虑地下气化过程中瓦斯涌出、地下水渗入、工作面采出率、炉体排水、围岩散热和煤气泄漏等特有因素的影响，建立了一种适宜煤炭地下气化过程的计算模型.应用模型对华亭地下气化现场实验进行模拟计算，并与实测数据对比分析，结果表明，绝大部分理论计算值与现场实测值的相对误差在5%以内，准确度较高.该模型可以用于地下气化项目的前期研究，为相关工艺参数的设计和选择提供参考.@以神华煤直接液化示范装置加氢稳定单元进料为原料，在300 mL加氢装置上进行了煤直接液化油加氢稳定催化剂活性评价实验.结果表明：与HTS-358进口催化剂相比，FFT-1B国产催化剂在降低生成油密度和氮含量、提高溶剂油供氢性能方面有较大优势，加氢反应化学氢耗高0.2%(质量分数)，但裂化活性低；FFT-1B催化剂的活性金属含量较高.@采用Ni-W/γ-Al2O3型催化剂，利用固定床反应器对煤直接液化油进行催化加氢改质，研究了反应温度和氢压对烃类液体和气体产物分布的影响.结果表明：随着反应温度的升高，液态烃类产物中芳烃和烷烃组分的含量(质量分数)增加，当温度高于500 ℃时，裂化反应加剧，甲烷和乙烷气体含量(体积分数)急剧增加；随着反应压力的升高，氢化芳烃的含量增加，但高于4 MPa后，增加趋势变缓，甲烷气体含量随着压力升高而增加，其他气体含量受压力影响微弱.300 ℃，4 MPa条件下加氢液体产物中轻馏分油含量由加氢前的11%提高到17%；催化剂的HDN(加氢脱氮)、HDS(加氢脱硫)和HDO(加氢脱氧)活性分别为35.56%，72.73%和24.20%，n(H)∶n(C)由1.37提高到1.52.@以兰炭粉为主要原料，配加黏结性烟煤和黏结剂，通过冲压方式制成大块型煤，再利用改进的隧道窑将型煤炭化成型焦，型焦应用于冲天炉，作为冲天炉化铁的主要燃料.结果表明，以兰炭粉为主要原料所制得的型煤落下强度均为97.0%；型煤经隧道窑炭化所得型焦的整块率均为99.5%，落下强度为91.0%和93.5%，固定碳含量为86.5%和88.2%，热值为27.77 kJ/g和27.81 kJ/g；经炭化后的型焦应用于冲天炉，冲天炉风压降低，炉内透气性得到明显改善，熔化的铁水温度达到1 421 ℃和1 418 ℃，化铁效果好，完全满足铸造的要求.@以新疆三道岭不黏结烟煤热解兰炭粉末为原料，采用复合黏结剂制备冶炼用型焦，考察黏结剂配比对型焦冷、热强度的影响规律.在优化黏结剂配比的基础上，考察了压力和炭化温度对型焦抗压强度的影响，并通过扫描电镜(SEM)解析了不同温度下型焦的微观结构.结果表明，型焦复合黏结剂的最佳配比为：淀粉3.65%(质量分数，下同)，沥青2.81%，有机钙0.33%，Fe2O3 0.49%，水34%.在实验范围内，成型压力越大，型焦抗压强度越大.随着温度的升高，在300 ℃~500 ℃范围内型焦的抗压强度明显下降；在500 ℃~900 ℃范围内型焦的抗压强度呈上升趋势.低温时，黏结作用主要以范德华力和静电力等物理作用方式为主.随着温度的升高，沥青和淀粉热解所产生的桥键成为黏结作用的主体，在温度超过500 ℃后，焦粉自身及其与有机钙、Fe2O3之间发生化学反应，产生黏性物质，促使型焦抗压强度提高.@针对300 MW贫煤锅炉，进行了低NOx燃烧系统改造和性能优化实验，研究了低氮燃烧器组合深度空气分级低氮燃烧技术对贫煤燃烧锅炉NOx排放的影响规律和控制效果.结果表明，锅炉采用新型低氮燃烧器、全炉膛深度分级燃烧改造后，锅炉SCR脱硝系统入口NOx浓度可由改造前约1 100 mg/m3(干态，6%氧量)下降至改造后的460 mg/m3(干态，6%氧量)左右，氮氧化物排放浓度平均降幅达到50%以上.改造方案及实验结果可为贫煤燃烧锅炉低NOx燃烧改造和运行优化提供借鉴.@以中温煤沥青为原料，使用芳烃和烷烃作为溶剂，采用溶剂法制备出灰分低于0.03%的纯化沥青；再以纯化沥青为原料，采用空气吹扫和高温热缩聚及刮膜蒸发的方法，制备出软化点高达250 ℃的纺丝沥青.借助偏光显微镜、热台和扫描电子显微镜对沥青的软化点、同性度和碳纤维的显微形貌进行表征，研究溶剂的芳环比、沉降温度和时间对制备纯化沥青的影响，以及温度和空气吹扫对聚合后沥青同性度的影响.结果表明，芳环比、沉降温度和时间对纯化沥青的影响较大；空气吹扫在一定程度上能提高沥青的分子质量，保证沥青的产率，温度控制在360 ℃以下可以防止中间相的生成.@以昭通(ZT)、小龙潭(XLT)和先锋(XF)三个地区的褐煤为原料进行腐植酸(humic acid，HA)的提取研究.以褐煤中腐植酸含量、腐植酸提取率及品质因素为分析指标，考察三种褐煤提取腐植酸的适用性.通过工业分析及酸性官能团含量的检测等手段对腐植酸的品质进行综合评价.结果表明，三种褐煤腐植酸提取率分别为76.13%，47.61%和43.48%.昭通褐煤腐植酸中灰分含量(16.83%)相对较高，小龙潭褐煤腐植酸和先锋褐煤腐植酸中灰分含量分别为6.66%和4.63%，且水分、挥发分和固定碳含量也相差较小.在腐植酸含氧官能团含量上，三种褐煤腐植酸的总酸性官能团含量及羧基含量相差较小，但昭通褐煤腐植酸提取残渣中含氧官能团含量远低于另外两种提取残渣.以上分析表明，昭通褐煤腐植酸提取较为完全，在腐植酸提取方面适用性更强.@利用超声波辅助共沉淀法制备了半焦负载Fe基脱硫剂，在固定床反应器中考察了其脱硫及再生特性.采用X射线衍射(XRD)法和傅立叶红外光谱(FTIR)法对硫化前后及再生后样品的晶体结构和表面化学结构变化进行了表征.结果表明，金属Zn和Cu的加入使得Fe基脱硫剂的脱硫性能得到明显改善，其中半焦负载Fe-Zn-Cu脱硫剂具有最佳脱硫及再生性能.利用水蒸气法再生后的脱硫剂脱硫性能稳定，脱硫剂经多次硫化-再生循环后，仍具有良好的脱硫性能.@在固体热载体快速热解装置上考察了锅炉循环灰对内蒙古羊市塔烟煤热解过程中氮的迁移转化特性的影响.结果表明，在考察温度(530 ℃~660 ℃)内，在气相氮中仅含有HCN和NH3，无N2产生.循环灰对煤结构及焦油分子中氮杂环的裂解没有催化作用，与惰性石英砂作为热载体的实验结果相比，热解温度600 ℃时，循环灰作为热载体使气相中HCN-N和NH3-N的产率分别降低了24.53%和29.86%.并通过向惰性石英砂中添加碱性矿物质对循环灰中影响煤热解过程中气相氮释放的主要物质进行了考察.@选择宁夏吴忠某造纸厂污泥为研究对象，将其与宁夏本地煤炭进行混合，用热重-质谱仪分析了室温~1 000 ℃时，污泥与煤混烧特性及混烧过程中NOx和SOx污染物的排放，并用原子吸收分光光度计和原子荧光光谱仪分别研究了燃烧前后样品中重金属Pb，Cr，Cu， Zn， Ni， Mn，Hg和As的迁移.结果表明，造纸厂污泥与煤混烧后，燃烧特性良好，并且燃烧后的灰渣中重金属含量符合GB 4284-1984，不会对水土造成二次污染；燃烧过程中一部分重金属迁移到烟气中去.因此，应采用吸附及除尘结合的方式对烟气进行处理，避免污泥资源化处理过程中对大气的污染.@通过溶胶-凝胶法制备蜂窝状Mn-Ce/TiO2催化剂，并探究在烟道气脱硝应用中不同工艺条件对Mn-Ce/TiO2催化活性的影响.结果表明，催化剂在高体积分数NO、高空速、高氧的条件下，仍然显示出了优越的活性.暂态响应实验表明，NO以气态或少数弱吸附态的形式与强吸附的NH3反应；O2在SCR(选择性催化还原)反应中起着重要的作用，O2促进了Mn-Ce/TiO2催化剂上表面氧的生成，进一步补充了晶格氧，同时也促进了NO的吸附.@以山西长治霍尔辛赫矿贫煤为研究对象，对煤样分别进行了不同溶剂的抽提，并借助柱层析法和X射线衍射技术(XRD)对抽提物和抽余物进行了测试分析.结果表明：高阶煤进行溶剂抽提后，THF对煤样的抽提率最高，其次是CS2、丙酮和乙醇，苯的抽提率最低；除CS2抽提物中非烃类含量高于总烃含量外，其余溶剂的抽提物均表现为总烃含量大于非烃类含量，同时，随着抽提效果的增强，抽提物中非烃类化合物的质量分数逐渐增大；经溶剂抽提后抽余物的基本结构单元(BSU)的芳香层间距d002、堆砌度Lc和芳香层数N均表现出大于原煤微晶结构的规律，而延展度La在溶剂抽提后却呈现出小于原煤微晶结构延展度的特性.@利用静态热机械分析法(TMA)测定三种煤样的热膨胀特性，分析煤质特性对热膨胀性的影响，通过滚筒干燥实验，研究干燥过程中不同作用力加载方式、温度和煤质对破碎特性的影响，以及热膨胀与破碎特性的相关关系.结果表明，不同煤种的热膨胀特性差异较大，最大膨胀率和最大收缩率均与原煤全水分存在正相关关系；干燥过程中，热力和机械外力两种作用力的耦合加载方式相较单独加载方式产生了协同效应，其中热力作用使褐煤孔隙和裂隙结构发生变化，颗粒机械强度降低，而机械外力的作用使破碎现象更为显著，且细粒级产量大幅增多；褐煤的热膨胀和破碎特性相一致，原煤全水分越高，热膨胀性越强，在干燥过程中也越易发生破碎及粉化.@依据煤全组分族分离方法——萃取反萃取法及煤嵌布结构模型思想，采用正己烷、甲醇、丙酮、氯仿、CS2和THF六级溶剂对淮北童亭煤(HB)、徐州煤(XZ)和平顶山煤(PDS)各族组分进行分级分次索氏萃取，对各级萃取物进行GC-MS分析.结果表明：索氏萃取溶出物中有机卤化物的溶出行为主要发生在氯仿级的萃取过程中，其溶出物主要以脂基氯、芳基氯(溴)和杂环基氯化物4类卤化物为主，相对分子质量为94~250.其中，杂环基氯化物倾向分布于疏中质组和密中质组中，以较小微孔嵌入态和网络嵌入态赋存；芳基卤化物倾向分布于重质组中，以较小微孔嵌入态赋存；脂基氯化物在各族组分中没有倾向性，以3种赋存状态存在于各族组分中.@采用碱酸法对鄂尔多斯褐煤进行了不同温度下的脱灰处理，通过元素分析、FTIR、TG和SEM等分析手段比较了脱灰前后煤的结构变化.结果表明，煤经过碱酸处理后，水含量和灰含量降低，经高温(240 ℃)酸碱处理，灰分降低到0.84%.碱酸处理过程减少了煤的含氧量，提高了碳含量和发热量.室温碱酸处理会加速煤的热解，使煤的粒度更加均匀.高温碱酸处理降低了煤的挥发分，热失重曲线变缓，小分子间发生聚合反应，增强了煤的紧密性，使煤表面变得粗糙.说明碱酸处理在一定程度上改变了煤的物理化学结构，且高温下更加明显.@以煤的基氏流动度实验作为研究胶质体性质的出发点，提出以加权平均流动度lgFwa和最大流动度lgFm分别代表整个阶段胶质体所体现的平均质量和最佳质量，并提出以软固温度区间Tr-Ts表征胶质体数量.在此基础上，以因子分析为综合评价胶质体性质的模型，建立一个全面表征胶质体性质的新指标——流动指数F，发现流动指数F较lgFm与煤工艺性质有更密切的联系，具有更好的加和性，预测焦炭质量更准确，表明流动指数F作为黏结性指标可以全面反映胶质体的性质.@在实验室规模的固体热载体快速热解装置上，以内蒙古富安高硫煤为研究对象，考察热解温度、升温速率及热载体种类对煤中硫在热解产物中分布的影响.结果表明，燃烧灰和气化半焦为热载体时，均具有明显的固硫能力.在650 ℃热解时，煤中约40%的硫转移至热载体中.由于热载体中碱性矿物质存在形态的差异及其物理性质的不同，低温下气化半焦的固硫能力强于燃烧灰的固硫能力，随热解温度的提高其差异逐渐降低.与慢速程序升温过程相比，由于高温有利于Fe2O3与还原性气体反应生成FeO，快速热解时热载体的固硫能力较强.@通过热重分析的方法对褐煤、生物质及褐煤生物质混合物的热解特性进行研究，以考察生物质与褐煤共热解过程中是否存在协同效应，结果表明：将褐煤与生物质按1∶1(质量比)的比例混合后，其初始热解温度及挥发分最大释放峰出现温度与生物质单独热解基本相同，热解终温与褐煤相比大幅度提前，混合物热解在各个阶段的失重率均大于其单独热解失重率的平均值.褐煤、生物质及其混合物的热解过程可以用一级和二级热解反应动力学模型描述，通过计算动力学参数，发现在整个主要热解过程中，混合物在各个温度段的E值均小于褐煤或生物质单独热解时的E值，热解反应更加容易进行.证明了生物质对褐煤的热解有促进作用，褐煤与生物质在共热解过程中存在协同效应.@采用热重分析仪分别对废轮胎、煤及其混合样进行热解实验，研究废轮胎与煤的混合比例及热解升温速率对混合物失重特性的影响.结果表明：废轮胎和煤单独热解时发生剧烈缩聚反应，DTG曲线在400 ℃～480 ℃的温度区间有重叠部分；添加废轮胎对煤的热解有促进作用，随废轮胎质量分数的不断增加，煤的热解高峰区逐渐向低温区移动，且失重率不断提高；对混合样进行不同升温速率的热解实验发现，在较低的升温速率范围(15 K/min~20 K/min)内，增大升温速率可以促进热解反应的进行；而升温速率过高(>20 K/min)会使样品颗粒内部热解产生的挥发分来不及逸出而出现笼蔽效应，从而使样品的失重率减小.@采用热重分析法探讨了影响低阶煤热解半焦燃烧性能的主要因素；采用比表面积和孔隙结构分析仪、扫描电镜揭示了半焦燃烧性能差异的机理.结果表明：热解条件是影响半焦燃烧性能的重要因素.煤种相同时，随热解温度的升高和热解时间的延长，半焦的燃烧性能变差，用半焦的燃料比可预测半焦的燃烧性能；对于不同煤种，不能根据半焦的燃料比来预测半焦的燃烧性能.原煤的内水含量是影响其热解半焦燃烧性能的关键因素，可根据煤的内水含量预测其热解半焦的燃烧性能；半焦的BET比表面积和微表面特征是造成其燃烧性能好坏的主要原因，与半焦热解母体(煤炭)的内水含量密切相关.@采用煤炭地下气化实验系统模拟鹤壁烟煤地下气化过程，收集气化后残留半焦(气化残焦)，研究了气化残焦中污染物在地下水中的浸出规律.研究表明，煤炭地下气化残焦浸出液中含有挥发酚等有机污染物及镉(Cd)、铅(Pb)、砷(As)、铬(Cr)、铜(Cu)、镍(Ni)和锌(Zn)等10余种重金属无机污染物.浸出温度和浸出时间是影响煤炭地下气化残留半焦浸出液中污染物质量浓度的重要因素.当浸出温度为45 ℃，浸出时间为8 h时，气化残焦浸出液中挥发酚、总有机碳(TOC)及化学需氧量(COD)的质量浓度分别为0.03 mg/L，5.07 mg/L，7.48 mg/L；Cr，V，Cu，Se，Ni及Zn等重金属离子的质量浓度介于4.0 μg/L~73.4 μg/L之间.大规模进行煤炭地下气化可能会对地下水造成潜在污染.@以新疆阜康西沟煤为研究对象，考察了甲醇(MET)和洗油(WO)混合溶剂下的醇解条件，醇-碱体系下的醇解行为及醇解残渣的液化性能，并与煤样直接液化结果进行对比.结果表明：θ=320 ℃，t=60 min，m(solvent)∶m(coal)=10∶1，mMET∶mWO=8∶2为适宜的醇解条件，此条件下，醇解率为21.8%.进一步加入NaOH或CaO作为醇解催化剂，当碱煤比=0.8∶1时，醇解率分别为51.3%和27.4%.以洗油为供氢溶剂，对醇解残渣进行直接液化，并与原煤样直接液化的结果进行对比，煤样直接液化的总液体产率为62.3%，而无碱醇解、CaO醇解和NaOH醇解产物的总液体产率依次为71.0%，72.7%，83.2%，分别提高了8.7%，10.4%和20.9%.同时，对醇解产物进行了FTIR，TG-DTG和SEM表征，对催化醇解与煤样直接液化的气体产物进行了GC分析.@利用间歇式高压反应釜考察温和条件下，铁基复配催化剂对红柳林煤液化性能的影响，并利用元素分析仪和红外光谱仪对前沥青烯(PA)和沥青烯(AS)的元素组成和官能团进行分析.结果表明，在温和液化条件下(反应温度430 ℃，氢初压4 MPa)，铁基复配催化剂可显著提高γ-FeOOH的催化活性，其中三元复配催化剂的活性优于二元复配催化剂.与γ-FeOOH相比，二元和三元复配铁基催化剂最多可将油产率提高3.88%和6.12%.铁基复配催化剂可同时促进前沥青烯和沥青烯的加氢，尤其是沥青烯的加氢.@应用云芝菌(Coriolus versicolor，简称为C.versicolov)对昭通褐煤进行液化，并对液化产物进行了13C NMR光谱分析.结果发现，云芝菌对未处理的原煤无液化效果，对脱灰预处理煤有一定液化效果，对硝酸氧化预处理煤具有较强的液化效果.在DOX培养基中的液化效果是在SMB培养基中的10倍左右.摇床培养比静置更利于生物液化，当转速为120 r/min时，由于菌体生长过于旺盛，不如转速为60 r/min时的液化效果好.13C NMR光谱分析发现，液化产物中含有≡C—O—(80.7×10-6)，—CH2—O—(59.0×10-6)和—COOR(179.6×10-6)等含氧官能团，这主要是云芝菌对昭通硝酸氧化煤液化过程中发生氧化反应造成的.@在炼焦配合煤中添加K2CO3或Na2CO3进行捣固炼焦，考察K或Na对炼焦煤工艺性质和焦炭性能的影响，运用DTG分析K或Na对炼焦煤热解质量的影响规律，运用XRD和SEM分析K或Na对焦炭性质的影响规律.结果表明，随着K或Na添加量的增加，炼焦煤的干燥无灰基挥发分(Vdaf)质量分数先增加后保持不变，黏结指数(G)和胶质层最大厚度(Y)减小；K或Na使炼焦煤的热解DTG曲线在200 ℃出现失重峰，在400 ℃～600 ℃之间的热解速率变大.随着配合煤中K或Na添加量的增加，焦炭的冷态强度降低，热态性能变差，焦炭微晶结构中堆垛高度Lc减小，网状平面尺寸La变化不大，层间距d002增大，石墨化度降低；K或Na使得焦炭基质受CO2破坏的程度加剧，从而降低焦炭结构强度.@通过控制驯化条件对接种物进行选择性培养，分析接种物驯化过程中pH值、SCOD质量浓度、辅酶F420质量摩尔浓度和产气量的变化.获得接种物的驯化方案为：在35 ℃培养温度下，每天进料量为2 g泥炭，驯化30 d；其在第20天辅酶F420质量摩尔浓度达到最高值0.037 3 mmol/g，远远大于对照组P0第19天的辅酶F420质量摩尔浓度最高值0.011 0 mmol/g，揭示驯化接种物有助于富集厌氧微生物，尤其是产甲烷细菌.实验结果可为泥炭转化为生物甲烷、扩大煤制天然气煤种资源开辟新途径.@以太西煤及其煤基活性炭为碳源，硅酸钠为硅源，Fe(NO3)3·9H2O为催化剂，利用溶胶-凝胶法经碳热还原制备碳化硅粉体，探究不同n(Fe)∶n(Si)对制备的碳化硅的结构和形貌的影响.分别采用XRD，SEM和BET等分析技术对所制备的样品进行表征.结果表明，以太西煤为碳源，制得的碳化硅存在不同程度的堆积缺陷，且随着n(Fe)∶n(Si)的提高，堆积缺陷逐渐减弱，碳化硅的形貌由部分晶须逐渐变为尺寸均匀的纳米颗粒.以煤基活性炭为碳源制备的碳化硅堆积缺陷较弱，碳化硅的结晶度高，而且随着n(Fe)∶n(Si)的提高，碳化硅粒径逐渐增大，但基本保持在50 nm~100 nm范围.@以HCl作为酸浸介质，考察热活化及碳酸钠助剂+热活化耦合活化两种活化方式下，煤矸石物料在酸浸过程中Al，Fe，Ca，Mg，K和Ti等金属离子的溶出活性，采用X射线衍射光谱(XRD)和红外光谱(IR)对活化前后的物料及酸浸渣进行矿物组成和微观结构表征，并根据金属在煤矸石中的矿物存在形态对金属离子的溶出活性进行解释.结果表明，在750 ℃热活化作用下，煤矸石中Al，Fe，Ca和Mg大量溶出，K的溶出率很低，Ti基本上不溶出；加碳酸钠助剂活化不仅有利于Al的溶出，同时滤液中金属离子K，Ti和Na也大量溶出，增加了滤液分离提纯和铝产品制备的难度.此外还研究了煤矸石热活化-酸浸工艺过程中金属离子的溶出规律，提出了酸浸预除杂的措施.@以二苄基硫醚(DBS)和二苄基二硫醚(DBDS)为有机含硫模型化合物，以二苯甲烷(DPM)亚甲基作为活性氢源，研究了反应温度对DBS中C烷—S键及DBDS中C烷—S和S—S键断裂以及硫的热迁移的影响.结果表明：200 ℃以下，DBS中C烷—S键未断裂；225 ℃以上，DBS中C烷—S键能够发生有效热断裂.而模型化合物DBDS在200 ℃时C烷—S和S—S键可发生有效热断裂.两种化合物热断裂反应遵循自由基型反应机理，两种模型化合物中硫的热迁移历程基本相同，主要产物是甲苯(PhMe)、二苯乙烯(DPE)、二苯乙烷(DPEA)和三苯乙烯(TPE)，有机含硫化合物很少，说明温和条件下化合物DBS中C烷—S键及DBDS中的C烷—S和S—S键能有效热断裂，热断裂硫能有效以气体H2S形式迁出，少量转化为其他形态有机硫.@运用量子化学密度泛函理论(DFT)研究了褐煤表面含氧官能团对水分子的吸附机理，结果表明，氢键作用为主要作用力，水分子在羧基上吸附时形成两个氢键，最短氢键长度为0.173 3 nm.在酚羟基和醇羟基上吸附时，含氧官能团作为氢键供体，水分子作为氢键受体是最优吸附构型，氢键长度分别为0.187 6 nm和0.192 7 nm.在羰基和醚键上吸附时形成的氢键长度分别为0.196 1 nm和0.206 0 nm.由Mulliken电荷布局可知，吸附后含氧官能团中氧原子得电子，O—H，C=O和C—O键的强度被削弱，从而键长被拉长.吸附能计算结果符合吸附平衡距离变化规律，含氧官能团对水分子的吸附强弱顺序为：羧基>酚羟基>醇羟基>羰基>醚键.水分子在酚羟基上的吸附符合Lennard-Jones理论，水分子离酚羟基约0.188 5 nm处的吸附能最低，此为稳定吸附平衡态，吸附能为-45.63 kJ /mol.@分别在1 400 ℃，1 700 ℃，2 000 ℃，2 200 ℃，2 400 ℃和2 600 ℃下对云南昭通无烟煤高温热处理，并采用CA，XRD和SEM等方法对其进行了测试和表征.结果表明，云南昭通无烟煤水分、灰分和挥发分等物相随着热处理温度的提升转变为逃逸相后遗失，热处理温度越高，三种物相转变越迅速，越彻底；超高温热处理能使无烟煤转变为石墨相，固定碳相从非晶态向晶态转变，热处理温度越高，内部碳原子规整化程度越高，芳香层结构逐渐发育长大完善，石墨化程度就越高.@运用煤的结构化学理论，基于固体13C-NMR测试方法，对比分析了构造煤在混合酸处理脱灰前后碳组成的变化.研究表明，混合酸处理脱灰对构造煤中脂肪碳、芳香碳和含氧官能团的比例分配影响不大，但对碳组成有一定影响.脱灰后比例增加明显的结构包括脂甲基碳、甲氧基/芳甲氧基碳、桥接芳碳，结构受到明显破坏；比例显著减小的结构归属为亚甲基/次甲基碳、环内氧接脂碳、侧支芳碳、质子化芳碳.混合酸处理脱灰对构造煤结构最重要的影响在于芳香稠环结构有所改变，脱灰样品中芳香簇的尺寸变大了.@采用超高温热重/差示扫描量热仪，研究了神木烟煤和宝日希勒褐煤在室温至1 600 ℃之间N2气氛中的热解特性，以及神木烟煤在CO2气氛中的热解气化特性.研究表明，在1 000 ℃~1600 ℃范围内，两种煤仍保持一定的热解速率，在该温度段的失重分别为4.49%和6.21%，褐煤在1 200 ℃~1 500 ℃内还存在一个明显的失重峰.在200 ℃~949 ℃/969 ℃之间，烟煤和褐煤热解放出热量，两种煤最大净放热量分别为728 mJ/mg和1 776 mJ/mg，而在其他温度段主要表现为吸热.CO2气氛下烟煤中低温失重曲线与N2气氛中的基本相同，800 ℃时失重量相近.但CO2气氛下中低温热解过程几乎不放热，反应级数也变为3级，与N2气氛完全不同.@利用热重分析仪研究了植入金属氧化物对褐煤半焦水蒸气气化反应的影响，并对其气化反应机理及动力学特性进行了分析.实验结果表明：水蒸气气化反应温度和负载的过渡金属氧化物是影响半焦水蒸气气化反应的重要因素.随着气化反应温度的升高，反应速率加快；Fe-Zn形成的复合金属氧化物铁酸锌对半焦气化反应具有最强的催化作用，达到最大气化反应速率的时间最短，具有最小的表观反应活化能(166.89 kJ/mol).@利用STA449F3同步热分析仪，在50 ℃~1 500 ℃温度下，对4种粒度的半焦和焦炭进行CO2气化实验.结果表明，粒度对半焦和焦炭的反应性影响不大，粒度越小，半焦和焦炭的气化反应温度越低，反应越易进行.粒度变化对半焦中挥发分析出温度和起始反应温度几乎无影响.半焦的失重主要由挥发分的析出和固定碳的气化引起，焦炭的失重则只是由固定碳的气化引起.半焦的最大气化速率随粒度减小呈现加快的趋势，焦炭则呈减慢的趋势.@以生物质和褐煤共气化半焦为研究对象，向生物质与褐煤混合热解获得的半焦中植入Fe(NO3)3后进行共气化，制备了活性半焦脱硫剂，利用固定床实验装置对脱硫剂的脱硫性能进行考察，并通过BET和XRD等检测手段对脱硫前后样品的比表面积和晶体结构进行表征.结果表明，负载Fe3O4的生物质与褐煤共气化半焦具有良好的脱硫活性；植入10%Fe的脱硫剂在O2和H2O存在的条件下，脱硫效率最高，硫容最大，达到764.1 mg/g；在脱硫剂吸附SO2的过程中，O2首先化学吸附在活性半焦表面的C活性位点，形成C(O)络合物，作为SO2被氧化的活性位点，金属氧化物促进了半焦表面对O2的化学吸附，形成更多的活性位点，并将SO2氧化为SO3，在水蒸气存在的条件下生成硫酸储存在半焦的微孔中，并有少量的金属硫酸盐(Fe2(SO4)3)生成.@基于密度泛函理论的方法，对硫覆盖度为0.22的Ni(111)表面上合成气甲烷化的反应机理进行了研究.描述了Ni(111)含硫表面上各种反应分子和可能中间体的稳定构型，相对于Ni(111)表面，反应物CO的吸附能降低了0.30 eV，而重要中间体CH2，CH3和HCO吸附能分别下降了0.11 eV，0.24 eV和0.23 eV.得出在0.22 mL硫覆盖度的Ni(111)表面上CO通过加氢反应生成甲烷的最优路径为：CO+4H→HCO+3H→CH2O+2H→CH3O+H→CH3+H→CH4，而在Ni(111)洁净表面甲烷化时，HCO的进一步加氢则容易生成CHOH，这说明表面S原子的存在使CO甲烷化的路径发生了改变.@采用热重-差热分析法，研究了水煤浆中水分分布特征.通过水煤浆脱水率、Zeta电位、粒径、动态稳定性和黏度等指标的对比分析，研究了聚合氯化铝(PAC)调节水煤浆脱水性能以及错流过滤实现水煤浆浓缩的可行性，对比研究了平纹丙纶滤布与土工布过滤分离的性能.结果表明，添加PAC可以增加水煤浆中自由水的质量分数，显著提高水煤浆的脱水速率.添加0.01%(质量分数)的PAC，可以同时满足动态稳定性、黏度和脱水速率等要求；实验设计的错流过滤装置，能快速将水煤浆的质量分数由52%提升至65%以上，平纹丙纶滤布的水透过通量与煤水分离效果优于土工布.@利用矢量网络分析仪测定煤样及其相关含硫模型化合物的吸波特性，得到0.5 GHz~2 GHz频段是微波辐照脱除硫醚/硫醇类有机硫的最佳频率范围；使用不同频率的微波辐照开展炼焦煤脱硫实验，通过X-射线光电子能谱(XPS)解析，辐照前后煤中有机硫质量分数的变化.结果表明，频率为0.84 GHz和0.915 GHz的微波对硫醚/硫醇类的脱除效果远高于频率为2.45 GHz的微波.@研究了不同比例下顶装焦与捣固焦均匀混合后焦炭的等温连续热反应，结果表明：当顶装焦与捣固焦分别以3∶1，2∶1和1∶1的质量比混合进行反应时，捣固焦优先于顶装焦与CO2反应，使顶装焦的反应性(CRI)较单独使用时明显降低，反应后强度(CSR)明显改善.随捣固焦混合比例的增加，混合焦炭的CRI增大，CSR减小，其中，顶装焦的CRI减小，CSR增大，捣固焦的CRI增大，CSR减小，并且混合焦炭的CSR和CRI的实测值与计算值接近.混合焦炭可使优质焦得到保护，保障焦炭整体的骨架支撑作用.@采用立式煤粉燃烧电阻炉装置，研究了燃烧气氛(O2/N2和O2/CO2气氛)、石英砂质量分数和氧气体积分数对半焦燃烧时N2O生成特性的影响.结果表明：燃烧气氛对N2O收率无明显影响，随着温度升高，N2O收率显著降低(最大降幅为1.96%)；添加石英砂对N2O收率影响明显，在石英砂质量分数为50%，温度为1 300 ℃时，N2O收率较未添加石英砂时增加约2.5%；N2O收率在低氧气体积分数(20%)时受氧气体积分数影响，在高氧气体积分数(40%)时受焦炭颗粒数量影响.@以矿热炉法生产电石过程中产生的二次废料为添加剂，在不同添加量下，对不同挥发分煤的燃烧特性及其动力学行为进行分析.结果表明，当二次废料添加量分别为4%(质量分数，下同)，8%及6%时，王佐煤、石嘴山煤及二者混合煤燃烧效果最佳；当二次废料添加量一定时，煤粉挥发分含量越高，燃烧促进作用越显著；随二次废料添加量增加，煤粉燃烧温度区间整体上呈变窄趋势；动力学分析结果与煤粉燃烧特性实验结果相一致.@采用制备液相色谱，分别用石油醚、甲苯与无水甲醇对低温煤焦油进行洗脱，对含氮化合物进行富集，使用GC-MS与XPS分别对洗脱液和残留物质进行分析.结果表明，以硅胶和硅酸的混合填料(质量比为3∶1)为色谱柱填料，检测出4种吡啶类化合物，占1.59%(质量分数，下同)；6种苯胺类化合物，占4.18%；7种喹啉类化合物，占6.91%；两类吲哚化合物，占0.97%；咔唑类化合物，占0.56%以及腈类化合物，占0.26%.含氮化合物主要为碱性含氮化合物，非碱性含氮化合物质量分数极低.@采用等体积浸渍法制备了Ni/ZnO-Al2O3催化剂，以含酚油为原料，通过固定床实验筛选出了最优的脱硫催化剂，并评价了其对含酚油脱硫不脱酚的最佳工艺条件.结果表明，ZnO粒径越小，其制备出的脱硫催化剂脱硫活性越高；较高的反应温度和较低的体积空速有利于提高Ni/ZnO-Al2O3对含酚油的脱硫效果.Ni/ZnO-Al2O3脱硫剂脱硫不脱酚的适宜操作条件为：常压，温度320 ℃~340 ℃，空速0.2 h-1，此时Ni/ZnO-Al2O3催化剂的脱硫率达99.1%，且可稳定运行200多小时.该催化剂在常压临氢条件下，可以实现对含酚油脱硫且不脱酚，不仅解决了工艺难题，也大大节约了生产成本.@以煤萃取反萃取分离所获得的疏中质组分为原料，通过简单的炭化过程制备了泡沫炭并进行了石墨化处理.采用热重分析、傅立叶红外光谱、扫描电镜与透射电镜以及压汞仪等对原料的结构特征、热反应性质及产品特性进行了分析表征.结果表明，煤疏中质组因其在分离的同时并行发泡，形成微纳尺度下的泡状结构，且分子质量中等，灰分极低，有较强的黏结性能，是制备煤基泡沫炭的优良前驱体；经塑型和炭化后所制得的泡沫炭主要由球形“泡”和超薄“泡壁”构成三维立体结构，泡孔密集且连续排布，泡沫炭孔隙率最高可达81.32％.疏中质组中最主要的作用力是氢键作用，是导致萃取反萃取过程析出疏中质组分结构疏松并呈现泡状结构的最主要原因；疏中质组本身的微纳级泡状结构，使其成为炭化过程中生成的热解气体的聚集地，并由此推动泡孔不断长大，从而形成所需要的泡沫炭泡孔结构.@针对徐州华润彭城发电厂三期工程超超临界凝汽式机组(2×1 000 MW 级机组)，研究混煤与各单一煤在燃烧特性上的关系，设计煤采用晋中烟煤，校核煤采用徐州混煤，任选4种不同煤质的单煤，并按照不同质量分数两两混合，通过热重实验分析比较各煤种的燃煤特性，以及难燃煤质量分数的改变对混煤特性的影响.分别采用加权平均法、线性规划法和模糊综合评判法等数学方法优化配煤，得到彭城发电厂最优混煤配比，与该电厂实际运行配煤结果进行比较，验证模型的可靠性和适用范围.结果表明，采用线性规划法获得的配比可为电厂节省百万元配煤成本.@
Three high-sodium Zhundong coals have been experimentally studied by system of tube furnace and inductively coupled plasma atomic emission spectrometer. The occurrence mode and evaporation of sodium are the key research topics. The results indicate that the sodium existing in the typical Zhundong coals is mainly in the form of water-soluble sodium and acid-soluble sodium. Sodium occurrence mode has a great influence on the transformation of sodium. Soluble sodium mainly volatilizes into gas phase during combustion, and the more sodium coal contains, the more sodium volatilizes. Most of sodium has volatilized below 1 000 ℃, and the higher temperature, the higher volatilize rate of sodium under various temperatures. There are signs that sodium volatilizes in abundance at short temperature range, and the more water-soluble sodium content is, the more obvious this surge phenomenon is.@Oxidation and spontaneous combustion of coal could be controlled by restraining coal chemical adsorption O2, because the initial stage of coal oxidation is the process of coal chemical adsorption O2. Using the Gaussian 03 program, the mechanism of interaction of Zn2+ and α-aldehyde structure in coal is studied by using density functional theory (DFT) method at the B3LYP/6-31G (d, p) level. And the restraining oxidation effect of Zn2+ on α-aldehyde structure in coal is characterized by activation energy to provide base for studying technology of inhibition coal spontaneous combustion. The results show that sp0.02d0.02 orbital of Zn2+ and sp12.20d0.01 orbital of 20O atom in C10H7CHO structure hybridize forming σZn-O coordinate-covalent bond, its second order energy is 131.84 kJ/mol. When C10H7CHO structure is being oxidized, the first step is that O2 is adsorbed physically onto —CHO group to form complex I, and release heat 30.86 kJ/mol. Secondly, O2 is adsorbed chemically onto it by chemical action of the molecules in complex I. The activation energy is Ea=66.87 kJ/mol during the whole process. After forming [ZnOHCC10H7]2+ coordination complex by α-aldehyde structure in coal with Zn2+, the heat released by —CHO group physically adsorbing O2 is decreased 19.38 kJ/mol, and the activation energy of chemical adsorption is increased 52.34 kJ/mol. Consequently, we can get the conclusion easily that inhibition effect of Zn2+ on α-aldehyde structure in coal is particularly noticeable.@Two low rank coals were dewatered and upgraded by hydrothermal dewatering process in this article. Water concentration of the upgraded coals decreased a lot, while the fixed carbon content and heat value increased. The pyrolysis characteristics curves of upgraded coals were delayed towards the high temperature region. The pyrolysis start temperature increased and the maximum mass loss rate of upgraded Zhaotong coal and Zhundong coal present a different variation trend through hydrothermal dewatering. The mass loss of both Zhaotong coal and Zhundong coal decreased along with the increasing hydrothermal dewatering temperature. The pyrolysis characteristics analysis was also conducted on deashed low rank coals. Results indicated that the deashed process could increase the mass loss rate of pyrolysis effectively and the main effect of hydrothermal dewatering process was to reduce the active component of low rank coals and narrow the mass loss peak of low rank coals.@To understand the fuel consumption in the coal storage yards of coal-fired power plant better, experimental studies on the oxidation characteristics of lignite storage were carried out both in coal and laboratory. The field experimental results showed that the coal quality changed a lot with the storage time increased, which turns out to be less calorific value and moisture, more ash, and smaller average particle size for the decreasing of large particle and increasing of small particle. The experimental results also showed that with the increasing of laboratory lignite storage time, the trend of TG curve was consistent with the field testing results, while the DTG curve shifted to low temperature which results to a higher weight loss peak, the corresponding kinetic parameters, activation energy E decreased while frequency factor A increased. The laboratory experiment results were consistent with the field test results.@The pyrolysis processes of lignite at 1 000 K-2 000 K were studied using ReaxFF molecular dynamics simulations. The effects of temperature on the product distributions were analyzed. The elementary reactions of sulfur transfer in thiophene, thiophenol and thioether structures, as well as the sulfur forms existed in pyrolysis products were searched. It was determined that the sulfur atom compositions in pyrolysis products were dependent on temperature. At high temperatures, escaping of sulfur atoms from lignite was inhibited. In the pyrolysis process, sulfur atoms in thiophene, thiophenol and thioether structures transferred to each other by the reactive intermediates of sulfur radicals. Most of sulfur atoms existed in thiophene and thioether forms in the final products of pyrolysis.@Fugu bituminous coal was pyrolyzed with hot boiler ash from a circulating flui-dized bed as solid heat carrier. The effect of pyrolysis temperature (470 ℃-630 ℃) on the yield and properties of products were investigated. The distribution of sulfur and nitrogen from the raw coal into products were analyzed. The results showed that with increasing pyrolysis temperature, the yield of char decreased, the yield of gas increased from 0.97% to 5.44%, the yield of tar increased from 1.96% to 8.07%. The content of light-oil in the tar accounted more than 80% and decreased with the increase of pyrolysis temperature. The ash melting point of char-ash is higher than 1 000 ℃. After pyrolysis of coal, about 70% of sulfur was distributed into char, while about 90% of nitrogen was distributed into char.@The pyrolysis experiments of the raw coals and the treated coals were conducted in a chamber electric furnace. The emission regularity of the sodium in the raw coals and the treated coals were determined. And the effect of colloid additive on the emission regularity was also determined. The results show that the emission of sodium increases with the increasing temperature. The emission of sodium mainly take place in the temperature range of 700 ℃-900 ℃. Adding appropriate amount of silica sol can decrease the emission of sodium effectively. However, adding aluminum sol can promote the emission of sodium, and the emission of sodium increases with the increasing adding proportion.@The co-gasification characteristics of PRB coal and a type of biomass (American bamboo willow) were studied in an atmospheric fluidized bed gasification system with the scale of 1 kg/h at the temperature of 850 ℃, 900 ℃ and 950 ℃, under the conditions of oxygen and carbon ratio being 1.0, 1.1, 1.2, 1.3 and 1.4, and the ratio of biomass to the total mixture being 20% and 40%. The results showed that with the increase of temperature, the content of H2 gradually increased, while the content of CO, CH4 and QHHV (syngas heating value) gradually reduced, the production of synthetic gas and carbon conversion increased considerably. With the increase of n(O)∶n(C), the content of CO, H2, CH4 and QHHV decreased, the synthetic gas yield and carbon conversion increased. With the increase of biomass ratio, the content of CO, H2 and CH4 decreased firstly and increased soon afterwards, QHHV increased more, and the synthetic gas yield and carbon conversion increased. The amount of soot is higher at the condition of n(O)∶n(C) being 1 than that under the condition of n(O)∶n(C) being 1.3.@Carbon deposition characteristics of Fe-based oxygen carriers under different temperatures (650 ℃, 750 ℃, 850 ℃, 950 ℃) and different atmospheres (CH4, CO+H2) in the chemical-looping combustion process are studied in a bench scale fluidized bed. In addition, the effects of water vapor and CO2 on carbon deposition characteristics are also studied. Experimental results show that carbon deposition of Fe-based oxygen carriers is observed under both CH4 and CO+H2 atmospheres. The amount of carbon deposits is smaller under CO+H2 atmosphere than that under CH4 atmosphere. The amount of carbon deposits reduces with the increase in temperature and the minimum amount appears at the temperature of 850 ℃ under CO+H2 atmosphere. Carbon deposition can be restrained by the addition of water vapor and CO2 with the effect of water vapor apparently better than CO2.@To study the properties of two direct coal derived liquefaction initial product , the true boiling point (TBP) curve and 17 narrow fractions were obtained using the TBP distillation apparatus, and density, recative molecular mass, elemental composition and the critical property of narrow fractions were investigated. The results showed that the difference between fractional compositions of two coal derived liquefaction initial product is small. Meanwhile, the differences between relative molecular mass, density, and elemental composition of narrow fractions in two samples are both small. At last, the critical properties of two products calculated by Riazi-Daubert method are similar, and showed the same trend that the critical temperature and critical volume increased and the critical pressure decreased with cut temperature.@In direct liquefaction the gas-phase product of Wucaiwan coal (WCW) and its individual macerals (vitrinite:WCWV, inertinite:WCWI) was analyzed. The direct liquefaction reaction was investigated in 0.05 L microautoclave, meanwhile the composition of the gaseous products was analyzed by gas chromatography. At 380 ℃, the order of gas yield is: WCWV>WCWI>WCW; at 420 ℃, the order of gas yield is: WCWV>WCW>WCWI. For the three samples, the content of C1-C4 and COx varied differently with the temperature increased in the liquefaction process. For WCW, the content of C1-C4 and COx increased apparently with temperature increased, for WCWI, the content increased slightly, for WCWV, the content showed a decreasing behaviour. The distribution of liquefied gas products was studied, hydrocarbons gas content order is: CH4>C2H6>C3H8>C4H10, among them, CH4 and C2H6 gas accounts for about 67% and 22%, the total content of C1-C4 gas is about three times of COx gas; the content of CO2 reach up to 69% in COx gas. Gas phase product generally presents rich alkanes, rich methane and rich carbon dioxide.@Long flame coal and its pyrolysis blue-coke are used to prepare briquettes based on several kinds of binders, and the forming mechanism of briquettes was studied by XRD and SEM. The results showed that the best optimum formula for AB composite binder is following: while the added amount is 11% and the mass ratio of A and B is 5∶3, corresponding briquette has high strength and waterproofing. The composite binder convert into hydration phase C, which can stably existence and closely combine with the coal or blue-coke particles and further make briquette possess higher strength. Moreover, there are more C and better combination between C and those particles in the blue-coke briquette than long flame briquette, which result in the higher strength of the former than the latter.@Removal of quinoline-insolubles in high temperature coal tar by solvent-sedimentation with xylene and solvent oil as solvent was analyzed. The effects of the ratio of aromatic hydrocarbon and aliphatic hydrocarbon, solvent ratio, sedimentation time and sedimentation temperature on the QI content and the yield of refined coal tar were investigated. The results show that the higher sedimentation temperature and the longer sedimentation time is conducive to QI removal within a certain range; the yield of refined coal tar increased and the QI content decreased firstly and then increased with the ratio of aromatic hydrocarbon and aliphatic hydrocarbon increased; the QI content decreased and the yield of refined coal tar increased firstly and then decreased with the solvent ratio increased. When the solvent ratio is 1, the ratio of aromatic hydrocarbon and aliphatic hydrocarbon is 0.6, sedimentation 2 h at 75 ℃, the yield of tar can reached 75.48%, the separation of QI can reached 87.7%, the QI content is reduced to 0.178%.@Phenolic resin was used as the modifier and the method of blending was used to modify coal tar pitch. The pyrolysis characteristics of coal tar pitch modified with different blending ratio were investigated by TG-FTIR. The results show that with the increase of the content of phenolic resin, n(H)∶n(C) in the modified coal tar pitch decreases gradually, and the intensity of the transmission peak at 2 953 cm-1 (—CH3) and 2 924 cm-1 (—CH2—) is gradually decreased; while the intensity of the transmission peak at 1 512 cm-1 (benzene ring CC) ,1 232 cm-1 (aromatic ether bond =C—O—C) and 1 101 cm-1 (aliphatic ether =C—O—C) gradually increased; the initial weight loss temperature of modified coal tar pitch increases gradually and the maximum weight loss rate decreases gradually; the content of the volatile matter in the modified coal tar pitch is separated from the wide temperature range, and the actual weight loss rate of the modified coal tar pitch is more than the theoretical weight loss rate. The phenolic resin and coal tar pitch were cross-linked, the addition of phenolic resin decreased the release amount of aromatic hydrocarbons, aliphatic hydrocarbons and CH4, and the precipitation of the volatile products occurred in a wider range of pyrolysis temperature, and the release amount of aromatic hydrocarbons and CH4 is extended from low temperature to high temperature.@The basic properties of light and heavy oil of Shaanxi Shenmu low temperature coal tar were determined. The coal tar was cut into four fractions of <220 ℃, 220 ℃-260 ℃, 260 ℃-300 ℃ and >300 ℃ by atmospheric distillation. The extraction of phenol from three fractions of <220 ℃, 220 ℃-260 ℃ and 260 ℃-300 ℃ was studied with the method of acid and alkali, and total phenol content and minimum soda-oil ratio was determined. The optimum soda washed conditions was determined by orthogonal experiment, and under optimal conditions, the total yield of phenol of light oil fraction segments corresponding 92.23%, 89.99% and 87.91%; heavy oil fraction segments corresponding to a yield of 94.60% of total phenols, 91.88% and 90.73%. The properties of phenol formaldehyde resin synthesized by the mixture was studied, and phenol resin of light and heavy oil’s viscosity and solid content were 3.18 Pa·s, 3.73 Pa·s and 79.39%, 82.15%.@Granular activated carbon was made from Ningxia Lingwu bituminous coal, Guizhou lean coal, bagasse char and additives in this study. An orthogonal experiment method was employed to research the optimum preparation conditions. The effect of coal type, blending ratio of coal and additives on caramel decolorizing rate of the resulted activated carbon was studied. The results show that the optimum conditions are as following: the ratio of Ningxia Lingwu coal to Guizhou coal 8∶2, the bagasse char proportion 20%, the ammonium polyphosphate proportion 8%, the proportion of Na3PO4 1%, the carbonization temperature 550 ℃, the activation temperature 930 ℃, the burn-off rate 70%, at which the granular activated carbon is 97.1% in caramel decolorization rate, 0.37 cm3/g in micropore volume, 0.28 cm3/g in mesopore volume, 0.068 cm3/g in the pore volume between 2.6 nm-4.8 nm, and 2.81 nm in average pore diameter respectively. Pore structure analysis show that the micropore is negative to adsorb pigments in the sugar, the mesopore is helpful to improve the decolorization performance, and the pore volume between 2.6 nm-4.8 nm has significant effect on decolorization.@Xinjiang coal was used to prepare porous carbon directly through one-step steam activation. The effects of activation time and particle sizes of the raw material on the activation process were investigated. Meanwhile, the effect of removing ash before and after activation was compared. The results show that the specific surface area of the activated carbon can reach 1 300 m2/g with a high yield of 30% at the optimal activation time of 120 min and particle sizes of raw materials in the range of 150 μm-180 μm. It’s suitable for removal of ash after activation. The capacitive performance of the resulting porous carbon was evaluated as electrodes in supercapacitor. In 6 mol/L KOH electrolyte, the capacitance of 149 F/g can be obtained in a three-electrode system. The assembled supercapacitor cell presents superb cycle stability and almost no capacitance decay is observed after a consecutive 30 000 cycles.@Blue-coke/polyaniline composite material, which exhibits the double layer capacitance and pseudocapacitance properties, was synthesized after vacuum heat treatment and acid-base deashing respectively and through initiating the in-situ polymerization of aniline in the pores or on the surface of blue-coke. FTIR, proximate analysis of blue-coke, conductivity and capacitance tests showed that the weak interaction between blue-coke and small molecule organic compounds can be destroyed, small molecule organic compounds was removed and specific capacitance of blue-coke/polyaniline was enhanced effectively when vacuum heat treatment at low temperature. The specific capacitance and the energy density of blue-coke/polyaniline can increased to 169.4 F/g and 24.1 Wh/kg. The wettability of aniline and specific capacitance was reduced and interfacial interaction between polyaniline and blue-coke was weaken when deashing treatment of blue-coke.@X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) was used to analyze the nitrogen and sulfur occurrence of Shenmu coal and Shenmu char. Gaseous products in combustion of Shenmu coal and Shenmu char were studied with online thermogravimetry-mass spectrum (TG-MS) system by equivalent characteristic spectrum analysis (ECSA). The nitrogen morphology in Shenmu coal and Shenmu char is in the following descending order: N-5, N-6, N-Q and N-X.NH3 and HCN are detected out as the major precursors of NOx, while the volume of HCN is larger than that of NH3 for both Shenmu coal and Shenmu char. NO and NO2 emissions are lower for Shenmu char than those of Shenmu coal. The sulfur morphology in Shenmu coal and Shenmu char is in the following descending order: S1, S2 and S3. H2S and COS are detected out as the major precursors of SO2 in combustion of Shenmu coal. COS and SO2 are not detected out in the combustion of Shenmu char. Nitrogen and sulfur-containing gases are released earlier for Shenmu coal than that for Shenmu char, and the volumetric flow rates are much greater for Shenmu coal than that for Shenmu char.@Desulfurization of Wuhai coal was carried out by microwave combined with sodium hydroxide solution. By the orthogonal experiment, the best desulfurization condition was ascertained, and the effect factors of desulfurization such as coal particle size, concentration of sodium hydroxide solution, microwave irradiation time and irradiation power were investigated. What’s more, the desulfurization mechanism with this method was also analyzed. Through the comparative analysis to the spectrum of SEM, XRD and FTIR, the coal properties before and after the experiment were researched. The results indicated that sulfur of Wuhai coal can be removed off 29.53% by microwave in sodium hydroxide solution, and the coal matrix have no significant changes. What’s more, the microwave dielectric response of solid mixtures were measured with different concentration of sodium hydroxide solution, and the effect of electric field to organic sulfur molecule was simulated and calculated by the software-materials studio.@The low rank coals before and after low temperature drying process were characterized using Fourier-transform infrared spectrometer. Variations in the main functional groups of the low rank coals before and after the drying process were analyzed based on the curve-fitting analysis. It was found that the aliphatic hydrocarbons in the coals after the drying process disappear gradually with the increasing drying temperature. Compared with the methyl groups, the methylene groups with higher activity were preferably oxidized in the low temperature drying process. The main oxygen functional groups containing the carboxyl groups, hydroxyl groups, carbonyl groups and ethers decrease with the increasing drying temperature. The carboxyl groups decrease quickly with the increasing drying temperature and the carbonyl groups are more stable than the other functional groups. The aromatic C=C groups of Yimin (YM) coal decompose at 230 ℃. While, the aromatic C=C groups of Tianchinengyuan (TC) coal decompose at 190 ℃. It can be deduced that the metamorphic grade of low rank coal increases with the increasing temperature during the drying process, which improve the coal rank to some extent.@Hypercoal was extracted by NMP at 380 ℃ from lignite, long flame coal, gas coal and fat coal. The structural changes of hypercoal were characterized by means of ultimate analysis, FTIR, TG and the classified extraction test at room temperature. The effect of coal rank on the thermoplasticity of hypercoal was studied by TG and Gieseler fluidity test. The results showed that, compared to raw coal, there is more hydrocarbons in hypercoal, so it has better thermoplasticity and caking ability. The caking index of hypercoal from non-caking coal can reach 90 or more. With the increase of raw coal rank, the aliphatic hydrocarbons and oxygen-containing materials in hypercoal reduced, aromatics increased, average molecular weight get larger, weight loss reduced. Blending hypercoal which prepared from low rank coal into Tangshan 1/3 coke coal, the softening point of mixed coal reduced, and the thermoplasticity of mixed coal improved with the rise of coal rank of hypercoal.@Based on the principle of “similarity”, ultrasonic microwave synergistic extractions of different metamorphic degree raw coal and tectonic coal were conducted using chloroform as a solvent, and Fourier-transform infrared spectroscopy(FTIR), chromatography column chromatography and mass spectrometry (GC-MS)methods were applied to analyze the structure and composition of extracts. The results reveal that: as the increase of coal metamorphism degree, raw coal extraction rate is less than tectonic coal as a whole, the raw coal extraction rate showed a trend of decrease, and the tectonic coal extraction rate increased, which mainly depends on the change in the evolution process of coal body structure. The dissolution behavior of extracts presents stage and explosive, fatty substances is particularly evident, which has a relationship with the occurrence of small molecules from different metamorphic degree tectonic coal. Chromatography mass spectrometry and infrared spectroscopy consistent predictable results, the extraction yield of aliphatic hydrocarbons is much higher than that of aromatic hydrocarbons. At the same time, the cause of coal-formed hydrocarbon are discussed by the microscopic theory of hydrocarbon generation and chemical kinetics theory, and the chromatographic theory describes the migration of hydrocarbons.@Based on the fragmentation model of single particle pulverized coal, the method for characterizing fragmentation level by using fragmentation ratio was proposed. The first-step fragmentation in pyrolysis process was studied by simulation with setting outside-in circles in the cross-section. Therefore, the mesh of model was also drawn according to the concentric circles. It is found that the diameter of coal particle is a key influence factor for its fragmentation. The smaller the diameter is, the bigger the specific surface area becomes; the higher pressure with the same swelling stress is, the more obvious fragmentation behavior appears. The swelling stress in pyrolysis process becomes higher with the increase of volatile content. Meanwhile, the void ratio also increases because of the separation of gaseous volatile from the wall of coal, which reduces the yield strength of coal particle and makes the fragmentation easier. The temperature gradient in the initial step enlarges with the increase of combustion temperature. Hence, the devolatilization becomes faster and the swelling stress increases, which makes the fragmentation happen.@The infrared spectroscopy and isothermal heating pyrolysis experiment were performed to study the main molecular structure and pyrolysis characteristics of Dongsheng and Yallourn lignite. The main work was done to investigate the influence of pyrolysis temperature on pyrolysis gas composition, gas yield and gas heating value. The results show that both lignites had abundant aliphatic hydrocar structure and oxygen containing functional groups. The content of CO and H2 increase gradually with the increasing of pyrolysis temperature, and CO2 content of gas reducing dramatically. The calorific value and yield of the gas increased accordingly. During the pyrolysis, Dongsheng lignite have a higher yield of H2, and it is more suitable as raw material for hydrogen production.Under the same temperature, the calorific value of pyrolysis gas obtained from isothermal heating is higher than that of programmed temperature.@This paper builds a new calculation model adapted for underground coal gasification (UCG) process, which is based on comprehensive calculation method that divides the UCG process into carbonization and gasification, combines with the related theories of calculation method of reaction equilibrium, introduces the equilibrium constant equations of CO2 reduction and the reaction of carbon with steam, and considers the particularly factors influence of UCG process including methane emission, groundwater permeation, mining rate of working face, gasifier drainage, heat transfer of surrounding rock and gas leakage. The model is used for simulating calculation of Huating UCG field experiments, and the results are compared with measured data, which reflect the vast majority of relative errors between the theoretical value and measured value are less than 5%, showing high accuracy. This model could be used for prophase research of UCG projects, to provide scientific reference for design and selection of relevant technological parameters.@The feed of Shenhua direct coal liquefaction solvent hydrotreatment unit was used as the hydrotreatment feedstock in this experiment. The activity evaluation of hydrotreatment catalysts for direct coal liquefaction oil hydrotreatment was carried out in the 300 mL fixed bed reactor unit. The results show that compared with the imported catalyset (HTS-358), the domestic catalyst (FFT-1B) has obvious advantages in reducing the density and nitrogen content of the hydrogenated oil and improving the hydrogen-donating ability of the solvent oil. Hydrogen consumption to use the domestic catalyst is 0.2%(mass fraction) higher than that to use the imported catalyst. The cracking activity of the domestic catalyst is lower than that of the imported catalyst. Hydrogenation active metals content in the domestic catalyst are 20% higher than that in the imported catalyst.@The catalytic hydrogenation experiment on direct coal liquefaction (DCL) oil was carried out in a fixed-bed reactor using Ni-W/γ-Al2O3 catalyst, which aims to investigate the effects of reaction temperature and hydrogen pressure on the distribution of gas and liquid products. The results showed that the contents of hydroaromatics and alkanes increased with the raising of temperature. When the temperature was over 500 ℃, methane and ethane contents increased sharply which indicated drastic crack reaction occurred under the condition. The hydroaromatics increased with increasing reaction pressure, while the increase was alleviated when the pressure was over 4 MPa. The methane content increased with higher pressure. The analysis of distillates and elements of the feed oil and liquid products (300 ℃, 4 MPa) indicated that the volume fraction of light oil increased from 11% to 17%; the catalyst activities of HDN, HDS and HDO were 35.56%, 72.73% and 24.20%, respectively. The n(H)∶n(C) in the liquid oil was increased from 1.37 to 1.52.@Powdered blue-coke as the main raw material, chunks of coal briquette were made by stamping methods with addition of adhesion bituminous coal and binder, and then made into formed coke in the tunnel kiln carbonizing. The formed coke was used as the main raw material in cupola smelting iron. Experimental results show that: the Shenmu powdered blue-coke as the main raw material obtained good dropping strength, 97.0% and 97.0%; the formed coke via a tunnel kiln carbonizing had dropping strength (91.0% and 93.5%), fixed carbon content (86.5% and 88.2%), calorific value (22.77 kJ/g and 27.81 kJ/g); and when it was used in cupola, the pressure reduced, breathability significantly improved, melting temperature of hot metal reached 1 421 ℃ and 1 418 ℃, good effect of smelting iron was obtained, which met the casting requirements fully.@Lignite blue coke powder from Xinjiang Hami Sandaoling was formed with composite binder to prepare molding metellurgical coke. The components ratio of blinder for formed coke was optimized by measuring the cold and thermal strength of the products. The effects of temperature and pressure on the compressive strength were investigated and the surface morphologies of the formed coke at different carbonization temperatures were studied by SEM. The results indicated that the optimum composition of the binder was 3.65% starch, 2.81% pitch, 0.33% organic calcium, 0.49% Fe2O3, 34% water. The compressive strength of formed coke increased with increasing pressure during briquetting. With the increase of temperature, the compressive strength of formed coke reduced significantly at 300 ℃-500 ℃, while then increased at 500 ℃-900 ℃. The strength at low temperature mainly came from physical interactions such as van der Waals forces and  electrostatic force, with the increase of temperature, the bridge bonding formed by pyrolysis of starch and pitch was the main reason. As temperature increased over 500 ℃, the compressive strength was enhanced by the bonding reaction from organic calcium and Fe2O3 with char particles.@This paper introduces the application and performance optimization of low-nitrogen combustion technology in nitro oxides(NOx) emissions control for a lean-coal fired 300 MW tangentially fired boiler. Effects of the combination of low-nitrogen burner, air-staged combustion technology and tertiary air down-operating technology on the control of NOx emissions are studied. The experimental results indicate that after the retrofit on the combustion system by the application of new type low-nitrogen burner together with air-staged combustion and tertiary air down-operating, the NOx emission concentration at the entry of SCR-denitration system can be lowed to around 460 mg/m3 (O2=6% O2, dry) from 1 100 mg/m3 (O2=6% O2, dry). The NOx emission concentration drops by more than 50% averagely, which proves that the retrofit is effective. The retrofit solution and experimental results can be taken as a reference for the low NOx retrofit and performance optimization of lean coal-fired boilers.@The purified pitch whose ash content lower than 0.03% was prepared by solvent method with medium temperature coal pitch as raw material, aromatic hydrocarbons and alkane as solvent, the spinning asphalt which softening point was 250 ℃ was prepared using methods of the air purge, high temperature thermal polycondensation and blown film evaporation; the softening point, isotropy, the microstructure morphology of the carbon fiber was characterized. Using polarization microscope, heating stage ,scanning electron microscope (SEM), the effect of aromatic hydrocarbons and alkane ratio, temperature and time on preparing purified pitch, and the effect of temperature, air purging on isotropy of pitch after polymerization were studied. The results showed that the aromatic hydrocarbons and alkane ratio, subsidence temperature and time had great influenced on the purification of pitch, and air purge to a certain extent could improve the molecular weight of asphalt, guarantee the production rate of pitch, temperature control under 360 ℃ would prevent the formation of mesophase.@The humic acid(HA) extraction experiment was carried out with three regions lignite of Zhaotong(ZT), Xiaolongtan(XLT) and Xianfeng(XF) as raw material. Factors such as content of humic acid in coal sample, yield of humic acid product and quality were the analytical indicators to investigate the adaptability of lignite. Comprehensive evaluation was conducted by the proximate analysis and content of oxygen-containing functional group. The experimental results showed that yield of humic acid of three kinds of lignite were 76.13%, 47.61% and 43.48%, respectively; and the proximate analysis indicated that the ash yield(16.83%) of humic acid product of Zhaotong lignite was relatively higher than the other two, which the ash yield was 6.66% and 4.63%, respectively. For the oxygen-containing functional group in humic acid product, especially for the content of total acid group and carboxyl group, there was less difference among three kinds of lignite. But the content of functional group in extraction residue of Zhaotong lignite was far less than that in extraction residue of Xiaolongtan lignite and Xianfeng lignite, which meaned Zhaotong lignite was suitable for humic acid extraction.@In this study, char supported Fe-based sorbents were prepared by ultrasonic assisted co-precipitation method, the desulfurization and regeneration performance of the char supported sorbents were investigated in a fixed-bed quartz reactor, and the crystal phases, functional groups of fresh sorbents and the sorbents before and after regeneration were analyzed by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectrometry. The results showed that the char supported Fe-Zn-Cu sorbent had the best performance during desulfurization and regeneration. The addition of Zn and Cu significantly improved the desulfurization performance. The sorbents which were regenerated by steam showed good stability and maintained good desulfurization performance after several sulfidation-regeneration cycles.@In this paper, the fast pyrolysis of Inner Mongolia Yangshita bituminous coal with circulating ash as the solid heat carrier was carried out in a bench scale reactor, and the effects of the pyrolysis temperature on nitrogen distribution in products were investigated. The results showed that the nitrogen in coal was released into the gas phase only in the form of NH3 and HCN at the range of 530 ℃-660 ℃, and no N2 was detected. The circulating ashes had no obvious catalytic effects on the cracking of nitrogen heterocyclics in tar and char, but it could fix part of NH3 and HCN released during pyrolysis in ash. Comparing with the inert heat carrier, the yields of HCN-N and NH3-N decreased by 24.53% and 29.86% when the coal was pyrolyzed at 600 ℃ using circulating ash as heat carrier. Furthermore, the main influencing factors in circulating ash were also investigated by adding the alkaline earth metals into the inert quartz sand.@In this paper, a kind of Ningxia paper making sludge and coal mixture with different ratios was investigated. Thermal analysis coupled with mass spectrometry was used for the characterization of samples and identified the volatiles evolved during the heating of the sample up to 1 000 ℃ under combustion condition. The transformation of eight kinds of heavy metals(Pb, Cr, Cu, Zn, Ni, Mn, Hg and As) also investigated by atomic absorption spectrometer and atomcic fluorescence spectrometer, respectively. The results show that the paper making sludge and coal mixture burning stability, the amount of heavy metals in the ash after burning in line with GB 4284-1984, will not cause secondary pollution to soil and water conservation. Part of heavy metals migrate in the flue gas during combustion, therefore should adopt the way of adsorption and dust removal combination to deal with flue gas, avoid atmospheric pollution during the recycling of the sludge.@The Mn-Ce/TiO2 monolithic honeycomb catalyst was prepared by sol-gel method. We explored the effect of different process conditions on the catalytic activity of Mn-Ce/TiO2 catalyst when it was applied in removing of NOx in flue gas. The experimental results indicated that the catalytic activities of catalyst were significantly affected by the high volume fraction of NO, space velocity ratio and O2 volume fraction. Transient response experiment showed that the NO react with strong adsorption of NH3 in the form of gas or a few weak adsorption state. Oxygen played an important role in SCR process and promoted the generation of surface chemisorptions oxygen. O2 not only promoted the surface oxygen generation on the catalyst, complemented lattice oxygen, but also promoted the adsorption of NO.@Taken lean coal of Huoerxinhe coalmine in Shanxi as object, coal samples are extracted by different solvent using the way of solvent extraction. The extracts and residues are analyzed by column chromatography and X-ray diffraction(XRD) respectively. The results show that the highest extraction rate is by tetrahydrofuran(THF), next is by carbon disulfide(CS2), acetone and ethanol, the lowest extraction rate is by benzene. Except the extract of CS2, the content of total hydrocarbon is higher than the content of non-hydrocarbon in the extract of other solvents. Meanwhile, as the effect of extraction enhances, the mass fraction of non-hydrocarbon compound increases. After solvents extraction, the value of the aromatic lamellae spacing(d002),  stack height (Lc) and layer numbers (N) in the basic structure units of residues increase, but the value of the diameter (La) of residues decrease compared with microcrystalline structure parameters of the unextracted coal.@Thermal expansion property of three lignites were determined using static thermo-mechanical analysis (TMA), and the effect of coal characteristics on thermal expansion property was analyzed. The influence of different loading ways of force, temperature, coal characteristics on the fragmentation behavior, and correlation between thermal expansion and fragmentation were researched through roller drying experiments. The results show that the thermal expansion property varies among three lignites, maximum expansion and shrinkage was positively related to raw coal moisture.In drying process, coupling loading way of thermal and mechanical force produced a synergistic effect than single loading way, thermal force caused the evolution of pore and crack structure, mechanical strength of particle was reduced, and external mechanical force made fragmentation phenomenon more pronounced meanwhile quantity of fine particles increased significantly. Thermal expansion and fragmentation characteristics of lignite had negative correlation, the higher the raw coal moisture content, the stronger the thermal expansion property, more prone to breakage and pulverization.@Based on the extraction and stripping method and inbuilt model of coal structure, all group components of Huaibei Tongting coal, Xuzhou coal and Pingdingshan coal were extracted fractionally by solvents of n-hexane, methanol, acetone, chloroform, CS2 and THF in proper order. The extracts of all levels were analyzed by GC-MS.The results show that dissolution behavior of organohalogen compounds in the extracts mainly appear in the process of chloroform extraction. Dissolved matter mainly includes chloro-substituted aliphatic compounds, chloro(bromo)-substituted aromatic compounds and chloro-substituted heterocyclic compounds, their relative molecular mass is in the range of 94 to 250. The chloro-substituted heterocyclic compounds with smaller pores embedded and network embedded states occurrence are mainly distri-buted in the dense medium and loose medium components; the chloro(bromo)-substituted aromatic compounds with smaller pores embedded state are mainly distributed in the heavy component; the chloro-substituted aliphatic compounds in three different occurrence states are distributed in all group components.@Alkali-acid deashing treatment on Ordos coal at different temperatures is carried out, and the changes of the structure before and after demineralization of coal are compared by elemental analysis, FTIR, TG and SEM. After alkali-acid treatment, the water content and ash content of coal reduce greatly, and the ash content reduce to 0.84% at high temperature (240 ℃). The treatment reduces the oxygen content and meanwhile enhance the carbon content and calorific value of coal. Room temperature alkali-acid treatment could accelerate coal pyrolysis, making the particle size of coal more evenly. High temperature alkali-acid treatment reduces the volatile matter of coal, slows the thermo-gravimetric curve, and promotes polymerization reaction between small molecules, increases the compactness of the coal, therefore the coal surface is rough. It indicates that alkali-acid treatment plays a good role in upgrading coal, and the effect is more remarkable at high temperature.@Based on Gieseler fluidity test of coal as a starting point to research the fluidity property of coal, weighted average fluidity lgFwa and maximum fluidity lgFm are put forward respectively to represent the average and the best quality of gel in the whole stages , and the soft-solid temperature range Tr-Ts is proposed as a parameter to reflect the amount of gel. Beside, a model of comprehensively evaluating the property of gel is proposed by factor analysis, as a result, a new fluidity index F is reported. The relationships between index F and the properties of coal have better regularity than that of lgFm. Index F is verified to be a comprehensive reflection of the fluidity property for coal.@In order to understand the sulfur transformation characteristic of Fuan coal pyrolysis in the poly-generation process of circulating fluidized combustion combined with coal pyrolysis, the effect of temperature, heating rate and solid heat carrier on sulfur distribution in products were investigated in a fixed bed reactor with solid heat carrier. The ash and gasification char show a significant action on sulfur retention, about 40% sulfur in coal is transferred into solid heat carrier at 650 ℃. The difference of mineral matter forms in ash and char cause higher sulfur retention in char, but the difference decreases with the increase of pyrolysis temperature. Compared to temperature programmed, higher temperature avails to reactions between Fe2O3 and CO, H2 to form FeO, so more sulfur is retained in solid heat carrier in rapid pyrolysis.@This article mainly studied the pyrolysis characteristics of lignite, biomass, and the mixture of lignite and biomass through analyzing thermogravimetric, to investigate whether there is a synergistic effect between biomass and lignite co-pyrolysis process. The results showed that the temperature of initial pyrolysis and the maximal volatiles released peak was equal to the single biomass under the condition of 1∶1 proportionally-mixed of lignite and biomass, the final pyrolysis temperature brought forward in a large margin compared with lignite, and the weight loss rate of mixture pyrolysis in different stages were greater than the mean value of single biomass. In addition, the pyrolysis process of lignite, biomass and the mixture of lignite and biomass were described by first and second level reaction kinetics model, and it was found that the activation energy of different temperature ranges of mixture were less than that of the single lignite or biomass in the main process of pyrolysis by calculating the kinetic parameter, and the pyrolysis was proceed easily. It proves that biomass has auxo-action for the pyrolysis of lignite, and the synergistic effect exists in co-pyrolysis of lignite and biomass.@Co-pyrolysis of waste tyre and coal was performed using thermal gravimetric analyzer, and the effects of blending ratio and heating rate on the weight loss characteristics of mixture were analyzed. The results show that the violent polycondensation reaction occurred in the pyrolysis of coal and waste tyre separately, and the DTG curves overlap at 400 ℃-480 ℃. Adding waste tyre can promote the coal pyrolysis, with the mass fraction of waste tyre increase, the peak zone of coal pyrolysis gradually moves towards the low temperature zone, and the weight loss rate continuously improves. The co-pyrolysis experiment of mixture in different heating rate show that increasing heating rate can promote the pyrolysis reaction in lower heating rate range (15 K/min-20 K/min); when the heating rate is too high (>20 K/min), it can make the volatile in the sample particles produced by pyrolysis too late to escape and appear cage effect, so as to reduce the weightlessness rate of the samples.@The dominant impact factors of combustion performance of semi-coke were discussed by thermo-gravimetric analysis. The mechanism of difference in combustion performance of semi-coke was revealed by specific surface area and pore structure analyzer and scanning electron microscopy. The results demonstrate that pyrolysis environment is an important factor of the combustion performance of semi-coke. For the same coal, the combustion performance of semi-coke deteriorates with the increase of temperature and time during the pyrolysis process and can be predicted via the fuel ratio of semi-coke. But the fuel ratio can’t be used to predict the combustion performance of semi-coke from different coals. Internal moisture content of coal is the key influence factor of combustion performance of semi-coke and can be used to predict the combustion performance of semi-coke. BET specific surface area and micro surface features of semi-coke are the main cause affecting its combustion performance, and closely related to the air-dried moisture content of pyrolysis coal.@In this paper, the underground gasification process of Hebi bituminous coal is simulated using UCG experimental system, and the residual char is collected after the UCG. The leaching behavior of pollutants in the residual char in underground water is investigated. The results show that the leaching solution of residual char in UCG contains organic pollutants (e.g. volatile phenol) and inorganic pollutants such as heavy metal ions of Cd, Pb, As, Cr, Cu, Ni, Zn, etc. The leaching temperature and time are the important factors to affect the pollution concentration in leaching solution of residual char. When the leaching temperature is 45 ℃ and leaching time is 8 h, the mass concentrations of volatile phenol, total organic carbon (TOC) and chemical oxygen demand (COD) in leaching solution of residual char reach 0.03 mg/L, 5.07 mg/L, 7.48 mg/L, respectively, and the concentration of heavy metal ions is ranging from 4.0 μg/L to 73.4 μg/L. The groundwater may be subjected to pollute through large-scale UCG.@Taking Xinjiang Fukang Xigou coal as the research object, we investigated the mixed solvent of methanol (MET) and wash oil (WO) under alcoholysis condition, alcoholysis behavior of alcohol-alkali system and liquefied performance of alcoholysis residue, and compared the results with that of direct liquefaction of coal samples. The results showed that θ=320 ℃, t=60 min, m(solvent)∶m(coal)=10∶1, mass ratio mMET∶mWO=8∶2 was appropriate alcoholysis condition. Under this condition, alcoholysis rate was 21.8%. When alkali-coal ratio=0.8∶1, alcoholysis rates were 51.3%, 27.4% respective after adding NaOH or CaO as alcoholysis catalyst. When wash oil was used as hydrogen-donor solvent, we directly liquefied alcoholysis residue and compared with the results of the direct liquefaction of coal samples, the total liquid yield of the coal samples of direct liquefaction was 62.3%, and the total liquid yield of zero-alkali alcoholysis, CaO alcoholysis, NaOH alcoholysis were 71.0%, 72.7% and 83.2%, increased by 8.7%, 10.4% and 20.9% respectively. Meanwhile, alcoholysis products were used for FTIR and TG-DTG, SEM characterization, and the gas products from catalytic alcoholysis and direct liquefaction of coal samples were used for GC analysis.@Effects of various iron-based composite catalysts on the mild liquefaction characteristics of Hongliulin coal were investigated using batch autoclave. Ultimate analysis and FTIR were used to study the elemental compositions and functional groups of preasphaltenes (PA) and asphaltenes (AS) produced with different catalysts. The results showed that under the mild liquefaction conditions (reaction tempreture 430 ℃ and initial hydrogen pressure 4.0 MPa), the catalytic activity of γ-FeOOH can be improved significantly by mixing other catalysts, and the catalytic activity of ternary composite catalysts were better than that of binary composite catalysts. Compared with γ-FeOOH, the oil yields were increased by 3.88% and 6.12% under the optimal binary and ternary catalysts. The composite catalysts could promote the hydrogenation of PA and AS simultaneously, especially the hydrogenation of AS.@Zhaotong lignite was taken as study object in this paper. After pretreatment, white rot fungus Coriolus versicolor was used to liquefy and its bio-solubilized lignite was analyzed by 13C NMR subsequently. Results show that lignite without pretreatment cannot be liquefied at all, while nitric acid oxidized lignite plays strong liquefaction. Liquefaction in DOX culture is about 10 times as that in SMB culture. Besides, liquefaction in shake table is better than that in standing condition, while shaking with 120 r/min is worse than that with 60 r/min because more bloom of hypha body growth. According to 13C NMR spectrum, bio-solubilized Zhaotong lignite contains oxygen-containing functional groups such as ≡C—O—(80.7×10-6), —CH2—O—(59.0×10-6) and —COOR(179.6×10-6) et al, which attributes to oxidation reaction in bio-solubilization of Zhaotong lignite by white rot fungus Coriolus versicolor.@K2CO3 and Na2CO3 were added to coking blending coal, and the tamping coke were then prepared from these blending coals. The technological properties of coking coal and thermal properties of coke were tested. The effect of potassium and sodium on the pyrolysis of coking coal were analyzed using DTG, and the influence of potassium and sodium on the properties of coke were studied using XRD and SEM. The studies showed that w(Vdaf) of the coking coal increased, but the G and Y decreased with the increase of the added amount of potassium and sodium. Weight lessness peak appeared in the DTG curve of the coking coal at 200 ℃, and the rate of pyrolysis increased between 400 ℃ and 600 ℃ because of potassium and sodium. The cold-state strength of coke reduced, the thermal properties of coke became worse, the Lc of coke decreased, the La of coke had almost not changed, the d002 of coke increased, and the graphitization degree of coke decreased with the increase of the added amount of potassium and sodium. The high levels of potassium and sodium made coke destructed by CO2 more easily, thus reducing the structural strength of coke.@The inoculum was selective culture by controlling the domesticated conditions. The changes of pH, SCOD and co-F420 of sludge in the process of domestication, as well as the daily gas production and total gas production were analyzes. The results show the optimal domestication plan coenzyme for inoculum is 35 ℃ temperature, feed rate of 2 g/d, and domestication time 30 d. The maximum value of co-F420 is 0.037 3 mmol/g on the 20th day, far greater than that of the control group P0 0.011 0 mmol/g on the 19th day, which reveals that the domesticated inoculum can help anaerobic microorganisms enrichment, especially the methanogenic bacteria. This experiment can open up new ways to peat transformed into biomethane, expand additional coal resources for coal gasification.@Using Taixi coal and coal-based activated carbon as carbon source, sodium silicate as silicon source and Fe(NO3)3·9H2O as catalyst, nano-silicon carbide powder was produced by sol-gel method via carbonthermal reduction way. The effect of n(Fe)∶n(Si) on the crystal phase and morphology were researched by means of XRD, SEM and BET. The results showed that, the stacking faults of SiC decreased with the increasing value of n(Fe)∶n(Si) when using Taixi coal as coal source and the morphology of SiC changed from partial whisker to nanoparticles in the meantime. On the other hand, when using coal-based activated carbon as carbon source, all the silicon carbide produced had a weaker stacking fault relatively and its size increased slightly when the value of n(Fe)∶n(Si) increased and its grain size maintained between 50 nm-100 nm.@The dissolution of metal ions such as Fe, Al, Ca, Mg, K and Ti from coal gangue were investigated under two different activation ways, thermal activation and thermal activation with Na2CO3 as additive. Hydrochloric acid was used as leach media. ICP-OES was used to determine the metal ion concentration in the aqueous phase. XRD and IR were used to analyze the mineral components in the coal gangue samples before and after activation, as well as the leaching residues. The dissolution properties of the metal ions were explained according to the mineral existence form of the metals in the coal gangue. The results show that Al, Fe, Ca and Mg can be quantitatively dissolved from the coal gangue after thermal activation. Only 31% of K can be dissolved in the experimental condition, while Ti can be barely dissolved. Thermal activation with Na2CO3 as additive can promote Al dissolution, the impurity metals ions like K, Ti and Na were largely dissolved into the leach liquor at the same time, which brings difficulty to prepare high-purity of aluminum products. The dissolution characteristics were specially investigated for the thermal activated coal gangue. By pre-leaching the activated coal gangue sample in 6 mol/L hydrochloric acid for less than 5 min can remove most of the impurity metal ions, by pre-leaching the activated coal gangue sample in ≤1 mol/L hydrochloric acid first can remove Ca and Mg, then in ≥8 mol/L hydrochloric acid can removal Fe.@Dibenzyl sulfide (DBS) and dibenzyl disulfide (DBDS) were selected as the model sulfur-containing organic compounds, and diphenylmethane (DPM) methylene was employed as the active hydrogen source, the effects of reaction temperature on the breaking of Calkyl—S bound in DBS and Calkyl—S and S—S bonds in DBDS and on the heat transfer of sulfur were investigated. The results show that the Calkyl—S bond in DBS doesn’t break below 200 ℃, whereas it can effectively break above 225 ℃. For the model compound DBDS, Calkyl—S and S—S bonds can effectivley break at 200 ℃. The reaction mechanism is considered as radical reaction, the heat transfer paths of sulfur in two kinds of compounds are very similar. The main heat breaking products are toluene (PhMe), diphenylethene (DPE), diphenylethane (DPEA) and triphenylethene (TPE), and there are very little amount of other orgnic sulfur-containing compounds. This work indicates that the Calkyl—S bond in DBS and Calkyl—S and S—S bonds in DBDS can effectively break under relatively mild conditions, the thermally breaking sulfur can mainly move out in the form of H2S and another little amount of sulfur is transferred to other sulfur-containing orgnic compounds.@The adsorption mechanism of lignite surface oxygen containing functional groups adsorbing water molecules was studied using the quantum chemistry density functional theory (DFT). The results show that the hydrogen bonding interaction is the main force. Two hydrogen bonds are formed when water molecule adsorbed on the carboxyl group with the shortest hydrogen bond of 0.173 3 nm. When water molecules adsorbed on the phenol hydroxyl and alcoholic hydroxyl, optimal adsorption configuration is that oxygen containing functional groups act as the hydrogen bond donor and water molecules as the hydrogen bond acceptor, and the hydrogen bonds length are 0.187 6 nm and 0.192 7 nm respectively. When water molecules adsorbed on the carbonyl and ether linkage, the hydrogen bonds are formed with length of 0.196 1 nm and 0.206 0 nm respectively. Mulliken Population analysis show that the oxygen atoms in oxygen containing functional groups acquire electrons, the O—H, C=O and C—O bond are impaired, and the bond length are elongated. The calculation results of adsorption energy agree with the change rule of adsorption equilibrium distance. The order of adsorption strength from large to small for water molecule adsorbed on the oxygen containing functional groups is carboxyl, phenol hydroxyl, alcohol hydroxyl, carbonyl, ether linkage. The result of water molecule adsorbed on phenol hydroxyl in line with the theory of Lennard-Jones, the stable adsorption equilibrium is achieved at a distance of about 0.188 5 nm and the adsorption energy is -45.63 kJ/mol.@High temperature heat treatment for Zhaotong anthracite were conducted under 1 400 ℃, 1 700 ℃, 2 000 ℃, 2 200 ℃, 2 400 ℃ and 2 600 ℃ respectively, and then examined by CA, XRD and SEM methods. The results showed that the moistures, ashes and volatiles content matter of Yunnan anthracite phase transited and lossed with the increment of the heat treatment temperature, and the higher the heat treatment temperature was, the more rapid and thorough the three phase transformation was. Besides, ultra-high temperature heat treatment could make the anthracite transform into graphite anthracite, the fixed carbon would transform from amorphous to crystalline phase, and the higher the heat treatment temperature was, the higher the regularity degree of the internal carbon atoms was, the aromatic layer structure gradually developed perfectly, and thus the higher of the graphitization degree was.@Based on the theory of coal structure chemistry, the carbon composition differences between deformed coal and its demineralized sample were comparatively studied with solid state 13C-NMR analysis. The results show that the impact of mixed acid treatment demineralization on the allocation proportion of aromatic carbons, aliphatic carbons and O-containing functional groups is insignificant, but has some impact on the carbon composition. After demineralization structure ratio increasing obviously included fat methyl carbon, methoxyl/aromatic methoxyl carbon and bridge aromatic carbon, structural damage is obvious; structure reducing significantly includes methylene/methyne carbon, aliphatic carbon bonded to oxygen in cyclic hydrocarbon, alkylated aromatic and protonated aromatic carbon. The important impact of demineralization by mixed acid treatment on deformed coal structure has some changes of aromatic fused ring structure, aromatic cluster size increases in the demineralization samples.@The purpose of this paper was to test the pyrolysis charecteristics of Shenmu bituminous coal and Baorixile lignite at super-high temperature by means of thermogravimetric analysis and different scanning calorimeter. The pyrolysis and gasification of the bituminous coal in CO2 atmosphere was also included in this paper. The study shows that the weight loss rate still remains significant between 1 000 ℃ and 1 600 ℃, in which 4.49% of the lignite and 6.21% of the bituminous coal by weight volatilized. A significant weight loss peak of the lignite between 1 200 ℃ and 1 500 ℃ was observed. At the range of 200 ℃ to 949 ℃ and 969 ℃, the pyrolysis of bituminous coal and lignite are exothermic respectively. Apart from this, the pyrolysis process was mainly endothermic. The maximum net heat released during the pyrolysis of the bituminous coal and lignite was 728 mJ/mg and 1 776 mJ/mg respectively. Below 800 ℃, the pyrolysis in CO2 atmosphere has a strong resemblance to that in N2 atmosphere and the weight losses were also barely different at 800 ℃. But in CO2 atmosphere it is barely exothermic below 800 ℃ and became 3-order reaction in contrast to 1-order and 2-order reaction in N2 atmosphere.@Effects of impregnation of metallic oxides on lignite char gasification were studied using the thermogravimetric analyzer. The characteristics and kinetics of gasification reaction were analyzed. The experimental results show that the temperature and metallic oxides loading are important factors to influence the reaction rate and activation energy during steam gasification of char. As the gasification temperature increasing, the gasification reaction rate increases. Fe-Zn complex oxides catalyzed the gasification reaction of char, and the apparent activation energy of the reaction is reduced to 166.89 kJ/mol under the present experimental conditions.@The gasification reaction tests of 4 different particle sizes of semi-coke and coke were performed in CO2 atmosphere using a STA449F3 simultaneous thermal analyzer at 50 ℃-1 500 ℃. The results show that particle size does not affect the reactivity of semi-coke and coke much. The gasification reaction temperature of semi-coke and coke will be lower as the particle size decreasing, and the gasification reaction goes on easier. But the particle size variation has almost no effect on the volatile releasing temperature and initial reaction temperature of semi-coke. The weight loss of semi-coke is mainly caused by both the precipitation of volatiles and the gasification of fixed carbon, while the coke weight loss is only caused by the fixed carbon gasification. The maximum gasification rate of semi-coke speeds up with the decreasing of particle size, and for the coke the trend is reverse.@Biomass and lignite mixed chars were impregnated with Fe(NO3)3 to get the activated char desulfurization sorbent using co-gasification method. The characteristics of desulfurization sorbent have been investigated by using a fixed bed experimental apparatus. The specific surface area and crystal structure of the sorbents were characterized by BET and XRD before and after desulfurization. The results showed that biomass and lignite co-gasification char supported Fe3O4 has a good desulfurization activity, and the sorbent supported 10% Fe can be reached to the highest desulfurization efficiency and sulfur capacity (764.1 mg/g) in the presence of O2 and H2O. In the process of SO2 adsorption, oxygen was the first chemical adsorbed on the char’s surface, forming C(O) complex which were used as active sites. Metal oxide promoted oxygen chemical adsorption on the char surface to form more active sites which made the oxidation of SO2 to SO3, the generation of sulfuric acid and a small amount of the metal sulfate (Fe2(SO4)3) stored in the char microspore structure in the presence of water vapor.@Based on DFT method, the purpose of this study is to investigate the reaction mechanism during the CO methanation on the Ni(111) surface with sulfur coverage of 0.22. The equilibrium geometries of reactants and all possible intermediates are represented, and the possible elementary reactions from HCO species are listed. Compared with clean Ni(111) surface, the adsorption energy of CO on sulfide surface decreased 0.3 eV, such as CH2, CH3 and HCO, the adsorption energy of these important intermediates decreased respectively 0.11 eV, 0.24 eV and 0.23 eV.By analyzing the energy barriers of six reaction paths on the Ni(111) surface with sulfur coverage of 0.22 mL, it is concluded that the favorable reaction path of CO methanationis: CO+4H→HCO+3H→CH2O+2H→CH3O+H→CH3+H→CH4. However, on clean Ni(111) surface the HCO species tend to be hydrogenated by forming CHOH, this change of methanation route is due to the effect of sulfur.@The moisture distribution of CWS was analyzed by TG-DSC before and after polyaluminium chloride (PAC) adjustment, the effects of PAC dosage on the dewatering performance of coal-water slurry and the feasibility of cross-flow filtration were conducted, PAC adjustment mechanism was discussed according with several indexes such as dewatering rate, Zeta potential, particles potential, size, dynamic stability and slurry viscosity. The filtration performance of tabby polypropylene fabric and geotextile were compared with the membrane flux and pressure change. The results revealed that PAC can significantly increase the dewatering rate of coal water slurry; 0.01% (mass fraction) PAC can meet the requirements of dynamic stability, viscosity and dewatering rate for long-distance pipeline transport and finally gasification device. The cross-flow filtration device can quickly improve the concentration of CWS from 52% to 65%, and the effect of plain polypropylene fabric’s filtration rate and turbidity were better than that of geotextile.@Vector network analyzer was used to investigate the dielectric property of the coal and model compound. The method of XPS was used to investigate the relative amount of thiols/thioethers in coal before and after microwaves radiation.The results showed that 0.5 GHz to 2 GHz microwave frequency could be obtain the best operation parameters of removing the thiols/thioethers organic sulfur, and removal efficiency of thiols/thioethers from coal by microwave irradiation at the frequency of 0.84 GHz and 0.915 GHz is better than that at the frequency of 2.45 GHz.@The isothermal continuous thermal reaction was investigated by mixing with top charging coke and tamping coke. The results showed that tamping coke should be reacted prior to top charging coke by the mixed mass ratio of 3∶1, 2∶1 and 1∶1, the CRI decreased and the CSR improved obviously for top charging coke. With the increase of the mixing ratio of tamping coke, the overall CRI of mixing coke increased and the CSR decreased, while the CRI decreased and the CSR increased for top charging coke, CRI increased and CSR decreased for tamping coke. The actual values of CSR and CRI of mixed cokes were in close agreement with the calculated values in different mixed ratio. So that using the mixed cokes would make high quality coke get protection, and enhance the skeleton function of overall coke.@The characteristics of N2O were studied in the furnace vertical device under different atmospheres (O2/N2 and O2/CO2 atmosphere), different mass ratio of quartz sand and different volume fraction of oxygen. The result shows that the atmospheres have no effect on the N2O yield, with the temperature increasing, the N2O yield decrease significantly (the maximum drop is about 1.96%); after the mass ratio of quartz sand changing, the N2O yield is influenced obviously, when the mass ratio of quartz sand is 50%, the N2O yield at 1 300 ℃ increase about 2.5% compared with adding no quartz sand; under the condition of low oxygen volume fraction (20%), N2O yield is affected by the oxygen volume fraction, but under the condition of high oxygen volume fraction (40%), it is affected by the number of coke particles.@As to the coal with different amount of volatile, the combusting characteristics was studied and the dynamic characteristics was analysed with addition of different amount of se-condary waste which was generated from calcium carbide production process in dectric arc furnace. The results showed that for Wangzuo coal and Shizuishan coal and their mixture (mixture coal), the suitable mass fraction of the secondary waste added was 4%, 8% and 6% respectively which can lead to the best promoting effect according to the study on coal combusting characteristics. When adding the same amount of secondary waste, the higher of the amount of volatile, the more notable promoting effect in combusting process. When secondary waste increased, the combusting temperature range of coal became narrow. The results from dynamic characteristic analysis was in accordance with that of combustion characteristic analysis, which can lay a foundation for the efficient utilization of secondary waste.@In this study, low-temperature coal tar was eluted respectively with petroleum ether, toluene and anhydrous methanol by the method of preparative liquid chromatograph for enrichment of nitrogen containing compounds, and GC-MS and XPS were used to analyze the elution solution and residual substances. The results show that the substances separated by mixed chromatographic column packing of silica gel and silicic acid (mass ratio 3∶1) contained four kinds of pyridine compounds, accounting for 1.59% (mass fraction, similarly hereinafter); six kinds of aniline compounds, accounting for 4.18%; seven kinds of quinoline compounds, accounting for 6.91%; 0.97% of indole compounds, 0.56% of carbazole compounds and 0.26% of nitrile compound. Low-temperature coal tar nitrogen compounds were mainly alkaline nitrogen-containing compounds, non-basic nitrogen compounds were very low.@Ni/ZnO-Al2O3 catalyst was prepared by isoehoric impregnation. The optimal desulfurization catalyst was selected to remove sulfur compounds from phenol oil in the fixed-bed unit and the optimal technological condition of desulfurization and undephenolization was investigated. The results showed that the smaller of the particle size of ZnO, the desulfurization activity of the prepared desulfurization catalyst is higher. The higher reaction temperature and the smaller LHSV can improve the better desulfurization activity of Ni/ZnO-Al2O3. The optimal operating conditions in desulfurization and undepheno-lization of phenol oil by using Ni/ZnO-Al2O3 as desulfurizer included atmospheric pressure, the reaction temperature of 320 ℃-340 ℃, the LHSV of 0.2 h-1, under which the desulfurization rate would be 99.1% and the catalyst would be stable operation of more than 200 h. The Ni/ZnO-Al2O3 catalyst can realize desulphur and undepheno-lize from phenol oil under hydrogen at atmospheric conditions, which not only solved the technological difficulty, but also greatly saves the production cost.@By simple carbonization processes and graphitized, the carbon foams were prepared from the loose medium component which was separated from raw coal by the method of all-components group separation. Structure characteristics, thermal reactivity of materials and properties of products were analyzed by thermogravimetric analyzer (TGA), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), transmission electron microscope (TEM) and mercury porosimeter, and so on. The results show that the loose medium component foam during the process of separation and form the micronano foam pore structure. The loose medium component, which has not only the intermediate molecular weight, a very low ash content but also good cohesiveness can be qualified to be an excellent carbon foams precursor. The spherical pores and ultrathin walls of the pores themselves constitute the three dimensional structure of carbon foams which was prepared by moulding and carbonization. The distribution of the pores is intensive and consecutive. The maximum porosity of carbon foams can attain 81.32%. The hydrogen bonding interaction is the main force in the loose medium component and it’s the major cause for the loose and bubble structure of loose medium component which was extracted through extraction and stripping process. The micronano foam pore structure itself hold the pyrolysis gases during the process of carbonization and prompt the increase of thepores to form the foam pore structure for carbon foams that we needed.@The relationship of the combustion characteristic between mixed coal and a single coal based on Xuzhou Pengcheng power plant phase Ⅲ project ultra super critical, condensing steam turbine (2×1 000 MW unit) was studied. The Jinzhong coal was used as the design coal and the Xuzhou mixed coal was used as the check coal. Four different kinds coal samples was mixed by different mass fraction, and the combustion characteristic of each coal was analysed and compared used thermogravimetric experiment. Especially, the effect of the change of mass fraction of the hard burnig coal on mixed coal characteristics was tested. The weighted average method, linear programming method and fuzzy comprehensive evaluation method was used to optimize the coal blending respectively. The optimum coal blending ratio was obtained in Pengcheng power plant by these methods. The actual operation results was compared to verify the reliability and applicability of the model. It was showed that the mass ratio obtained by the linear programming method could cut down the cost of coal blending about million yuan for the power plant.@
2018
为使CFB锅炉达到NOx原始超低排放，需要更加深入地理解煤炭燃烧过程中NOx生成和还原机理，其中焦炭对NOx的还原(NOx-char反应)被认为是CFB含氮反应体系中最重要的环节之一.综述了文献中对NOx-char反应的研究结果，围绕基本反应过程、焦炭中矿物杂质作用和影响因素三个部分，较为全面地阐述了焦炭表面NOx还原过程.研究表明，碳原子除可直接作为还原反应物外，还可为CO，H2，NH3等还原性气体提供吸附表面从而间接还原NOx，同时焦炭中的K，Fe，Ca等具有催化活性的矿物杂质能明显促进NOx-char反应.多种还原作用共同存在使得NOx-char反应的影响因素众多，包括煤种、热解条件、反应温度、焦炭粒径、碳燃尽率、CO/O2/H2O/SO2等环境气体、焦炭中矿物杂质含量和化学组成等.另外，很多情况下这些因素并非独立作用，而是相互影响，且常在不同条件下对NOx还原表现出“促进-抑制”两重性质.未来还需更加深入地研究焦炭表面NOx反应体系，特别是定量描述不同影响因素的作用，建立CFB全炉膛NOx排放模型，从而为深度挖掘循环流化床技术的低氮燃烧潜力奠定理论基础.@对比研究了经水泡冷却和通氮气冷却方式制得的低温热解半焦的微观结构和理化性能差异.X射线衍射与傅立叶变换红外光谱分析结果表明：氮气冷却半焦样品的官能团强度和碳原子结构有序化程度比水泡冷却的样品高；氮气吸附结果表明：氮气冷却半焦比表面积较小，且10 nm以下的孔隙发达程度不及水冷半焦；可磨性与转鼓强度测试结果表明：氮气冷却半焦样品的可磨性比水泡冷却半焦低20%，抗碎性能高于后者；热重分析结果表明：相较氮气冷却半焦，水冷半焦的燃烧着火点降低了19 ℃，平均燃烧速率更快，燃尽性能更好.@以内蒙古不连沟次烟煤为原料，在加压热解装置中考察了530 ℃，3.5 MPa条件下热解气氛(N2+H2，N2+H2O和N2+H2O+H2)对碳酸钾催化剂催化煤热解产物产率及性质的影响.结果表明：碳酸钾的分解以及碳酸钾催化剂促进煤中含氧官能团的断裂，导致大量CO2的产生；与N2气氛下催化热解相比，N2+H2和N2+H2O气氛促进了焦油和CH4的生成；在N2+H2O+H2气氛下热解，焦油产率进一步增至7.62%，CH4产率增至2.06%；相同气氛下有/无催化剂的热解实验结果表明，H2对碳酸钾催化剂的催化作用影响较小，H2O气氛下碳酸钾能促进碳水气化反应的进行；实验考察范围内，气氛的改变对热解半焦的比表面积及其气化反应特性的影响较小.@为拓宽多段直立热解炉的适用范围，以陕北低阶碎煤为实验对象，搭建移动床层阻力测定装置和连续热解实验装置，研究不同因素对移动床层阻力和气体含尘量的影响，并分析热解产品的性质.结果表明：床层阻力分别随气体流速和床层高度的增加而增大，随下料速度的加快而减小，床层静态阻力比动态阻力高15%左右，气体流速影响最为显著，其次为床层高度和下料速度；当床层高度和下料速度一定时，气体含尘量随气体流速的增加而增大，粉尘平均粒径为87 μm；热解实验所得半焦产率为66.21%，焦油收率为8.72%，达到格金产率的85%，实验系统热效率为88%.@在微波加热方式下，采用自行设计的两段式石英反应器考察热解温度和吸波剂的添加对褐煤与棕榈壳共热解特性的影响，利用气相色谱-质谱联用仪和气相色谱仪分别对焦油和热解气体进行分析.结果表明：在褐煤与棕榈壳共热解过程中二者存在明显的协同作用，挥发分产率有明显增加.利用活性炭做吸波剂时，焦油产物有一定的轻质化，且轻气体产物中产生较高含量的CO和H2.在600 ℃下，活性炭做吸波剂时，CO和H2在轻气体中的总产率达到91.98%(体积分数).@以中温煤沥青(TP)为主原料，蒽油和煤直接液化残渣精制沥青(CP)分别作为共炭化剂，采用热缩聚法制备中间相炭微球(MCMB).热处理温度为440 ℃，保温时间为8 h.利用偏光、XRD、粒度和元素分析等对生成的MCMB进行表征分析.结果表明：添加蒽油和CP均可抑制TP的过度缩聚，但二者的作用机理不同，蒽油主要是作为溶剂起作用，而CP则会形成晶核参与缩聚反应，并通过氢转移来抑制过度缩聚.随着蒽油的加入，MCMB的收率呈先增加后减小的趋势，当蒽油添加量为5%时，MCMB的收率最高，为52.6%；随着CP的加入，MCMB的收率呈上升趋势，当CP的加入量为30%时，MCMB的收率可达56.8%.由于二者作用机理不同，对MCMB的微观结构影响也不同，添加蒽油对MCMB微晶的有序排列无明显促进作用，甚至会产生不利影响；添加CP则有利于MCMB微晶的有序排列.@选取可再生且“碳零排放”的花生壳为原料，在热解装置中进行热解，得到终温分别为350 ℃，400 ℃，450 ℃，500 ℃和550 ℃的花生壳炭，并对花生壳炭进行工业分析、元素分析、发热量分析、燃尽率实验和热重实验，判断其是否满足高炉喷吹对燃料的要求.结果表明：五种不同热解终温花生壳炭的一些冶金性能达到了高炉喷吹燃料的质量要求，但灰熔点略低于规定温度范围，需要进一步探索优化方案.花生壳热解炭具有满足高炉喷吹冶金性能要求的可能性.@采用前置法和后置法制备添加碱土金属Ca的焦炭.考察不同反应温度下，CO2对焦炭溶损行为的影响，并运用比表面积测定仪、X射线衍射仪和扫描电子显微镜表征焦炭的微观结构.结果表明：添加碱土金属Ca可以提高焦炭的反应性.当温度达到1 200 ℃时，后置法焦炭的反应性和反应后强度均高于前置法焦炭的反应性和反应后强度.用随机孔模型模拟了焦炭溶损反应动力学过程，后置法制备的焦炭溶损反应活化能较前置法制备的焦炭溶损反应活化能低.添加碱土金属后的焦炭微晶结构有序性、微晶尺寸和反应前后的比表面积均发生变化.@以云南省较为典型的三种褐煤为原料，采用碱溶酸析的方法提取其中的腐植酸，考察提取过程常见金属元素K，Ca，Na，Mg，Al，Fe及非金属元素Si的分布规律.结果表明：在腐植酸提取过程中，褐煤中的矿物质主要分布于残渣中；褐煤中金属元素及硅元素含量的本底值和游离态腐植酸在总腐植酸中所占比例决定了残渣及腐植酸中相应元素的含量；腐植酸灰分含量远小于残渣灰分含量.不同种类褐煤所得腐植酸，官能团种类、数量及结构相似，但灰分及矿物质含量差异较大，其中昭通褐煤腐植酸的灰分和各金属元素的含量均高于其他两种褐煤腐植酸，说明不同腐植酸除了通过官能团与金属矿物质进行化学吸附外，还存在大量的物理吸附，这与腐植酸物理结构和表面性质等有关.@在O2/CO2气氛下，采用立管炉研究添加稀土尾矿对烟煤燃烧过程中NOx释放的影响，分别研究温度、稀土尾矿添加量及粒径对脱硝效率的影响.结果表明：0.1 g的烟煤添加稀土尾矿后，当反应温度为1 000 ℃，稀土尾矿添加量为0.05 g，粒径为48 μm～58 μm时，稀土尾矿的脱硝效率是最高的，最大脱硝率占0.1 g烟煤产生的NOx总量的60%.稀土尾矿降低NOx主要由异相催化还原引起，通过对比分析尾矿反应前后的XRD发现，稀土尾矿形成的固溶体体现了稀土尾矿中物质的协同作用.@为探索韩城矿区煤矸石产酸对周围水环境的影响，采集了韩城不同矿区13个煤矸石样品，利用酸碱计算(ABA)实验和净产酸量实验(NAG)对13个样品的产酸潜能进行研究.结果表明：燎原、桑树坪和下峪口三个矿区中新鲜煤矸石都具有潜在产酸能力，但产酸并不强烈；燎原矿区煤矸石酸性潜能相对较高，桑树坪矿区煤矸石酸性潜能相对较低；堆放3~5个月的煤矸石酸性潜能比新鲜煤矸石高出2~3倍，属于潜在强烈产酸.煤矸石中黄铁矿和方解石是决定AP(最大产酸潜能)和NP(中和潜能)的主要原因，相关性分析发现，AP与黄铁矿相关性并不显著，而NP与方解石显著相关.通过对比ABA实验和NAG实验结果，发现NAG实验对煤矸石产酸能力区划分更加详细准确.风化3~5个月的煤矸石相对于新鲜煤矸石产酸潜能较大，有可能形成酸性矿井水并促进煤矸石中有毒元素的释放.@总结了高碱煤燃烧过程中结渣机理的研究现状，概述了高碱煤中碱金属的赋存形式及其在燃烧过程中的演变规律与高碱煤燃烧过程中的结渣机理.煤中赋存的碱金属化合物在燃烧过程中与烟气中的其他化合物反应生成气态的碱金属原子、碱金属硫酸盐、碱金属碳酸盐、碱金属氯化物、碱金属氢氧化物及固态或熔融态的含碱金属矿物质.硫酸钠及硫酸钙在受热面表面形成内白层并捕获烟气中灰颗粒，与之反应生成低熔点化合物，促进渣层的生长.硫酸钠及硫酸钙亦可在固态或熔融态的灰颗粒表面形成液态黏性的涂层.这种带有涂层的颗粒与烟气中含铁矿物质的颗粒加剧了结渣的形成.结合高碱煤结渣的特点，概述了高碱煤的结渣防治技术.@采用四种咪唑基三氟甲磺酸盐离子液体(ILs)，分别对伊犁煤进行自然溶胀和微波辅助溶胀.结果表明：ILs微波辅助溶胀煤效果明显优于ILs自然溶胀煤效果.经ILs微波辅助溶胀后，煤的大分子结构虽然没有发生变化，但煤微观结构变得更为疏松，外观呈层状结构；此外，ILs自然溶胀煤需24 h才能达到平衡，而在微波辅助条件下ILs溶胀煤达平衡仅需20 min；与自然溶胀相比，四种ILs在微波辅助溶胀，溶胀度分别高出7%，23%，37%和63%；热解动力学表明，与原煤样相比，自然溶胀和微波辅助溶胀煤样的活化能分别降低了8.00%和15.54%.@利用热重质谱分析仪(TG-MS)对热处理后肥煤样品的热解特性进行了研究，分析了热失重变化和挥发分析出规律.结果表明：随着煤样热处理温度的升高，热解过程中挥发分总产率逐渐减少，最大失重速率逐渐降低并向高温移动.在热解过程析出的挥发分中，轻气体主要有H2，CO，CO2和H2O，烃类含有脂肪烃、环烷烃及苯、甲苯和二甲苯等；随着煤样热处理温度的升高，热解过程析出的挥发分中烃类减少，最大析出率对应的温度向高温移动；轻气体挥发分析出的温度区间较宽，在300 ℃到800 ℃之间.烃类析出的温度区间较窄，在400 ℃到600 ℃之间.@采用XPS方法分别表征了低、中、高硫炼焦煤的硫赋存形态及分布，并利用TG-MS技术分析了三种煤的失重过程、主要气体和含硫气体的逸出情况.结果表明，三种焦煤的硫形态存在明显差异，中高硫煤中的无机硫比例显著高于低硫煤，噻吩类和亚砜类硫比例低于低硫煤.三种煤的失重过程大致相同且可分为释水及吸附气体的脱除、活泼热分解和二次热解三个阶段.焦煤在热解过程中不同含硫气体的逸出差异较大，但其与原煤中原有硫的形态和总量关系密切.@针对H2/CO合成气同向扩散火焰展开研究，考察了合成气燃烧生成NO的情况，使用Fluent软件对燃烧实验进行了1∶1的数值模拟研究.耦合了详细化学动力学模型以考察燃烧过程中的NO生成机理，研究不同压力与不同n(H2)∶n(CO)比条件下合成气燃烧特性与污染物排放特性，为实际燃烧设备的设计和优化提供理论指导.结果表明，随着压力的增加，H2/CO合成气同向扩散火焰的峰值温度单调增加，压力越高增加趋势越平缓.同时主要的污染物NO生成量也随着压力的增加而显著增加，其中热力型NO占主导地位.此外，随着H2/CO合成气同向扩散火焰中氢气体积分数的增加，合成气同向火焰中产生的NO污染物和火焰峰值温度也有明显的增加.@将六次甲基四胺(HMT)和钼酸铵(AHM)的络合物与霍林河(HLH)脱灰煤机械混合，然后通过一步焙烧制备了不同金属负载量的钼基碳化物与活性半焦(activated semi-coke，ASC)的复合材料.采用XRD，SEM，HRTEM，XPS，H2-TPSR及元素分析等方法对催化剂进行了表征，考察了金属负载量对催化剂形貌以及甲烷化反应性能的影响.结果表明：随着金属负载量的增加，金属活性组分Mo的分散度变差以及存在形态发生变化；CO转化率随着金属负载量的增加而逐渐增大，但是增大趋势变缓；单位质量Mo上的CO转化速率随着金属负载量的增加而逐渐减小；样品20%Mo/ASC由于具有较好的本征催化活性以及最大的催化加氢热解速率，使其具有最高的甲烷选择性.@采用欧拉双流体模型模拟了加压下二维鼓泡床内的气固流动特性，结果表明：在相同的表观气速下，加压使气泡体积分数增大，气泡相与乳化相间的分解越发明显，气固两相流动、混合剧烈；同时，床层中上部颗粒轴向速度的径向分布不均匀性增强：中心区颗粒速度增加，近壁区下降；随着操作压力变大，流化床膨胀高度增大，相应地，整体气含率增大，床层下部的颗粒浓度减小，而上部颗粒浓度增加，固含率在轴向上的分布更均匀；床层压力波动主要由两种成分构成：低频率高幅值和低幅值高频率成分.压力脉动强度随床高的增加呈现先增大后迅速减小的趋势；此外，加压下床层压力脉动强度变大，即床压波动更加剧烈；而且加压下颗粒拟温度增大，即颗粒速度脉动增强.@通过高压釜研究了山东某炼厂的催化裂化油浆(FCC油浆)与新疆哈密地区煤共处理效果.结果表明：当煤粉添加量为30%时，油煤浆的黏度已经达到了1 375 mPa·s，远大于煤直接液化中油煤浆的黏度，不利于泵的输送，因此，如何降低油煤浆黏度是煤油共炼技术要解决的重要问题之一；在煤粉添加量为30%~35%、反应温度为450 ℃、停留时间为2.0 h的条件下，FCC油浆与煤共处理的反应效果较好，转化率超过了98%，油产率基本维持在80%；对FCC油浆进行加氢预处理来改善其性质，可显著降低油煤浆的黏度，同时提高了煤粉添加量为40%条件下的煤油共处理效果，使转化率由92.4%上升至96.5%，油产率由71.12%上升至79.19%.@利用KOH活化工艺制备活性炭，通过正交实验得到最优工艺参数：褐煤粒度为0.075 0 mm~0.150 0 mm(过100目~200目筛)，KOH与活性炭质量比为3∶1，活化温度为600 ℃，活化时间为1 h.最佳工艺时样品的比表面积最大，为504.7 m2/g，石墨化程度低，比电容达107.7 F/g，在2倍电流下比电容保持率达96.6%，在5倍电流下比电容保持率达93.8%，衰减较小，倍率性能良好.@以NaOH为催化剂，通过水解反应降解年老褐煤的大分子结构来制备再生腐植酸，考察了反应温度、NaOH质量浓度、反应时间和水(体积)煤(质量)比对腐植酸收率的影响，结果表明，通过优化水解反应条件可使腐植酸收率由11.25%提高到78.38%.采用元素分析、紫外-可见光谱和红外光谱等对水解反应制备的再生腐植酸结构组成进行了表征.结果表明：再生腐植酸官能团组成与原生腐植酸官能团组成相似，但再生腐植酸的氧含量较低，酸性基团以酚羟基为主，羧基含量较少；原生腐植酸的分子质量比再生腐植酸的分子质量大，但再生腐植酸芳香核上的取代基团数量更多.@研究了干压成型法制备球形高温定形复合相变蓄热材料的工艺.采用粉煤灰为陶瓷基体材料、金属铝为相变介质，以PVA作黏合剂，通过球形模具干压成型后，在室温至1 000 ℃程序控温及无保护气的条件下进行无压烧结，得到直径D为7.5 mm的近球形高温定形相变材料，有望在高温球形堆积床蓄热器中加以应用.研究表明：相变介质含量、坯料量和素坯成型压力对材料的球形度及烧结稳定性有明显影响，烧结后相变介质由最初的单质铝转变为Al-Si共晶合金.当坯料量为0.35 g、成型压力为0.6 MPa时，制备的D7.5 mm球形材料铝含量可达57%(质量分数)，球形度为0.92，密度为1.60 g/cm3，经20次热震后相变潜热为62.49 J/g，相变温度峰值为577.33 ℃.@为提高流化床煤气化炉的碳转化率和处理能力，中国科学院山西煤炭化学研究所对已有的灰熔聚流化床煤气化技术进行了升级，集成快速流态化技术，开发了多段分级转化流化床煤气化技术.该气化炉分为下部浓相射流段和上部快速提升段两部分，下部浓相射流段保留了灰熔聚气化技术的特征；在上部快速提升段，通过强化细粉循环以提高气固接触和细粉停留时间，并采取分段给氧方式以提高气化温度和细粉转化效率.通过基础研究，获得了煤加压热解特性和高温高压气化反应动力学规律；获得了加压气固流态化行为特征，分析了操作参数和关键结构对气固流场、浓度场分布的影响；完成了操作状态下气化炉内气固流动行为的数值模拟计算，研究了二次风对提升段流场的影响规律.在此基础上，建成了3.0 MPa、日处理煤量100 t的中试装置，并开展了1.0 MPa~2.8 MPa压力下的神木原煤及其热解半焦氧气/蒸汽鼓风中试试验研究.中试结果表明：在试验压力范围内实现了平稳长周期操作；可以直接气化热解半焦；带出细粉碳含量明显下降，气化碳转化率最高可达到95%；气化指标达到同类型气化炉先进水平.进而完成了千吨级工业示范装置的工艺软件包设计和经济评估.@为研究煤尘表面微观形貌及表面自由能与润湿性的关系，选取四种典型煤样为研究对象，采用原子力显微镜(AFM)、接触角测量仪分析煤尘表面粗糙度及接触角(θ)，并结合van Oss-Chaudhury-Good理论估算表面自由能.结果表明：煤尘的微观粗糙度与润湿性存在一定关系，粗糙度Sa和Sq与煤尘接触角的相关系数分别为R2=0.940 5和R2=0.872 2，即随着煤尘表面粗糙度的增大，接触角增大且煤尘润湿性变差；由自由能计算结果可知，四种样品均为低能非极性表面，煤尘总表面自由能与接触角数据变化规律一致，煤尘的Lewis碱特征越强，润湿性越好；表面粗糙度与自由能之间存在一定相关性，相关系数为R2=0.842 6.@采用低温氮气吸附法分析了胜利褐煤在低温(350 ℃～600 ℃)热解过程中孔结构的变化，研究了热解温度及脱灰处理对半焦的平均孔径、比表面积和孔径分布等孔结构参数的影响，并利用FHH(Frenkel-Halsey-Hill)模型，分别在相对压力为0~0.50和0.50~0.95内计算了不同的分形维数D1和D2，用以表征煤样的分形特征.结果表明：在热解过程中，半焦的比表面积与孔容积具有相同的变化趋势，与平均孔径呈相反的变化趋势；当热解温度高于500 ℃时，脱灰褐煤转化为半焦的过程中孔结构变得更为发达，比表面积和微孔孔容明显增大，孔径区间在0.45 nm~1.58 nm及2.65 nm~10.00 nm内的孔数量明显增加；FHH模型分析表明，半焦内存在两种变化趋势相反的分形维数D1和D2.D1可以描述450 ℃之前脱灰褐煤半焦微孔表面的粗糙程度，D2可以反映出整个热解过程中脱灰褐煤的中孔孔容粗糙程度.@进行了低变质粉煤(SJC)与重油(HS)、煤沥青(LQ)、焦煤(JM)的共热解实验，主要研究了HS添加量对共热解过程中产品组成与结构的影响规律.利用傅立叶红外光谱(FTIR)和气相色谱-质谱联用(GC-MS)等对固体焦、热解焦油的结构和组成进行分析表征.研究表明：HS的加入可有效改善低变质煤共热解过程中热解产品的产率与结构组成.随着HS添加量的增加，固体焦收率逐渐降低，而焦油收率先增大后减小，煤气收率先减小后增大；固体焦表面酚类、醇类官能团质量分数有所增加；热解煤气中CH4体积分数逐渐增大，H2体积分数则逐渐减少.当HS添加量为20%时，焦油收率达到最大值33%，煤气中CH4与H2体积分数分别增大到33.16%和19.61%，CO+CH4+H2总体积分数达到最大值65.54%.随着HS添加比例的增大，HS中芳香结构的加氢裂解使得焦油中芳香烃含量骤减，同时烷烃和酚类质量分数有所上升，SJC与HS之间的协同作用更加明显，酚类物质含量最大为21.87%，而芳香族物质则减少了24.20%.同时，焦油中轻质组分(C5~C10)含量逐渐增大，而C11~C19与C≥20质量分数则有所降低，HS添加量为20%时，轻质组分含量达到最大值28.81%，而中质组分和重质组分质量分数均达到最小值.@采用自行设计的低温干馏装置，将不同配比下的褐煤-玉米芯混合物进行低温共热解实验.结果表明：当玉米芯配入量为30%(质量分数，下同)时，焦油产率达到最大值11.70%，比褐煤单独热解提高了53.75%.对褐煤、玉米芯及褐煤与玉米芯配入量为30%的混合样进行热重分析可知，玉米芯的添加降低了煤热解初始温度，整个TG曲线向低温区移动，表现出明显的促进热解作用.对热解焦油进行GC-MS检测，发现添加30%的玉米芯后热解焦油的脂肪类和酚类质量分数分别提高了27.79%和193.96%，酸类和杂原子类质量分数分别下降了26.42%和55.19%，轻质油含量由原来的4.68%提高到27.13%.玉米芯的添加实现了热解焦油大幅度轻质化和高品质焦油的生成.@为提高细粒氧化煤表面疏水性，改善浮选效果，选取了三种含有不同疏水尾链的非离子表面活性剂：C12EO15，AC-1215，NPEO15，考查了初始质量浓度和吸附时间对三种表面活性剂在氧化煤表面吸附量的影响，结合FTIR和浮选实验，对比了三者在氧化煤表面的吸附差异.结果表明，疏水尾链结构对非离子表面活性剂在氧化煤表面的吸附效果有重要影响.在实验质量浓度范围内，随着三种溶剂质量浓度增大，氧化煤对溶剂的吸附量及精煤产率均提高；C12EO15可以显著增强氧化煤表面疏水性，浮选精煤产率由49.39%升至84.83%；NPEO15次之，精煤产率最高可达81.14%；AC-1215的吸附效果一般，精煤产率最高可达58.58%.@经过对云南某选煤厂煤泥进行浮选，获得含硫为1.36%(质量分数，下同)的浮选精煤，其中有机硫含量占全硫含量的82.35%，利用物理分选方法进一步脱硫比较困难.采用低温隔绝空气焙烧方法进行煤泥降硫，研究不同焙烧条件对浮选精煤降硫的影响规律，结果表明：在磷基复合药剂(DP)用量为5%，焙烧温度为450 ℃，焙烧时间为40 min，焙烧物料球团直径为小于9 mm的综合焙烧条件下，浮选精煤中的硫含量降至0.30%以下，降硫效果显著，其他有害元素磷和砷等的含量也较低.@通过爆裂过程中起始爆裂时间和持续爆裂时间以及型煤微观形态，探讨了水分、成型压力、混合比例(质量比)和温度对煤泥型煤爆裂行为的影响.结果表明：水分的蒸发是影响煤泥型煤发生爆裂的重要原因；成型压力通过影响煤泥型煤的内部结构进而影响爆裂，成型压力越大，结构越致密，产生的气体越易在煤泥型煤内部集聚，从而越易发生爆裂；煤泥和石灰石混合比例对爆裂行为的影响，主要通过不同混合比例引起的煤泥型煤的结构及成分的变化发挥作用，高质量分数的石灰石形成的煤泥型煤结构更致密，传热速率更快，更有利于爆裂的发生；温度对爆裂行为的影响主要体现在对煤泥型煤内外温度梯度的影响，进而从热应力与化学反应两方面影响爆裂特性.@考查了BP抑制剂对焦炭热态性能、表面形貌及孔隙结构分形描述的影响.结果表明：BP抑制剂能使焦炭试样热态性能明显改善，焦炭开孔数目减少，气孔多呈封闭状，孔容积及比表面积均减小，这种结构有利于抑制焦炭劣化反应.应用动态吸附技术测得了焦炭试样在不同相对压力下的吸附气体量，用Frenkel-Halsey-Hill方程拟合.结果表明：在研究尺度范围内，焦炭孔隙结构存在分形现象，且负载BP抑制剂的焦炭分形维数明显变小，证明BP抑制剂能够渗透或覆盖焦炭孔隙结构，使孔隙粗糙程度降低而趋于光滑，进而有效抑制焦炭劣化反应.@基于Aspen Plus软件建立石油焦流化床空气-水蒸气复合气化模型，该模型的数值模拟结果与实验值能够吻合.利用Aspen Plus灵敏度分析模块考查了气化温度、压强、空气当量比(equivalence ratio)、水蒸气与石油焦质量比(msteam∶mpc，下标pc为petroleum coke)对燃气体积分数、燃气热值和气体产率的影响.结果表明：当选取恰当的空气当量比和msteam∶mpc值时，温度对燃气体积分数影响不大；较大的压强有利于甲烷的产生，使燃气热值提高；随着空气当量比的增加，氧化反应强度增强，燃气热值减少；较高的msteam∶mpc有利于氢气的产生，但水蒸气通入量过高使燃气热值下降；燃气热值与气体产率变化趋势相反.@提出了一种以特殊高强度金属纳米材料作为导热内衬的上升管余热回收吸热装置，并使导热内衬作为控制焦油凝结析出的“温度开关”，即当粗煤气温度高于500 ℃时可增强换热，低于500 ℃则表现为热的不良导体，不仅能以此最大限度地传热，而且能避免上升管内壁结焦.利用该吸热装置设计了一套余热回收系统，对其进行实验测试，得到上升管余热回收吸热装置的有效换热效率为79.16%，焦化炉年节能量为1.668×1011 kJ，确保了焦化生产工艺，提高了出汽率.@选择典型晋城无烟煤和榆林半焦为原料，通过热重法研究原料在不同掺混比下的燃烧特性，制得洁净民用型煤并进行性能评价，得到型煤的燃烧特性及污染物排放规律.结果表明：随着半焦添加比例(质量分数)的增加，型煤抗压强度逐渐下降,热稳定性基本没有变化；随着半焦的加入，型煤的残炭率下降，排放出的NOx降低；半焦型煤NOx排放比无烟煤型煤NOx排放减少65.6%，但CO排放为无烟煤型煤CO排放的2倍；当半焦含量为60%时，型煤燃烧时间最长.@
In order to realize the original ultra-low NOx emission from CFB boilers, it is necessary to deeply understand the NOx formation and reduction mechanisms during coal combustion process. The NOx reduction over chars (NOx -char reaction) is considered to be the most important process in nitrogen reaction system in CFB. The research on NOx-char reaction in literature was reviewed, and the NOx reduction process over chars was thoroughly discussed, focusing on the basic reaction process, the effects of minerals in chars and reaction conditions. The results show that chars can be directly used as the reducing reactant, and provide adsorption surface to the reducing gases, e.g. CO, H2, NH3, catalyzing the NOx reduction. Moreover, K, Fe, Ca and other catalytic minerals in chars can significantly promote the NOx-char reaction. Due to the coexistence of these reduction reactions, many influencing factors will affect the NOx-char reaction, including coal types, pyrolysis condition, reaction temperature, char size, carbon burnout level, CO/O2/H2O/SO2 and other environmental gases, minerals content and chemical composition. Additionally, in many cases, these factors are not independent, but interact with each other, and usually show the two-side effects of promotion and suppression of NOx reduction reaction under different conditions. It is necessary to investigate the system of NOx reaction process over chars further, especially to describe the effects of various factors quantitatively and establish an overall model of NOx emission in CFB furnace, for further exploiting the low nitrogen combustion potential of CFB technology.@The different microstructure and physicochemical properties of low-temperature pyrolysis semi-coke which cooling by water and nitrogen were investigated. The results of X-ray diffraction and FTIR spectroscopy analysis show that graphitization level of nitrogen cooling is higher than that of the semi-coke cooled by water. In addition, the C atoms of microcrystalline edge are less and the absorption peak of functional groups are weak of nitrogen cooling semi-coke sample. The BET analysis results indicate that the specific area of nitrogen cooling semi-coke is smaller and the micropores (the diameter is below 10 nm) are less than that of semi-coke cooled by water. The grindability and tumbler strength test results show that the wear resistance of nitrogen cooling semi-coke is 20% less than that of water cooling sample, and the broken-resistance of nitrogen cooling semi-coke is also higher than the latter. The TGA results also indicate that ignition temperature of water cooled semi-coke is lower than that of nitrogen cooling sample, while the water cooling semi-coke also has faster average burning rate and better combustion performance than semi-coke cooled by nitrogen.@The effects of K2CO3 and atmospheres (N2+H2, N2+H2O and N2+H2O+H2) on the yields and properties of products from pyrolysis of a sub-bituminous coal named Bulian’gou from Inner Mongolia was investigated in 3.5 MPa pressurized reactor at 530 ℃. The results show that the decomposition of K2CO3 and the addition of K2CO3 promoting the fracture of oxygen-containing functional groups in coal enhance the production of CO2 substantially. Compared with the catalytic pyrolysis in N2 atmosphere, the yields of tar and CH4 are promoted with the addition of H2 and H2O. Moreover, during pyrolysis in N2+H2O+H2 atmosphere, the yields of tar and CH4 further increase to 7.62% and 2.06%, respectively. The results obtained from the catalytic and non-catalytic pyrolysis in N2 and N2+H2 atmosphere show that effect of H2 atmosphere on the catalytic performance is limited. In addition, K2CO3 promotes the carbon gasification reaction in H2O atmosphere. Within the scope of the experimental study, effects of changing the atmosphere on the specific surface area and gasification reactivity of chars are not obvious.@In order to broaden the scope of application of multi-stage vertical pyrolysis furnace, with the crushed low-rank coal in Shanbei as the test object, the moving bed resistance testing device and the continuous pyrolysis test device were constructed. The effects of different factors on the resistance of the moving bed and the dust content of the gas were studied, and the properties of the pyrolysis products were analyzed. The results show that the bed resistance increases with the increase of gas flow rate and bed height, and decreases with the increase of the material moving speed. The bed static resistance is about 15% higher than the dynamic resis-tance, and the effect of the gas flow rate is the most significant. When the bed height and the material moving speed are constant, the dust content of the gas increases with the increase of the gas flow rate, and the average particle diameter of the dust is 87 μm. The yield of semi-coke is 66.21%, the yield of coal tar is 8.72%, reach 85% of the yield of Gray-King, and the thermal efficiency of the pyrolysis test device is 88%.@The lignite and palm kernel shell were co-pyrolyzed using a newly developed two-stage reactor under microwave radiation. The effects of co-pyrolysis temperature and catalyst on co-pyrolysis charactenstics were investigated. The tar and gas from pyrolysis were subsequently analyzed using gas chromatography-mass spectrometry and gas chromatograph respectively. The results show that there is a synergetic effect between lignite and palm kernel shell during microwave co-pyrolysis process. The yield of volatile matter increases compared with the calculated value. When activated carbon is used as the microwave absorbent, it seems to change in the tar composition towards smaller molecular weight products and this significantly promote the high content of H2 and CO in the gas phase. The total volume fraction of H2 and CO is 91.98% at 600 ℃.@Mesocarbon microbeads (MCMB) were prepared by thermal polymerization using mid-temperature coal tar pitch (TP) as raw materials and anthracene oil and coal liquefaction pitch (CP) as additives at 440 ℃ for 8 h. The products were analyzed by polarizing microscope, X-ray diffraction analysis, laser particle sizer and elemental analysis. The results show that anthracene oil and CP as addtives can inhibit the excessive poly-condensation of TP. However, the mechanism of action of anthracene oil on TP is different from that of CP. Anthracene oil is as the solvent of TP in poly-condensation reaction, however, CP forms some nucleus at first in the poly-condensation reaction, and inhibits excessive poly-condensationthrough hydrogen transferring. With the addition of anthracene oil increasing, the yield of MCMB increases at first and then decreases. When the amount of anthracene oil is 5%, the yield of MCMB is the highest, which is up to 52.6%. With the addition of CP increasing, the yield of MCMB is increasing. When the amount of CP is 30%, the yield of MCMB is up to 56.8%. Because the effect of anthracene oil on TP is different from that of CP, the effect on the microstructure of MCMB is also different. With anthracene oil added, it has no significant role in promoting the arrangement of MCMB crystallites, and even has adverse effects. While, with CP added, it can promote the arrangement of MCMB crystallites.@The renewable and “carbon zero emission” peanut shells were selected as raw materials for pyrolysis at 350 ℃, 400 ℃, 450 ℃, 500 ℃ and 550 ℃ in tube setting furnace. Then five kinds of peanut shell carbons were analyzed by proximate analysis, ultimate analysis, calorific value analysis, burnout experiments and thermogravimetric tests to determine whether they met the requirements of blast furnace injection for fuels. The results show that metallurgical properties of peanut shell carbons of five different pyrolysis final temperatures reach the standard of stipulating in the blast furnace injection coal, but the ash melting point is under standard of process, which needed to further explore optimization scheme. In conclusion, peanut shell carbons have the possibility to meet the metallurgical properties requirements of injection in the blast furnace.@Cokes were prepared from the coking coal added alkaline earth metal Ca by pre-addition and post-addition methods. The solution loss reaction behavior of coke in CO2 atmosphere at different reaction temperatures were studied, and the microstructures of coke were characterized by specific surface area analyzer, XRD analyzer and SEM analyzer. The results show that adding alkaline earth metal Ca to coke can enhance solution loss reactivity. The reactivity and strength after reaction of coke prepared by post-addition method are higher than that of coke prepared by pre-addition method when the temperature reaches 1 200 ℃. The random pore model is used to describe the solution loss reaction of coke, and the activation energy of coke prepared by post-addition method is lower than that of coke prepared by pre-addition method. The microcrystalline structure, microcrystalline size and specific surface area of cokes prepared by post-addition method are changed.@The three kinds of typical lignite samples in Yunnan Province were used to extract humic acids by base-dissolving acidification method. This research was focused on studying distribution characteristics of metallic elements such as K, Ca, Na, Mg, Al, Fe and non-metallic element Si in extraction process. The experiment results showed that the minerals in lignite are mainly distributed in the residues in the extraction process. The content of the corresponding elements in the residues and humic acids were determined by the background value of the content of the metallic elements and non-metallic element Si in lignite and the proportion of free humic acid in total humic acid. The content of ash in humic acids was far less than that in residues. Although the functional groups of humic acids from different types of lignite were similar in species, number and structure, the content of ash and minerals varied greatly. Among them, the content of ash and various metal elements of humic acid extracted by Zhaotong lignite are higher than that of the other two lignites, which indicates that not only the chemical adsorption exists between different functional groups and minerals, but also physical adsorption exists. This is related to the physical structure and surface properties of humic acid.@The effect of rare earth tailings on the release of NOx in the combustion process of 0.1 g bituminous coal was studied by using a riser furnace under O2/CO2 atmosphere. The influences of temperature, rare earth tailings addition ratio and particle size on denitrification efficiency were studied respectively. The results show that the denitrification efficiency of rare earth tailings (48 μm-58 μm, 0.05 g addition) is about 60% of the NOx total amount produced by 0.1 g bitumionous coal at 1 000 ℃. It is mainly caused by the heterogeneous catalytic reduction. From the result of the XRD, it is found that the solid solution is formed in the reflected earth tailings compared with the sample of no calcined. It reflects the existence of synergistic action between the substances in the rare earth tailings.@In order to explore the effect of coal gangue on the water environment in Hancheng mining area, the acid production potential of 13 coal gangue samples from different mining areas in Hancheng was studied by ABA (acid-base accounting) and NAG (net acid generation) experiment. Static prediction results show that Liaoyuan, Sangshuping, Xiayukou mining area of three fresh coal gangue have the potential ability of acid production, but acid production is not strong. The acid potential of Liaoyuan coal gangue is relatively high, Sangshuping coal gangue is relatively low; piled up for 3 to 5 months of gangue acid potential is 2-3 times higher than fresh gangue, belongs to the potential and strong acids. Pyrite and calcite are the main causes of AP (maximum acid production potential) and NP (neutralization potential). Correlation analysis showed that the correlation between AP and pyrite is not significant, but NP is significantly correlated with calcite. Comparing the results of ABA and NAG experiments, it is found that the NAG experiment is more accurate for the acid production capacity of coal gangue. Compared with the fresh coal gangue, the acid production potential of weathering coal gangue for 3-5 months is higher, it is possible to form acid mine water and promote the release of toxic elements in coal gangue.@A review of the previous research on the mechanism for slagging during the high alkali coal combustion was presented. The occurrence modes of the sodium contained in the high alkali coal and the conversion rule of the sodium during the high alkali coal combustion was summarized as follows: during coal combustion process, alkali metals are released and transported either in the form of solid particles or vapor species in the combustion gas. The main occurrence modes of alkali metals in solid particles is, A-silicates and A-aluminosilicates (A represents K and Na), and the main occurrence modes of alkali vapor species is A(g), ACl(g), A2CO3(g), A2SO4(g), and AOH(g). The slagging mechanism caused during the high alkali coal combustion process can be illustrated as follows: the vaporized Na2SO4 and CaSO4 at high temperature will condense on heating surface and form an initial sticky slagging layer as an adhesive that bonds the subsequent deposits and heating surfaces together and the condensed Na2SO4 and CaSO4 react with the subsequent deposits from low melting point chemical compounds to promote growth of slagging. Furthermore, coating particles due to the condensation of the vaporized Na2SO4 and CaSO4 at high temperature on grain boundary and iron-bearing minerals promote growth of slagging. The mode of boiler slagging prediction and the current control technologies for the high sodium coal slagging were briefly introduced and some potentially promising research topics on the slagging mechanism of the high alkali coal were discussed.@The Yili coal were swelled with four imidazolium-base ionic liquids (ILs) as the solvent at the condition of natural and microwave-assisted. The results show that the microwave-assisted swelling is much more efficient. After microwave-ssisted swelling, the macromolecular structure of coal doesn't change, but the microstructure of coal becomes looser and appears to be layered structure. It takes 24 h to achieve equilibrium for ILs natural swelling coal, but only 20 min for ILs microwave-ssisted swelling coal. In adition, the natural swelling time is 24 h, but the microwave-assisted swelling time only 20 min under 400 W. The microwave-assisted swelling ratio of coal with four ionic liquids were 7%, 23%, 37% and 63%, respectively, higher than that of natural swelling. The  pyrolysis kinetic analysis show that the activation energy of natural and microwave-assisted swelling coals is decreased 8.00% and 15.54%, respectively.@Thermogravimetry-mass spectroscopy (TG-MS) analysis was used to investigate the pyrolysis behavior of raw and thermally pretreated coal samples at different temperatures. The weight loss, weight loss rate and the release of volatiles as a function of temperature were studied. The experimental results show that with increasing the pretreatment temperature of coal, the total weight loss and the maximum weight loss rate decrease and shift to higher temperatures. During pyrolysis, light gases such as H2, CO, CO2, H2O and hydrocarbons including aliphatic hydrocarbons, cycloalkanes, benzene, toluene, xylene and so on, are detected by MS. With the heat treatment temperature increasing, the release of aliphatic hydrocarbon decrease, while the temperature corresponding to the maximum release rate shift to higher temperatures. The release temperature range of light gases is wider (300 ℃-800 ℃), while organic volatiles are detect in a narrower temperature range (400 ℃-600 ℃).@The chemical speciation of low, middle and high-sulfur coal was investigated, as well as the relative amount of sulfur in different kinds of coal with XPS method was analyzed. The weight loss and the pyrolysis gas escaping process were recorded by TG-MS. The result shows that the inorganic sulfur of the middle and high sulfur coal are significantly higher than that of the low-sulfur coal, while the relative amount of thiophene and sulfoxide are lower than that of low-sulfur coal. The weightlessness process of different kinds of coal are similar and can be divided into three stages: the release of water, the removal of the adsorbed gas, lively thermal decomposition and secondary pyrolysis. The escaping process of different sulfur-containing gases in the pyrolysis process is quite different, while it is closely related to the chemical speciation and the relative amount of sulfur in the coking coal.@The experimental research and theoretical analysis on the pollution formation of n(H2)∶n(CO) syngas coflow diffusion flame was carried out. The numerical work was done by Fluent coupled with detailed reaction mechanism. The formation route of NO was investigated. In order to provide guidance for the design and optimization of combustion equipment, the pollution formation during combustion of syngas with different n(H2)∶n(CO) at different pressure was studied. The results show that the peak flame temperature of H2/CO syngas coflow diffusion flame increases obviously with the increase of pressure. The NO formation shows the same trend. The NO produced through thermal route dominates the variation trend. Besides, NO formation increases with the n(H2)∶n(CO) ratio in syngas coflow flame.@The composite materials of molybdenum carbides supported on activated semi-coke with different Mo loadings were prepared by thermal decomposition of the mixture of HLH de-ashed lignite and the complex of hexamethylentetramine (HMT) and ammonium molybdate (AHM). The synthesized catalysts were characterized by XRD, SEM, HRTEM, XPS, H2-TPSR and the effects of Mo loadings on methanation were evaluated. The results show that the dispersion of Mo decreased and the configuration of Mo changed with the increase of Mo loadings. The conversion of CO increase, while the tendency of increase is reduce with the increase of Mo loadings. The conversion rate of CO on unit mass of Mo decreases with the increase of Mo loadings. The selectivity of CH4 is best on the sample of 20%Mo/ASC due to the better intrinsic catalytic activity and the highest rate of catalytic hydropyrolysis.@The gas-solid flow characteristics in a two-dimension pressurized bubbling fluidized bed were investigated through a simulation based on Euler two-fluid model. The results show that under the same apparent gas velocity, the elevated operating pressure can cause a higher volume fraction of bubbles and a more obvious boundary between bubbles and emulsions, which result in much stronger flow and mixing between two phases. Meanwhile, the radial distribution of solids’ vertical velocity in the middle and upper of bed presents more inhomogeneous: solids vertical velocity increases in the central region, while decreases near the wall. Moreover, the bed expansion height increases with the elevated operating pressure; accordingly, gas holdup increases. The distribution of solid holdup becomes more homogeneous in the radical direction: the particles concentration decreases in the bottom and increases in the top. The fluctuation of bed pressure is primarily composed of two components: one with low-frequency/high-amplitude, the other with low-amplitude/high-frequency. The intensity of pressure pulsation inside the bed shows a tendency to increase initially then decrease rapidly with increase of the bed height. In addition, the intensity of pressure pulsation increases with the elevated operating pressure, indicating that the bed pressure fluctuates more intensely. Furthermore, particles show higher granular temperature with the elevated operating pressure, indicating of an enhanced particle velocity fluctuation.@The reaction effect of FCC slurry from a Shandong refining factory and coals from Hami was studied. The results show that when the coal addition reaches 30%, the viscosity of oil-slurry is 1 375 mPa·s, which is much higher than that of oil-slurry produced by directly-liquefied coals, and this is not good for pump transfer. Therefore, how to reduce the viscosity of oil-slurry is one of the important problems that the coal-oil synergistic technology has to solve. When the coal addition is 30%-35%, the reaction temperature is 450 ℃ and the residence time is 2.0 h, better co-processing effects of FCC slurry and coal reactions can be achieved with the conversion of 98% and oil yield of 80%. With hydrogenation of FCC slurry to improve its quality, the viscosity of oil-slurry can be reduced considerably, and the effects of co-processing can also be ameliorated when the coal addition is 40%. Furthermore, the conversion rises from 92.4% to 96.5%, and the oil yield increases from 71.12% to 79.19%.@The activated carbon was prepared by KOH activation process, and the optimum technological parameters were obtained by orthogonal experiment: the lignite particle size is 0.075 0 mm-0.150 0 mm (100 mesh-200 mesh), the mass ratio of KOH and activated carbon is 3∶1, the activation temperature is 600 ℃, and the activation time is 1 h. The optimum specific surface area through the optimum process is 504.7 m2/g, and the degree of graphitization is low. The specific capacitance is 107.7 F/g, the specific capacitance retention was 96.6% at 2 times the current and 93.8% at 5 times the current, the attenuation is small and the magnification performance is good.@With NaOH as catalyst, humic acids were prepared by degrading the macromolecular structure of lignite using hydrolysis reaction, and the effects of temperature, ρ(NaOH), reaction time and V(water)∶m(coal) on the yield of humic acids were researched. The results show that the hydrolysis reaction can greatly improve the yield of humic acids from 11.25% to 78.38% by optimizing the hydrolysis conditions. The structure characteristics of humic acids were investigated by means of ultimate analysis, UV-Vis spectra and FTIR spectra. The results indicate that the type of functional groups are similar in both kinds of humic acids. The phenolic hydroxyl groups are the primary acidic functional groups, and the carboxyl group content of original humic acids is higher than that of regenerated humic acids. Compared with regenerated humic acids, the molecular weight of original humic acids is higher, but there are more substituents on the aromatic nucleus of regenerated humic acids.@The preparation process of spherical form-stable composite phase change material for high temperature thermal storage by the use of dry pressing is researched. The nearly spherical form-stable phase change material with 7.5 mm in diameter, which is expected to be adopted in high temperature thermal storage with spherical capsule packed bed, is obtained by the way of utilizing fly ash as the ceramic matrix, aluminum as the phase change medium and PVA as adhesive. Non-pressurized sintering without protective gas with the help of program temperature controlling from room temperature to 1 000 ℃ was employed to process the green sample after dry pressing. The results show that the content of phase change medium, the amount of blank and the pressure of blank shaping affect the sphericity and sintering stability of materials significantly. The phase change material pure aluminum combines the silicon in the fly ash, forming Al-Si eutectic alloy after sintering. On the prerequisite of 0.35 g in the amount of green sample and 0.6 MPa in forming pressure, the aluminum content, sphericity, density and phase change temperature of spherical material with 7.5 mm in diameter could be 57%, 0.92, 1.60 g/cm3 and 577.33 ℃, respectively. The latent heat is 62.49 J/g after 20 times of thermal shock.@To increase the throughput and carbon conversion of coal gasifier, the ash agglomerating fluidized bed gasifier has been upgraded to the multi-stage conversion fluidized bed coal gasification (MSFBG) technology, which integrates the concept of fast fluidization technology, was proposed and presented by the Institute of Coal Chemistry, China Academy of Sciences. The gasifier is divided into two zones: the high-speed riser in the upper region and the dense jetting-fluidization zone in the lower region. The latter makes it possible to preserve the characteristics of agglomerating fluidized bed gasifier. While in the high-speed riser, the enhanced contact of gas and solid and long residence time are achieved by increasing the circulating ratio of fine powder, and a high gasification temperature is obtained by feeding oxygen. All of these can help to obtain a higher carbon conversion and processing capacity. In order to achieve the above-mentioned goals, the characteristics and kinetics of coal-pressured gasification were studied and analyzed. The influence of operation parameters and key structure on the gas-solid flow and distribution of concentration field were studied. Furthermore, the numerical simulation of gas-solid flow in gasifier and the influence of second blown gas on the flow field of lifting section were investigated. On the basis of these, the design and building of MSFBG pilot plant with a daily coal capacity of 100 t at 3.0 MPa were carried out. Some pilot gasification tests with Shenmu coal and its char, in which pressure is from 1.0 MPa to 2.8 MPa, pure oxygen/air blast acted as testing condition, were carried out. The results show that a reliable, stable and long-term operation can be easily achieved in the pressure range. In addition, the char also can be directly gasified; the carbon conversion can reach 95%; the performances of MSFBG has achieved the advanced level of the similar gasifiers. Moreover, the design software package and techno-economic evaluation of kiloton industrial demonstration device have also been finished.@To investigate the relationship between micro roughness,surface free energy and wettability of coal dust,the micro roughness and the contact angle of four typical coal samples were measured by atomic force microscope(AFM) and contact angle measuring instrument, and the surface free energy was estimated by van Oss-Chaudhury-Good theory. The results indicate that surface roughness has a certain relation with the wettability of coal dust and the correlation coefficient (R2) between the surface roughness (Sa and Sq) and the contact angle are 0.940 5 and 0.872 2, respectively. With the increasing of surface roughness, the contact angle increases and the wettability of coal dust becomes worse. The free energy calculation results show that the four coal samples are approximately low-energy nonpolar surfaces. The surface free energy (γs) of coal dust is consistent with the change of contact angle and with increasing polar Lewis acid-base of surface free energy, the wettability of coal dust is enhanced. The surface roughness has a certain correlation with the surface free energy and the correlation coefficient (R2) is 0.842 6.@Low temperature nitrogen adsorption method was used to study on the variation of pore structure of Shengli lignite in low temperature (350 ℃-600 ℃) pyrolysis process. The effects of pyrolysis temperature and de-ashing treatment on pore structure parameters including average pore diameter, specific surface area and pore size distribution were studied. And two fractal dimensions D1 and D2 were calculated using the FHH(Frenkel-Halsey-Hill) method at relative pressures of 0 to 0.50 and 0.50 to 0.95, respectively. The results indicate that the specific surface area and pore volume of semi-coke have the same variation trends while the specific surface area and average pore size show the opposite variation trends in the pyrolysis process. When the pyrolysis temperature is above 500 ℃, more abundant porous structure, larger specific surface area and micropore volume have been formed during the process of de-ashed lignite pyrolysis. And the number of pores with an aperture interval in 0.45 nm-1.58 nm and 2.65 nm-10.00 nm significantly increases. The results of FHH method analysis demonstrate that there are two kinds of opposite trend fractal dimensions in the semi-coke: D1 and D2. Pyrolysis temperature lower than 450 ℃, D1 can be used to describe the micropore surface roughness of the semi-coke which are produced by de-ashed lignite. While D2 can reflect the roughness of the mesopore volume adequately in the whole pyrolysis process.@The co-pyrolysis experiments of low metamorphic pulverized coal (SJC), heavy oil (HS), coal tar pitch (LQ) and coking coal (JM) were carried out . The research focused on the composition and structure of co-pyrolysis products after adding the heavy oil (HS). FTIR and GC-MS were used to investigate the structure and composition of solid products and pyrolysis tar respectively. Results show that the addition of HS can effectively improve the distribution and structure of pyrolysis products in the process of co-pyrolysis of low-rank coal. The solid coke yield gradually decreases, while the tar yield first increases and then decreases, the gas yield first decreases and then increases; the contents of phenols and alcohols functional groups on the surface of solid coke increase; the pyrolysis CH4 gas content gradually increases, while H2 content gradually reduces. When the amount of HS is 20%, the yield of tar reaches 33%, the volume fraction of CH4 and H2 in gas increase to 33.16% and 19.61% respectively, and the total volume fraction of CO+CH4+H2 reaches 65.54%. With the increase of the proportion of HS, the aromatics structure in HS is pyrolyzed and the content of aromatics in tar decreases sharply. With the increase of HS addition ratio, the hydrocracking of aromatic structures in HS causes a sharp decrease in aromatic hydrocarbon content in tar, while the contents of alkanes and phenols increase, and the synergy between SJC and HS becomes more pronounced. The maximum mass fraction is 21.87%, while the aromatics reduce by 24.20%. Meanwhile, the content of C5-C10 in tar gradually increases, while the contents of C11-C19 and C≥20 decrease. The maximum amount of light components is 28.81%, when the addition of HS is 20%. However the contents of medium and heavy components reach their minimum values.@Low-temperature co-pyrolysis experiment of lignite-corncob mixture at different mass fraction was carried out by using a self-designed low-temperature pyrolysis device. The results show that when the corncob mass fraction is 30%, the tar yield reaches 11.70%, which is 53.75% higher than that of the lignite pyrolysis. The thermogravimetric analysis of lignite, corncob, lignite and 30% corncob mixture shows that the addition of corncob reduces the initial pyrolysis temperature of coal, and the whole TG curves shift to the low temperature region, which shows obvious promotion of pyrolysis. The results of GC-MS show that the contents of aliphatic and phenol increase by 27.79% and 193.96%, while the contents of acids and heteroatoms decrease by 26.42% and 55.19%, respectively, with the addition mass fraction of 30% corncob. Moreover, the content of light oil increases from 4.68% to 27.13%, which achieves a substantial pyrolysis of tar and high-quality tar generation.@In order to improve the surface hydrophobicity and the floatation efficiency of fine oxidized coal, three kinds of nonionic surfactants containing different hydrophobic chains including C12EO15, AC-1215, and NPEO15 were selected. The effects of initial mass concentration and adsorption time on the adsorption amount of three surfactants on oxidized coal surface were investigated. FTIR and flotation experiments were carried out to compare the adsorption differences on oxidized coal surface of three surfactants. The results show that the structure of hydrophobic tail chain of nonionic surfactant has an important influence on the adsorption effect on oxidized coal surface.In the experimental mass concentration range, with the increase of the mass concentration of three solvents, the adsorption capacity and cleaned coal yield of oxidized coal both increase, C12EO15 can significantly enhance the surface hydrophobicity of oxidized coal, the cleaned coal yield rises from 49.39% to 84.83%; and NPEO15 is the second, the cleaned coal yield is up to 81.14%; the adsorption effect of AC-1215 is general, and the cleaned coal yield is up to 58.58%.@A coal flotation slurry from a selected plant in Yunnan was obtained by flotation process. The sulfur content is 1.36%, of which organic sulfur accounted for 82.35%, and physical separation method was difficult to remove sulfur further. The low temperature isolation air roasting method was used to reduce sulfur in slime, and the influence of different roasting condition on sulfur reduction was studied. The results show that in condition of the amount of DP 5%, the roasting temperature 450 ℃, roasting time 40 min and pellet diameter <9 mm, the final sulfur content after roasting can be reduced to below 0.30%, and the effect of reducing sulfur is significant. The contents of other harmful elements, such as phosphorus and arsenic, are also low.@The effects of moisture, pressure, mixing ratio (mass ratio) and temperature on the cracking behavior of coal slime briquette through initial crack time and continuous crack time and micromorphology of briquette were investigated. The results show that water evaporation is an important process during coal slime briquette cracking. The pressure has an influence on the cracking by affecting the internal structure of coal slime briquette and the briquette becomes compacted under the increasing pressure. It results in the gathering of produced gas, thus the briquette is more prone to crack. The mixing ratio of coal slime and limestone affects the cracking behavior by changing the structure and composition of coal slime briquette. High mass fraction of limestone in coal slime briquette has more compact structure and the heat transfer rate is higher, which is helpful for cracking. The influence of temperature on cracking behavior is reflected in temperature gradient between inside and outside of briquette. Furthermore, the cracking characteristics are affected by two aspects of thermal stress and chemical reaction.@The influence on properties，surface morphology and fractal description of pore structure of coke samples treated by BP inhibitor were investigated. The results show that after treated by BP inhibitor, the thermal performances of coke samples are improved，the pores of coke samples are decreased, as well as the pore volume and specific surface area, which are beneficial to inhibit coke deterioration reaction. The adsorption-desorption data of coke samples were measured and fitted using Frenkel-Halsey-Hill equation, it is found that there are fractal phenomena in pore structure of coke samples in the study scale and the fractal dimensions of coke samples treated by BP inhibitor are lower than that of the original coke sample. The results explain that BP inhibitor can effectively inhibit coke deterioration reaction by infiltrating into or covering the pore structure of coke and reducing pore roughness.@Based on Aspen Plus software, an air-steam composite gasification model of petroleum coke was established. The numerical simulation results of the model coincide with the experimental values. The effects of gasification temperature, pressure, equivalence ratio and msteam∶mpc (subscript pc means petroleum coke) on gas volume fraction, gas calorific value and gas yield were investigated by using Aspen Plus sensitivity analysis module. The results show that when the equivalence ratio and msteam∶mpc are selected the appropriate value, temperature has little influence on the gas volume fraction. The higher pressure contributes to more methane production and the gas calorific value. With the increase of equivalence ratio, the gas calorific value is reduced owing to enhancing of oxidation reaction intensity. The higher msteam∶mpc contributes to more hydrogen production, but lower calorific value. The changing trend of the calorific value is opposite to that of gas yield.@A kind of waste heat recovery endothermic device for the riser with special high strength metallic sodium material as heat conduction lining was proposed. The heat conduction lining is used as the temperature switch to control the tar condensation and precipitation, when the temperature of crude gas is higher than 500 ℃, the heat transfer performance can be enhanced, when the temperature is lower than 500 ℃, it is manifested as poor heat conductors, which can not only maximize the heat transfer, but also avoid coking on the inner wall of the riser. A set of waste heat recovery system was designed and tested with this endothermic device. The effective heat transfer efficiency of the riser waste heat recovery device is 79.16%, and the coking furnace annual energy saving is 1.668×1011 kJ, to ensure the coking production process, and improve the steam rate.@Jincheng anthracite and Yulin semi-coke were selected as raw materials, and the combustion characteristics of raw materials were studied by TGA with different blending ratios. The performance evaluation of briquette was carried out to grasp the combustion characteristics and pollutant emission rules of briquette. The results show that with the increase of the mass fraction of semi-coke, the compressive strength of briquette decreases and the thermal stability does not change. With the addition of semi-coke, the residual carbon ratio of briquette decreases and the emission of NOx decreases.NOx emissions of semi-coke briquette only takes one thirds of that of anthracite coal briquette, but the CO emissions of semi-coke briquette is two times bigger than that of anthracite briquette; when the mass fraction of semi-coke is 60%, the combustion time of briquette is the longest.@
2014
以一种典型长焰煤为研究对象，采用立式管式热解炉、卧式管式热解炉和气相色谱仪等装置，系统研究了不同热解温度下该长焰煤的热解特性.结果表明，受二次反应的影响，随干馏终温的升高焦油产率略有减少，半焦产率略有增加；分段干馏煤气中H2与CO的含量均随温度的升高而增加，CH4的含量随温度的升高先增加后减少，在600℃左右达到最大值；800℃以上混合干馏煤气中，H2的含量最高且随干馏终温的升高而增加；半焦挥发分含量随干馏终温的升高逐渐降低；900℃以上基本保持不变，并分析了900℃干馏所得煤焦油的基本性质.@采用热重-质谱联用技术研究三种烟煤程序升温热解过程中气相产物析出特性，分析了热解温度、升温速率和煤种对气体产率和生成规律的影响.结果表明，随着升温速率增大，挥发分释放特性指数增大，更利于热解产物析出.较高的升温速率缩短了反应时间，使气相产物产率降低.烃类气体的生成曲线都呈单峰分布，而其他气体生成曲线呈不规则变化；不同煤种热解产生的H2和烃类气体的离子强度曲线随温度变化趋势一致，且峰值温度都十分接近；相同热解条件下，不同煤种热解的气体产率跟煤样成分相关；不同煤种中硫的存在形态不同，主要以H2S，SO2和COS的形式逸出.@对不同溶胀时间、不同溶剂、矿物质、预处理和金属无机盐等实验条件下鑫源低阶烟煤的溶胀行为和溶胀动力学进行了研究.结果表明，随着时间的延长，溶胀率逐渐增大，48h时，溶胀基本达到平衡，溶胀特征是典型的slow-climbing-type溶胀；煤在混合溶剂中的溶胀率大于单一溶剂中的溶胀率，在极性溶剂中的溶胀率大于非极性溶剂中的溶胀率；脱除矿质元素后，煤溶胀率增大；溶胀、酸洗和碱洗使煤溶胀率增大，烘干使煤溶胀率减小；溶胀动力学表明，该煤的溶胀行为符合一级反应动力学方程，在THN和吡啶溶剂中的表观活化能均小于20kJ/mol,这与煤中范德华力的破坏相对应，溶胀机制是由Case-Ⅱ扩散控制的.@煤与氧易在低温下发生复合反应，煤中的活性基团被氧化，导致煤结构发生了变化.制备不同氧化温度的煤样，采用红外光谱法进行了研究；对红外谱进行差示光谱分析，得到各基团在煤氧升温过程中的变化规律，并对各基团进行煤氧复合反应的活性排序为：胺基>甲基、芳香亚甲基>羧酸、脂类、乙烯基>醚类.@采用自行研发煤的低温干馏实验装置，研究炼铁瓦斯泥对长焰煤催化热解反应过程的影响.利用在线红外煤气分析仪对煤气进行分析，以探索炼铁瓦斯泥的加入量对煤气产率及成分的影响规律.同时对固体半焦进行SEM扫描，探讨炼铁瓦斯泥的添加对半焦性质的影响.结果表明,随着炼铁瓦斯泥的添加量的增加，半焦和煤气产率均呈现增大趋势.当煤气的热值达到最大时，煤气中CO，CH4和H2的含量分别可达到9.91%，23.98%和38.42%.且随着炼铁瓦斯泥掺混比例的增大，半焦表面的裂纹数量随之增加，表面变粗糙，形成深度龟裂纹，致使半焦的反应性升高.@对伊敏褐煤和大唐五间房褐煤在高温烟气环境下的干燥过程进行了实验研究.实验中对大粒径煤颗粒采用固定床干燥法，对小粒径煤粉则采用下降管顺流干燥法.根据实验获得的煤颗粒和干燥介质温度曲线研究了初始烟气温度、粒径和初始含水率对褐煤中水分和挥发分析出的影响,结果表明，褐煤高温烟气干燥过程主要分为预热阶段和降速干燥阶段，褐煤在下降管中的干燥过程主要处于预热干燥阶段；在800℃的烟气初温下，增大粒径，提高初始含水率，可以避免挥发分析出；两煤种在下降管干燥过程中均比较稳定，且伊敏褐煤相比五间房褐煤吸收和脱除水分更为容易，但也更易受热分解.研究表明，下降管高温烟气干燥技术适用于伊敏和大唐五间房褐煤这两种煤种的干燥过程.@在内热式流化床干燥器实验装置上完成了湿煤的干燥实验，验证了工艺可行性.通过调节干燥实验装置的干燥处理量，考察了流化床平均温度分别为83℃，89℃，102℃时的干燥强度、换热强度及耗热项等工艺特性.在较低的流化速度（0.37m/s~ 0.41m/s）下和83℃~102℃的流化床平均温度范围内，实验装置可以稳定运行；以设计的最大干燥处理量114kg/h运行时，流化床平均温度为83℃，干燥强度为76.5kg/(m2·h)，蒸汽盘管的换热强度为4172W/m2，干燥器平均传热系数为200W/(m2·K)，干燥煤中水分耗热比率为52%，加热流化风耗热比率和干燥器散热比率均为20%，加热物料耗热比率为8%.@针对粉煤密相输运床气化技术，使用滴管炉对云南褐煤（YN）、山东次烟煤（SD）和内蒙烟煤（NM）进行快速升温热解实验，应用数字成像颗粒分析仪同时获得颗粒粒径和球形度，研究了不同煤阶、粒径、温度、预烘干除水对煤焦形貌参数的影响.结果表明：随着煤阶提高，热解膨胀度和球形度均提高，1273K热解后YN褐煤因收缩和破碎，膨胀度为0.66；SD煤和NM煤的膨胀度均大于1；焦的球形度因热解软化，较原煤均略有提高；NM烟煤随着热解温度的提高，膨胀度降低，球形度先增加后减小；小粒径NM煤颗粒的膨胀度和球形度均更高.干燥NM煤的膨胀度显著高于含水原煤，且随温度升高，膨胀度提高，变化规律与含水原煤相反；球形度随温度变化规律相似，但却低于原煤，预烘干除水对NM煤焦形貌的影响显著.@从分析煤层气水中煤粉的特征出发，以泵阀启闭为界点，分析了泵筒内液体流动状态.提出利用分段分析的方法进行泵筒内液体研究，以上、下游动阀之间液体段为目标，以小浓度煤粉颗粒为研究对象，基于运动相对性方法，从单煤粉颗粒和小浓度煤粉颗粒的实际流动入手进行分析，以相邻两颗粒为模型，建立实际流动与相对运动之间的图形关系，从而建立单颗粒沉降速度与小浓度颗粒沉降速度的关系模型，在此基础上，提出排水泵泵筒内静水中小浓度煤粉沉降速度的计算公式模型，并与不同空隙率的煤粉沉降实验结论相比较.结果得出，应用该公式计算出的煤粉沉降速度与实验数值较接近，其误差最大值为6.7％，验证了公式的合理性.@煤粉流量调节阀在国内气流床粉煤气化装置中广泛使用，对于调节控制煤粉流量发挥着重要作用.在中国石化安庆分公司的Shell煤气化装置上，对进口煤粉流量调节阀进行性能测试和研究.结果表明，该煤粉流量调节阀在其开度低于20%时，阀门开度变化对流量的调节最为敏感，开度大于40%后，几乎没有调节流量的作用.分别给出了在煤粉循环系统和气化炉运行系统中该调节阀的压降特性及其压降占系统总压降的分率值，并对提升阀门性能及优化操作提出了建议.@分别在两种气氛下（CO-H2和CO2-N2）就对流废热锅炉三段受热面和三圈环隙内合成气的流动和温度分布进行数值模拟研究.结果表明，两种气氛下，速度场相近；离散相在炉内的停留时间基本相同；两种气氛下，传热系数随三环隙和三段受热面的变化规律一致，CO2和N2气氛下的传热系数较还原性气氛大；两种气氛下，换热量分配不同，导致温度场差别较大.在不同气氛下所引起的温度分布不同必将导致炉内受热面布置方式的不同.研究为对流废热锅炉在不同气氛下的安全性和高效性设计提供了依据.@在固定床内进行了氧气、二氧化碳和水蒸气混合气氛下贫煤与玉米秸秆共气化实验.实验分析了秸秆比例、温度及氧浓度对生成可燃气体组分及热值的影响.结果表明：秸秆的加入促进了CO和烃类的生成，抑制H2的生成，而过量的秸秆会降低各产气组分及气体热值.CO和H2分别在秸秆比例为0.2和0时达到最大，秸秆比例为0.2时气化热值最高.升高温度能促进气化反应，提高产气组分，而过高的温度抑制了CnHm的生成.氧浓度的提高能显著提高气体组分及产气热值，理想的氧浓度为0.2.载气中加入适量CO2可提高产气热值.@利用两段固定床对三层床煤依次经过450℃低温、650℃中温和900℃高温的分级热解过程进行模拟实验，研究了上两段中低温和下两段中高温热解相邻两段之间的相互作用，揭示了多层床煤热解提高油气品质的机理.通过中低温热解的相互作用，焦油中轻质组分(沸点低于360℃的馏分)含量增加，热解气中CH4含量增加，H2含量减小，说明中低温热解主要通过半焦对热解产物的原位催化提质作用而提高焦油品质.通过中高温热解的相互作用，焦油收率和焦油中轻质组分含量增加，CH4和CO含量升高，H2含量下降，表示中高温热解的主要作用是在富含H2气氛下热解提高焦油收率和品质.实验结果表明，多层床煤热解主要通过半焦的原位催化提质和富H2气氛的协同作用而提高热解油气品质.@以低灰分、高挥发分、高水分的新疆煤和工业甲醇为原料，进行了精细甲醇煤浆的制备及其特性研究.实验中主要采用172μm左右和54μm左右粒度的煤粉进行研究.探讨了分散剂、稳定剂、甲醇煤浆的原料配比、煤粉粒度级配等因素对甲醇煤浆黏度的影响.确定了最佳的工艺条件为：十二烷基硫酸钠、膨润土用量均为25%，煤粉粒度为172μm左右与54μm左右按1∶1复配对煤浆的制备效果最好.产品性能测试表明：通过实验制得的甲醇煤浆黏度在1200mPa·s以内，其稳定性较好，煤浆的最大浓度为63%.@为了研究煤粉粒径对煤快速热解半焦特性的影响，对微负压系统中煤快速热解产生半焦的收率、灰分、挥发分含量和结构等特性进行了分析.结果表明，随着粒径增加，煤粉热解的活化能逐渐增加，低温区大粒径煤粉热解挥发分逸出量高于小粒径煤粉逸出量.热解半焦收率随着煤粉粒径减小逐渐增加，挥发分中焦油收率却随着煤粉粒径的减小而增加.小粒径煤热解生成的半焦结晶程度较低，边缘碳原子和其他缺陷较多，半焦炭层结构较不致密.极小颗粒中矿物质含量较高导致煤粉粒径越小，所得半焦的灰分含量越高，大粒径煤粉由于在低温区间失重速率快，挥发分逸出量大而导致半焦中残余的挥发分含量较低.@利用不同炼焦用煤对捣固焦炉炼焦配煤进行研究.探讨了根据冶金焦炭要求选择合理的配煤方案，得到符合灰分、硫分、抗碎强度、耐磨强度、反应性及反应后强度要求的焦炭.研究表明，可以利用修正公式预测焦炭灰分；根据原料及配合煤硫分的经验值预测焦炭硫分；根据对焦炭灰分、硫分以及冷、热态的要求选择合理的配合煤挥发分进行配煤.用配合煤胶质层厚度预测捣固焦炉焦炭强度更具有实际意义. @以某煤抽提物为前驱体，在N2保护下，分别在600℃，700℃，800℃和900℃炭化制备四种电化学电容器用炭材料，分别记作：FKC600，FKC700，FKC800和FKC900.采用低温N2吸附法对各炭材料的孔结构进行表征，并通过恒流充放电和循环伏安测试研究其电化学性能.结果表明: 随着炭化温度的升高，四种炭材料的比表面积和总孔容逐渐增大，但孔结构总体上发育不完善，FKC600和FKC700的比表面积仅为14m2·g-1左右.四种炭材料在3mol/L KOH电解液中具有良好的充放电可逆性和典型的双电层电容特性；其体积比电容和面积比电容随炭化温度的升高呈现先增大后减小的趋势，FKC700的体积比电容高达112.4F·cm-3，FKC600和FKC700的面积比电容大于800μF·cm-2，远远高于炭材料的理论储能极限.@以神木烟煤为原料，煤沥青为黏结剂，在较低浸渍比下采用KOH和ZnCl2活化法制备成型活性炭，利用低温(77K)N2吸附法对活性炭的比表面积及孔结构参数进行表征，考察浸渍比对活性炭孔结构的影响及其液相吸附性能，并对比分析两种化学活化法所制活性炭结构与性能的差异.结果表明，在相同浸渍比下，KOH活化法所制成型活性炭的比表面积、总孔容及碘吸附值均高于ZnCl2活化法.当浸渍比为1.0时，采用KOH活化法可制备出表面积为811m2/g，总孔容为0.513cm3/g，中孔比例为23.6%，碘吸附值为1125mg/g的成型活性炭；采用ZnCl2活化法可制备出表面积为472m2/g，总孔容为0.301cm3/g，中孔比例为30.6%，碘吸附值为527mg/g的成型活性炭.两种活化法所制成型活性炭的孔径主要分布在1.2nm～2.0nm的微孔和3.6nm～4.5nm的中孔范围内.@目前低变质程度烟煤制取型煤的技术还处于起步阶段.为研究终温及其保温时间对低阶煤制取型煤质量的影响，利用制取型煤和测试其强度的相关设备分别进行了不同终温温度和最佳终温下不同保温时间的单因素实验.结果表明，160℃可作为低变质程度烟煤（低阶神木煤）制取气化型煤的最佳干燥终温，干燥型煤生球的最佳终温保持时间为20min~30min.@采用热重分析法对市政污泥（污泥SZ）与大同烟煤（煤样DT）及其混合物进行了热解实验研究.揭示了污泥SZ和煤样DT及其混合物热解特性的异同，研究了污泥SZ和煤样DT及污泥SZ的掺比量对两者热解特性的影响.结果表明，市政污泥的挥发分析出特性远好于烟煤；市政污泥和烟煤的热解特性存在显著差异，主要表现在总失重率、失重速率及挥发分析出温度区间等；污泥SZ与煤样DT的掺混对两者的热解过程都有催化作用，而且各自最大催化作用时的掺比量也不相同；市政污泥与烟煤混合物的热解特性与两者的混合比例有关.@取葡萄糖浓度2000mg/L，介体浓度1.66×10-1mmol/L，考察电池长达13天运行过程中的电化学性能变化.电池启动约1.5h后，开路电压达到最大,电池运行进入平台期.传荷阻抗由第1天的216Ω减小到第4天的76.52Ω，此时生物膜完全成熟，运行平稳且状态佳.至第13天时，传荷阻抗已经增大至1657Ω，长期运行导致生物膜的电化学活性降低，电池产电能力大大下降.@使用不同酸、碱溶液对堇青石蜂窝陶瓷载体进行了预处理，考察了载体酸、碱预处理对蜂窝状Fe-Mo/ZSM-5催化剂涂覆率及NOx催化还原性能的影响，并采用XRD，NH3-TPD和扫描电镜等技术对蜂窝状催化剂表面形貌、结构特征和表面酸性进行了分析.结果表明，载体经酸性和碱性溶液预处理后，蜂窝状催化剂的涂覆率和催化能力都提高，且酸溶液预处理的效果要优于碱溶液预处理.分析认为，这与酸溶液作用下堇青石结构受到一定程度的破坏，表面变得粗糙以及所制备的蜂窝状催化剂表面较多的弱酸位有关.@对神东上湾煤（SDR）及由其岩相分离得到的镜质组富集物（SDV）和惰质组富集物（SDI）进行了吡啶抽提，得到不同煤样的抽提率，并对抽提前后的煤样进行了13C-NMR，FTIR和XRD分析表征.结果表明，三种煤样的抽提率（质量分数）顺序为：镜质组富集物（15.78%）>上湾煤（13.89%）>惰质组富集物（9.45%）；通过对吡啶抽提前后煤样的13C-NMR，FTIR和XRD的分析表明，吡啶抽提后三种煤样的芳香度均有所增加，抽提前后煤样的骨架结构没有发生大的变化.@选择五种不同变质程度的煤样，分别测试二氧化氯作用前后的13C-NMR谱，并对比其变化特征.结果表明，二氧化氯作用后煤中化学活性较高的脂族碳基团因部分转化为较稳定的其他基团而导致含量减少，含氧官能团含量有所降低，稳定的羧基碳和羰基碳含量增加，芳香烃中不饱和烃键以及芳香环上的醚氧键断裂，部分芳香环被打开，芳香度降低.研究结果为揭示二氧化氯对煤储层吸附能力和渗透率影响机理提供了实验支撑.@采用自行改装设计的干馏炉对不同配比的凤眼莲（EC）和低阶煤（LFC）进行低温共热解实验，得出凤眼莲添加量为30%时热解油产率达到最高值11.32%，与纯煤时对比提高了24.81%，比质量加权值提高了5.11%.选取凤眼莲、煤样和凤眼莲添加量为30%的混合样进行了热重分析，在300 ℃~700 ℃温度段，实验失重量明显大于质量加权值.并对热解油进行了GC-MS检测，共热解油中烷烃含量比纯煤时提高了34.46%.元素分析和热值分析得出共热解油H/C比纯煤时提高了8.72%，热值稍低于汽柴油的热值.说明凤眼莲与低阶煤共热解存在协同效应，共热解油实现了一定程度的轻质化.@采用热重分析法在不同掺混比例、不同升温速率和不同掺混煤种下对含油污泥混煤进行热解实验研究，并通过气相色谱仪分析热解产生的气体产物.结果表明，含油污泥混煤的热解失重过程可以分为水分及吸附气的挥发、轻烃的析出、重烃的裂解和煤小分子链脱除、重烃的二次裂解和煤大分子链脱除、半焦的缩聚反应以及无机矿物质的分解5个阶段.进行热解动力学分析，采用Coats-Redfern积分方法求解含油污泥混煤的热解动力学参数，并得到了掺混比例、升温速率、煤种对动力学参数的影响规律.利用气相色谱仪检测生成的气体产物有H2，N2，CO2，CO，CH4，C2H6，C2H4，C3H8和C3H6等，并分析了主要气体产物H2，N2，CO2和CH4的生成规律.@利用固定床反应器，考察了浸渍法添加硝酸铁、氯化铁和硫酸亚铁铵等铁基催化剂对煤加氢热解特性的影响，对提高焦油产率较显著的硫酸亚铁铵的作用过程进行了探讨，并对其焦油进行了分析评价.结果表明，添加这三种催化剂时煤加氢热解的转化率都有提高，其中在添加5%（质量分数，以铁计）的硫酸亚铁铵时焦油的产率提高最为显著，由不加催化剂时的14.3%（质量分数，daf）提高到17.9%；铁的价态不同对煤加氢热解的催化作用不同，铵根的存在有利于煤热解转化率和焦油产率的提高；采用硫酸亚铁铵为催化剂时煤热解得到的焦油品质优于无催化剂时得到的焦油品质.@图像灰度与反射率之间的关系是利用图像分析法进行煤岩自动测试时首先需要解决的问题.通过理论分析和反射率标准物质实验研究两者关系，并确定图像分析法测试的适宜光照条件，最后对图像分析法测试与光度计法测试的工作曲线及测试精度进行对比.理论分析和实验研究均表明图像灰度与反射率间存在线性关系，线性相关度很高；拟合直线的相关度在较宽的光照范围内接近1，线性相关度随视域缩小而变高；图像分析法可以达到光度计法同样的测试精度.@以新疆将军庙煤样为研究对象，四氢萘为制浆、供氢溶剂，使用胶体磨湿磨制浆，考察了研磨时间对煤浆粒径的影响.通过激光粒度仪表征可得：磨煤1 h，2 h，3 h和4 h的主要粒径分布范围分别为8 000 nm~10 800 nm(2 000目~1 000目)，2 400 nm~2 900 nm(6 000目~5 000目)，800 nm~1 200 nm(18 700目~12 500目)和500 nm~1 250 nm(30 000目~12 000目).低压直接加氢液化实验结果表明，随煤样粒径减小, 煤粉粒子间因团聚现象油产率反而下降，在其他液化条件都相同的条件下，200目煤样油产率为75.24%，1 340目煤样的油产率为59.96%.但对1 340目煤浆进行超声处理，其油产率提高到80.04%，增加了20%.@通过正交实验对木质素磺酸钠（SL）和丙烯酰胺(AM)接枝反应的条件进行了优化，考察了合成产物对烟煤成浆浓度、黏度和稳定性的影响.结果表明，当AM与SL质量比为1∶5，温度为40 ℃，引发剂K2S2O8-NaHSO3含量为3%条件下反应2.5 h，得到的产物作为水煤浆分散剂，在添加量为0.8%（占干煤基的比例），煤浆浓度为69%时，黏度为550 mPa·s，3 d后的穿透率达74.75%；相同情况下使用未经改性的SL为分散剂制浆，黏度为610 mPa·s，3 d后穿透率为70.68%，明显低于改性分散剂制浆的穿透率，且改性SL所制煤浆同未改性SL所制煤浆的析水率相比也降低了4.45%.@以廉价的玉米秸秆提取物木质素为原料，通过磺甲基化法改性制备水煤浆（coal water slurry，CWS）添加剂，实验发现合成磺化木质素的最佳工艺条件是：温度T=90 ℃～95 ℃，Na2SO3与木质素质量比2∶1，时间t=6 h，37%的甲醛溶液用量为2 mL；红外光谱表明改性物在979 cm-1和633 cm-1处出现了新的强吸收峰；白金版法测定溶液表面张力可降低至36.806 mN/m，说明木质素磺化改性是成功和有效的.作为分散剂将其用于CWS成浆性实验发现：改性产物对CWS能够起到很好的降黏增浓作用，在分散剂使用量为1%的条件下，CWS浓度可高达70%以上，流动性为A级，流速较快且连续，流型细腻，稳定时间达25 d且无硬沉淀产生.@选择两种矿物质含量不同、硫含量相近的炼焦煤进行HCl-HF-CrCl2联合脱除矿物质实验，将脱矿物质后的煤分别在300 ℃，500 ℃，700 ℃和900 ℃下热解，用XPS研究煤中有机硫形态在热解过程中的变迁规律.将S2p谱用Lorentzian-Gaussian拟合分为3个峰：有机硫化物（163.3 eV±0.4 eV）、噻吩（164.1 eV±0.2 eV）和亚砜（166.0 eV±0.5 eV）.结果表明，脱除矿物质后的煤中不存在硫铁矿硫和硫酸盐硫，煤中的有机硫分布是均匀的，以三种形态赋存，即有机硫化物硫、噻吩硫和亚砜硫，在两种脱矿物质后的煤中都未检测到砜类硫.两种煤中的有机硫化物在700 ℃时分解完全，低温下有机硫化物硫主要以气体形式逸出，高温下低价态的有机硫化物硫可与煤基质结合转化成噻吩硫；噻吩硫含量在300 ℃以下无明显变化，随温度升高，噻吩硫含量有所增加；亚砜硫在整个热解区间变化无明显规律.@在彭城肥煤中添加不同比例的钢渣作为催化剂进行炼焦，考察焦炭的热性能，并运用XRD，SEM和液氮吸附等方法研究钢渣对焦炭热性能的影响规律.结果表明，随着钢渣添加量的增加，焦炭溶损率增大，但存在一个饱和点，而焦炭反应后强度持续降低.添加量相同，钢渣粒度越小，焦炭反应性指数越大，且随着钢渣量的增加，焦炭灰分和硫分增加，但也存在饱和点；焦炭定向程度变差，环缩合程度有所降低；焦炭比表面积先增大而后减小.EDS研究显示，钢渣中含Fe，Ca等复合物以颗粒形式均匀分布在焦炭中，使得焦炭反应性增加，结构强度降低.@以三种不同变质程度的低阶煤1 kg/h规模的快速热解实验数据为基础，从能效和经济层面，对不同煤质特性的低阶煤通过热解实现提质和联产发电的可行性进行了探讨.研究发现，热解提质后煤质特性接近于烟煤的煤质特性，电厂锅炉掺烧半焦比掺烧原煤锅炉效率有不同程度的提高，并且该趋势随煤炭变质程度的降低而增强；另外，热解生成的低温煤焦油可为电厂创造可观的经济价值，干燥无灰基挥发分越高，碳氢比越小，焦油产率越高；但煤中全水分含量高，单位质量的原煤制得的焦油产率降低，经济性下降.@应用Aspen Plus过程模拟软件对分级给氧膜式壁气化炉甲醇-热联产系统工艺流程进行模拟，首先采集大量实际运行数据对Aspen Plus模拟环境进行详细的校核，以使模拟计算结果正确可信，再运用热量方法和方法对各设备进行详细的能量计算和计算，给出甲醇-热联产系统的能流图和流图.模拟计算结果显示，激冷洗涤水处理段的能量损失最大，工质分离和节流环节的损最大，驰放气排空的能量损失和损均较大，并且分析得出，在高压条件下可以降低燃烧损失.@以钢铁企业自备电厂锅炉煤汽比为研究对象，以灰色关联度分析为基础，从理论和数据两方面分析了影响煤汽比的主要因素及各因素对煤汽比影响程度的大小.结果表明，各因素对煤汽比的影响程度为排烟温度>热风温度>给水温度>空燃比>烟气含氧量.基于BP神经网络预测方法，建立了自备电厂锅炉煤汽比预测模型，此BP神经网络为5-12-1结构，隐含层和输出层分别用tansig，purelin函数传递，利用改进动量梯度下降优化算法traingdm训练网格.预测结果表明，该模型网络训练值与实际值较吻合，相关系数R达到0.993 7，用建立的网络进行预测，预测的相关系数为0.976 2，平均误差绝对值为3.9%，在可控范围之内，证明了网络的可靠性与良好的泛化推广能力，可用来指导实际生产.@以烟煤和高粱秸秆为研究对象，在小型加压固定床反应器上考察了压力3.5 MPa及温度700 ℃条件下制焦方式、煤/生物质混合比和气固接触时间对煤与生物质共气化制取富甲烷气体过程中水蒸气气化反应和甲烷化反应的影响.结果表明，对于水蒸气气化反应，煤焦和生物质焦共气化时不能观察到明显的协同作用；对于甲烷化反应，高粱秸秆焦的甲烷化反应活性高于煤焦的甲烷化反应活性，当对高粱秸秆水洗后，高粱秸秆焦的甲烷化反应活性降低至与煤焦的甲烷化反应活性相当，分析表明，水洗后高粱秸秆焦碱金属钾的含量显著降低，说明高粱秸秆焦中碱金属钾的存在是高粱秸秆焦甲烷化反应活性较高的主要原因.增加气固接触时间，有利于提高甲烷产率.@以褐煤为原料研究无灰煤的制备工艺，考察了反应温度、溶剂种类、反应时间和固液比对萃取率和无灰煤灰分的影响.实验结果表明，以NMP为溶剂，反应温度360 ℃，反应时间1 h，固液比4 g∶200 mL的条件下，萃取率可以达到48.8%，无灰煤的灰分为0.54%.通过红外光谱分析发现，反应过程发生非共价键断裂与氢键缔合，使得无灰煤性质优于褐煤性质，黏结性指数G值达到95.61.@以内蒙蒙东褐煤为原料，在活性焦制备小试实验装置上，以水蒸气为活化介质，用正交实验方法考察了活化温度、活化时间和水蒸气流量对活性焦产品的碘吸附值、亚甲基蓝吸附值及收率的影响.结果表明，综合考虑活性焦的亚甲基蓝吸附值及收率的影响，最佳的活化条件为：活化温度800 ℃，活化时间为90 min，水蒸气流量2 g/min，在最佳工艺条件下所制得的活性焦中孔发达，中孔孔径在4.0 nm附近分布比较集中.@采用共沉淀-水热复合法制备Ni-Mg/Al2O3催化剂，考察焙烧和还原温度对其结构和甲烷化催化性能的影响，通过XRD，H2-TPR，TEM等表征，发现随焙烧温度升高，催化剂中NiAl2O4物相呈增多趋势，至900 ℃时，催化剂中镍物种完全以NiAl2O4形式存在，催化剂表面积从500 ℃焙烧的130 m2/g降至900 ℃焙烧的34 m2/g.针对600 ℃焙烧的催化剂，反应活性随还原温度升高呈现先增加后降低的趋势，其最佳还原温度为650 ℃，这主要是受Ni物种还原度、还原后Ni晶粒尺寸等多重因素影响.通过关联甲烷化性能与催化剂结构发现，NiO与载体之间相互作用适中，还原后表面能够形成较小的镍晶粒，催化剂具有较好的甲烷化活性和稳定性.@对于导流管喷动床，导流管的形式对颗粒物料的循环量影响不能忽略.研究了四种不同形式的导流管在导流管不同的安装高度、不同的床层料位高度以及不同的吹松气量对颗粒循环量的影响.结果表明：增加床层料位高度，在一定范围内增加导流管安装高度和吹松气量，会增大颗粒循环量；导流管形式对颗粒循环量影响至关重要.@通过大量文献调研，综述了实现加压条件下高升温速率的煤焦制备方法的工作原理和设备特点，包括加压丝网反应器、加压平面火焰炉及加压沉降炉等，分析了这些方法的优缺点，得出加压沉降炉是一种较为理想的装置.介绍了清华大学开发的国内第一台加压沉降炉制焦系统，其工作压力范围是0.1 MPa ~3.1 MPa，温度最高为1 873 K，颗粒输送速率范围可达0.6 g/h~6 g/h，有较长的恒温区间，可以完成加压和高颗粒升温速率的煤焦制备.@过对三种不同变质程度(Ro,max=0.38%~1.06%)原生结构煤和三种不同变形类型(弱脆性变形、强脆性变形和强韧性变形)构造变形煤的热解实验，探讨了不同变质、变形煤热解过程中H2的逸出特征.结果表明，三种不同变质程度原生结构煤(SGT01，JZT01和WY01)热解过程中H2的逸出量随温度增加（600 ℃~800 ℃）具有一定的差异，但三者热解H2累积生成量变化不大.在相同的温度下，三种不同类型构造变形煤(XTM09，XTM07和XTM10)热解中H2的逸出量差异明显，变形程度较强的强韧性变形煤（XTM10）和强脆性变形煤（XTM07）热解H2产出速率和累积生成量均明显小于变形程度较弱的弱脆性变形煤（XTM09）；强韧性变形煤（XTM10）热解H2产出速率和累积生成量又明显低于强脆性变形煤（XTM07）.@在固定床反应器上研究了平朔煤在N2，H2，CH4/CO2和CH4/CO2（catalyst）不同热解气氛下的煤热解性能.主要考察了不同热解气氛下的热解温度和升温速率对焦油、水、半焦产率以及脱硫率的影响.结果表明，甲烷在催化剂的作用下能够产生大量的CHx基团，CHx基团能使煤热解产生的自由基更稳定，从而提高焦油产率.平朔煤在CH4/CO2（catalyst）气氛下热解的焦油产率最高，在600 ℃的热解温度下，焦油、水、半焦产率和脱硫率分别为33.5%，25.8%，69.5%和25.3%（质量分数），其中焦油产率为相同条件下H2和N2气氛下热解的1.6和1.8倍.@以松木屑和未经干燥的褐煤为原料，在管式炉中进行了两者单独热解及共热解实验.单独热解实验结果表明，随着热解温度的升高，木屑和褐煤热解的气体产率逐渐增加，而液体和固体产率逐渐减少，高温有利于煤中水分的快速蒸发，促进煤热解中间产物与水蒸气的蒸汽重整反应；共热解实验结果表明，松木屑的添加可以调配混合物的n(C)∶n(H)，促进褐煤热解；松木屑掺混比例为30%时，碳转化率和产气率的实验值与计算值的差值均达到最大值，说明该条件下两者的协同作用最明显.@选取渭北石炭纪高有机硫煤与小麦秸秆进行共热解实验，采用正交实验考察了热解温度、升温速率、停留时间和煤与生物秸秆的混合比以及煤与生物秸秆成型压力等对热解脱有机硫及有机硫脱除规律的影响.结合FTIR和SEM分析了共热解半焦的结构特征、孔隙结构与发育情况，并讨论了低温溶剂萃取精制对煤与生物质共热解脱硫效果的影响.结果表明，热解温度对脱硫率的影响最显著.共热解制备较高脱硫率半焦所适宜的最佳水平为850 ℃，15 ℃/min，5 min，1∶4和2 MPa.共热解半焦孔结构发育整齐规则，孔壁薄，孔径较大，有利于热解过程中硫的析出与扩散.低温溶剂萃取提高了共热解脱硫率，尤其是热水精制煤与生物秸秆共热解脱硫率约为39%.@以浸渍-焙烧法制备NiO/Al2O3型催化剂.采用该催化剂微波热解低变质煤，探讨了热解产生的气体组成、液态油品成分特点及固态残渣的形貌与负载催化剂制备条件的相互关系，考察了负载NiO的工艺条件如浸渍方式、焙烧时间和焙烧温度等因素对催化活性的影响.结果表明，NiO/γ-Al2O3催化剂在煤微波热解过程中有明显催化作用，对煤热解制可燃气体及焦油产率有明显提高，其中以超声浸渍、450 ℃焙烧4 h制备的产品催化活性更优.@利用有机溶剂对兖州煤中小分子化合物进行抽提，在抽提14 h以上时抽提率基本不再变化，为12.26%左右.用凝胶色谱法对兖州煤中小分子化合物的相对分子质量进行测定，发现相对分子质量在几十到上万不等，但是主要集中在Mw=400左右.最后采用比重瓶法，利用混合液体密度公式测得小分子化合物密度为1.192 4 g/cm3.@考察了不同水热处理条件对胜利褐煤主要含氧官能团甲氧基、羧基和酚羟基的脱除效果及其表面亲水性的影响.结果表明，提高温度、延长恒温时间以及增大初压均能不同程度地促进含氧官能团的脱除，甲氧基、羧基和酚羟基的最大脱除率分别为67.88%，89.41%和93.70%.脱除含氧官能团使水热处理后的煤样/水接触角增大，亲水性减弱.通过线性拟合，接触角与三种含氧官能团均表现出较好的相关性，其中羧基的相关性最好，说明羧基束缚水的能力要强于甲氧基和酚羟基.@在微波辅助下H2O2氧化前后分别用四氯化碳对枣庄煤进行萃取，并利用红外色谱仪和GC/MS/MS对各萃取物的组成进行分析.结果表明，可检测到枣庄煤CCl4萃取物中有37种化合物，主要包括脂肪烃、芳香烃和含杂原子的有机化合物.检测出的物质中脂肪烃绝大多数为烷烃，共七种，醇类和酮类各五种，还有芳香烃、酰胺、醛、脂等常见有机化合物.脂肪烃包括正构烷烃和异构烷烃；含杂原子化合物有含氧化合物、含硫化合物和含氮化合物等.@利用Aspen Plus软件对某600 MW富氧燃煤电厂褐煤的干燥过程进行模拟分析，研究干燥介质、烟气温度、流量、烟气中CO2浓度和H2O含量对褐煤干燥特性的影响.结果表明，富氧燃煤电厂的烟气适合于褐煤的干燥，烟气中的CO2可以有效抑制褐煤的氧化自燃，使干燥过程更加安全，并能增强烟气的干燥能力，H2O会抑制煤中水分的蒸发；干燥温度和干燥流量的增加都会加速褐煤达到干燥要求，干燥温度的影响更明显.通过分析得出烟气温度150 ℃和流量1.4×106 m3/h为600 MW富氧燃煤电厂的最佳干燥条件.@向延安子长禾草沟煤（2#煤）中添加不同含量的助熔剂碱性氧化物，研究碱性氧化物含量对煤灰熔融温度的影响，并结合X射线衍射和扫描电镜探讨添加助熔剂后煤灰的熔融机理.结果表明，几种氧化物中Na2O降低煤灰熔融点效果最好，可以使煤灰熔融温度从1 300 ℃降到1 195 ℃，降低幅度为105 ℃；其次是CaO，K2O和MgO，降低幅度分别为75 ℃，55 ℃和45 ℃.煤灰在熔融过程中，矿物成分的变化是导致煤灰熔融温度发生变化的主要原因.@以高灰熔点府谷煤(A)分别与低灰熔点神木西沟煤(B)和神木河畔煤(C)按不同比例配比，用智能一体化马弗炉制成灰，用JRHR-3型微机灰熔点测定仪测定其在弱还原性气氛下的熔融特征温度，并利用XRD与CaO-SiO2-Al2O3三元相图分析配煤灰样在不同温度和不同配比下矿物组成的变化.结果表明，配煤可以有效改善煤灰熔融特性，配煤的灰熔点和煤的配比呈非线性关系；配煤的灰熔点变化主要是由于高温下矿物质的转化.@利用球磨机对水葫芦进行预处理，然后将其与神府煤、水和分散剂按照一定的比例混合制备水葫芦煤浆.重点考察球磨时间对水葫芦煤浆成浆性和流变性的影响，并与神府煤浆作比较.结果表明：水葫芦煤浆与水煤浆相比，屈服应力显著增大，触变性和稳定性显著增强，但Zeta电位的绝对值减小；对于水葫芦煤浆，增加球磨时间，其成浆性增强，屈服应力明显减小，触变性和稳定性稍微减弱，Zeta电位的绝对值增大.@采用自行研发的煤低温干馏装置，将四种冶金渣与长焰煤进行低温催化热解，对液体产物煤焦油和固体半焦分别进行GC-MS和SEM分析，同时，利用在线红外煤气分析仪对煤气进行成分分析.结果表明，随着冶金渣的添加，煤气含量呈先上升后下降趋势，煤气中CH4和H2的含量分别可达到23.98%和38.12%；热解水和焦油收率降低，但焦油中直链烷烃、萘、菲和芴等含量不断增大，实现了低温煤焦油部分轻质化；半焦的表面变得粗糙凹凸不平有龟裂纹，导致半焦的反应性增加.四种冶金渣中炼铁瓦斯泥对热解过程的催化作用更为显著.@以低变质粉煤为主要原料，以煤直接液化残渣（DCLR）为黏结剂，利用成型热解技术成功制备出性能优良的型焦产品，采用红外分析及扫描电镜（SEM）分析对型焦进行表征，主要考察液化残渣加入量对型焦抗压强度的影响.研究表明，随着去灰后的煤直接液化残渣（D-DCLR）添加比例的增加，热解焦油和煤气的产率逐渐增大，而型焦的抗压强度先增加后减小，当其添加量为40%时，抗压强度出现了一个最大值573.3 N/ball.热解过程中胶质体的含量、挥发分的大量析出以及灰分的增加是型焦抗压强度变化的主要影响因素.@选择影响褐煤提取腐植酸过程的主要因素（搅拌时间、碱液浓度和温度）作为优化对象，应用Box-Benhnken的中心复合设计（CCD）和高等数学知识获得了可以用来预测响应值（提取率）的数学模型，模型的方差分析结果表明预测模型具有良好的预测性与适应性.通过响应面分析法优化了主要工艺条件，最佳工艺条件是：搅拌时间为82.32 min，氢氧化钠溶液浓度为0.94 mol/L，提取温度为65.83 ℃，由预测模型获得的最大提取率为82.19%.在预测的最佳工艺条件下进行实际实验，获得了与预测值相近的实验结果.@以太西无烟煤为原料，KCl作为添加剂，通过混合、成型、炭化、活化过程制备活性炭.用CO2吸附量、碘值、堆积重、比表面积和孔径分布等对样品进行表征.研究表明，活性炭的CO2吸附量与其碘值、比表面积和总孔容等指标无明显的线性关系.进一步研究发现，活性炭的CO2吸附量与孔径分布有很大的相关性.借助Excel软件对活性炭各个孔径区间孔容与CO2吸附量进行线性回归，寻找最优孔径区间，分析各孔径区间对CO2吸附量的影响.结果表明，CO2吸附量与0.61 nm~0.79 nm之间的孔容有明显的相关性，扩大该孔径范围的孔容是提高活性炭CO2吸附量的关键.@考察了葡萄糖、pH值、煤用量、Fe2+浓度交互作用下煤发酵产氢的最优培养条件.在Fe2+和pH值及葡萄糖单因素实验的基础上，应用极差分析原理，设计四因素交互作用实验.以葡萄糖、pH值、煤用量和Fe2+为响应因子，以产气量为响应值，采用响应面法处理实验数据.结果表明，在所选的因素水平范围内，葡萄糖和pH值对产气量影响显著，pH值和Fe2+之间交互作用显著，煤用量大小影响不太明显.实验证明，培养基中葡萄糖用量为6 g/L，初始pH值为5.5，煤基质用量为50 g/L，FeCl2·4H2O用量为10 mg/L时，产氢效果最好，产氢率达24.26 mL/g，为大规模工业化实验提供参考.@通过不同改性剂的复合使用来降低煤沥青的毒性，并考察其路用性能，采用紫外分光光度计分析有毒物质的含量，并对处理后煤沥青的高低温性能及温度敏感性进行了分析.结果表明，处理后煤沥青中的高致癌物苯并[a]芘有很大程度的降低，降低率最大为85.22%，煤沥青的高低温性能尤其是低温性能得到很大改善，对温度的敏感度也有所下降.@建立CaO固硫反应的未反应缩芯动力学模型，通过模型计算，考察了宏观反应、灰层扩散控制、气膜扩散控制和化学扩散控制条件下，反应温度、CaO粒径对固硫反应特性的影响.结果表明，提高反应温度、延长反应时间和减小CaO粒径，有利于提高CaO转化率，其中减小CaO粒径对于提高CaO固硫效果最为明显.模型计算结果与实验结果分析表明，未反应收缩芯模型可较好地描述CaO-SO2固硫反应的宏观动力学，其中影响CaO固硫反应的最主要因素是化学反应扩散控制，提高CaO固硫效率最有效的方法是减小CaO粒径.@采用污泥重力浓缩脱水的实验方法探讨了煤粉对污泥调质与浓缩脱水的影响.结果表明，用煤粉对污泥进行调质，能够改善污泥的浓缩脱水性能和沉降性能，当100 g污泥中加入10 g煤粉时，浓缩污泥的含水率由煤粉调质前的91.13%降至调质后的76.35%，污泥的平均沉降速率由煤粉调质前的1.30 mL/min提高至调质后的1.73 mL/min；不同粒度的煤粉对污泥调质与浓缩脱水性能存在差异，最适宜污泥调质的煤粉粒径为0.076 mm～0.25 mm；随着煤粉投量的增加，污泥浓缩脱水性能及污泥机械脱水性能得到较大改善.用煤粉对污泥进行调质，能使浓缩污泥的含水率小于80%，为浓缩污泥与煤混合配制污泥水煤浆提供了条件，对污泥的资源化利用有重要的理论和实际意义.@介绍了国内外几种典型的煤干馏工艺，根据热载体类型的不同，可以分为气体热载体法、固体热载体法和气-固热载体法，从工艺流程、原理特点、问题不足、工业化程度等方面对这几种典型工艺进行了详细分析.在此基础上提出了清华大学的流化床气-固热载体法干馏工艺，详细介绍了该工艺的工艺流程和技术特点.该工艺可以产生更多高价值的轻质焦油，同时产生清洁的产品煤气和半焦，具有重要的推广价值.@褐煤中的含氧官能团与褐煤中的水分具有较为明显的交互作用.利用不同浓度的氢氧化钠、盐酸及双氧水对褐煤进行化学改性，通过DSC（differential scanning calorimetry）分析改性褐煤样品中水分特性的变化，同时结合FTIR手段分析对改性前后的煤样化学官能团进行表征.结果表明，氢氧化钠改性后样品中自由水及结合水分的含量增加，盐酸溶液改性后样品水分冻结特性与原煤基本相同，双氧水溶液改性后的煤样中自由水含量减少，结合水基本消失.FTIR表征结果表明，—OH官能团增加是影响煤样中自由水及结合水分含量增加的主要原因.@采用等体积浸渍法制备了Fe/MgO，Co/MgO和Ni/MgO催化剂，利用固定床反应器对石河子烟煤在热解气气氛下的催化热解行为进行了研究，考察热解气在催化剂作用下对煤热解焦油产率、半焦产率、轻重油比例以及焦油族组成的影响，并与相同条件下N2气氛和热解气气氛热解特性进行了对比分析.结果表明，三种催化剂对煤在热解气中的热解都有促进作用，其中Ni/MgO催化剂对提高焦油产率最明显.在气体流量为400 mL/min，热解温度为550 ℃，Ni/MgO为催化剂的条件下，焦油产率为7.33%，与相同条件下在N2气氛和热解气气氛下热解相比，焦油产率分别提高了78%和42%.而Co/MgO催化剂对提高轻油的作用较明显.这表明热解气催化活化对煤热解有较好的促进作用，可抑制缩聚反应，提高焦油的产率和改善焦油的品质.@以河南宜洛煤系黄铁矿为原料，采用微波加热强化煤系黄铁矿的磁性，探讨微波加热时间及原料粒度对煤系黄铁矿磁性的影响规律与作用机理.结果表明，微波加热时间及黄铁矿粒度是影响煤系黄铁矿磁性强化的重要因素.随微波加热时间的延长，煤系黄铁矿的比磁化率先逐渐增大后迅速减小，在微波加热时间为240 s时达到最大值533.18×10-8 m3/kg；随着粒度的减小，煤系黄铁矿的比磁化率逐渐增大；煤系黄铁矿磁性的变化与其自身热分解反应有关.在微波加热过程中，煤系黄铁矿主要经历如下历程：黄铁矿→黄铁矿（样品脱水及黄铁矿晶型转变）→磁黄铁矿→陨硫铁.@选择焦作两选煤厂的原煤及其洗选产品和洗煤水作为研究对象，探讨煤中砷在洗选过程中的迁移行为和分配特征.结果表明，焦作原煤中砷含量较高；在所有洗选产品中，精煤中砷的含量都得到不同程度的去除，平均脱除率为54.97%，最高脱除率高达73.19%，而洗选副产品洗矸石和煤泥中砷含量均相对富集，其富集率的平均值分别为196.29%和64.67%；两选煤厂含砷量最低的洗煤水其砷含量为0.76×10-6，仍超过了国家规定的排放标准，因此对于煤泥的的利用和洗煤水的排放需要加以关注.@为比较空气和过热蒸汽干燥对褐煤化学结构和反应活性的影响，在流化床干燥器中对褐煤进行干燥，采用傅立叶变换红外光谱仪（FTIR）对原煤和干燥后样品的化学结构参数进行分析，并通过热重分析(TGA)实验对比了不同干燥方式褐煤的热解特征参数和动力学参数.结果表明: 褐煤在空气和过热蒸汽干燥过程中，随着温度的升高会逐渐失去羧基和羰基含氧官能团，当温度高于135 ℃时，空气中干燥的褐煤发生表面氧化反应，而在蒸汽中干燥的褐煤，温度达到160 ℃仍没有发生氧化反应.干燥后的褐煤与原煤相比，活化能增加，反应活性降低.相同温度下，过热蒸汽干燥后褐煤的活性大于空气干燥后褐煤的活性.@研究了蒙东地区两种不同煤化程度褐煤的干燥过程，并对干燥至不同程度的褐煤进行分析.在干燥过程中不同煤化程度褐煤干燥速率变化趋势较为一致，煤化程度对干燥速率有一定的影响.煤化程度较低的乌拉盖褐煤其平均干燥速率较高，达到最大干燥速率的时间点较早.干燥过程改变了褐煤的微观结构，干燥后水分较低的褐煤其比表面积与原煤相比有所增加.随着干燥后水分的不断降低，褐煤中的含氧官能团表现为先减少后增加的趋势.与宝日希勒褐煤相比，乌拉盖褐煤中含氧官能团开始增加的时间点较早，更容易被氧化.@针对目前高温储能相变材料较少和煤中无机成分处理困难的现状，通过对煤中无机成分热解、碱熔、酸溶、沉淀和萃取等步骤，以H2SO4，HCl和NaOH为主要反应试剂，改变反应体系的温度、酸的浓度、碱与原料的配比，制备出一系列可溶性和不溶性的样品.通过对样品进行组分分析、差热-热重分析和XRD方法的表征，确定出样品的组成、结晶水的含量、某种组分的分解温度和含量以及熔点、结晶程度和晶型.在上述表征与分析基础上，发现碱熔法制备的材料在50 ℃~150 ℃范围内能够吸热较多且晶型较好，可作为换热器的相变材料.@利用碱金属碳酸盐作催化剂，对低灰熔点无烟煤煤焦与CO2的催化气化反应活性进行研究.结果表明，反应活性主要受温度、催化剂种类及担载量的影响，催化活性顺序为：K2CO3>Na2CO3>Li2CO3，煤焦的反应活性随着催化剂担载量的增加而提高；在反应过程中，催化剂与煤焦中的物质会发生一定程度的反应，生成不溶性盐；煤焦的比表面积会随着催化剂担载量的增大而减小，但催化活性反而增强，其主要受到催化剂提供的反应活性中心的影响.@通过对原料煤可磨性、工业分析、灰成分、煤岩组分、黏结性及结焦性能的研究，结果表明，进口莫桑比克煤为中等灰分、中等挥发分、低硫分、强黏结性的中等煤化程度主焦煤，采用其单独炼焦可以制得冷热强度均较高的优质焦炭.通过与国内生产的优质主焦煤性能指标进行比较，莫桑比克主焦煤具有硫分适中、强黏结性和结焦性等优势，确定莫桑比克主焦煤可以替代国内优质主焦煤进行配煤炼焦.采用70 kg实验焦炉进行不同配比的莫桑比克焦煤代替主焦煤的炼焦实验，结果表明，莫桑比克主焦煤可以作为配煤煤种资源进行应用，并在满足焦炭质量的前提下，确定了进口莫桑比克主焦煤的最佳配比，降低了焦炭的生产成本.@通过选取不同炼焦煤的特征指标，对微波干燥前后这些特征指标的分析比较，探索微波干燥技术对炼焦煤煤质的影响.结果表明，微波干燥技术在去除炼焦煤水分的同时，对炼焦煤的工业分析和黏结指数无明显影响；对基氏流动度和奥亚膨胀度存在正影响，但不明显；对胶质体影响较大，特别是其过程行为.因此微波干燥技术对炼焦煤煤质无较大影响，如果存在影响，也是有利于改善炼焦煤煤质的.@以中温煤沥青为原料，采用冷冻粉碎方法制得具有一定粒度级配的煤沥青粉后，再加入适量分散剂与去离子水、自来水和焦化废水分别制备煤沥青水浆.考察了分散剂用量与煤沥青水浆流变性的关系，并对分散剂在煤沥青表面的吸附和Zeta电位进行了研究.研究表明，三种水均能制得浆体浓度为70%的煤沥青水浆，且浆体的表观黏度均随剪切速率的增加呈下降趋势.由去离子水、自来水和焦化废水制得煤沥青水浆的低位发热量、挥发分和灰分均达水煤浆Ⅰ级标准，硫分达Ⅱ级标准.三种水的分散剂溶液在煤沥青表面的吸附量和Zeta电位均随分散剂浓度的增加呈增大趋势，当分散剂浓度达到一定值后继续增加分散剂的浓度，吸附量和Zeta电位稍有下降，且吸附量和Zeta电位达到最大时对应的分散剂浓度基本相同.@在同步热分析仪上对小龙潭褐煤进行了不同升温速率（5 K/min，10 K/min和20 K/min）下的O2/CO2燃烧特性实验，确定不同升温速率下煤粉的燃烧特性参数及动力学参数.实验结果表明，随着升温速率的增大，煤粉的TG曲线和DTG曲线均向低温区偏移，煤样的着火温度和燃尽温度升高，燃烧时间延长，可燃性指数和综合燃烧特性指数增大，同时，反应动力学参数随升温速率的变化而不同，频率因子呈上升趋势.@以5种煤泥型煤为原料进行燃烧实验，研究煤泥型煤的燃烧特性及影响因素.结果表明，成型过程及黏结剂等对煤泥的燃烧性能基本无影响；煤泥型煤燃烧初期主要为挥发分的析出和燃烧，火焰旺盛火力强；型煤中后期燃烧为焦炭的燃烧，燃烧由型煤表面不断深入内部进行，氧气要扩散到焦炭表面会受到灰壳及其内部产生的挥发分和燃烧产物等扩散阻力.型煤挥发分越高，灰分越低，其燃烧速率越大，且易于燃尽.@针对两种印尼褐煤进行了自燃倾向性评价，研究了印尼低热和高热褐煤煤堆在堆放周期内不同高度和不同深度方位温度变化规律.结果表明，在相同的堆放时间下，低热褐煤煤堆达到自燃敏感温度区域范围比高热褐煤煤堆广泛，同时建立煤堆内部温度和表面温度的函数关系，并对印尼褐煤煤堆进行热值损失评估，为燃煤电厂印尼褐煤合理堆放和周转提供科学指导.@以未经任何活化的内蒙古煤热解半焦为催化剂，研究了甲烷在微波加热条件下裂解制氢的反应规律和催化剂失活机理，探讨了半焦的表面结构特征和含氧官能团，分析了反应条件对甲烷催化裂解过程的影响.研究表明，在650 ℃～850 ℃之间，内蒙古褐煤半焦是一种很好的甲烷裂解制氢催化剂，在半焦制备温度为850 ℃，反应温度为850 ℃，空速为600 mL/(h·g)的条件下，半焦催化甲烷裂解的初始转化率最高达到了61.75%；升高半焦制备温度和催化反应温度以及降低空速有利于提高甲烷的转化率；半焦催化活性降低的主要原因是表面结构特性的改变和含氧官能团的减少.@以FeSO4·7H2O为铁源，以氨水为沉淀剂，通过沉淀-空气氧化法，在不同pH值条件下制备了一系列铁系催化剂；采用X射线衍射、低温N2吸附、扫描电镜和透射电镜等技术对催化剂进行了表征.通过800 ℃焙烧3 h考察了催化剂的含水量.结果表明，不同pH值制备的催化剂主体晶相和微观结构有较大差异，其中pH值为7.0时，催化剂主体晶相为γ-FeOOH，微观形态为板条状，其比表面积最高，平均孔径最小，催化剂中含水量最高.@基于热重-质谱（TG/MS）联用系统对从风化煤中提取的腐植酸进行了热解反应研究，对黑腐酸和棕腐酸的热解曲线作了分析，同时对小分子气体的逸出规律进行了探讨.结果表明，黑腐酸和棕腐酸的失重趋势一致，但是黑腐酸的失重率小于棕腐酸的失重率；在小分子气体逸出曲线中，黑腐酸和棕腐酸的H2和CH4逸出量相近.棕腐酸的H2O逸出量大于黑腐酸的H2O逸出量，在热解过程H2O的逸出量高于CH4，CO和CO2的逸出量，黑腐酸的CO最高峰温出现得比棕腐酸要迟；棕腐酸含硫组分及官能团稍多于黑腐酸；棕腐酸轻质碳氢化合物逸出量明显高于黑腐酸；轻质芳香烃化合物逸出量二者基本相同.并根据Coast-Redfern积分方法计算出了腐植酸热解的表观动力学参数.@对神东某矿区高效煤粉工业锅炉粉煤灰的工业分析、化学组分、矿物构成、粒度分布、孔隙结构及微观形貌等进行了研究分析.结果表明，该样品的化学成分以SiO2和Al2O3为主，其次是CaO和Fe2O3；固定碳含量为0.69%，在1 000 ℃下的烧失量为4.35%.粉煤灰粒度主要集中在50 μm以下，其中粒径为10 μm左右的颗粒所占比例最多，约占粉煤灰颗粒总量的4.8%.微观结构以狭缝状孔道为主，并且含有较多的二次孔，孔径分布以中孔为主，孔径为3.8 nm，BET比表面积为36.5 m2/g.从微观形貌上看，粉煤灰由空心或实心的球形及一些形状不规则的颗粒构成，其中以球形颗粒为主.@以潞安矿区所产煤矸石为研究对象，对该区16种煤矸石样品的工业成分、化学成分以及矿物成分进行了理化性质分析.在此基础上，采用盐酸酸浸法浸取煤矸石中的氧化铝.结果表明，在800 ℃煅烧活化后，氧化铝的平均溶出率可达到62.4%以上，消纳1 000 kg煤矸石可得到131.6 kg氧化铝，同时产生500 kg SiO2含量约为83.9%的酸浸硅渣，使SiO2得到富集，可进一步用于制取白炭黑等硅产品，加大煤矸石的资源化利用.@以辽宁阜新矿区所产废渣自燃煤矸石为骨料，添加适当粉煤灰，配制混凝土空心砌块.依据均匀设计理论设计实验方案，研究不同配合比情况下煤矸石混凝土空心砌块的表观密度、吸水率、相对含水率、软化系数、碳化系数、抗冻性和抗压强度等性能指标.通过回归分析，得到抗压强度方程.利用BP神经网络预测出煤矸石混凝土砌块抗压强度，预测结果与实验结果吻合较好.实验与计算结果表明，采用煤矸石配制混凝土砌块，强度达到建材使用标准，能降低工程造价，且可以有效治理环境污染，工艺先进，值得大力推广使用.@
In this paper, a typical candle coal was selected as the research sample. The pyrolysis characteristics of this candle coal at different pyrolysis temperature were systematically studied by using vertical tubular pyrolysis oven, horizontal tubular pyrolysis oven, gas chromatography etc. The result showed that with the increase of pyrolysis temperature, the productivity of coal tar slightly decreased and the productivity of semi-coke slightly increased, affected by the secondary reactions. With the increase of temperature, the content of hydrogen and carbon monoxide in subsection coal gas increased; the content of methane first increased then decreased, maximized at about 600℃. The content of hydrogen in mixed coal gas is the highest over 800℃, and the content of hydrogen increased with the increase of temperature. The volatile content of semi-coke decreased with the increase of temperature, but almost remain unchanged over 900℃. Fundamental properties of coal tar produced by pyrolysis at 900℃ were analyzed at the end.@Characteristics of gas products during temperature-programmed pyrolysis of three grades bituminous coal were studied using thermogravimetric-mass spectrometric (TG-MS) analysis. The effects of pyrolysis temperature, heating rate and coal grade on gas yield and generation regularity were investigated. The experimental results indicated that the devolatilization index decreases with the increasing of heating rate, and it is beneficial to products release. However, the reaction time was shortened and the gas yield was reduced. The generating curves of hydrocarbon gases shown one single peak shape, but the generating curves of other gases were irregular. Hydrogen and Hydrocarbons generated from different coals has the same tendency of ionic strength with temperature, and also has similar peak temperatures. The gas yield of different coals was related to the composition of raw coal. Meanwhile, the form of sulfur was different in different coal samples, and it mainly release in the form of H2S, SO2 and COS. @In this paper, the influence of different swelling time, different solvents, mineral elements, pretreatment, metal inorganic salt on swelling behavior and the swelling kinetics of Xinyuan low order bituminous coal were investigated. The results show that the swelling rate increased gradually with the extension of time, and swelling basically balanced for 48h, the slow-climbing-type solvent-swelling processes were observed. The swelling rate of coal in the mixed solvent was higher than the single solvent, the swelling rate of coal in polar solvent was higher than the non-polar solvent; mineral elements were removed, the swelling rate increased; Swelling，acid washing and alkaline washing made the swelling rate increase, drying made the swelling rate reduce; metal inorganic salt improved coal swelling differently; the swelling behavior of coal corresponded to first-order reaction kinetics equation, the apparent activation energy of coal in THN and pyridine were less than 20 kJ/mol, the swelling process was affected by Case-Ⅱ diffusion.@Coal with oxygen easily occurs composite reaction at low temperature. Active function groups are oxidized, lead to the structure change of coal. Study on coal in different oxidation temperature by infrared spectrum method was carried out. The result with differential spectrum was analyzed, and the rule of function groups in coal oxidation warm-up procedure was gained. The order of reactivity of functional groups is: amino> methyl，aromatic methylene > acid，lipid，vinyl> ether.@Co-pyrolysis characteristics of low rank mixed with ironmaking sludge in different proportions were studied in a dry distillation equipment. The results show that the low rank coal pyrolysis yields of char and gas could be improved with the increasing of ironmaking sludge content. The yield of char and gas improved and the oil and tar reduced at the same time. Furthermore, the content of CO, CH4 and H2 increased obviously in coal gas, Which is up to 9.91%,23.98% and 38.42%. The result of SEM show that the number of char surface cracks was increased; it can formate depth of crack.@Yimin lignite and Datangwujianfang lignite, two kinds of Chinese lignite, were selected for the investigation. In the work, the drying process of the lignites, which particle size were 3mm-20mm, was investigated in a self-designed fixed-bed dryer and the fine particle (0mm-3mm) lignite drying process was carried out in a downward vertical tube dryer. The drying mechanism of a single lignite particle was discussed based on the temperature curves of the flue gas and the surface of lignite particle. The results indicate that the drying process of lignite is greatly influenced by the initial flue gas temperature, particle size and initial moisture content. The water emission can be promoted by the increase of the initial flue gas temperature and the lignite devolatilization can be avoided even under the initial temperature of 800℃. The increases of particle size and initial moisture content can prevent the lignite devolatilization. Both the two kinds of lignite keep stable during the drying process in the downward vertical tube dryer. The water absorption and dewatering characters of Yimin lignite are more rapid than those of Datangwujianfang lignite. Meanwhile, compared to Datangwujianfang lignite, Yimin lignite is easier to pyrolyze. Therefore, high-temperature flue gas drying process is suitable for lignite dewatering. @The drying of coal was studied in a internal-heated fluidized bed dryer. The process parameters, drying intensity, heat transfer intensity and percentage of heat consumption distribution were calculated with the test results at the different fluidized bed temperatures, 83℃, 89℃ and 102℃. The dryer was operated at low fluidizing velocities (0.37m/s-0.41m/s) and average fluidized bed temperatures of 83℃-102℃. The maximum drying capacity 114kg/h was attained at 83℃, meanwhile the drying intensity was 76.5kg/(m2·h), the heat transfer intensity of the steam tubes was 4172W/m2, the average heat exchange rate of the fluidized bed was 200W/(m2·K),the heat consumption for evaporation of water in coal was 52%, the heat consumption of heating fluidized air and dryer heat loss were both 20%, the heat consumption of heating coal was 8%.@For the development of dense phase transport gasification technology, lignite (YN), sub-bituminous (SD) and bituminous (NM) coals were pyrolyzed in a drop-tube furnace. A digital image particle analyzer was used to obtain both swelling ratio and sphericity simultaneously. The effects of coal rank, particle size, temperature and drying pretreatment on char morphology were studied. With the increase of coal rank, the swelling ratio and sphericity were both increased. YN lignite underwent an obvious shrinkage with swelling ratio about 0.66 after the 1273K pyrolysis. SD sub-bituminous and NM bituminous were more than 1. The particle sphericity was increased after pyrolysis because of the softening. With the increase of pyrolysis temperature, the swelling ratio of NM coal decreased, and the sphericity increased first and decreased then. Finer NM coal particles resulted in higher swelling and roundness. The swelling ratio of dried NM coal chars were higher, and increased with a higher pyrolysis temperature, which is contrary to the raw coals with moisture. The variation of sphericity with temperature was similar to the raw coal but the sphericity of dried coal char was lower than the raw coal. Drying pretreatment before pyrolysis experiments could significantly influence the morphology of chars.@Based on the analysis of the characteristics of coalbed methane (CBM) water pulverized coal, this paper analyzes the liquid in the pump barrel flow with the opening and closing of the pump valve. It is proposed to research liquid in the pump barrel by piecewise analysis method , above the floating valve between liquid section as the goal, with small concentration pulverized coal particles as the research object, based on motion relative method, from single coal particles and low concentration pulverized coal particles of the actual flow analysis, in order to adjacent two particles as model, establish the graphics relations between the actual flow and the relative movement, so as to establish a single particle settling velocity and low concentration particle settling velocity relation model, based on this, this paper proposes for the first time the low concentration pulverized coal sedimentation speed calculation formula model in the static water of drainage pump barrel,and compares with experiment conclusion of coal powder sedimentation with different porosity of phase.From the result,we can conclude the application of the formula to calculate the value of coal powder sedimentation velocity and empirical value is close, the maximum error is 6.7%, verified the rationality of the formula.@Mass flowrate regulating valve of coal powder has been widely used in entrained-flow pulverized coal gasification plants and plays an important role in the regulation of coal mass flowrate. The performance of the imported regulating valve in Anqing Shell Coal Gasification Plant was tested. The test results showed that the pulverized coal flowrate was significantly sensitive to the valve opening while it was below about 20%. When the valve opening was more than 40%, the valve became almost ineffective in regulation. Meanwhile, its pressure drop characteristics in both conveying loop process and gasifier feeding process of pulverized coal were also analyzed. Based on the performance studied, the optimization for the gasifier feeding operation was suggested.@The flow of syngas and the temperature distributions of three sections of heating surface and three circular gaps for convective waste heat boiler under the two kinds of ambience (CO and H2, CO2 and N2) are studied respectively by numerical simulation methods. The results show that under two kinds of ambience, the velocity fields are similar; the residence time of discrete phase in the boilers are identical; under two kinds of ambience, the changing laws of heat transfer coefficient varying with the circular gap and three sections of heating surface are the same. The heat transfer coefficient under CO2 and N2 ambience is bigger than that under reducing ambience; under two kinds of ambience, heat transfer distribution is different, which leads to big difference in temperature field. The different temperature distribution caused by different ambience will contribute to different arrangement of the heating surface in the boiler. Therefore, the article provides the reference to the design of safety and high efficiency of convective waste heat boiler under two different ambience.@The experiments on the co-gasification of corn straw and lean coal with steam-oxygen-carbon dioxide mixture were carried out in the fixed bed gasifier. The effects of straw proportion，reaction temperature and the oxygen concentration(OC) on the gas composition and low heat value (LHV) were investigated. The results show that the straw in the samples promote the production of CO and hydrocarbon and suppress the production of H2, however, excessive straw can reduce the gas content and LHV. The gas content of CO and H2 reach their maximum when the straw percentage reaches 0.2 and 0, respectively. The LHV reaches the maximum at the straw percentage of 0.2. The increase of temperature can promote the co-gasification and improve the gas content, but excessive temperature suppress the production of CnHm. By increasing OC, the gas content and LHV are improved. LHV reaches the maximum when the OC comes to 0.2. The mixing of CO2 in the enriched gas can improve the gas content and save cost. @A two-stage fixed bed reactor was used to simulate the three-stage bed pyrolysis of coal for implementing the pyrolysis successively at low, medium and high temperatures of 450℃, 650℃ and 900℃.  The interaction of pyrolysis reactions between two adjacent stages, i.e. between the low- and medium-temperature pyrolysis in the upper two stages and between the medium- and high-temperature pyrolysis in the lower two stages, was investigated to reveal the mechanism of improvement on the quality of tar and gas for multi-stage bed pyrolysis of coal.  It was found that the interaction between the low- and medium-temperature pyrolysis increased the light fractions in tar (boiling points below 360℃) and CH4 content in gas, while it decreased the H2 content in the gas.  This indicates that the tar quality improvement via the interaction between the low- and medium-temperature pyrolysis in the upper two stages is mainly due to the in-situ upgrading of tar catalyzed by char.  The interaction between the medium- and high-temperature pyrolysis increased the tar yield and light tar fractions, while it elevated the CH4 and CO contents and decreased the H2 content in the pyrolysis gas.  These show that it is the H2-rich atmosphere that improved the yield and quality of tar by the interaction between the medium- and high-temperature pyrolysis.  As a consequence, the multi-stage bed coal pyrolysis realized mainly the in-situ upgrading of tar under catalysis of char and the H2-rich atmosphere of pyrolysis that can improve the quality of the pyrolysis oil and gas.  @This experiment is the use of low ash, high moisture Xinjiang coal, and industrial methanol as raw material, for the detailed methanol coal slurry preparation and characteristics. The experiment choose the grinding 172μm and 54μm two different pulverized coal. Discuss the impact of ratio of raw materials for the preparation of methanol of methanol coal slurry,granularity to select,type and amount of dispersant (stabilizers),as well as the influence of temperature on the performance of the methanol coal slurry. The optimum technological condition is that: the dosage of sodium dodecyl sulfate and bentonite are 25%，coal particle size grinding 172μm: 54μm = 1∶1 mixed with the lowest viscosity. Performance measurements show that the viscosity of methanol coal slurry below 1200mPa·s, Stability is very good and the highest concentration of methanol coal slurry is 63%.@In order to investigate the effects of particle size to characteristics of semi-coke from the coal pyrolysis process, the characteristics of semi-coke including yield, ash content, volatile content, and structure were studied. The results shows that the activation energy increased with coal particle size, and the volatile emission from large particle coal pyrolysis was higher than that from little particle coal pyrolysis in low temperature. The semi-coke yield always decreased with the increase of particle size, while the coal tar yield decreased with the increase of particle size. The structure of semi-coke from little particle coal pyrolysis was not fine and close due to low degree of crystallinity. The ash content of semi-coke from little particle coal pyrolysis appeared increasing with the decrease of particle size due to more mineral substance in little particles, while the volatile content of semi-coke from large particle coal pyrolysis was lower caused by more volatile emission during pyrolysis process. @The coking coal blending technology of stamp-charging coke oven was studied using different species of coking coal. According to the requirement of metallurgical coke, the reasonable coal blending scheme was investigated. Based on this，coke which is accorded with the characteristic of coke ash and sulfur content, the broken and abrasion Strength, coke reactivity (CRI) and coke strength after reaction (CSR) will be available. The results show that the coke ash value can be predicted from modified formula, and the coke sulfur content can be predicted from the raw material and the empirical value of the mixed coal sulfur content. The reasonable volatile matter of mixed coal is chosen based on requirements of coke ash and sulfur content, cold and hot state. Coal strength is forecasted by thickness of colloidal matter layer（y） of mixed coal for stamp-charging coke oven, which shows the practical significance to the applications in industrial production.@With a coal extract as precursor, four kinds of carbon materials (named FKC600, FKC700, FKC800, FKC900) used for supercapacitor electrode were successfully prepared by using carbonization method at 600℃,700℃,800℃,900℃ under the protection of nitrogen, respectively. The pore structure of as-obtained carbon materials were characterized by hypothermia nitrogen adsorption.The electrochemical properties of supercapacitors with carbon materials as electrodes were studied by using galvanostatic charge-discharge and  cyclic voltammetry techniques. The results showed that, with carbonization temperature increasing, the specific surface area and total pore volume of the four carbon materials increased gradually, but the overall pore structures were underdeveloped. The specific surface area of the FKC600 and FKC700 only reached about 14·g-1. Four carbon materials in 3mol/L KOH electrolyte had a good charge-discharge reversibility, behaved a typical double layer capacitance. The volumetric specific capacitance and area capacitance first increased and then decreased with carbonization temperature increasing. The volumetric specific capacitance of FKC700 reached up to 112.4F·cm-3, the area specific capacitance of FKC600 and FKC700 were more than 800μF/cm2 much higher than the theoretical storage limit of carbon materials. @Formed activated carbon was prepared from Shenmu bituminous with coal tar pitch as binder by KOH and ZnCl2 activation under low impregnation ratio. Specific surface area and pore structure parameters were characterized by nitrogen adsorption at 77K. The influence of impregnation ratio on pore structure of formed activated carbon and its adsorption properties were investigated. The differences of structure and properties of activated carbon prepared by KOH and ZnCl2 activation were also studied. The results showed that the specific surface area, total pore volume and iodine adsorption value of activated carbon prepared by KOH activation were all higher than ZnCl2 activation under the same impregnation ratio. The specific surface area, total pore volume, the ratio of mesopore and iodine adsorption value of formed activated carbon prepared by KOH activation reaches 811m2/g, 0.513cm3/g, 23.6%, 1125mg/g when the impregnation ratio is 1.0, and formed activated carbon prepared by ZnCl2 activation reaches 472m2/g, 0.301cm3/g, 30.6%, 527mg/g respectively. The pore size of formed activated carbon prepared by two kinds of activation method mainly distribute in a range of 1.2nm-2.0nm and 3.6nm-4.5nm.@In light of this situation, the technology of briquette of bituminous coal in low rank is still in the initial stage. In order to study the influence of terminal temperature and its holding time on briquette quality, a series of experiments of single factor under different terminal temperature and different holding time at the best terminal temperature were carried out under natural and saturated state by concerned equipments to manufacture briquette and determine the strength of briquette. The testing results show that 160℃ can be used as the best terminal temperature for drying coal briquette by bituminous coal in low rank (Shenmu coal), and reasonable holding time of best terminal temperature is 20min-30min.@Thermogravimetric analysis was used to study pyrolysis characteristics of bituminous coal of datong(coal sample DT), municipal sludge(sludge SZ) and the mixture. The differences of pyrolysis behavior of sludge SZ, coal sample DT and sludge-coal blends were disclosed, and the influences of sludge SZ, coal sample DT and mixing ratio of sludge and coal on the pyrolysis process were studied. It is found that the pyrolysis feature of municipal sludge is much better than that of bituminous coal; the municipal sludge and bituminous coal have different pyrolysis characteristics parameters in aspects of total weight loss, weight loss rate and volatile release temperature range. Sludge SZ and coal sample DT blending on the pyrolysis process have catalytic effect, and their biggest catalysis of blending specific flow is not the same. The pyrolysis characteristics of sludge-coal blends are related to the mixing ratio of sludge SZ and coal sample DT.@Taking the glucose concentration of 2000mg / L, the mediator concentration of 1.66×10-1 mmol/L, the MFC was operated for up 13. The experiment identified the influence of the long running to the MFC’s electrochemical behavior. It took 1.5h for starting up,attained its maximum output voltage,then entered plateaus . The charge transfer resistance decreased from 216Ω to 76.52Ω, manifesting the biofilm had become immature completely,it operated steadily .To the 13th day, the charge transfer resistance has increased by up to 1657Ω,the long time running leaded to the greatly decrease of biofilm electrochemical activity, The capacity of MFC’s producing electricity decreased greatly.@In this paper, cordierite honeycomb carriers were pretreated by different acid and alkaline solutions to prepare Fe-Mo/ZSM-5 monolithic catalysts. The effect of pretreatment method on the coating rate and performance of the monolithic catalyst was studied. Meanwhile, the surface character, structure and surface acidity of the monolithic catalyst were analyzed by XRD, NH3-TPD and SEM techniques. Results showed that acid and alkaline pretreatment can both increase the coating rate and the catalytic performance of the monolithic catalyst, and the catalyst pretreated by HCl performed best. It is believed that this result can be contributed to the effect of acid solution, which can modify the cordierite surface and change the surface acidity of monolithic catalyst.@Pyridine extraction of Shendong Shangwan coal(SDR), macerals of vitrinite concentrate(SDV) and inertinite concentrate(SDI) obtained using sink-float method combined with hand-picking from SDR were conducted. The coal samples before and after pyridine extraction were characterized using 13C-NMR, FTIR and XRD. The  extraction rate of three samples are as follows: SDV(15.78%)>SDR(13.89%)>SDI(9.4%). The results of 13C-NMR, FTIR and XRD for the samples after pyridine extraction show that the aromaticity increase, —CH3, —CH2, C—H aliphatic side chain, C—O functional group, hydroxyl groups and other small structure decrease, while the skeletal structure of three coal samples  have no change.@In this paper, an experimental study on the 13C-NMR characteristics of coal structure before and after being interacted with chlorine dioxide was carried out selecting five different rank coal samples, and the results are as follows that the aliphatic carbon radicals of higher chemical activity have a decrease after chlorine dioxide due to their partial transformation into other relatively stable radicals; the oxygenic functional radicals have a reduction while the carboxyl and carbonyl of some small molecules have an increase; the unsaturated hydrocarbon bonds of aromatic hydrocarbons and the other oxygen bonds of aromatic nucleus are fractured, and part of aromatic nucleus is opened and thereby the aromaticity is reduced. This study provides an experimental support for revealing the mechanisms that chlorine dioxide affects the adsorption capacity and permeability of coal reservoirs.@Low-temperature co-pyrolysis of Eichhornia crassipes(EC) and low-rank coal(LFC) blends were undertaken in a special fixed bed reactor. The results show that the pyrolysis oil yield rise to 11.32% with EC ratio of 30%, which increased by 24.81% and 5.11% respectively compared with coal and calculated value from the additive model. From TG experiments, additional weight loss is observed at 300 ℃-700 ℃. The content of alkanes rise by 34.46% supported by GC-MS and H/C of co-pyrolysis oil rise by 8.72% compared with coal, while heat value is slightly lower than that of gasoline and diesel fuels. Due to the synergetic effect existed in co-pyrolysis of EC and coal, the quality of co-pyrolysis oil is upgraded.@Different mixing ratio and different heating rates are used in different coal mixed with oily sludge pyrolysis experiments by thermogravimetric analyzer, the pyrolysis gas is analyzed by gas chromatography. The experimental results show that the pyrolysis process of coal and oily sludge mixture is divided into five stages, which is dehydration, precipitation of light hydrocarbons, cracking of heavy hydrocarbon and removal of coal small molecular chain, secondary cracking of heavy hydrocarbons and removal of coal big molecular chain, polycondensation reactions of the char and decomposition of mineral. Oily sludge mixed with coal pyrolysis kinetics parameters can be solved by using Coats-Redfern integration method which also brings us kinetics parameters dependence of mixing ratio, heating rate and coal type. Pyrolysis gas is H2, N2, CO2, CO, CH4, C2H6, C2H4, C3H8 and C3H6, etc by gas chromatography. The generation law of main gaseous product (H2,N2,CO2 and CH4) is analyzed.@The effect of iron-based catalysts such as Fe(NO3)3, FeCl3 and (NH4)2Fe(SO4)2 prepared by impregnation method on the hydropyrolysis behavior were investigated using a fixed-bed reactor in this paper. The role of catalyst, (NH4)2Fe(SO4)2, having the highest yield of tar was investigated, and its tar was evaluated. The results showed that coal hydropyrolysis conversion was improved after adding these three catalysts; adding (NH4)2Fe(SO4)2 of 5%, the tar yield increased from 14.3%(daf) without catalysts to 17.9%(daf). Adding different valence iron catalyst, the role of iron catalyst is different. The existence of ammonium root is conducive to the improvement of coal pyrolysis conversion and tar yield. The tar prepared from (NH4)2Fe(SO4)2 has a good quality compared with that prepared without catalyst, its quality greatly improved.@The primary issue of automatic coal petrography using image analysis method is to determine the relationship between gray value of images and the reflectance. A theoretical approach was made to analyze the relationship followed by experiments using standard materials. The suitable illumination conditions were also studied. Finally comparisons of working curves and precision between image analysis method and microscope photometer method were conducted. A linear correlation and a high degree of linear correlation coefficient had been found between gray value of images and the reflectance by both theoretical and experimental methods. The degree of linear correlation was close to 1 in a wide illumination range and the smaller the field stop was, the better the degree of linear correlation. The precision of image analysis method could match that of the traditional one.@The coal object was obtained from Jiangjunmiao in Xinjiang. Tetralin as hydrogen donor and pulping solvent, the coal slurry was prepared with colloid mill by wet milling. The effect of the grinded time on coal slurry particle size was investigated. Particle size distribution was measured by Laster granulometer. The result showed that primary particle size distribution scope were 8 000 nm-10 800 nm（2 000 mesh-1 000 mesh）, 2 400 nm-2 900 nm（6 000 mesh-5 000 mesh），800 nm-1 200 nm（18 700 mesh-12 500 mesh）and 500 nm-1 250 nm（30 000 mesh-12 000 mesh）with grinded by 1 h, 2 h, 3 h, 4 h, respectively. Results of the direct coal hydrogenation liquefaction experiment under low pressure showed that if the coal particle size become smaller, the reunion would happen in the coal particles, then the oil yield would decrease. With the same liquefaction condition, oil yield of 200 mesh coal sample was 75.24%, oil yield of 1 340 mesh coal sample was 59.96%; while, 1 340 mesh coal sample was treated by ultrasonic treatment, oil yield has been greatly up to 80.04% and increased by almost 20%.@Optimal conditions for grafting reaction of sodium lignosulfonate (SL) and acrylamide (AM) through orthogonal experiment were determined. And its influence on the slurry concentration, viscosity and stability of bituminous coal were observed with the modified products as coal water slurry (CWS) dispersants. The results of this experiment indicated that when the ratio of AM to SL is 1∶5, the temperature is 40 ℃, K2S2O8-NaHSO3 as an initiator, and the dosage of which is 3%, the reaction keeping time as 2.5 h, then the obtained is effective as a dispersant. When the amount of additive was 0.8% of the mass of the dry coal, and the concentration of CWS was 69%, the viscosity was 550 mPa·s, and the penetration ratio after 3 d was 74.75%. Under the same conditions, unmodified SL had a higher viscosity of 610 mPa·s than the former, the penetration ratio after 3 d was 70.68%. The dewatering rate decreased by 4.45% compared to the modified SL.@As a raw material, lignin from cheap maize straw could be modified to synthesizing additive through suffocated method, the optimal process parameters of synthesizing suffocated lignin: temperature is 90 ℃-95 ℃, the ratio of mass of and Na2SO3 and lignin is 2, reaction time is 6 h, the dosage of 37% HCHO is 2 mL/g(lignin). The infrared characterization demonstrates that suffocated lignin has new absorption peak at 979 cm-1 and 633 cm-1; the surface tension was determined by Baijinban method. It indicates that lignin is modified successfully and effectually. As a dispersant, suffocated lignin is used to study slurry ability of CWS, it is able to reducing apparent viscosity and raising concentration of CWS effectively, when the dosage of dispersant is 1%, the concentration of CWS attains to 70%, liquidity is grade A, velocity faster and unremitting, flow pattern is exquisite, settling time is to 25 d, no hard precipitation.@Two coking coals with different content of mineral matter and similar sulfur content were demineralized combined by HCl-HF-CrCl2. The deashed coals were pyrolyzed under argon atmosphere at 300 ℃, 500 ℃, 700 ℃ and 900 ℃ to get transformation of organic sulfur functionality occurring during pyrolysis. The XPS S2p spectra obtained were curve-resolved into three peaks with Lorentzian-Gaussian method: sulphidic(163.3 eV±0.4 eV), thiophenic(164.1 eV±0.2 eV) and sulfoxide(166.0 eV±0.5 eV). It has been demonstrated that there are not exist pyrite and sulfate in deashed coal, and organic sulfur in coal distribution is even, they occurrence in three kinds of form, namely, organic sulfide, thiophenic and sulfoxide, there are not exist sulfone in two deashed coals. The organic sulfide can decomposed completely at 700 ℃ in two coals, which evolved in the form of gas under lower temperature and which can formed thiophenic compounds under higher temperature. The content of thiophenic increase with the temperature rise but has unobvious change before 300 ℃, the change of sulfoxide is irregular.@The slag as catalyst was added to the fat coal in Pengcheng with different blending ratios, and cokes were then prepared from these blended coal samples. The thermal properties of coke were tested, and X-ray diffraction, SEM analysis and liquid nitrogen absorption were carried out. It was shown that the CO2-gasification reactivity of the resulting cokes significantly increased with the increase of the addition of slag, and their reactivity was enhanced at a maximum. Also, with the same addition, the smaller the size of the slag is, the higher the coke reactivity index is. However, the post-reaction strength of the coke decreased with the increase of the addition of slag. The ash and sulfur of cokes increased with the increase of the addition of slag but there was a point for the sulfur. And the coke directional degree got worse and the degree of cyclic condensation become smaller with the increase of the addition of slag. And the surface area of cokes increased at first and then decreased with CRI increase. The EDS study showed the compounds of Fe and Ca were evenly distributed in the coke, which enhanced the CO2-gasification reactivity and degraded the strength of the coke texture.@The coal characteristic to the application feasibility of the cogeneration technology was studied, based on a 1 kg/h scale pyrolysis results of three low-rank coals with different degree of metamorphism. It was found that the characteristic of chars was similar to that of bituminous coal after pyrolysis. Using of char blends as boiler fuels, the boiler efficiency increased than using raw coal blends and the increasing became more notably as the decrease of the coal metamorphism. In addition, the pyrolysis product, low-temperature coal tar will create substantial economic value for the power plant. The tar yield increased as the increase of the volatile content and the H/C ratio. However, the high water content in the coal will decrease the tar yield per unit and thus the economic feasibility decreased.@This paper utilizes the Aspen Plus software to simulate the system process, but to make sure the correctness of the simulation, first of all, a large amount of actual running data must be collected to adjust the Aspen Plus software. Energy method and exergy method are used to analyze the whole process, the energy flow chart and exergy flow chart are produced for this polygeneration systems. The results show that the gasification quenching process possess the maximum energy loss, the syngas separation and throttle process possess the maximum exergy loss, the energy loss and exergy loss of the purge gas release process are more than the average loss. It is also concluded that the burning exergy loss can be reduced in high pressure.@With the gas-steam ratio of self-provided power plant in an iron and steel works taken as an object, flue gas temperature, hot air temperature, feed water temperature, air fuel ratio and oxygen content in flue gas are the major factors influencing gas-steam ratio, which is analyzed by grey relation analysis. A prediction model of gas-steam ration of self-provided power plant is established on the basis of BP neural network, which is a 5-12-1 network structure, the hidden layer and output layer is transferred by tansig and purelin function respectively, momentum gradient descent optimization algorithm, traingdm is also used to train network. The results show that the model can effectively predict the gas-steam ratio of boiler, the correlation coefficient of actual values and training ones is 0.993 7, and the correlation coefficient of actual values and prediction ones is 0.976 2, the mean absolute error is also controlled within the scope. Showing a good generalization ability and outreach capacity, we can provide a theoretical basis and guide for the real production.@The Inner Mongolia coal and sorghum straw around Taiyuan, Shanxi Province were selected as the samples in this study. The effect of char preparation method, coal/biomass blend ratio and gas residence time were tested on steam gasification reactions and methanation reactions in a fixed bed reactor under the pressure of 3.5 MPa and the temperature of 700 ℃. The results showed that no synergistic effects were observed on steam gasification reaction when co-gasification of coal char and sorghum straw char blend. The catalytic activity of sorghum straw char on methanation reaction is higher than that of the coal char, however, the catalysis of sorghum straw char is equivalent to coal char after wash with water. Analysis showed that the alkali metal potassium content was significantly decreased after water wash. The relation between the methanation activity and potassium amount in biomass showed that the potassium in biomass played the key catalytic effect during methanation reactions. The increase of residence time of gas in the dense zone of the gasifier has significance on the increase of methane yield.@The preparation process of hypercoal was studied with lignite as raw material. Effects of reaction temperature, type of solvents, reaction time and solid-to-liquid ratio on the extraction yield and hypercoal ash contents were investigated. The results showed that using NMP as solvent and under the conditions of reaction temperature of 360 ℃, reaction time of 1 h, solid-to-liquid ratio of 4 g∶200 mL, the extraction rate of hypercoal is 48.8%, and ash contents is 0.54%. Infrared spectrum analysis showed that the non-covalent bond had broken and the hydrogen bond had associated. The hypercoal had a better property than that of lignite. The value of caking index(G) is 95.61.@This paper presented the preparation of activated coke from Inner Mongolia East Mongolia lignite. The activation reactions were studied using the tubular electro-thermal furnace with water stream as activation gas. The orthogonal experiments, in which the activation conditions were activation temperature, activation time and vapor velocity, were carried out to inspect the effects of reaction conditions on activated coke properties. The result shows that the optimum activation conditions were determined as: activation temperature 800 ℃, activation time 90 min and vapor velocity 2 g/min, with comprehensively consideration of methylene blue adsorption value and yield rate. The sample which was prepared under the optimum condition had a developed mesopore with a diameter of 4 nm.@Ni-Mg/Al2O3 catalyst for syngas methanation was prepared by an approach combining co-precipitation and hydrothermal methods. The effect of calcination and reduction temperatures on catalyst structure and performance for methanation were investigated by activity evaluation and catalyst characterization using X-ray diffraction (XRD), temperature-programmed H2 reduction (H2-TPR), transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and so on. The results showed that with the increase in calcination temperature the reduction of the catalyst become more difficult because of the formation of NiAl2O4 at high temperatures, especially at temperatures above 900 ℃. The specific surface area of the catalyst decreased from 130 m2/g to 34 m2/g corresponding to the calcination temperatures rise from 500 ℃ to 900 ℃. After calcination at 600 ℃, the stability and catalytic activity of the catalyst first increased and then decreased with raising the reduction temperature, and the best methanation performance appeared at a reduction temperature of 650 ℃. This is due to the differences in the reductive degrees of nickel compounds and in the grain sizes of resulting Ni. It demonstrates actually the relationship between the catalytic performance for methanantion and the structure of the Ni-Mg/Al2O3 catalyst. This study clarified that for good catalytic performance of methanation, the grain size of Ni should be small and the interaction between active metal (Ni) and catalyst supporter (Al2O3) should be moderate.@Effect of spouted bed with four different draft tubes on solid circulation can’t be ignored. This paper mainly studies the effect of four different forms draft tube with different installation height,different bed material height and different amout of fluidised gas on particle circulation. Particle circulation increases as bed material height rises.In a certain range,particle circulation increases as installation height of draft tube and loose gas flow rate rise.@According to investigation of other researchers' work, the article summarizes the principles and the features of coal char preparation methods at high heating rate under pressurized condition, including PWMR, HPFFB, PDTF etc. By comparing the methods, PDTF is the ideal system. At last, the first domestic PDTF system developed by Tsinghua University is introduced, which achieves a pressure range of 0.1 MPa-3.1 MPa, a temperature range up to 1 873 K, a particle feed rate of 0.6 g/h-6 g/h, and a comparatively long constant temperate length. Different coal char can be produced at high pressure and high heating rate conditions by the PDTF system.@In this work, three different metamorphic grade undeformed coals (Ro,max=0.38%-1.06%) and three different deformation type coals(weak-brittle deformed coal, strong-brittle deformed coal and strong-ductile deformed coal)were compared, evolution characteristics of hydrogen from gaseous products on different metamorphic grades and deformation types deformed coals were explored during pyrolysis. The results show that there is a definite difference in the transgression amount of H2 with the increasing temperature during the pyrolysis of the three undeformed coals(SGT01,JZT01 and WY01), but there is little difference on the accumulated generation of H2 during their pyrolysis. At the same temperature, there are obviously differences during the emission of three deformed coals, it is obviously that the generation amount of H2 of strong-ductile deformed coal(XTM10) and strong-brittle deformed coal(XTM07)are less than that of weak-brittle deformed coal(XTM09). It is clearly that the generation amount of H2 of strong-ductile deformed coal(XTM10) also less than that of strong-brittle deformed coal(XTM07).@In this paper, pyrolysis of the coal (Pingshuo) behavior was investigated in the fixed bed reactor under different reactive atmosphere. The effect of pyrolysis temperature and heating rate on tar, water, char yields and desulfurization rate was studied. The results indicated that methane can produce large amounts of CHx groups in the presence of a catalyst. The CHx groups made the radicals produced by the pyrolysis of coal more stable, and then improved the tar yield. The higher tar yield can be obtained when Pingshuo coal pyrolysis was integrated with the atmosphere of CH4/CO2（catalyst）. In the pyrolysis temperature of 600 ℃, the tar, water and char yield and desulfurization rate were 33.5%, 25.8%, 69.5% and 25.3%(mass fraction) respectively under the atmosphere of CH4/CO2（catalyst）, which was 1.6 and 1.8 times as that under H2 and N2, respectively.@Pyrolysis experiments for pine sawdust, undried lignite and their blending samples were performed in a tubular furnace. The results showed that the gas yields increased gradually, while liquid and solid yields reduced with the increase of pyrolysis temperature when pyrolyzed separately. High temperature was beneficial to the rapid evaporation of the moisture in lignite, and promoted the steam reforming reaction of pyrolysis product and water vapor. The addition of pine sawdust adjusted the proportion of carbon and hydrogen and promoted the pyrolysis of lignite. When the pine sawdust proportion was 30%, the difference value of the carbon conversion rate and gas generation rate between experimental value and calculated value reached to the maximum. It showed that the synergy effect behaved significantly in this condition.@The co-pyrolysis of carboniferous high sulfur coal from Weibei with white straw was presented. The effects of the pyrolysis temperature, heating rate, holding time, mix ratio of coal and biomass and pressure on the desulfurization of organic sulfur and its desulfurization law were investigated by the orthogonal test. FTIR and SEM were employed to analyze structure characteristics and pore properties of the semi-coke. The effects of low temperature extractions on the desulfurization of co-pyrolysis with biomass were introduced. The results show that the effect of pyrolysis temperature on desulfurization rate is significant. The best desulfurization conditions are 850 ℃, 15 ℃/min, 15 min, 1∶4 and 2 MPa. Pore structure of co-pyrolysis semicoke presents with a degree of regularity, thin walls, and relative large diameters, which benefits the release and spread of sulfur during co-pyrolysis. The desulfurization rates of co-pyrolysis are increased by low temperature extractions, especially for the hot water refined coal. Its co-pyrolysis desulfurization rate is about 39%.@The catalyst NiO/Al2O3 was prepared according ultrasonic impregnation-roasting method, the low transformation coal was researched in the microwave pyrolysis process with the catalyst. The relationship between the composition of gas, component characteristics change of liquid oil, morphology of solid residue and the load catalyst was discussed. The results showed that the NiO/Al2O3 catalysts played a significant catalytic effect during the process of coal pyrolysis, the hydrogen production from coal pyrolysis and the tar production rate had increased significantly, the products prepered under the condition of 450 ℃ ultrasonic impregnation and roasting 4 h had the best catalytic activity.@Organic solvent was used to extract small molecular compounds of the Yanzhou coal, extraction rate basically no longer changed when approaching 12.26% after extraction of 14 h. The molecular weight of small molecule compounds of Yanzhou coal was determined by gel permeation chromatography, the molecular weight ranging from dozens to tens of thousands, but mainly concentrated about M=400 g/mol. Finally by pycnometer method, using the mixed liquid density formula method, small molecule compounds density was measured, that is 1.192 4 g/cm3.@The changes in O-containing functional groups and surface hydrophilic property due to hydrothermal treatments under different conditions were examined in this paper using Shengli lignite. The results showed that the increases in reaction temperature, reaction time and and initial pressure could promote the removal of O-containing functional groups to different extents. The maximum removal rate of the methoxy, carboxyl and phenolic hydroxyl were 67.88%, 89.41% and 93.70%, respectively. The contact angle of the coal samples (with water) increased after the removal of O-containing functional groups, which was a direct reflection of  weak hydrophilic property on coal surface. The linear fit analysis demonstrated that the contact angle has a better correlation with carboxyl than other functional groups, implying strong affinity between carboxyl and water due to the formation of hydrogen bond.@In this study, Zaozhuang coal is extracted with carbon tetrachloride under microwave irradiation before and after hydrogen peroxide oxidation respectively, and the composition of the extract is analyzed by infrared spectrum and GC/MS/MS. The results show that 37 kinds of compounds including fat hydrocarbon, aromatic hydrocarbon and heteroatom containing organic compounds can be detected in the CCl4 extraction of Zaozhuang coal by GC/MS/MS. Among that, the majority of aliphatic hydrocarbons are alkanes that has seven kinds, alcohols and ketones that have five kinds respectively; and many aromatic hydrocarbons, amides, aldehydes, grease and other common organic compounds are detected. Aliphatic hydrocarbons include n-paraffins and isoparaffins. Heteroatem containing organic compounds include oxygen compounds, sulfur compounds and nitrogen compounds.@The lignite drying process of a 600 MW oxy-fuel combustion power plant was simulated by Aspen Plus software. The effect on drying characteristics of drying medium, temperature, flow rate and the concentration of CO2 and H2O in flue gas were investigated. The simulation results show that the flue gas of oxy-fuel combustion is suitable for lignite drying. CO2 in the flue gas can effectively prevent spontaneous combustion of lignite which make drying process more safety; CO2 can increase the drying capacity of flue gas, while H2O in the flue gas will inhibit evaporation of moisture in the coal; the increase of drying temperature and flow rate will accelerate lignite drying to achieve the requirements, while effect of the drying temperature is more obvious. According to the simulating results, temperature of 150 ℃ and flow rate of 1.4×106 m3/h are the best drying conditions for the 600 MW oxy-fuel combustion power plant.@Adding different content of alkaline oxide in the coal of Yan’an Zichang Hecaogou, the effect of oxide content on the ash melting temperature were studied and the mechanism of the ash fusion temperature change were analyzed by XRD and scanning electron microscope. The results show that in several oxides, Na2O has the best effect on reducing the ash melting temperature, can make the ash fusion temperature from 1 300 ℃ to 1 195 ℃, reduced by 105 ℃, followed by CaO, K2O and MgO, decreased 75 ℃, 55 ℃ and 45 ℃ respectively. The change of mineral composition is a major cause of the change of ash fusion temperature, while ash in the melting process. The study has vital significance in the melting temperature on changes in the coal of Yan’an Zichang Hecaogou and expanding its scope of application.@In this paper, the coal blending were obtained by mixing Fugu coal (A) with Shenmu West Ditch coal (B) and Shenmu River coal (C) in different proportion, respectively. Fugu coal has high ash melting point, while Shenmu West Ditch coal and Shenmu River coal have low ash melting point. The ash was produced by calcining in muffle furnace. The temperatures of melting characteristic of the ash in the weak reduction atmosphere were measured by JRHR-3 microcomputer ash melting point apparatus. The changes of the mineral composition in the ashes of the coal blending which were obtained in different proportion and at different temperatures were analyzed by the X-ray diffraction (XRD) and CaO-SiO2-Al2O3 three phase diagram. The experimental results show that coal blending can effectively improve the fusibility of ash melting. The ash melting point of coal blending and the proportion of coal blending have a non-linear relation. The change of the ash melting point of the coal blending is mainly due to the transformation of minerals at high temperature.@In this study, water hyacinth was pre-treated using a ball mill and then the pre-treated water hyacinth, Shenfu coal, water and dispersant were used to prepare water hyacinth-coal slurry (WHCS) proportionately. The slurry ability and rheological properties of WHCS were investigated, which were also compared with coal-water slurry(CWS). The results showed that the yield stress, thixotropy and stability of WHCS were found to be much higher than that of CWS. But the absolute value of the zeta potential of WHCS was smaller than that of CWS. With increasing ball milling time, the WHCS slurry ability was enhanced, the yield stress was obviously decreased, thixotropy and stability was slightly weakened, while the zeta potential absolute value was increased.@Co-pyrolysis characteristics of low rank mixed with metallurgical slag in different proportions were studied in a dry distillation equipment. The results show that the content of CH4 and H2 increased obviously in coal gas, which is up to 23.98% and 38.12%.The yield of tar and water slightly decreased, but straight-chain alkanes and some high value-added chemical compounds increased, which improved the quality of coal tar at the same time. The number of semi-coke surface cracks increased and formated depth of crack, so the reactivity of carbocoal increased. The catalytic pyrolysis process of ironmaking slage more effected than other kinds of metallurgical slag.@In this paper, formed coke with excellent quality was successfully prepared by briquetting pyrolysis technology, in which low rank coal and direct coal liquefaction residue (DCLR) were adopted as main raw material and additive separately. The composition and structure of formed coke were characterized by FTIR and SEM, and the effect of the proportion of DCLR on the compressive strength of formed coke was investigated. The results indicated that formed coke’s compressive strength increased first and then decreased with the proportion increase of DCLR. The compressive strength reached its maximum 573.3 N/ball as the proportion of D-DCLR increased to 40%, which was mainly attributed to the proportion increase of both the ash and colloidal matter.@The main factors such as extraction time, concentration of alkaline solution and extraction temperature were chosen as parameters to optimize the process of extracting humic acid from lignite. Box-Behnken central composite design and advanced mathematics were applied to achieve the mathematical model that could predict the response (extraction rate). Model variance analysis results showed that the prediction model had good prediction and adaptability. Main process conditions were optimized by the response surface analysis. Results showed that best technological conditions could be obtained when extraction time was 82.32 min, sodium hydroxide solution concentration was 0.94 mol/L and temperature was 65.83 ℃. Prediction model showed that the maximum extraction rate was 82.19% and the actual experiment obtained a similar result.@Activated carbons were prepared from Taixi anthracite. KCl was used as additive in this study. The preparation process is under the following procedures: mixing, extruding, carbonization and activation. The properties of the carbons were characterized by CO2 adsorption capacity, iodine number, specific surface area and pore size distribution (PSD). The capacity of CO2 adsorption was independent of iodine number, specific surface area and total pore volume. Further studies show that the CO2 adsorption capacity of the activated carbon has great relevance with the PSD. In order to find the optimum pore size for CO2 adsorption, the pore size was divided into different ranges which were fitted with the CO2 adsorption capacity by linear regression analysis through the excel software, and the relationship between the PSD and the CO2 adsorption capacity was investigated. The result showed that the CO2 adsorption capacity of activated carbon has great relevance with the pore volume between 0.61 nm and 0.79 nm and to increase the pore volume is a vital way to increase the CO2 adsorption capacity.@This paper intends to study the optimum culture condition of coal fermenting to produce hydrogen when interacted under the conditions of glucose, pH, dosage of coal and concentration of Fe2+. Based on the testing of which Fe2+, pH and glucose were used as single factors, by means of range analysis principle, a four-factor interactional experiment was designed and the data was collected by response surface method, in which glucose, pH, dosage of coal and concentration of Fe2+ were the response factors and gas production was the response value. The results show that glucose and pH both have a notable impact on hydrogen production respectively, and the interaction between pH and Fe2+ works significantly as well, whereas the effect of dosage of coal is not very obvious. The experiment bears out that under the conditions that the dosage of glucose is 6 g/L and the original pH is 5.5, and the dosage of coal matrix is 50 g/L and FeCl2·4H2O is 10 mg/L, the hydrogen production effect is best and up to 24.26 mL/g, which provides an advantageous reference for the large-scale industrialized experiment.@This paper aimed to reduce the toxicity of coal tar pitch by using the combined of modifiers, and investigated pavement performance of coal tar pitch. To analyze the content of toxic substances-benzo[a]pyrene, UV spectrophotometric was used. Besides, it was discussed that the high temperature performance and temperature sensitivity of specially treated coal tar pitch. The results showed that the treated coal tar pitch in the high-carcinogen-benzo[a]pyrene reduced to a great extent, reduction rate was up to 85.22%. Not only the high and low temperature performance of coal tar pitch improved, but also the temperature sensitivity declined.@The un-reacted shrinking core dynamic model of CaO-SO2 solid  fluorine reaction was set up. Calculated by the model, under these conditions that macro reaction, gas film diffusion control, ash layer diffusion control, chemistry diffusion control, reaction temperature, CaO particle size and addition of the effects of fluorine-fixing reaction characteristics were studied. CaO conversion increase with the reaction temperature and reaction time increasing. With the decrease of the initial particle size of CaO, CaO concentration rate significantly increased. According to result of experiment and model fitting, unreacted shrinking core model can be used to describe the reaction of CaO-SO2 sulfur retention macro-kinetics. Chemistry diffusion control was the most factor influence sulfur retention, so the best way to improve CaO conversion was to decrease the initial particle size of CaO.@The pulverized coal’s effects on the modifying and concentrated dewatering of sludge was explored by the method of gravity concentrated dewatering. The results showed that the dehydration property and the sedimentation property of the sludge have been improved greatly through adding pulverized coal into the sludge. When 10 g of pulverized coal was added to 100 g of sludge, the moisture content of concentrated sludge was reduced to 76.35% from 91.13% after modified treatment. The average sedimentation rate of sludge was increased to 1.73 mL/min from 1.30 mL/min. There are differences in the modifying and concentrated dewatering of sludge through adding different particle sizes of pulverized coal, the optimum particle size of the pulverized coal for sludge modifying is 0.076 mm-0.25 mm. With the increase of the pulverized coal’s dosage, the concentrated dewatering performance and the mechanical dewatering performance of sludge are more improved. The moisture content of concentrated sludge is less than 80% through adding pulverized coal into the sludge, which provide conditions for using the concentrated sludge mixed with coal to prepare the sludge-coal water slurry. The results have important theoretical and practical significance for the resource utilization of the sludge.@This paper gives a comprehensive presentation and comparation of the current technologies of coal low-temperature pyrolysis available at home and abroad. They are categorized into gas heat carrier technology, solid heat carrier technology and gas-solid heat carrier technology according to the different types of heat carriers. This paper analyzes the technological processes, advantages and disadvantages and industrialization degrees of the current technologies. On that basis, we put forward the technology of coal pyrolysis with gas-solid heat carrier in fluidized bed of Tsinghua University, which is given a detailed introduction of the technological process and technical feature in this paper. The technology is capable of producing high added-value light liquid products and co-producing clean gas and solid products. It has a good development prospect in future.@The interaction of oxygen-containing functional groups and moisture in lignite is very complicated. This experiment utilizes different solutions including sodium hydroxide, hydrochloric acid and hydrogen peroxide to modify the lignite. The congelation characteristics of water in modified samples were studied by DSC instrument. The change of chemical structure in modified samples was characterized by FTIR. The results of DSC showed that the bound water and free water in lignite modified by sodium increased; the congelation of water in lignite modified by hydrochloric acid was basically the same as raw coal. The free water was reduced and the bound water almost disappeared after modified by hydrogen peroxide. The results of FTIR show that the increase of functional group —OH is the main reason for the bound water and free water in lignite increased.@Three catalysts, Co/MgO, Fe/MgO and Ni/MgO, were prepared by incipient impregnation method. Catalytic pyrolysis of Shihezi bituminous coal was carried out in a fixed-bed reactor under pyrolysis gas atmosphere. The effect of pyrolysis gas on the catalytic pyrolysis behaviors was studied by comparative analysis of the tar yield, char yield, the proportion of light oil and asphaltene and the group composition with N2 atmosphere pyrolysis. The result indicates that the three catalysts have catalytication to pyrolysis of Shihezi bituminous coal, especially the catalysts of Ni/MgO can improve the tar yield obviously. The tar yield reached to 7.33% under conditions of gas flow rate of 400 mL/min, 550 ℃ and catalysts of Ni/MgO. Compared with N2 pyrolysis and pyrolysis gas pyrolysis under comparable conditions, the tar yield increased by 78% and 42% respectively. And the catalysts of Co/MgO can improve the light oil yield obviously. The results suggest that the influence of pyrolysis gas on the catalytic pyrolysis behaviors was significantly which benefit to inhibit the polycondensation reaction, increase the tar yield and improve its quality.@Magnetic of Yiluo coal-pyrite was enhancement by microwave heating. The influence and mechanism of microwave heating time and particle size on the magnetic of coal-pyrite were investigated. The results show that the microwave heating time and particle size are important factors to influence the magnetic enhancement of coal-pyrite. Magnetic susceptibility of coal-pyrite increases gradually and then decreases rapidly with increasing microwave heating time, and reaches a maximum value of 533.18×10-8 m3/kg when the microwave heating time is 240 s. Magnetic susceptibility increases gradually with decreasing particle size of coal pyrite. The change of magnetic of coal-pyrite is relative to its thermal decomposition. In the process of microwave heating, coal-pyrite mainly through the following process: pyrite, pyrite (dehydration and crystal transformation of pyrite), pyrrhotite and troilite.@The transformation behavior and distribution characteristics of arsenic in the process of coal cleaning in Jiaozuo was studied. The conclusions are as follows: the concentration of arsenic in Jiaozuo coal is relative higher; in all coal cleaning products, the concentration of arsenic in cleaned coal is reduced in different degree, the average removal rate was 54.97%, the highest removaility is as high as 73.19%, and the concentration of arsenic in the byproduct such as coal gangue and coal slime is relatively rich, its enrichment rate averages is respectively 196.29%, 64.67%; the lowest concentration of arsenic of coal in washing water in the two preparation plants is 0.76×10-6, which is still more than emissions standards stipulated by the state. Consequently, the use of coal and emission of coal washing water need more attention.@In order to compare the effect on chemical structure and reactivity for different drying medium, chemical structure parameters during fluidized bed drying in air and superheat steam studied using FTIR technique. The pyrolysis characteristic and kinetic parameters were compared for different dried lignite samples by thermogravimetric analysis (TGA) experiment. It showed that in the process of lignite drying in air and superheat steam, the carboxyl and carbonyl oxygen-containing functional groups decreased with the temperature increase. As the temperature is over 135 ℃, the oxidation will be happened on the coal surface in air drying, while it is still not happened in superheat steam drying up to 160 ℃. Comparison with the raw coal, the activation energy of dried coal increase while reactivity decrease. The reactivity of superheat steam dried coal is larger than that of air dried coal at the same temperature.@The drying processes of two types of lignite in Mengdong area with different coal rank were discussed in this paper, and  lignite samples which were dried to different degree were analyzed as well. It was found that lignite samples with different coal rank had relatively identical drying rate variation trend, while the coal rank had certain impact on drying rate. The Wulagai lignite, which has lower coal rank，could be dried at relatively higher drying rate and reach the maximum drying rate earlier compared with Baorixile lignite. Moreover, drying process changed the micromechanism of lignite, and the specific surface area of lignite which had lower moisture content after drying was bigger than raw coal’s. Along with the decrease of moisture content during drying process, the amount of oxygen functional groups in lignite declined firstly, and grew up then. Compared with Baorixile lignite, the amount of oxygen functional groups in Wulagai lignite increased earlier in drying process, which made it more easy to be oxidized.@Aiming at the high temperature phase change materials is less and the current situation of inorganic constituent in coal gangue processing difficulties, through changing the reaction temperature, acid concentration, alkali and the ratio of raw materials, and using HCl, H2SO4 and NaOH as the main reactant, series of soluble and insoluble samples have been prepared in this paper. Elemental composition of the sample has been qualitatively and quantitatively analyzed, to determine the composition. And to determine phase-transition temperature and crystal case of the samples, DTA-TGA and XRD analysis for samples have been carried out. By processing and analyzing data, it was found that the materials prepared by alkali fusion using sodium hydroxide would absorb more heats within the scope of 50 ℃-150 ℃, and crystal form good, would be use as phase change materials filled heat exchanger.@Catalytic gasification reactivity of lower ash melting point anthracite coal char with alkali carbonates as catalyst were investigated. The results showed that the catalytic reaction activity was affected mainly by temperatures, catalyst types and catalyst loadings. The order of catalytic activity was shown as follows: K2CO3>Na2CO3>Li2CO3. The reactivity increased with the increase of catalyst loadings. Analysis and experiment showed that the partly catalyst could reacted with minerals during the reaction and formed insoluble salts. The specific surface area decreased with the increase of catalyst loadings but their corresponding catalytic increased, which indicated that the catalytic was affected mainly by the active sites of catalysts.@The results showed that imported Mozambique coal is a kind of coking coal with medium degree of coalification, which has medium ash and volatile, low sulfur and strong caking by studying the grindability, industrial analysis, ash composition, coal maceral, the caking and coking properties. Higher cold and hot strength coke will be got when it is used alone to coke. Compared with the properties indexes of high-quality coal that was made in domestic, Mozambique coking coal has the advantages of moderate sulfur, strong adhesion and caking property and so on. Therefore the Mozambique coking coal can replace domestic coking coal for blending coking. Through the experiment that Mozambique replaces domestic coking coal was made under different blending ratio in 70 kg test oven, the results indicated that Mozambique coking coal can be applied as coal blending resources in the company. In addition, the optimal ratio was determined under the premise condition of meeting the quality of coke. It also reduced the coke production cost by this method.@This paper is aimed to discuss the influence of quality of coal with microwave dry technique, by selecting and analysing different characteristic indexes of coking coal. The results show that the microwave dry technique has no obvious effect on proximate analysis and caking index while removing the humidity of coking coal, no obvious positive effect on the Gieseler fluidity and Audiberts Arnu dilatation and large effect on behavior of colloid. The microwave drying technique has little effect on the quality of coking coal and is also advantageous to improve the quality of coking coal.@The coal pitch water slurry was separately prepared using deionized water, tap water and coking waste water with surfactants and coal pitch powder, which prepared with medium temperature pitch by cryogenic grinding. Dependence of rheology of slurry on surfactants was discussed, then the absorption of surfactants and Zeta potential on coal pitch surface was investigated. The results showed that coal pitch water slurry with concentration of 70% could be all prepared by the three kinds of water, and apparent viscosity of slurry declined when shearing rate increased. Lower heating value, volatile and ash content of coal pitch water slurry that prepared by deionized water, tap-water and coking waste water could all meet Level 1, while sulfur content meet Level 2. Absorption of surfactants and Zeta potential growed at first, then fell slightly with increase of dispersants concentration.@The experiment of combustion characteristics of Xiaolongtan lignite was carried out by a simultaneous thermal analyzer. It was at the different heating rate (5 K/min, 10 K/min, 20 K/min) which under the mixed O2/CO2 atmospheres that make the experiment feasible. The combustion parameters and kinetic parameters of the Xiaolongtan lignite were determined based on experimental results. The results showed that the TG and DTG curves of coal would move to lower temperature area, the ignition and combustion temperature would be higher, the burning time would be longer. Both the flammability index and composite combustion characteristic parameters would increase while the heating rate increasing. In addition, the activity energy changed with the variation of heating rate, there was an upward trend of the frequency factor of the Xiaolongtan lignite.@Five kinds of coal slime briquette were used for burning test to study the combustion characteristics and influencing factors. The experiments show that forming process and binder almost have no influence on the combustion characteristics of coal slime, the early stage of coal slime combustion was mainly the devolatilization and combustion of volatile, having vigorous flame and strong fire. The middle and late was the combustion of coke, from surface to interior, the oxygen would diffuse into the surface of coke by the resistance of gray shell, volatile and combustion products from the interal. The briquette volatile is higher and the ash content is lower, the burning rate is greater, and easy to burn out.@Indonesia lignite has the characteristics of high spontaneous combustion tendency and short spontaneous combustion period. Two Indonesia lignite were evaluated with spontaneous combustion tendency. In the whole stacking period, experimental piles of Indonesia lignite with high calorific value and low calorific value were studied in the aspects of piles temperature change objective laws in the different height and depth direction of the piles. The experiment results show the pile of Indonesia lignite with high calorific value is more broader in scope than the pile of Indonesia lignite with low calorific value in the same stacking time of sensitive spontaneous combustion temperature. Also, the function relationship of surface and internal temperature of lignite piles was established. Heat loss of Indonesia lignite was evaluated in the whole stacking period. In order to stack Indonesia lignite in safety and reduce heat loss, scientific guidance was provided in the aspects of arranging and revolving of Indonesia lignite in the coal-fired power plant.@The aim of this work was to use low-cost coal chars prepared from Inner Mongolia lignite (IML) without further activation as a catalyst for hydrogen production by methane decomposition in the microwave-assisted heating apparatus. The condition of methane decomposition was investigated and the surface properties changes of the chars including surface area, pore volume and oxygen containning functional groups were analyzed. The results indicated that IML char prepared from 650 ℃ to 850 ℃ had a high activity in methane decomposition, at reaction temperature of 850 ℃ and space velocity of 600 mL/(h·g), the initial rate of methane decomposition over IML char prepared of 850 ℃ up to 61.75%. And the methane conversion increased with the increase of the preparation temperature of char and catalytic reaction temperature, and the decrease of VHSV. The catalyst deactivation was mainly caused by the changes of surface properties and the reduction of functional oxygen groups.@A series of iron catalysts were prepared by the precipitation-oxidation method at different pH using ammonia as the precipitating agent and FeSO4·7H2O as the precursor. The catalysts were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), N2 adsorption, scanning electron microscopy and transmission electron microscopy. Water content of the catalyst were obtained by roasting the catalysts at 800 ℃ for 3 h. The results showed that there were big differences in the main crystal phase and microstructure of the catalysts prepared at different pH, the catalyst prepared at pH of 7.0 which showed the main crystal phase of γ-FeOOH and lath-like morphology, had the highest specific surface area, lowest average pore diameter, and the highest water content.@Based on thermogravimetry-mass spectrometry (TG/MS) coupled system, the pyrolysis reaction of humic acid extracted from the weathered coal was studied. The pyrolysis curves of pyrotomalenic acid and hymatomelanic acid were analyzed, and the escaping rules of small molecules gas were discussed. The results showed that pyrotomalenic acid and hymatomelanic acid had the same weight loss trend, but the weight loss rate of pyrotomalenic acid was less than that of hymatomelanic acid; in the escaping curves of small molecular gas, the amount of H2 and CH4 escaping from pyrotomalenic acid and hymatomelanic acid were similar. The amount of H2O escaping from hymatomelanic acid was greater than that of pyrotomalenic acid. The spilling quantity of H2O is higher than that of CH4, CO and CO2 in the pyrolysis process , and the peak temperature of CO escaping from pyrotomalenic acid appears later than that of hymatomelanic acid; the sulphur components and functional groups of hymatomelanic acid were slightly more than that of pyrotomalenic acid; the quantity of light hydrocarbon escaping from hymatomelanic acid was significantly higher than that of pyrotomalenic acid; while both of them had basically the same escaping amount of light aromatic hydrocarbons. Apparent kinetics parameter was obtained by Coast-Redfern integration method.@The proximate analysis, chemical composition, mineral composition, particle size distribution, pore structure and microstructure of fly ash from the pulverized coal fired industrial boiler of Shendong mine were studied and analyzed. The results show that the chemical composition of the sample is mainly SiO2 and Al2O3, followed by CaO and Fe2O3. The carbon content of the sample is 0.69%, while the amount of the ignition loss gotten under 1 000 ℃ is 4.35%. Most particle size of the fly ash is under 50 μm, while the particle size in highest content is about 10 μm, which is of 4.8% in mass of the total particles. The microstructure of the fly ash is mainly consists of the mesoporous slit-shaped pore with secondery holes. The most probable aperture is 3.8 nm and the specific surface area by BET is 36.5 m2/g. From the microcosmic angle, fly ash is mainly consists of hollow or solid spherical particles as well as some irregular shaped particles.@The utilization ways of coal gangue in Lu’an mining area were investigated via proximate analysis, chemical composition analysis and mineralogical analysis for the selected 16 coal gangue samples. Based on above research, the alumina extraction experiments were performed by hydrochloric leaching method. The results showed that more than 62.4% alumina in coal gangue could be dissolved. The consumption of 1 000 kg coal gangue would produce 131.6 kg alumina and 500 kg acid leached residue. The acid leached residue containing about 83.9% SiO2 could be further used to prepare silicon products. The study provided a new way to the comprehensive utilization of coal gangue in Lu’an mining area.@The coal gangue concrete hollow blocks were prepared with the self-ignition gangue and fly ash in Fuxin mine. Based on the theory of uniform design, the apparent density, water absorption, relative water content, soften coefficient, carbonized coefficient, frost resistance strength loss and frost resistance quality loss of the coal gangue concrete hollow block in different mixing proportion were studied, and the compressive strength equation was obtained by regression analysis. The compressive strength of coal gangue concrete hollow block was predicted by BP neural network, it showed that the predicted results were in good agreement with the test results. The test and calculation results indicated that using the coal gangue concrete block which strength reached the standard of building materials could reduce the engineering cost, control environmental pollution, in advanced technology, and worthy recommending.@
2010
用煤的苯胺抽提物模拟有通孔结构的无灰煤作为模板合成煤基聚苯胺，研究了煤的孔结构和官能团对复合材料电导率的影响.结果表明，所制备的复合材料的最大电导率为6.46×10-4 S/cm.原因是溶剂抽提产物面的羧基、羰基和羟基等极性基团数量较少，电荷密度较低，活性位点较少，导致其表面“水化”能力较差，难以在水中均匀地分布，不能对聚合物进行良好的掺杂.所以高电导率的煤/PAN是煤孔结构和官能团的协同效应.@由于用于测定煤样黏结指数的专用无烟煤价格较高，有必要进行专用无烟煤替代品的研究.以石英砂代替专用无烟煤为添加物进行煤样的黏结指数测定实验，结果表明，不同煤种黏结指数差别较大；添加物及其掺合比对煤样黏结指数均有显著的影响.正交实验研究表明，添加物对煤样黏结指数的影响最大；添加物掺合比次之，二者为高度显著的影响因素；煤种对黏结指数的影响最小，为较显著影响因素.根据正交实验结果得出添加物及掺合比的合理选择，在此基础上，建立了以非专用无烟煤为添加物的煤样黏结指数与以专用无烟煤为添加物的煤样黏结指数之间的关系.@分别用X射线衍射仪（XRD）、扫描电子显微镜（SEM）和热重分析仪（TG-DSC）对神华宁煤集团水煤浆用煤煤灰物相组成、形貌特征和灰熔性特征进行分析.结果表明，原料煤煤灰由方解石、石膏、石英、赤铁矿和金红石组成，而洗精煤煤灰由主要由方解石、石膏和石英三种矿物组成.洗精煤煤灰灰熔温度高于原料煤灰45 ℃，主要是由于原料煤灰中含有赤铁矿等成分所致.@煤灰在高温下的热行为对气化过程有很大的影响.利用热重-差示扫描量热（TG-DSC）、X-射线衍射(XRD)和扫描电镜(SEM)研究了义马煤中矿物质在高温氧化气氛下的热行为及矿物质演变.结果表明，矿物质组分随温度的升高发生了转变，主要由硅铝酸盐控制，这种改变会对灰熔融特性产生影响；矿物质形貌和分布状态随温度的升高也发生了变化.@采用浸渍法制备了以γ-Al2O3为载体的负载型氧化锌脱硫剂，同时对制得的脱硫剂进行煤气脱硫实验，考察了制备过程中负载量、焙烧温度和硫化温度等对脱硫剂性能的影响，用XRD和BET方法对制得的脱硫剂进行检测.结果表明，制得的脱硫剂存在一个单层分散当量，当负载量低于单层分散当量时，ZnO将以单层或亚单层状态分散在载体γ-Al2O3上(XRD检测不到)；当高于负载量时，除了单层或亚单层以外，ZnO晶体也将出现，通过XRD衍射图谱可以观察到ZnO晶体的衍射峰.活性评价实验也表明，在低于单层分散当量时该脱硫剂的穿透硫容随着负载量的增加而增大，且在极高的脱硫精度下（低于0.1×10-6）有较高的活性ZnO穿透硫容，达到了9.7 g S/100 g ZnO；而高于单层分散阈值时稳定性和硫容明显降低.@在栲胶脱硫生产过程中除了主反应外，同时还伴随Na2S2O3，Na2SO4，NaSCN及NaHCO3等盐类生成的副反应.这些副产物的生成会影响栲胶脱硫液的性质，并最终影响整个脱硫循环工艺的稳定.为了避免这些影响，从表面张力、黏度和密度三个方面分析了Na2S2O3，Na2SO4，NaSCN和NaHCO3四种栲胶脱硫工艺的副产物对栲胶脱硫溶液的影响.结果表明，副产物的积累可以引起脱硫溶液表面张力的下降以及溶液黏度和密度的增加，从而引起脱硫工艺中操作条件的改变，最终影响整个系统的脱硫效率.@煤炭直接液化油中含有种类丰富且数量可观的酚类化合物，研究影响酚类含量和组成的因素，对于深入研究煤液化产物中酚类化合物的生成机理具有重要的理论意义和实践意义.考察了煤液化过程中反应温度、催化剂及添加高分油三种工艺条件对煤液化油（41 ℃～220 ℃）中酚类含量分布的影响.结果表明：随着反应温度升高和催化剂加入都能增加煤液化油中总粗酚产率，而添加高分油方式则不太明显；另外，升高反应温度和添加高分油两种方式可以促进高级酚类中间体发生裂解、脱烷基及脱羟基等二次反应向生成分子量更小、结构更简单的低级酚类进行转化，而通过催化剂的加入可以抑制部分高级酚类向低级酚类的转化.@对神华煤进行煤炭直接液化实验，将300 ℃之前的液化生成油切割成8个窄馏分，利用基团贡献法计算得到窄馏分的假临界温度随蒸馏温度升高而升高，且符合线性方程Tc=435.4+1.298t.采用6种不同关联式计算得到的煤液化油窄馏分的假临界温度与基团贡献法的估算值有较好的一致性，相对误差在5%之内，其中采用Watanasiri关联式和日本NEDO法的相对误差在2%之内.@在实验室模拟自然氧化，以氧化时间作为氧化度定量的指标，研究了氧化度对炼焦煤工艺性质的影响，并分析了氧化引起的煤中结构变化.结果表明，随着氧化度增加，炼焦煤的Vdaf未见有变化，但黏结性和结焦性均有不同程度降低，随煤化度增加，这种影响逐渐减小，同时用红外光谱分析找出了其变化的原因.@对不同变质程度的5种烟煤进行了5 kg实验焦炉炭化实验.并就单种煤的结焦性与对应焦炭的微晶结构间的关系进行了探讨.结果表明，1/3焦煤焦炭、焦煤焦炭的冷态强度和热态强度较好；X射线衍射（XRD）分析结果表明，肥煤焦炭的炭结构因子(La/Lc)最小，石墨化程度最高.焦炭的真相对密度(TRD)随着La/Lc的增大而减小.@以六方石墨原子簇模拟纳米煤颗粒，采用量子化学AM1方法，研究了粒度对煤燃烧和热解动力学参数的影响规律.结果表明，粒度对煤粒燃烧和热解动力学参数有显著影响，Ea随着煤粒粒径的减小而减小，R则随粒径减小而增大，并且Ea和lnR均与粒径的倒数呈线性关系，这些影响规律与文献报道的实验结果一致.@对同轴交叉旋转射流过程的流动和燃烧性能进行了实验研究.结果表明，该射流装置中心管喷口的孔流系数为0.605，旋片阻力系数为0.09；气体从喷口喷出后会在喷口中心形成负压区，轴向速度衰减较快，燃烧所需空气过剩系数小，火焰透明，火体有力，燃烧充分，可以实现低热值燃气在焦化管式加热炉的高效洁净燃烧.@将低效率的燃煤锅炉改烧低热值煤层气是一项很好的节能减排措施.燃煤锅炉改烧低热值煤层气后，对炉膛内流动及燃烧过程进行了燃烧试验和三维数值模拟，分析了燃煤锅炉改烧煤层气后炉内流动及燃烧特性，并预测了炉膛内流场、温度场和甲烷组分的分布规律.结果表明，燃煤链条炉改烧低热值煤层气后，流动和燃烧状况良好，锅炉效率比燃煤时提高了25.5%.炉膛上部形成回流区；额定负荷时，CH4浓度下降最慢，整个炉膛的火焰充满度较好.@采用热分析仪对福建无烟煤和玉米芯的混合燃烧特性进行了研究，结果表明，无烟煤混合玉米芯后，其着火提前，燃烧和燃尽特性得到改善，但随着玉米芯混合比例的增加，无烟煤后期燃烧特性改善并不明显；此外，采用Coats-redfern法计算了无烟煤和玉米芯不同比例混合燃烧的活化能E，计算结果表明，无烟煤混合玉米芯后，其活化能E降低，但活化能的大小与玉米芯的比例大小无明显关系.玉米芯对无烟煤的燃烧主要起“引燃”作用.@利用TG-DTG热分析技术对煤、生物质及二者混合物的燃烧过程进行分析，研究了煤种、生物质、生物质添加比例、升温速率及氧气流量等因素对燃烧特性的影响.结果表明，生物质的着火特性、燃尽特性和燃烧性能明显优于原煤；添加生物质可以改善原煤的燃烧特性，随着生物质添加量的增加，燃烧性能改善越显著；升温速率增加，着火特性指数和综合燃烧特性指数升高，燃尽性能降低；增加氧气流量，可以显著改善燃料的燃烧性能.@采用热重分析仪对油页岩半焦与不同煤化程度的煤混合燃烧特性进行动态分析，讨论了掺混煤种和比例对燃烧过程的影响.结果表明，燃烧特性好的煤种可以改善页岩半焦燃烧特性，额吉长焰煤是最佳掺混煤种，随着煤掺混比例的提高，混合物燃烧特性指数增大.@采用喷动载流床快速热解装置，研究桦甸大城子4层油页岩的低温快速热解特性.采用改变气速的方法使不同热解温度下气体的停留时间一致，探讨不同热解温度对油页岩热解的气、液、固三相产物的产率、组成以及三者之间相互关系的影响，确定了在以获得液体燃料为主要目的时，530 ℃为桦甸大城子4层油页岩低温快速热解的最适宜温度.@以焦作无烟煤为原料，NaOH为活化剂，采用化学活化法制备煤基活性炭，分别考察了碱炭比、活化温度和活化时间等工艺参数对活性炭吸附性能和收率的影响；利用低温N2吸附法对活性炭的比表面积、总孔容及孔径分布进行了表征.结果表明，在碱炭比为4，活化温度为750 ℃和活化时间为1 h的条件下，可以制得比表面积为2 483 m2/g，总孔容为1.41 cm3/g，碘吸附值为2 530 mg/g，亚甲蓝吸附值为418 mg/g的煤基活性炭.@采用爆炸辅助化学气相沉积技术，以煤间接液化产物中的粗制石蜡为碳源制备碳纳米管.考察了催化剂前驱体和炸药填充密度对产物中碳纳米管形貌和纯度的影响，发现金属Co催化剂，炸药填充密度为0.2 g/mL时产物中碳纳米管的含量可达70%.在此基础上，尝试了利用另外两种重质碳源煤焦油和煤沥青合成碳纳米管.结果表明，利用重质碳源通过爆炸辅助气相合成碳纳米管是可行的，但是针对不同种类的碳源条件有待于进一步优化.@以煤沥青为碳源、二茂铁为催化剂前驱体，在氢气和氩气气氛下，采用化学气相沉积法制备出由碳纳米管自组装的线团状碳材料；利用场发射扫描电子显微镜、高分辨透射电子显微镜、X-射线衍射和拉曼光谱仪对产物进行了形貌、结构的表征和分析.结果表明：产物为高纯度的碳纳米管自组装的线团状碳材料，其直径约0.5 μm，碳纳米管直径为20 nm~45 nm；另外，测试了该产物的铁磁性和微波吸收性能，结果表明，在±10 000 Oe范围内，具有较大的矫顽力值（446.13 Oe），呈明显的铁磁性；在2 GHz~18 GHz频率范围内具有一定的微波吸收性能，有望成为铁磁性材料和微波吸收材料.@以煤沥青（CTP）和改性沥青（MCTP）为原料，在氮气保护下，采用热聚合的方法，制备出两种中间相沥青（MPPA和MPPB），采用FTIR与热分析对CTP与MCTP的中间相转化行为进行了研究.通过偏光显微镜分析，MPPA为镶嵌结构，MPPB为流域结构，对两种中间相沥青进行XRD分析，发现MPPB比MPPA具有较好的晶态结构.@采用精馏和重结晶相结合的方法，研究了从洗油中分离和精制苊的新工艺.结果表明，单纯使用多次精馏的方法很难制得高纯度的苊，而通过精馏与重结晶相结合的方法可制得高纯度的苊；提出了从洗油中提取苊的精馏重结晶工艺，该工艺具有能耗低、纯度高、收率高、工艺简单、溶剂可多次循环套用、无环境污染和成本低等优点.@从CNTs/环氧树脂纳米复合材料界面作用和CNTs在环氧树脂中的分散性、CNTs功能化和CNTs在环氧树脂中的定向排列等方面，详细介绍了高性能CNTs/环氧树脂纳米复合材料的制备方法.同时综述了CNTs/环氧树脂体系的固化反应机理和固化反应动力学等研究现状.不仅对现有研究结果进行了深入分析，还探讨了CNTs/环氧树脂纳米复合材料研究所面临的困难和挑战.@采用半封闭体系对神府煤以50 ℃为一温阶，从250 ℃～500 ℃进行了生烃热模拟实验，探讨了生烃热模拟过程中气态产物、液体油以及固体产物的演化特征.结果表明，生油高峰在400 ℃～450 ℃之间，最高生油率为41.2 mg/g.生气高峰在500 ℃，最高生气率为99.4 mL/g.气态烃以CH4为主要成分，占总生气量的33.6%～61.2%.非烃气体以H2为主，占总生气量的18.5%～58.1%.非烃气体主要形成于早期阶段，含有部分CO2以及少量CO.固体产物中的碳元素含量增加，氢和氧含量降低.@为探索煤中小分子化合物在整个煤阶中的赋存方式及溶出规律，采用正己烷溶剂对年轻褐煤至无烟煤八种煤样进行分次萃取，分析了一定时间段内各煤样萃取率的变化规律，并对各次萃取物进行GC分析.结果表明，煤中小分子化合物的三种赋存形态即游离态、微孔嵌入态及网络嵌入态，在整个煤阶中具有普遍规律性；不同煤阶煤的累积萃取率与累计萃取时间均服从对数函数关系；分次萃取率及总萃取率与碳含量均呈现“椅子”形曲线关系；正己烷可溶小分子化合物中的Ⅱ型分子最容易析出，Ⅰ型分子次之，Ⅲ型分子最难溶出，且Ⅰ型分子仅在烟煤中才有显现；煤的变质过程基本符合煤的三大变质反应过程即芳构化反应过程、裂解碎化加氢稳定反应过程和缩合反应过程的观点.@采用密度泛函理论计算方法研究了煤中含硫醚键的模型化合物萘基苄基硫醚的热稳定性.计算得到的微观结构参数和热力学函数表明，萘基苄基硫醚中各化学键的稳定性顺序为：苄基亚甲基上C与S之间的键在热解时最容易发生断裂而形成更加稳定的具有p-π共轭体系的苄基自由基；其次是萘基上的C与S之间的键断裂；再次是苄基亚甲基C上的H脱除；接着是苯基脱除；最后才是六元环上的H脱除.萘基苄基硫醚的热解是吸热反应，升高温度有利于热裂解反应的进行.@煤液化中油（220 ℃～260 ℃）馏分中含有大量的酚类化合物，其质量分数约20%～25%，其酚类化合物主要是由苯酚、（烷基）苯酚、（烷基）萘酚、（烷基）茚满酚和联苯酚等类型组成.考察了煤液化过程中反应温度、Mo系催化剂和添加高分油三种工艺条件对煤液化中油馏分中不同酚类的影响.结果表明，升高反应温度和加入Mo系催化剂能增加煤液化油中总粗酚产率，而添加高分油方式则不太明显；另外，添加高分油方式可以促进高级酚类中间体发生裂解、脱烷基和脱羟基等二次反应向生成分子量更小、结构更简单的低级酚类进行转化，而通过Mo系催化剂的加入可以抑制部分高级酚类向低级酚类的转化.@研究了内蒙某褐煤制油煤浆在高温高压条件、不同浓度和不同升温速率条件下黏度变化规律，为0.1 t/d褐煤直接液化实验提供初步的基础数据.选用煤炭科学研究总院研制的模拟高温高压条件下油煤浆黏度变化的高压釜，通过记录高压釜扭矩变化来换算成油煤浆黏度.结果采用线性回归方法，得出了该褐煤制油煤浆在高温高压条件下黏温关系方程.通过黏温关系方程，可以计算在不同温度下该油煤浆的黏度.结果表明，在不同升温速率和不同浓度下，该油煤浆黏度随温度升高呈下降趋势，浓度是影响黏度的重要因素.@以新疆五彩湾煤为研究对象，进行了煤质和热解分析，考察了溶煤比、反应时间、氢初压和反应温度对其加氢液化效果的影响.结果表明，尽管五彩湾煤惰质组含量高达81.5%，镜质组最大反射率达到0.73%，挥发分低于37%，H/C仅为0.59，但在氢初压仅为6.0 MPa，溶煤比1.75和反应时间60 min条件下，其最佳液化温度为450 ℃，油产率和转化率分别达到55.20%和76.76%，仍然具有良好的液化性能.@采用气相色谱/质谱联用研究分析了胜利褐煤在0.1 t/d直接液化连续实验装置上所得煤液化油中酚类化合物的分布特征.实验通过碱液洗涤法富集煤液化油中混合酚组分，并对该组分进行衍生化处理，以提高色谱柱对混合物的分离性能.以混合衍生物为主要分析对象，共定性出煤液化油中134种个体酚，分属于苯酚、茚满酚、萘满酚和萘酚等四种类型，且绝大多数酚类化合物都带有烷基侧链.苯酚类化合物数量最多，在混合酚组分中含量最大，其次为茚满酚和萘满酚.萘酚类化合物的数量最少，相对含量最小.@采用单因素法，以四氢萘为供氢溶剂，以Fe2O3和S为催化剂，在高压釜内，研究了配比、温度、反应时间和初始氢压对兖州煤与木质素共液化反应性的影响.结果表明，在液化中适量添加木质素可提高兖州煤的液化反应性.综合考虑实验条件和经济成本，得到共液化的最佳工艺条件为：兖州煤∶木质素（质量比）=9∶1，440 ℃，60 min，8 MPa，在此条件下转化率与油产率分别为86.8%与62.9%.@采用离子液体1-丁基-3-甲基咪唑四氟硼酸盐([BMIm]BF4)对中国神华煤进行直接液化前的溶胀处理，通过对溶胀度的测定及不同条件下溶胀煤样的直接液化实验，探讨了离子液体[BMIm]BF4在煤溶胀预处理方面的应用.结果表明，离子液体[BMIm]BF4溶胀预处理能破坏煤结构中的弱共价键，使煤的溶胀度获得了显著提高，进而改善了其液化性能，提高了煤的直接液化转化率和油气产率.在溶胀条件方面，随溶胀时间的增加，煤溶胀度和液化转化率提高；而温度对煤溶胀度和液化转化率的影响较复杂，存在一个合适的溶胀温度范围，在此温度之上，溶胀度和液化转化率随温度的升高而降低.而且使用过的[BMIm]BF4可以回收循环使用.@通过对不同混煤一维燃烧过程中H2S和SO2释放特性的有关数据，应用BP人工神经网络进行预测.通过分析和计算建立了典型的三层BP网络，输入神经元为8个，隐含层神经元个数为6个，输出层神经元个数为2个，用加入动量项的方法对传统的BP网络算法进行改进，通过样本数据训练，测试数据检验，该网络能够较为准确地预测混煤一维燃烧硫释放的情况.@脱硫剂中加入助剂不仅可以提高脱硫剂的耐久性和机械强度，还可以提高其化学稳定性.采用机械混合法制备了锰铜脱硫剂，通过XRD，SEM和BET等手段研究了助剂对脱硫剂的结构、物相及比表面积的影响.并在固定床反应器中考察了助剂对脱硫剂脱硫性能的影响.实验结果表明，活性组分锰铜摩尔比为9∶1，黏结剂选用10%自制溶胶来代替矿物黏结剂制备得到的脱硫剂有较好的脱硫性能，脱硫精度最高可达8×10-6，硫容量可达33.1%.助剂的加入可以改善脱硫剂的脱硫性能.@栲胶法脱硫工艺比ADA法应用更广，更具优越性.为揭示这种优越性，采用表面张力仪和电导率仪分别对氧化栲胶水溶液和ADA水溶液的表面性质进行了研究.结果表明，氧化栲胶是离子型表面活性剂，可降低溶液表面张力，并强化硫化氢或空气的气液传质速率；而ADA溶液不具有这种性质，这是栲胶脱硫技术优于ADA法脱硫技术的原因之一.氧化栲胶溶液的临界胶束浓度为0.53 g/L，该值可作为栲胶脱硫溶液中氧化栲胶含量的最小值.@在360 ℃~400 ℃，氢气初压1 MPa~2.5 MPa，5 min~40 min以及0.5~3剂油比条件下，在自制的间歇式反应器上对高温煤焦油在超临界二甲苯中加氢裂解的宏观反应动力学进行了研究，建立起三集总宏观反应动力学模型.结果表明，该模型能较好反应高温煤焦油在超临界二甲苯中加氢裂解行为.在本实验条件下高温煤焦油在超临界二甲苯中加氢裂解反应时裂化反应的表观压力指数为-0.211 1，表观剂油比指数为0.403 3，表观活化能为15.765 kJ/mol，指前因子为2.722 min-1·MPa（0.211 1）；缩合反应的表观压力指数为-0.288 4，表观剂油比指数为-0.445 9，表观活化能为30.762 kJ/mol，指前因子为18.952 min-1·MPa（0.288 4）；总反应的表观压力指数为0.160 9，表观剂油比指数为0.226 5，表观活化能为39.049 kJ/mol，指前因子为204.226 min-1·MPa（-0.160 9）.@针对工业气化炉二级旋风分离器的气化后半焦，同时选取京能烟煤在1 173 K，1 273 K和1 373 K三个温度下快速热解焦炭作为比较，在TGA/SDTA851e型热重分析仪上，对四种经历不同热过程的焦炭进行等温热重实验，实验温度范围为773 K～1 023 K，研究煤焦燃烧反应动力学特性及其影响因素.煤焦制取方式和热解温度的不同决定了煤焦反应性的不同，在这四种煤焦中，气化半焦JC的反应性最小，而京能烟煤三种热解煤焦的反应性随着热解温度的升高而减小.随着燃烧温度和氧含量的升高，煤焦的反应速率在增大.同时，用半转化率法确定了煤焦燃烧的转捩温度和各个反应区域的活化能，在化学反应动力区，JC，JN-1，JN-2和JN-3活化能分别为115 kJ/mol，57 kJ/mol，70 kJ/mol和97 kJ/mol，与等转化率法所求得的平均活化能相近.随着煤焦转化率的增大，反应越来越困难，活化能也在增大，而且煤焦燃烧反应离开化学反应动力区的转捩温度也在升高.@基于高温区压力平衡和承压区低温的原理，开发了一种小型高温高压反应器；建立了小型反应器基本传热方程和反应器温度分布模型T=-750lnR-1 428，用温度分布模型确定了保温材料厚度150 mm等结构参数.结果表明，反应器轴向温度呈梯型分布，在中间长度为25 cm的范围内，温度基本一致为均温反应区；在给定操作温度和增加反应压力的条件下，反应器最外层金属壁外表面温度基本恒定，实测温度低于设计值50 ℃，反应压力对反应器外表面的温度影响不明显，在该温度下反应器最外层金属壁具有足够的承压能力.实验证明，建立的温度分布模型合理、可靠，开发的小型反应器能在1 000 ℃和12 MPa的高温高压下工作.@用沉淀法制备了镍基甲烷化催化剂，采用X射线衍射、氢气程序升温还原和扫描电镜等技术对合成催化剂进行了表征.结果表明，铝助剂对形成微球状催化剂有较大的促进作用，铝铈助剂对镍基催化剂的还原有明显的促进作用，铈助剂大幅提高了催化剂的抗积碳能力.复合催化剂的催化活性明显高于单一催化剂.@采用过量浸渍法制备乙炔气相法合成醋酸乙烯催化剂醋酸锌/活性炭，对制备条件进行了研究.结果表明，较合适的浸渍条件为醋酸锌浓度0.8 mol/L，平衡时间60 min，浸渍温度55 ℃.120 ℃下干燥30 min水分就完全烘干，而90 ℃下干燥70 min催化剂才达到恒重.由比表面积分析可知，随着干燥温度的升高，中孔被堵塞，催化剂的平均孔半径减小；干燥温度高于110 ℃后，比表面积和平均孔半径变化不明显.由SEM可以看出，催化剂表面明显存在醋酸锌晶体.@以神东煤为原料，KOH为活化剂制备高比表面积活性炭，分别考察碱煤比、活化温度和活化时间对活性炭孔结构的影响，并用于CH4和H2的吸附与分离.结果发现，制得活性炭的比表面积和孔容随碱煤比和活化时间的增加分别呈增加和先增加后减小的趋势，但比表面积受活化温度影响不大，孔容随活化温度升高而增加；适合于CH4和H2分离的活性炭的最佳制备条件为：碱煤比为5，活化温度800 ℃，活化时间为90 min.@在小型两段式固定床反应器中，对生物质热解气在高温煤焦层中的裂解反应特性进行了研究，重点考察了两段式热解中裂解温度、停留时间及煤焦特性对焦油裂解率、气体产率及成分的影响.结果表明，增加气体停留时间及裂解温度，都有利于促进生物质气中焦油裂解和气体产率提高.裂解温度对气体产率、组分及焦油裂解率影响更明显，高温促进H2和CO的生成，1 000 ℃时H2和CO的含量达到94.51%.当生物质热解气在煤焦中停留时间达到1.41 s后，气体中各组分变化趋于缓慢；不同热解条件所制得的煤焦对生物质气中焦油裂解效果不同，较低制焦温度和较短热解时间都有利于增加煤焦的反应活性，促进焦油分解为可燃气体.@针对钙基烟气脱硫剂分散性差、易团聚和比表面积小的缺点，在消化过程中加入不同量的聚乙二醇（PEG600，PEG1500，PEG2000），对消化产物进行改性.结果表明，在搅拌时间30 min，水/灰=1.4∶1（摩尔比）条件下，PEG600添加量为3％时，消化产物颗粒均匀，平均粒径为9.4 μm，比表面积达到21.6 m2/g.XRD，SEM和FT-IR测试表明，添加PEG后，石灰消化完全，转化率较高，分散性得到改善，说明PEG对氢氧化钙有一定的包覆作用.@为研究比较不同X射线定量分析方法的优缺点，对CeO2-TiO2二元混合物体系样品分别用内标法、K值法和绝热法进行定量分析，着重比较了三种方法在实验步骤、可操作性和结果相对误差等方面的差别.结果表明，内标法操作程序较复杂，结果误差较大，不便在实际操作中推广应用；绝热法是实际应用中较便捷、误差较小的定量分析方法.然而应用绝热法进行定量分析时，要减小实验误差就必须获得待测物相准确的参比强度值（即K值），因此定性分析是其关键步骤.@利用Aspen Plus流程模拟软件模拟了300万t规模合成油项目驰放气制备LNG（液化天然气）及LNG-合成氨联产流程，在此基础上分析了两种方案的技术经济指标.结果表明，LNG单产项目温室气体CO2的排放量比LNG-合成氨联产项目少4.94万t/a，能源利用效率比联产项目高22.2%，利润少164万元/a～165万元/a.综合比较了CO2排放量、能效及利润，得出LNG单产项目技术经济指标优于LNG-合成氨联产项目.@煤的分子结构与瓦斯吸附性能关系密切.采用正己烷、苯、氯仿、四氢呋喃和吡啶等五种极性依次增强的溶剂，对平顶山烟煤进行索氏萃取，测试原煤及其不同极性溶剂萃余物的氮吸附行为，研究煤中低分子化合物对煤氮吸附行为的影响.结果表明，五种溶剂的萃取率依次增加，当相对压力pr（pr指吸附平衡压力与吸附质饱和蒸汽压比值）小于0.1时，五种溶剂萃余物的吸附量依次升高，当pr大于0.1时，苯、氯仿萃余物的吸附量迅速增高，明显大于四氢呋喃萃余物的吸附量.据此推测，煤中低分子化合物的含量和组成不仅改变了煤的孔径分布，还改变了煤的表面性质，其中可溶性极性芳烃化合物对煤的吸附行为影响最大，含氧和氮的杂环芳烃混合物次之，饱和烃类化合物影响最小.@利用高分辨质谱对在真空热解过程中淮北烟煤、无烟煤和天然焦形成产物进行实时在线检测，结合煤质结构和特征，通过图谱分析了煤种和热解温度对热解产物的释放规律.结果表明，较低热解温度时，热解产物组成随煤化程度变化较小；较高温度时，随煤化程度的升高，高分子量产物相对含量逐渐减少；随着温度的升高，烟煤和无烟煤高分子量产物所占比例明显增加;含氧基团在200 ℃~400 ℃开始释放，到600 ℃则主要生成CO2.@利用热重分析仪和傅里叶红外光谱仪对煤与木屑混合物在惰性气氛中进行了共热解研究，考察煤阶及煤与生物质掺混比例对热解过程的影响.结果表明，煤与木屑共热解特性并不是单独煤和单独木屑热解特性的简单叠加；高阶煤与生物质共热解更有利于协同反应的发生.通过对红外吸收光谱的分析发现，木屑与不同煤化程度煤共热解析出气体的成分和含量也不同，说明煤阶对煤与生物质共热解的气态产物有明显影响，也从侧面揭示了混合物热解过程中煤与木屑之间发生了相互作用.@微波闪速热解是低变质煤转化的一种新工艺.研究了微波加热条件下原煤粒度变化对热解产品质量和收率的影响.结果表明，微波加热条件下，10 min左右煤料温度可达到750 ℃，22 min焦油收率就可达到12%左右，比常规加热提高4%；热解煤气中氢气、一氧化碳和甲烷含量大幅度提高；原料煤粒度对各种产品的收率影响不大.因此该工艺可用于粉煤的快速热解，为煤气的进一步综合利用奠定了基础.@用XRD和TG等方法对无烟粉煤制炭化型煤的微观结构进行研究.结果表明：与石墨相比，炭化型煤的d（002）较大，但Lc和La较小.炭化型煤中的微晶无规则地连接，具有乱层结构；无烟煤成型块炭化时没有流体状胶质体形成，无烟煤颗粒通过黏结剂与细粉形成的胶料把它们黏结在一起，黏结剂与无烟煤颗粒表面有明显的作用界面；炭化型煤微晶结构与气孔结构共同决定炭化型煤的反应性.@用活性炭对模拟煤气中的H2S进行催化氧化脱除，考察了反应温度、氧硫比以及煤气气氛组成对活性炭催化氧化脱除H2S行为的影响.结果表明，最佳催化脱硫温度约为180 ℃，氧硫比为1∶2.煤气气氛中，CO，CO2和H2含量的增加降低了活性炭的硫容，而水蒸气含量的提高则有利于脱硫反应的进行，提高了反应的脱硫效率和活性炭的硫容.对其动力学行为进行研究，结果表明，脱硫反应过程属于表面反应控制过程，给出了脱硫反应动力学方程及动力学参数.@基于商业软件Aspen Plus，运用Gibbs自由能最小化方法建立了气流床部分气化模型，预测气化炉入口参数（空煤比、汽煤比、热损失和碳转换率）对出口合成气的影响特征，模拟结果表明，随空煤比的增大，粗煤气中有效气体成分含量先增大后减少；随汽煤比的增大，粗煤气中H2含量增多，有利于部分煤气化再燃；随碳转换率的增大，粗煤气中有效气体成分含量增加，但提高程度不明显，因此针对部分气化不刻意追求碳转换率.@应用Aspen Plus工业系统流程软件和Gibbs自由能最小化方法对粉煤气流床气化炉进行模拟.在设定粉煤气流床气化炉条件下，研究空气（O2占0.21，N2占0.79）与煤比和气化压力对有效气体（CO+H2）含量的影响.结果表明，在设定粉煤气流床气化炉温度为1 500 ℃和碳转化率为99％的条件下，当煤进料量为3 265.87 kg/h，空气与煤比为4∶1时，有效气体含量最大.同时，气化压力越大，有效气体含量越大.@通过对焦炉煤气和纯氧在双孔喷嘴石英管反应器内发生非预混燃烧的过程进行实验研究和数值模拟，得到了反应器内温度分布、流场、浓度分布和反应产品气（合成气）中H2/CO比.模拟结果显示，反应主要在靠近氧气入口的区域内发生，反应器壁温对反应结果有非常重要的影响.实验结果和模拟结果比较，表明温度和流场吻合得很好，组分分布略有误差.@利用5种成浆性能好的单煤、4种成浆性能差的单煤和2种成浆性能中等的单煤进行配煤组合，通过实验考察了配煤的成浆性能.结果表明，通过配煤可以提高成浆性能差的单煤的成浆效果，其中成浆性能好的配煤组合是有淮南B煤和神火煤两种煤的配煤组合，成浆性能较差的是大会战煤和华亭煤组合，最大成浆浓度仅为61.58%.实验发现，淮南B煤与成浆性能较差的煤种进行配煤可以提高其成浆浓度，大会战煤种虽然自身成浆性能较好，但与成浆性能差的煤种进行配煤不能收到很好的成浆效果.@以煤液化中油为原料，FV-20为催化剂，在微型反应釜中考察了不同温度和时间下煤液化中油进行加氢裂解反应前后的族组成变化.结果表明，在400 ℃以前，饱和烃含量随着温度的升高和时间的延长逐渐减小；在440 ℃时，40 min出现最小值，饱和烃中直链烷烃随温度升高逐渐减小，环烷烃含量变化不大；芳烃含量逐渐增加，440 ℃时，30 min出现最大值82.65％，其中单环芳烃逐渐增加，而双环和多环芳烃逐渐减少；极性物含量逐渐减小；产物中气态烃类在低于400 ℃时，随温度增加，CH4含量逐渐减少，C2H6和C3H8含量逐渐增大，在高于该温度时有C4H10出现，但气态烃产率变化不大.@在适宜条件下对Fe2O3，FeSO4和FeS作硫化处理，作XRD，SEM和EDS表征，并以新疆五彩湾煤作试样，通过加氢催化液化实验比较了硫化前后三者的催化活性.XRD和EDS结果表明，三种铁化合物硫化后都生成了磁黄铁矿（Fe1-xS）.当以油产率为目标，三者的催化活性顺序：硫化前为Fe2O3>FeSO4>FeS，硫化后为（Fe1-xS）FeSO4>（Fe1-xS）Fe2O3>（Fe1-xS）FeS.特别是（Fe1-xS）FeSO4，SEM表明其粒径明显变小，形成规则的纳米球.因此，催化活性显著提高，可使具有高惰质组特点的新疆五彩湾煤油产率提高11.5%，达到74.71%，转化率提高7%，达到79.8%.@通过对鞍钢焦炉煤气ZL（双核钛氰钴砜十磺酸，是一种脱硫催化剂）法脱硫脱氰6年的生产实践数据进行分析，摸索出脱硫液中最好的硫代硫酸铵、硫氰酸铵和游离氨浓度；确定合理的集合温度，预冷塔、蒸氨塔及循环水凉水架的操作参数.在优化工艺下，1#脱硫塔脱硫效率稳定在40％左右，2#脱硫塔脱硫效率稳定在80％左右，3#脱硫塔脱硫效率稳定在91％左右，ZL法脱硫脱氰三塔总效率达到了98％以上.@在不同的条件下，考察了不同脱硫剂对煤中全硫和各形态硫的脱硫效果.结果发现，次氯酸钠和双氧水等氧化类脱硫剂对煤中无机硫的脱除效果明显，而甲醇和N，N-二甲基乙醇胺等萃取类脱硫剂对煤中有机硫的脱除效果较好；此两类脱硫剂具有协同效应，配合使用可以增强煤中硫的脱除效果；另外，超声波和微波的辐照作用可以增强有机硫的脱除效率.@通过对气煤瘦煤煤质特征、胶质层测试后焦块形貌和焦炭光学组织进行比较，表明气煤与瘦煤成焦惰性结构高，配煤炼焦中起瘦化作用，但气煤瘦煤的结焦特性完全不同，气煤的反应活性较瘦煤高.通过对不同粒度气煤瘦煤自黏结强度和成焦显微结构特征进一步比较，表明气煤参与配煤炼焦粒度不宜过大，也不宜过小，应控制合理范围，利于焦炭质量提高；瘦煤参与配煤炼焦，应通过适度地细粉碎，利于焦炭质量提高.@以低QI含量的煤沥青为原料，通过控制热聚合时间得到不同甲苯可溶物（TS）含量的热塑性沥青中间相预聚体，并以中间相预聚体为原料考察了热态成型对中间相有序生长的影响.结果表明，在室温~600 ℃，成型压力为3.12 MPa，中间相预聚体中TS含量为10.7%~26.3%（质量分数）时，通过热态成型能够得到有序柱状初坯体.通过偏光显微镜观察，其中间相液晶分子沿垂直于模压压力方向排列成纤维状长程有序结构，经1 100 ℃炭化后测得炭前驱体样品的电阻率纵向为1.78 Ω·cm~2.99 Ω·cm，横向为0.83 Ω·cm~1.41 Ω·cm.由此所得有序炭前驱体具有显著的择优取向结构，属于易石墨化碳，为制备高导热炭材料奠定良好基础.@通过热重实验研究了三种典型烟煤在热解条件下粒径变化对焦炭结构特性的影响，并用扫描电镜对不同反应条件下的焦炭表面结构进行了观察.结果表明，现对于毫米级的煤颗粒而言，颗粒粒径变化对于挥发分析出速率的影响并不显著，但不同煤种的焦炭结构特性差别很大.对于塑性较小的煤，随着颗粒粒径的增大容易在热解过程中破碎，而对于塑性较大的煤在热解后不易破碎，但颗粒会出现膨胀和表面蓬松等现象，掌握焦炭结构特性变化对不同煤种的高效利用具有重要意义.@比较循环流化床（CFB）锅炉炉内脱硫灰渣与粉煤灰的性质的差异；分析炉内脱硫灰渣的水化胶凝特性，指出活性的Al2O3和活性的SiO2等无定形物质是CFB锅炉灰渣的活性来源，脱硫灰渣中大量存在的CaO和Ⅱ-CaSO4成分对火山灰活性起到了激发作用，使其具有更加明显的胶凝性质；认为CaO和Ⅱ-CaSO4是参与脱硫灰渣水化反应的主要物质，水化过程形成的钙矾石是引起水化产物膨胀的主要原因，水化后SO2-4的浓度对钙矾石的长期稳定性有着关键影响，而灰渣中的CaO对水化过程的体积膨胀则起到间接作用.@在115 mm×2 110 mm有机玻璃圆柱型流化床中，选取具有实际意义的焦灰体系，引入描述灰分存在时煤焦和生物质焦两组分混合特性的的质量比混合指数，考察了灰分对煤焦和生物质焦混合特性的影响.结果表明，在操作气速不变的情况下，增加灰含量，松木屑焦的富集位置向上转移，煤灰的含量小于15.4%时，灰含量增加利于煤焦和松木屑焦的混合；减小灰分粒径，煤焦和松木屑焦的混合趋于均匀；提高操作气速有利于煤焦和松木屑焦的混合.此研究结果可以为煤与生物质共气化流化床气化炉的设计、运行和操作条件的确定提供一定参考.@生物质与煤流化床共气化，其混合物料的流化实际上是两者焦的共流化，对其共流化行为特性的研究是共气化工艺过程的基础.实验考察了三种粒径的煤焦分别与两种粒径的玉米芯焦和甘蔗渣焦在不同混合比例下的共流化特性.结果表明，煤焦的加入可以明显改善生物质焦的流化效果，煤焦与生物质焦粒径和密度的差异以及表观气速均影响着混合物的混合分离程度.在实验中，对煤焦与玉米芯焦的混合物，煤焦的粒径普遍小于玉米芯焦的粒径，混合物的最小流化速度随煤焦的质量分数增大而减小，反之，呈现分离状态的物料，其最小流化速度随煤焦的质量分数增加而增加.@在大颗粒煤燃烧或者气化过程中，气体穿过灰层的有效扩散系数是非常重要的参数.对有效扩散系数的研究主要有两种思路：一方面，灰层本质上是多孔介质，因此在研究有效扩散系数时，沿用气体在多孔介质中扩散的研究思路；另一方面，焦炭的燃烧或者气化本质上是气固反应，气体在灰层也即产物层中的扩散是气固反应的重要影响因素，因此应用气固反应的理论对有效扩散系数进行研究.根据以上两种思路综述了有效扩散系数的实验和模型的研究现状，并对今后的研究重点进行了展望.@随着国内煤低温干馏的发展，低温煤焦油的产能也随之不断增加.为综合高效利用低温煤焦油，解决其燃烧过程中的环境问题，对低温煤焦油性质和组成、加工工艺及两种主要工艺路线（燃料型和燃料-化工型）的经济性进行了研究.结果表明：低温煤焦油加工应选择先提酚类，而后加氢的燃料-化工型路线.该路线有效地利用了低温煤焦油中的高附加值组分，工艺合理，投资回收期短，是产业化前景较为广阔的路线.@基于对贵州兴仁某村煤中砷的含量及赋存状态的研究，得出研究区砷含量分布范围在17.83 mg/kg～140.64 mg/kg，平均值为93.31 mg/kg，远高于中国（4.09 mg/kg）和世界（5 mg/kg）煤砷含量.其赋存状态复杂多样，煤砷各形态含量比例分布为：残渣态（56.74%）＞铁锰氧化物结合态(20.74%)＞硫化物结合态(15.20%)＞有机结合态(5.07%)＞碳酸盐结合态(1-73%)＞水溶态和可交换态(0.52%).煤中砷主要以残渣态形式存在，铁锰氧化物结合态砷含量也较高.其中一个煤样砷含量相对于其他样品较小，有机砷结合态所占比例相对较大，结合前人研究推断：此次研究的煤样多以大分子有机砷结合态存在，但不易提取，导致残渣态砷含量较高.@利用高压非均匀电场的作用研究流动煤粉正电晕荷电特性，为能够迅速找到影响煤粉荷质比各因素的最优工艺条件，在前期单因素实验的基础上，确定了荷电电压、粒径和给粉浓度等主要影响因素.采用正交实验法获得荷电电压、粒径和给粉浓度等主要影响因素的最佳工艺条件，并对结果进行方差分析.根据分析结果，对重要因素进行最小二乘回归，得到煤粉荷质比的实验回归公式.@研究了颗粒大小、气氛和残碳含量对霍林河褐煤灰熔融特性的影响，在探讨灰成分变化的基础上，对霍林河煤灰在不同温度下的矿物组成进行了XRD分析．结果表明，灰熔点随颗粒的增大而减少是由于灰中总碱量由小到大引起的；不同气氛导致的灰熔点变化是由于弱还原气氛下方铁矿在熔融过程中与钙长石和钙黄长石反应生成了铁尖晶石和铁橄榄石等低熔点物质引起的；残碳含量导致灰熔点的变化是因为Fe3C的生成引起灰熔点的升高，灰锥内局部还原性气氛的形成使灰熔点降低、残碳的“骨架”作用导致灰锥不易变形而使灰熔点升高．@为正确认识磨制煤粉和原生煤粉物性的差异，选取山西灵石煤进行制粉实验，从质量状况和密度组成两方面进行了实验研究，寻找两者之间物性的差异.研究表明：磨制煤粉的灰分比原生煤粉明显提高，而且粗粒度煤粉灰分较高；二者的全硫与粒度之间缺乏规律性，但磨制煤粉的硫酸盐硫与粒度呈负相关性，硫化铁硫与粒度呈正相关性；各密度级的产率和硫分与原生煤粉的变化趋势基本一致，同时灰分在各密度级的分布不均匀，而原生煤粉的灰分随着密度的增大而迅速增大，且集中在高密度区域中.@采用浮沉实验和激光粒度法研究了工业煤粉中矿物质的分布规律，考察了原煤的变质程度、原煤的灰分高低以及煤粉制备工艺对分布结果的影响.结果表明，工业煤粉都呈现出灰分随着煤粉粒度增加而降低的趋势，并且随着变质程度和原煤灰分的提高，灰分随煤粉粒度增加降低的幅度增大，而煤粉制备工艺对该规律的影响不明显.@为了考察地下气化过程中干馏和干燥作用对于气体产物组成的影响，以乌兰察布原煤为研究对象，采用大直径固定床反应装置进行了150 ℃～800 ℃范围内热解气体的形成与释放研究.结果表明，大粒径褐煤热解在400 ℃才开始有气体逸出，随着温度的升高气体总产率升高，平均孔径和孔容积呈现先增大后减小的趋势；不同粒度的块状煤有效气体析出规律大致相同，但5 cm见方的褐煤呈现气体析出缓慢、产量较大的趋势；在慢速升温和中速升温过程中，5 ℃/min的升温速率可以明显增加大粒度褐煤热解失重率，提高气体产率.@实验室条件下研究了从低煤化度烟煤到高煤化度无烟煤，以及石油焦等不同气化原料煤的成浆性.为提高低煤化度烟煤的成浆浓度，在保证其混合原料灰熔融特征温度满足液态排渣前提下，将低煤化度烟煤与一种或两种煤化度较高的煤或者石油焦配比，考察了它们的成浆性.结果表明，煤化度适中的QD煤单独制浆浓度达到70%，黏度536 mPa·s，流动性为A；通过不同煤种的级配，三种原料配合的料浆浓度为62%时，黏度在340 mPa·s~550 mPa·s之间，可以获得符合液态排渣气化要求的混合料水煤浆，扩大了气化原料来源.@煤液化中油馏分是煤液化的主要产物.以煤液化中油为原料，FV-20为催化剂，在微型反应釜中考察了不同温度和时间下对其进行加氢裂解反应前后的族组成变化.结果表明，在400 ℃以前，饱和烃含量随着温度的升高、时间的延长逐渐减小；在440 ℃，40 min时出现最小值，饱和烃中直链烷烃随温度升高逐渐减小，环烷烃含量变化不大，芳烃含量逐渐增加；440 ℃，30 min时出现最大值82.65％，其中单环芳烃逐渐增加，而双环和多环芳烃逐渐减少；极性物含量逐渐减小；产物中气态烃类在低于400 ℃时，随温度增加，CH4含量逐渐减少，C2H6和C3H8含量逐渐增大，在高于该温度时有C4H10出现，但气态烃产率变化不大.@热解温度是影响煤焦气化反应活性的重要因素.以型煤和相似粒度的原煤为样品在不同热解温度下制备煤焦，研究了热解温度对煤焦/CO2反应活性的影响，并对型煤半焦与原煤半焦的气化性能进行比较.结果表明，褐煤中低温热解所得半焦在1 000 ℃以上时具有较高的气化反应活性；在相同热解温度下，型煤半焦的反应活性稍高于原煤半焦；热解温度为650 ℃~750 ℃时半焦的反应活性最高.@采用淀粉作为新型焦炭劣化抑制剂负载于焦炭表面以改善焦炭的热态性能，并用电子扫描电镜对焦炭结构和形貌进行表征，初步探讨了淀粉改善焦炭热态性能的机理.结果表明，喷洒淀粉溶液后焦炭热态性能指标得到明显改善；1.0%淀粉溶液能使焦炭反应性CRI降低4.08%，反应后强度CSR提高3.99%；焦炭表面气孔直径和深度显著减小，CO2对焦炭的侵蚀劣化作用减弱，这为改善焦炭性能指标开拓了新途径.@在100 mL固定床加氢实验装置上，采用自制的不同性质的加氢催化剂组合对云南解放军化肥厂鲁奇炉副产的宽馏分煤焦油进行了加氢改质的工艺研究.结果表明，反应压力、温度、空速和氢油比等参数对煤焦油加氢改质的影响显著，并在反应压力12.0 MPa，温度360 ℃，液时空速1.0 h-1和氢油比1 200∶1的优化条件下通过加氢改质和产品分馏，可以获得约9%的小于160 ℃石脑油馏分、78%的160 ℃～350 ℃柴油馏分和13%大于350 ℃尾油馏分.实验装置连续运行了1 114 h后仍能保持稳定，催化剂表现出良好的活性和稳定性.@对改进前后两种低热值煤层气燃烧器进行了全尺寸的三维数值模拟，给出了两种燃烧器速度场、温度场和浓度场的分布情况，结果表明，改进后的燃烧器在产生中心回流区和外回流区的同时，还能具有较好的射流刚性；具有较宽的甲烷体积浓度调节比，在燃烧甲烷浓度较低（20%，体积分数）的煤层气时，还能保持较高的燃烧温度，高温区域分布较广，燃烧效率高.@选用水玻璃、膨润土和赤泥三种无机黏结剂，分别以四种不同的掺入量和低阶烟煤粉煤混合制取型煤.对型煤样品进行抗压强度的测定表明，型煤抗压强度随黏结剂掺比增大而增大，其中以膨润土为黏结剂的型煤强度远高于以水玻璃和赤泥为黏结剂的型煤强度，进一步的型煤微观结构电镜分析也证实了以膨润土为黏结剂的型煤其黏结性能相对最好，电镜切片表明，膨润土以朵状凝胶体楔入煤粒孔隙中并在煤粒表面形成整体网状结构.由于低阶烟煤自身的性质，以其制取的型煤往往对成型压力比较敏感，实验表明型煤的冷强度随成型压力的增大先增大后减小，存在一个最优成型压力.@以负载Fe的介孔分子筛Fe/MCM-41和Fe/ABW分别为催化剂，乙炔为碳源，采用化学气相沉积法对催化合成碳纳米管（CNTs）进行研究，讨论了反应温度、催化剂种类以及催化剂预处理对CNTs纯度和形貌的影响，通过场发射扫描电子显微镜、高分辨透射电子显微镜和X-射线衍射仪对产物的结构和形貌进行了表征和分析，并对CNTs的生长机理进行了推测.结果表明，在反应温度为700 ℃，两种不同的催化剂经H2还原后，催化生长出直径均匀（20 nm～30 nm）且晶化程度较好的CNTs.@采用浸渍法制备了ZrO2改性的的硅胶催化剂载体，并以该载体制备了“蛋壳”型催化剂，利用BET，SEM和EDS等考察了钴基催化剂的结构和还原性能.结果表明，ZrO2改性的“蛋壳”型催化剂具有更好的比表面性能；ZrO2改性的载体有利于提高催化剂的分散程度、催化活性及C+5选择性.在温度250 ℃，压力2 MPa，空速500 h-1条件下，“蛋壳”型催化剂上CO转化率可达到89.87%~96.58%，C+5选择性为76.8%~84.7%.@采用等体积浸渍法制备了含金属助剂钒（V）和钼（Mo）的Co-Pd/TiO2催化剂，在固定床反应器装置上考察了该催化剂催化CH4和CO2反应合成乙酸的性能，用XRD，TPD和TPR等技术表征了催化剂.结果表明，V和Mo的加入量能影响载体的结晶度，促进活性金属的还原，调节催化剂表面酸性，提高活性金属在载体表面的分散度，从而影响催化剂的催化活性.@以国内某煤化工企业为实例，应用Aspen Plus工业系统流程软件对HT-L粉煤气化合成甲醇工艺中CO变换反应进行模拟，应用RK-SOAVE和ELECNTL的物性方法计算在特定条件下经过变换反应后CO含量.计算结果显示：在设定温度为210 ℃，压力为3.6 MPa的条件下，CO变换反应前后CO气体的摩尔分数由69.578％降为19.700％，此时符合后续合成甲醇工艺条件的要求；同时与实验结果相比，提出模型能很好地模拟CO变换反应.@借助PROII软件，研究了合成甲醇体系中纯组分H2和CO等的密度值以及甲醇和甲醇-CO-H2混合物的容积值随温度和压力的变化，并与实验值进行了比较，在此基础上考察了温度和压力对甲醇合成体系平衡组成的影响.结果表明，压力对各组分性质的影响较大，当压力不大于10 MPa时，该软件的模拟计算值与实验值较接近，平衡组成与文献值也基本一致，低温高压有利于提高甲醇的平衡组成.对多喷嘴干粉气化工艺产气合成甲醇的研究表明，当采用铜基催化剂时，压力控制在9 MPa~10 MPa，合成气入口温度在260 ℃左右，CO2含量在6%~8%（体积分数）利于甲醇合成.@在反应温度60 ℃～110 ℃，反应压力0.5 MPa～1.75 MPa，进料空速1 h-1~3.5 h-1，油气比0.3∶80～0.3∶350(体积流量)的条件范围内，研究了Hβ分子筛催化改性M15甲醇汽油(甲醇体积分数为15%)轻质组分过程中的反应工艺条件对轻组分含量和M15甲醇汽油饱和蒸气压的影响.结果表明，最佳的反应温度、压力、空速、油气比分别为90 ℃，1.0 MPa，1.0 h-1和0.3∶135，在此条件下，易挥发组分减少，M15甲醇汽油的饱和蒸气压由75 kPa~76 kPa降低到64 kPa~66 kPa.@介绍了化学链燃烧技术（chemical-looping combustion，CLC）的基本概念及其特点；分析了固体燃料CLC的反应机理；总结了固体燃料CLC中氧载体的研究进展；探讨了几种不同的固体燃料CLC的反应器装置，指出串行流化床反应器是将来着重研究的装置；介绍了化学链制氢技术（chemical looping hydrogen，CLH）、化学链重整技术（chemical-looping reforming，CLR）和非耦合氧化学链燃烧技术（chemical-looping with oxygen uncoupling，CLOU）三种CLC技术的拓展，指出了固体燃料CLC中存在的问题及进一步研究的方向.@评述了分别以生产合成天然气甲烷（美国Exxson加压流化床）、中热值煤气（加拿大UBC加压喷动流化床和韩国KAIST常压导流管内循环流化床）、工业燃料气（中国福州大学常压“气化煅烧”集成流化床）为目标的四种不同类型催化气化PDU实验结果及工艺过程的对比，指出应尽快建立燃煤自供热的流化床催化气化PDU装置，为实际工程放大设计提供有效信息.鉴于工业燃料气和合成气的广阔市场需求，优先开展 “催化气化灰渣煅烧”CGAC集成工艺专利技术研发，可望推进催化气化的实际工业化进程.@
Coal/PAN complex was synthesized by using an aniline extracted product of coal as a template to simulate the structure of ash-free coal with through pores. The effects of pore structure and functional groups on the conductivity of the complex were investigated. The results showed that the maximum conductivity of the coal/PAN complex was 6.46×10-4 S/cm. The main reason for the low conductivity is that there are less —OH, —COOH, and =CO= functional groups, low charge density and less active site in the surface of the extract, which resulted in a relatively weak “hydration” surface. Therefore the doping process cannot be performed thoroughly for the nonuniform distribution of the extracts. The synergistic effect of pore structure and functional groups can enhance the conductivity of coal/PAN complex.@It is necessary to do some research on the substitute of standard anthracite because of the higher price of anthracite, which is supplement to investigate coking index of coal. The testing results of six kind of coals which are mixed with standard anthracite by the regulated ratio in standard(GB/T5447-1997) show that the coal is different, the coking index is different obviously. The further tests, in which the coal are mixed with quartz sand, demonstrate that the supplement and its mixing ratio have an significant influence on the coking index of coal. The results of orthogonal testing illustrated that supplement has more significant effect on the coking index of coal; the mixing ratio of supplement is second, they are highly significant factors of coking index; the type of coal is relatively more obvious than supplement and its mixing ratio, it is relatively significant factor. Some conclusions are drawn by the results of orthogonal testing that the choice of supplement and its mixing ratio with reason, the establishment of relationship between the coking index of coal mixed with non-standard anthracite and that of coal mixed with standard anthracite.@Coal-ash is the remains of coal after burning completely. The research was mainly emphasised on the mineral components, character of external appearance and melting point of coal-ash from Shenhua-ningmei group by means of XRD, SEM and TG-DSC. The result showed that the coal-ash of YLM is composed of calcite, gypsum, quqrtz, haematite and rutile while ash of XJM is mainly composed of calcite, gypsum and quqrtz. The ash-melting point of XJM is about 45 ℃ higher than that of YLM, which is largely because of haematite and rutile in the ash of YLM.@Gasification process is influenced by thermal behavior at high temperature. TG-DSC, XRD and SEM were employed to observe phase changes and reaction of mineral under oxidation atmosphere. There is different mineral changing in heating process which affects the ash fusibility. The system of mineral matters is mainly dominated by the change of aluminosilicate. The morphology and distribution of mineral are changed at elevated temperature.@In this study, the supported ZnO/γ-Al2O3 sorbents were prepared by the impregnation method. Gas desulfurization tests were made by using these adsorbents. The influence of loading，calcination and sulfur temperature and so on  was studied. The prepared adsorbents were characterised by using XRD, BET. The results showed that ZnO/γ-Al2O3 may have monolayer dispersed ZnO and ZnO crystallites. There is a threshold monolayer dispersion capacity. If the ZnO loading is lower than the threshold, the ZnO will disperse on the surface ofγ-Al2O3 as a monolayer, then the sample will give an XRD pattern with no crystalline ZnO peaks. When the ZnO loading is higher than the threshold, in addition to the monolayer dispersed ZnO, crystalline ZnO will appear, then the sample will give an XRD pattern with crystalline ZnO peaks. And this was also proved by experiment. When the ZnO loading is lower than the threshold ,the breakthrough sulfur capacity is rise with the increase of loading and the high dynamic sulfur capacity 9.7 g S/100 g ZnO was obtained by these adsorbents. By contraries, the stability and capacity decreaced clearly.@There are main reactions in the process of tannin extract desulfurization production, however,side reactions which generate many salts(such as Na2S2O3, Na2SO4, NaSCN, NaHCO3,and so on)are inevitable.These by-products will influence the qualities of desulfurization solution of tannin extract and the stabilization of desulfurization technology. We made studies for the sake of effect.The effect of Na2S2O3, Na2SO4, NaSCN, NaHCO3, in desulfurization solution of tannin extract on desulfurization solution was investigated from four aspects of surface tension, viscosity and density. The result showed that the accumulation of by-products in tannin extract desulfurization solution make desulfurization solution surface tension descend,viscosity and density increase. And change the operation condition of tannic extract desulfurization technology, finally influence the efficiency of desulfurization.@High-abundance content-rich phenolic compounds are formed in the direct coal liquefaction oil. It is crucial to investigate the factors that determine the contents and compositions of phenolic compounds, in order to understand  better the mechanism how phenolic compounds are produced. In this paper, we study the effects of three process conditions, including reaction temperature,catalyst and addition of high boiling point oil, on the content distribution of phenolic compounds in a boiling 41 ℃-220 ℃ coal liquefaction oil. We have found out that both the addition of catalyst and the increase of reaction temperature lead to the enhanced yield of crude phenol while addition of high boiling oil has insignificant effect. In addition, both the increase of reaction temperature and addition of high boiling oil help convert high-level phenolic intermediates to lower-molecular-weight, simpler-structure, lowlevel phenols by means of cleavage, hydrodealkylation, and dehydroxylation. In contrast, the addition of catalyst greatly inhibits the transformation from higer phenols to low-grade phenolic.@Shenhua coal-derived oil samples are obtained from the continuous direct coal liquefaction test. 8 narrow fractions are gained by the true boiling point distillation from the samples, of which boiling point is lower than 300 ℃. The pseudo-critical temperatures (PCT) calculated by group contribution method (GCM) of the narrow fractions ascend with distillation temperature rising with a linear relation:Tc=435.4+1.298t. The PCT calculated by six different equations accurately is consistent with the measured values by GCM, which the relative errors are within 5%. Furthermore, the lesser errors can be got by using the Watanasiri equation and NEDO formula within 2%.@The influence of mild oxidation on the technology properties and the changes of the structure of the coals were studied under the simulative nature oxidation at laboratory, and the oxidize time was used for the oxidation degree. The results showed that the Vdaf of the coals had almost not changed, but the caking and coking capacity had become worsening more or less with the increase of oxidation degree. And the higher the rank of the coal, the less influence on these technology properties, and the reason of these changes were explained with FTIR.@In this paper 5 bituminous coals with different coal ranks were carbonized in the 5 kg experiment coke oven. The relationshipship between the coking property of single coals and the crystallite structure of the cokes were discussed. The results showed that the quality of the cokes which had been prepared from the coking coal and the 1/3 coking coal were fairly good. It was shown from X-ray diffraction (XRD) results that the carbon structural factor (La/Lc) of the coke prepared from fat coal was smallest, but the graphitization degree was highest. The true relative density (TRD) of the coke was decreased with the increase of La/Lc.@The nanoparticles of coal was simulated by hexagonal graphite clusters, the regularity of effect of particle size on the combustion and pyrolysis kinetic parameters were researched by quantum chemistry method AM1.The results show that the particle size of coal particle has obvious effects on the kinetic parameters of combustion and pyrolysis; the apparent activation energy decreases and rate constant increases with the particle size of coal particle decreasing; and the apparent activation energy and the logarithm of rate constant have linear relation with the reciprocal of particle size. These regularines are consistent with experimental results of concerned documents.@Flow and combustion characteristics of coaxial crossed swirling fluidic process were studied by experimentation in the article. The study shows that the finestra current coefficient of fluidic equipment of central tube spout was 0.605; the resistance coefficient of circumrotation vane was 0.09; the ejective gas from the spout formed a negative pressure area at the center of spout; the axial velocity decayed faster; the excess air coefficient required for combustion was small; the combustion which flame was transparent and vigorous was full. The effective and clean combustion of low calorific gas-fired can be realized with the coaxial crossed swirling fluidic combustor in the tube furnace of coal chemical plant.@The low efficiency coal-burning chain link stove converted to burn low heat value coal-bed methane is an energy saving and emission reducing measure. To analyze the in-boiler flow and combustion conditions, experimental research and three-dimensional numerical simulation were conducted. The distribution of in-boiler flow field, temperature field, and CH4 component were obtained. The predictions show that the in-boiler flow and combustion conditions are optimal. Compared to coal-fired, the boiler efficiency ratio is enhanced by 25.5%. The recirculation region is formed at the top of chamber. At the rated load, the CH4 concentration drops slowly, and the entire chamber’s flame fullness is ideal.@The co-firing characteristics of Fujian anthracite and corn cob blends was studied with thermogravimetric technique. The results show that the characteristics of ignition, burning and burn-out of Fujian anthracite were improved added with corn cob. However, with proportion of corn cob increased, the improvement of the latter combustion characteristics of anthracite is little. Besides, the activation energy E was calculated by using Coats-Redfern method. It shows that E is decreased added with corn cob. However, the value of E hasn’t the obvious matter with the proportion of corn cob. The effect of corn cob on anthracite firing is mainly improving the ignition characteristics.@The TG-DTG thermal analysis technology was applied to analyze the combustion process of the coal, biomass and their mixture, and the influence of coal kinds, biomass kinds, biomass addition ratio, heating rate, oxygen flowing rate to the combustion characteristic of mixture was also studied. The results show that the biomass’s ignition, burnout and combustion characteristics are better than the coal’s. Biomass can improve the combustion characteristics of coal. With the increase of the biomass addition, the combustion characteristics improve more obviously. With the increase of heating rate, the ignition characteristic parameters and combustion characteristic parameters are increased, while burnout characteristic is reduced. With the increase of oxygen flowing rate, the combustion performances of flue can be improved.@Thermal analysis and combustion characteristics of mixture of oil shale semi-coke and coal investigated on TG analyzer, with regard to comparing the process of the mixture with those of the individual components. Meanwhile, the effect of rank of coalification and the rate of coal, which was mixed into the oil shale semi-coke, was studied. Results show that: the combustion characteristics can be improved by mixing coal with good combustion performance; the mixture of oil shale semi-coke and Erji jet coal had better combustion performance than other mixtures; the index of combustion performance of the mixture increased with the augment of the proportions of EJ coal.@The flash pyrolysis tests of Dachengzi 4# oil shale are carried out in a spouted-entrained bed reactor. The resident time of carry gas in the reactor was kept constant at different temperatures by changing the carry gas flow rate. The effect of temperature on the fields of gas, liquid and solid products was discussed. The optimum temperature for flash pyrolysis of Dachengzi 4# oil shale is 530 ℃, if the liquid product is the main objective.@Coal-based activated carbons were prepared from Jiaozuo anthracite by NaOH as activating agent. The influence of the ratio of KOH to anthracite, activation temperature and activation time on adsorption properties and yield were investigated. The specific surface area, total pore volume and pore size distribution of activated carbons were characterized by low temperature nitrogen adsorption. The results showed that coal-based activated carbon could be prepared when the ratio of NaOH to anthracite was 4, activation temperature was 750 ℃ and activation time was 1 h, which specific surface area was 2 483 m2/g, total pore volume was 1.41 cm3/g, iodine adsorption value was 2 530 mg/g and methylene blue adsorption value was 418 mg/g.@Carbon nanotubes can be synthesized via detonation-assisted chemical vapor deposition using olefin, which is one of the products of indirect coal liquefaction from coal, as carbon source. After investigating influences of metal catalysts and explosive packing densities on structures and morphologies of the detonation products, it was found when the explosive packing density is 0.2 g/mL the nanotube’s content of product using cobalt as catalyst is 70%. On this base, the synthesis of carbon nanotube using the other two heavy mass carbon sources is studied. The results show the conditions of synthesis via detonation-assisted chemical vapor deposition of carbon nanotubes need be further optimizing.@A clew-like carbon materials consisting of self-assembly carbon nanotubes were synthesized from coal pitch by chemical vapor deposition using ferrocene as catalyst precursors in hydrogen and argon atmosphere. The morphology and structure of the products were characterized by field emission scanning electron microscopy, high resolution transmission electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction and Raman spectroscopy. The results show that the clew-like carbon materials, which were composed of curly carbon nanotubes with high purity and diameter in the range of 20 nm-45 nm, were achieved. The ferromagnetic and microwave adsorbing properties of the products were measured. Results reveal that the products had an obvious ferromagnetic behavior with the large coercivity value (446.13 Oe) and certain microwave adsorbing property in the frequency range of 2 GHz to 18 GHz.@Two kinds of mesophase pitches (MPP) were prepared by heat-treatment two coal tar pitches (CTP) and modified coal tar pitch (MCTP) in the presence of nitrogen. The pyrolysis behaviors of CTP and MCTP were studied by means of thermal analysis (TG and DSC). The morphologies of MPP were inspected by optical microscope. The structures of the MPP were characterized by XRD. The results show that there are more alkyl functional groups existing in CTP and MCTP than in MPP, which indicate MPP formation predominantly polycondense aromatic and release the alkyl functional groups. An endothermic band due to volatilize light compounds around 290 ℃, two exothermic peaks at the range of 400 ℃-500 ℃ were characteristic of polymerization reactions, exothermic peaks of MCTP is higher than that of CTP because the former have a higher reaction active for its more alkyl side chain. MPP from CTP is mosaics texture, while from the MCTP is flow domains texture, (002) and (101) peaks of graphite occur on XRD patterns, the peaks of MPP from MCTP is higher and narrower than MPP from CTP, which indicates the former is more graphitizability than the latter.@Acenaphthene is an important chemically raw material which exists mainly in gas absorber oil distillation cut of coal tar. A new process of separating and pefining acenaphthene from gas absorber oil was investigated by rectification-recrystallization in the paper. The results show that it is very difficult to obtain acenaphthene with high purity from gas absorber oil only by rectification time after time, and yet acenaphthene with high purity can be obtained easily by means of the process of combining rectification with recrystallization, and that the process has many characteristics such as lower energy consumption, higher purity and yield, short process flow, mother liquor use for times, no pollution, lower cost and so on.@The methods of preparation of high-performance CNTs/epoxy nanocomposites are reviewed in detail from the points such as the interfacial interaction of CNTs with epoxy matrix, the dispersion of CNTs in epoxy matrix, the functionalization of CNTs and the alignment of CNTs in epoxy matrix. And the studies on the curing reaction mechanism and the curing kinetics of the CNTs/epoxy nanocomposites are introduced. The as-obtained research results are also thoroughly analyzed in this paper. The facing research difficulty and challenge of CNTs/epoxy composites are discussed as well.@Through the thermal simulation experiments of hydrocarbon generation in the semi-closed system on Shenfu coal and the coal with different mediums from 250 ℃ to 550 ℃, with a stepwise heating stage of 50 ℃, the characteristics of gas, liquid and solid products are discussed systematically in this paper. The results show that the peak yield of oil appears between the heating temperature 400 ℃ and 450 ℃, the maximum oil-generating ratio is 41.2 mg/g. The maximum gas-generating ratio is 99.4 mL/g at 500 ℃. Methane is predominant component of the hydrocarbon gas, reaches to 33.6%-61.2% of the total gas yield. Hydrogen is the main part of the non-hydrocarbon gas, achieves to 18.5%-58.1% of the total gas yield. Non-hydrocarbon gas is generated in the early stage, partial carbon dioxide and smidgen carbon monoxide in them. The content of C in the solid products increases and the content of H,O decreases.@To investigate the exiting state and solubilization characteristics of small molecule compounds in the entire coal rank, eight coals ranged from young lignite to anthracite were extracted with n-hexane and sampled in batches. The change law of extraction rate in a certain period was discussed, and the extracts were analyzed with GC. The results show that the three existing forms of small molecules: free state, micropore-inbuilt state and network-inbuilt state, consist in every coal and show universal rules for the entire coal rank. The relationship between the cumulative extraction rate and cumulative extraction time of coals in different rank are subject to logarithmic function. The curve of fractionated extraction rate or the total extraction rate to carbon content represent the “chair” shape. TheⅡ-type molecules in the n-hexane-soluble small molecule compounds are most likely to dissolve, followed by Ⅰ-type molecular, and then Ⅲ-type, especially theⅠ-type molecular just appear in the bituminous coal. The metamorphic reaction process basically submit to three stages, which is the aromatization process, splitting hydrogenation and stability reaction process, and the condensation reaction process.@The thermal stability of naphthyl benzyl sulfide in coal was studied using density functional theory method. According to the structure microscopic parameters and thermodynamic functional change, it can be concluded that the bond between C in the methylene of phenmethyl and S cleaves firstly and forms a more stable structure, phenmethyl radical, which has p-π conjugation system, then the bond between C at naphthyl and S cleaves, thirdly H atom of methylene is abstracted, subsequently phenyl is leaved from the original structure, finally H atoms of six-member ring are abstracted. The thermal decomposition of naphthyl benzyl sulfide is an endothermic reaction, and increasing temperature is in favor of the reaction.@High-abundance content-rich phenolic compounds are existed in the CLMO. The content of phenolic compounds is about 20%-25%. It is formed from phenol, (alkyl)phenol, (alkyl)naphthol, (alkyl)indanols and phenylphenol. It is crucial to investigate the factors that determine the contents and compositions of phenolic compounds, in order to understand the mechanism how phenolic compounds are produced better. In this paper, the effects of three process conditions is investigated, including reaction temperature, Mo catalyst and addition of BHTPSD, on the content distribution of phenolic compounds in CLMO. we have found out that both the addition of catalyst and the increase of reaction temperature lead to the enhanced yield of crude phenol while addition of BHTPSD has insignificant effect. In addition, addition of BHTPSD help convert high-level phenolic intermediates to lower-molecular-weight, simpler-structure, low-level phenols by means of cleavage, hydrodealkylation, and dehydroxylation. In contrast, the addition of Mo catalyst greatly inhibits the transformation from high-grade phenols to low-grade phenols.@In this paper, lignite of Mongolia, oil-coal slurry under the conditions of high temperature and pressure, different concentrations and different heating rates under the conditions of the viscosity variation, given 0.1 t/d brown coal direct liquefaction pilot data provide an initial basis. The use of autoclave developed by China Coal Research Institute, autoclave torque by recording the changes in converted oil-coal slurry viscosity by linear regression method, obtained oil-coal slurry system under the conditions of high temperature and pressure viscosity-temperature relationship equation. Through the viscosity-temperature relationship equation can be calculated the oil-coal slurry viscosity at different temperatures. From the test results, at different heating rates and different concentrations of the oil-coal slurry viscosity decreases with temperature decreasing trend in the concentration of important factors affecting the viscosity.@As a subject of Wucaiwan coal from Xinjiang, its quality characteristics and TG were analyzed, then it was investigated to affect of these four factors such as ratio of mass for solvent to coal, reaction time, initial H2 pressure, and reaction temperature on the coal hydro-liquefaction property. Results show that the optimal reaction temperature is 450 ℃, and oil yield is up to 55.20%, conversion 76.76% at conditions of initial H2 pressure being 6.0 MPa, ratio of mass for solvent to coal 1.75, reaction time 60 min although the coal sample is soft coal with high inertinite of 81.5%, R0max=0.73%, Vdaf＜37%, and H/C=0.59. So Wucaiwan coal has good liquefaction performance.@The distribution and characterization of phenolics in direct coal liquefaction (DCL) oil have been quantified by gas chromatography/mass spectrometry (GC/MS). The oil was from 0.1 t/d BSU liquefaction run feeding with Shengli brown coal. The phenolic concentrate in DCL oil was isolated through caustic extraction, and then was further derivatizied to prepare derivative mixture, which was the main sample for GC/MS analysis because of its higher separability compared to the concentrate. Totally, 134 phenolics, which belong to four types of ring structures: phenols, indanols, naphthalenols and naphthols are identified, and most of them are alkyl substituted. Phenols, including the most amount of compounds, has the highest weight content in the concentrate, followed by indanols and naphthalenols. Naphthols, with the fewest amount compounds, has the lowest weight content.@Co-liquefaction reactivity (CLR) of Yanzhou coal and lignin was investigated in the batch autoclave with the addition of tetralin as the hydrogen donor solvent and Fe2O3+S as the catalyst by using single-factor method. The impact of the ratio of coal to lignin, temperature, reaction time and initial hydrogen pressure on CLR were studied. The results showed that the addition of the appropriate amount of lignin to Yanzhou coal can enhance CLR of Yanzhou coal. According to comprehensive consideration experimental conditions and the economic cost, the optimum conditions is the ratio of Yanzhou coal∶lignin=9∶1, temperature of 440 ℃, cool hydrogen pressure of 8 MPa and reaction time of 60 min. The conversion and oil yield reached 86.8% and 62.9% at this condition.@A common ionic liquid of 1-butyl-3-methylimidazolium tetrafluoroborate ([BMIm]BF4) has been used as swelling solvent to swell Shenhua coal for pretreatment of the coal liquefaction. The swelling ratio and coal liquefaction have been experientially measured, by which the investigation of the application of the [BMIm]BF4 on swelling pretreatment of coal was carried out. The results show that the swelling ratio of the [BMIm]BF4 swelled coal is remarkably more than that of the coal without pretreatment in the solvent of methanol. The swelling pretreatment makes the weak covalency bonds of coal broken, so as to make the conversion ratio and the ratio of oil and gas product improved in the process of the swollen coal liquefaction. The swelling ratio and total conversion rate of Shenhua coal increased with increasing of the swelling time. The effect of operating temperature is complicated because there is a suitable temperature difference. Above that temperature, the swelling ratio and total conversion rate decrease with increasing of temperature. And the [BMIm]BF4 can recycled.@Research on the H2S and SO2 releasing characteristics by BP neural network is carried out, the data is validated by one-dimensional pulverized coal combustion system. A typical three-layer neural networks with 8 input neurons, 6 connotative layer neurons, and 2 output neurons, the BP neural network arithmetic is improved by adding momentum item. Through trained by training samples and validated by test data, the model indicates that the BP neural network can predict the sulfur releasing characteristics well.@Manganese-based oxide as a high-temperature desulfurization sorbent was prepared with different additive by the mixing method and its performance was studied in a fixed bed reactor. The effect of additive on phase, texture and specific surface area of Mn-based sorbents were investigated by XRD, SEM and BET. The results reveal that H2S could be desulfured to 8×10-6 and sulfur content was 33.1% by the sorbent with the mole ratio of Mn∶Cu which is 9∶1 and the binder is 10% sol, which also had good mechanical intensity and desulfurization performance. The change of additive can effects the micro-structure and reactivity of the sorbents.@Comparing with ADA, the tannin extract desulfurization is more superior and applied widely in industry. In order to reveal the advantages, the surface properties of oxidized tannin extract and ADA aqueous solution are researched using surface tensiometer and conductivity meter. The results shows that the oxidized tannin extract is an ionic surfactant, which can reduce the surface tension of solution and intensify the gas-liquid mass transfer rate of hydrogen sulfide or air with solution. Howere, the ADA solution is not of property. That is the reason for advantage. The critical micelle concentration of oxidized tannin extract solution is 0.53 g/L，and this value can be used as a minimum concentration in tannin extract desulphurization solution.@In the condition of 360 ℃-400 ℃, hydrogen pressure 1 MPa-2.5 MPa, residence time 5 min-40 min, and ratio of xylene to coal tar 0.5-3, reaction kinetics study of high temperature coal tar hydrocracking in supercritical xylene were investigated in batch reactor. The pressure index of cracking reaction was -0.211 1, ratio of xylene to coal tar index was 0.403 3, pre-exponential factor was 2.722 min-1·MPa（0.211 1）, and activity energy was 15.765 kJ/mol; The pressure index of condensation reaction was -0.288 4, ratio of xylene to coal tar index was -0.445 9, pre-exponential factor was 18.952 min-1·MPa（0.288 4）, and activity energy was 30.762 kJ/mol; The pressure index of total reaction was 0.160 9, ratio of xylene to coal tar index was 0.226 5, pre-exponential factor was 204.226 min-1·MPa（-0.160 9）, and activity energy was 39.049 kJ/mol.@The gasified semicoke obtained from the secondary cyclone of the Jincheng industrial gasifier was selected as one of the samples for the study, in addition, three chars were yielded by the investigation of the Jingneng bituminous coal in a drop tube deposition furnace at fast pyrolysis temperature of 1 173 K，1 273 K，1 373 K. Reactivity measurements of the four chars above mentioned were performed by TGA/SDA851e under the condition of constant temperature. The combustion behavior of the coal char and its effects have been studied for temperature ranging from 773 K to 1 023 K. Different methods to prepare chars and different pyrolysis temperatures determine varied combustion reactivity of coal char, and the combustion reactivity of the gasified semicoke JC is the minimum among the four chars, and the combustion reactivity of other three pyrolytic chars decreases with pyrolysis temperature increasing. The reaction rate increases with the combustion temperature and the oxygen concentration increasing. Meanwhile, the transition temperature and the activation energy(Ea) of the coal char was determined by halflife time method, in the kinetic region, Ea of JC，JN-1，JN-2，JN-3 is 115 kJ/mol，57 kJ/mol，70 kJ/mol，97 kJ/mol respectively. It is close to that determined by isoconversional method. The reaction is more difficult and Ea increases with the burnout increasing, and the transition temperature rises further.@A series of catalysts for methanation on silica-supported nickel was prepared by precipitation and the catalysts were analyzed by XRD, TPR and SEM. The results showed that aluminum addition was helpful to form microballoon catalyst and adding aluminum and cerium could accelerate reduction of catalyst. Cerium addition could obviously improve the carbon distribution of catalyst. The reaction activity of complex catalyst was higher than those of monotypic catalyst.@The zinc acetate/activated carbon catalyst which was used in vinyl acetate synthesis from acetylene was prepared by excessive impregnation and the impregnation condition were studied. The results show that the suitable zinc acetate concentration is 0.8 mol/L. The time is 60 min. The temperature is 55 ℃. Water complete drying needs 30 min at 120 ℃, but it needs 70 min at 90 ℃. The BET analysis showed that mesopore of catalyst is blocked and the average pore radius reduce during the dry temperature increase. The BET and average hole radius don’t change clearly when the dry temperature reaches 110 ℃. The SEM analysis shows that vinyl acetate crystal is on the catalyst surface.@Shendong coal was activated by KOH for preparation of high surface area activated carbons as adsorbent to separate CH4 and H2. The effects of different preparation variables, including the KOH/coal ratio, activation temperature and time, on the final porous texture of activated carbon were discussed. The results showed that the surface area and pore volume of prepared activated carbon increase with the increase of KOH/coal. The surface area and pore vo-lume reach maximum with activation time and then decrease. The activation temperature has little effect on surface area and the pore volume increases with activation temperature. The optimum preparation conditions of activated carbon for separation CH4 and H2 are KOH/coal ratio of 5, activation temperature of 800 ℃ and activation time of 90 min.@In a two-stage fixed bed, the cracking characteristics of tar derived from biomass pyrolysis in a high temperature coal char were studied. The results show that higher temperature is favor to the cracking of biomass tar. Both long residence time in char and the cracking temperature can decrease the tar yield with the increase of gas yield and H2 percentage. The prepare condition of char has influence on the gas yield and composition. Low pyrolysis temperature and short residence time can increase reactivity of coal char and are favor to the higher H2 and CO percentage.@In the hydrated process, calcium-based flue gas desulfurization sorbent has the poor dispersion, the small surface area and ease to get group. The hydrated products were modified by adding different amount PEG was studied in this paper. The results showed that when the hydration period of 30 min and the water to lime molar ratio of 1.4∶1, the optimal adding amount of PEG600 was 3%, the particle size of hydrated products was uniform, an average particle size was 9.4 μm, and the surface area was 21.6 m2/g. XRD, SEM and FT-IR showed that lime was hydrated completely, lime slaking rate was high, and the dispersion was improved. In addition, calcium hydroxide was coated with PEG.@In order to compare the advantages and disadvantages of different Xray diffraction quantitative methods, three X-ray quantitative analysis methods were used in the experiment with CeO2-TiO2 two-component sample. High emphasis was paid on the differences of experiment process, convenience of operation and value of relative error. The research showed that internal-standard-matter method wasn’t recommended in practice because of its complicated process and larger value of error. On the contrary, out-of-heat method was the best one in practice when compared in convenience and value of relative error. However, in order to obtain a more accurate K-value, which is indispensable in out-of-heat method, qualitative analysis is its key step.@Based on the 3 million tons-scale project of Fischer-Tropsch Chi-deflated gas data, the processes of Chi-deflated gas to LNG (liquefied natural gas) and LNG-ammonia-generation projects were simulated using the Aspen plus simulation software respectively; meanwhile, the technical and economic index of the two programs were analyzed. The simulation results showed that the emission of greenhouse gases CO2 of the LNG project is less 49,400 t/a than that of the LNG-ammonia-generation projects, the energy efficiency higher 22.2% than that of the latter one, while the profit is less 1.64-1.65 million RMB/a. According to a comprehensive consideration of CO2 emissions, energy efficiency, and profit, we believe that the project of LNG is better than co-generation.@The capability of methane absorbed by coal has a close relation with the molecular structure of coal. In order to study the effect of low molecular weight compounds in coal on behaviors of coal-nitrogen adsorption, Pingdingshan bituminous coal were extracted with five kinds of organic solvents using Soxhlet extraction, the solvents including n-hexane, benzene, chloroform, tetrahydrofuran and pyridine, and the polarity of solvents increased in turn, whereafter, the raw coal and its residuals adsorption behaviors of nitrogen were investigated. The studies show that the extraction yields of the five solvents increased in turn, when the relative pressure pr (relative pressure was the ratio of adsorption equilibrium pressure and the saturated vapor pressure of nitrogen) less than 0.1, the nitrogen adsorption capacity of coal residuals increased in turn, but when relative pressure pr larger than 0.1, compared with tetrahydrofuran residuals, benzene and chloroform residuals have high nitrogen adsorption capacity. The results show that the contents and constituents of low molecular weight compounds have a significant effect on coal adsorption behaviors of nitrogen, both aperture property and surface property were changed. The soluble polar aromatic compounds have the most effect on the behaviors of coal-nitrogen adsorption, the heterocyclic oxygen and nitrogen aromatic compounds have the inferior effect on it, and the saturated hydrocarbon compounds at least.@High resolution mass spectrometer is applied in on-line analysis of organic matter released during pyrolysis of coal with different rank from Huaibei coalfield under vacuum condition. The result shows that during 200 ℃-400 ℃, the component of compounds released by coals with different rank is similar, while the relative content of high molecular weight compounds decreases with increasing of coal rank at 600 ℃. The trend is also found that the ratio of aromatic hydrocarbons between high molecular weight and low molecular ones decreases with increasing of coal rank. As temperature increases, high molecular weight compounds of anthracite and bituminite greatly increase. Oxygen groups in coal start to crack during 200 ℃-400 ℃ and turn into CO2 at 600 ℃.@The pyrolysis characteristics of the coals and sawdust in an inertia atmosphere were investigated using a thermo-gravimetric apparatus with a on-line infrared-spectrum analyzer. The influence of blend ratio and coal rank on the pyrolysis of coal with sawdust blends was examined. The experimental results show that the pyrolysis characteristics of coal with sawdust blends are not similar to that of every single sample addition of single coal with single sawdust. The high rank coal with sawdust is more beneficial to interaction effects than low rank coal. By investigating the infrared spectrogram, there is a difference in the gas yield between different coals with sawdust. It is discovered that the coal rank has important influence on the pyrolysis of the blends. The interaction effects in the co-pyrolysis of coals and sawdust are suggested.@The relationship between particle size of coal and quality of pyrolysis production during microwave heating are studied, and the change of gas composition in different time is analyzed by gas analyzer. The results show that the coal’s temperature can reach to 750 ℃ within 10 min and tar yield is 12% within 22 min, which has increased by 4% compared with conventional heating. The content of hydrogen, carbon monoxide and methane in pyrolysis gas increase significantly. The size of raw coal particle has little effect on the yield of a variety of products. It shows that this technology can be used for rapid coal pyrolysis, and lay the foundation for the comprehensive utilization of coal gas.@The microcrystal structure of carbonated briquette made from Changzhi anthracite powder was studied by use of X-ary diffraction and TG. The results have shown that the microcrystal parameters d(200) is larger, but Lc and La are smaller than that of graphite. There were micro-crystals in the carbonizated briquette made from Changzhi anthracite powder. The arrangement of the micro-crystals in the carbonizated briquette was quite irregular, so that the structure was called “irregular structure”. When a briquette was carbonated, there was no fluid colloidal-matter formed in the inside of the briquette. Through binding material and glue stock, the anthracite powders were bonded together. Because of the affect of anthracite powder and binding material there was the apparent surface between them. The reactivity of the carbonizated briquette was decided by both the microcrystal arrangement and pore structure in the briquette.@Measurements of active carbon catalytic oxidation of H2S were conducted in a laboratory-scale, fixed-bed reactor system. The main objective of this research is to have a clear insight of the effects of operating parameters on desulfurization. The O2 concentration, the reaction temperature and the atmosphere of gas on the behavior of activated carbon catalytic oxidation of H2S removal was examined. Optimum desulfurization temperature was about 180 ℃. Oxygen-sulfur ratio was 1∶2. With the increasing of the content of CO, CO2 and H2, the desulfurization performance of AC decreased. On the countrary, the existence of H2O favored the desulfurization. A surface reaction control kinetics model of removing hydrogen sulfide by activated carbon had been put forward. The desulfurizig kinetics expression and kinetic parameter had been developed.@Based on Aspen Plus, a model for entrained-flow bed coal gasifier partial gasification by the method of Gibbs free energy minimization was established. A series of calculations were carried out to predict the effects of different operation parameters on the performance of syngas. The parameters include air-coal mass ratio, steam-coal ratio and carbon conversion rate in gasifier. The results show that the increasing of air-coal mass ratio can reduce the effective composition in coal gas, which lead to decrease of cold syngas efficiency, while the increasing of steam-coal ratio can enhance H2 volume percentages. It can help NOx reduction with partial gasification reburning. The results also show that the increasing of carbon conversion rate can add the effective composition in coal gas, but the extent of increasing is not obvious. Therefore we can not deliberately pursue carbon conversion rate for partial gasification.@The pulverized coal entrained-flow gasifier is simulated by Aspen Plus industrial systems flower software and the minimization method of Gibbs free energy. Under the given conditions of pulverized coal entrained-flow gasifier, the effects of content of effective gas (CO+H2) are studied under various ratios of air-coal and various pressures. Under the given conditions of 1 500 ℃ and carbon conversion of 99％, when coal flow volume is 3 265.87 kg/h and the ratio of air/coal is 4∶1, the computational results show that the content of effective gas is maximal. At the same time, the content of effective gas increases with the increasing of the pressure.@A new quartz tube reactor with double hole nozzle has been developed. In the reactor the non-premixed combustion and partial oxygenation process occurred as coke oven gas and pure oxygen were input. The experiment research and numerical simulation on the reactor have been carried on in our lab. The results of temperature distribution, flow field, concentration distribution in the reactor and also the H2/CO ratio in product gas have been obtained. Simulation results show that reactions mainly occur in the oxygen entrance region near by the double hole nozzle in the reactor. The wall temperature of the reactor affects the reaction results deeply. The results of simulation for the temperature distribution and flow field agree that of experimental well.@In this article, five coal with high slurring quality, four coal with low slurring quality and two coal with medium slurring quality is taken as sample for blending coal’s slurring experiment. The blend coal is made of high slurring quality and low slurring quality coal in 1∶1 proportion. The slurring results show the low slurring quality coal’s CWS’ concentration is improved by blending with the high slurring quality coal. The higher slurring quality blend coal contains Huainan B coal and Shenhuo coal. The lowest slurring quality blend coal is blended by Huating coal and Dahuizhan coal, whose CWS’ concentration is 61.58%. It is got from the experiment that the Huainan B coal is an excellent coal for coal blending to improve the slurring quality of the low slurring quality coal. Dahuizhan coal has high slurring quality, but it doesn’t suitable for coal blending to improve the slurring quality of the low slurring quality coal.@The middle distillate oil is the main product of coal liquefaction. In this paper, the group composition change of middle distillate oil from coal liquefaction before and after hydrocracking was investigated in an autoclave at different temperature and time using FV-20 as catalyst. The results show that the content of saturates gradually increase with the temperature and time increasing under 400 ℃. It reaches the minimum. under 440 ℃ for 40 min. The n-C12-27 of saturates decreasing with the increasing of temperature, cyclic-saturates change not too much. The content of aromatics increases and has a maximum 82.65% under 440 ℃ for 30 min. The content of mono-aromatics increase but di-aromatics and multi-aromatics decrease. The content of polar compounds decreased. When the temperature lower than 400 ℃, the gaseous hydrocarbon mainly concludes CH4, C2H6 and C3H8. With the increasing reaction temperature, C4H10 appears in the gaseous hydrocarbon, but its yield changes not too much.@After surfurating Fe2O3, FeSO4 and FeS under moderate conditions, they were characterized by XRD, TEM and EDS, and the catalytic activity of them compared through liquefaction experiments for the coal sample from Wucaiwan with high inertinite. XRD and EDS results show that they were produced Fe1-xS after sulfurating them. As a target of oil yield the catalytic activity of them before and after surfurating order Fe2O3>FeSO4>FeS and （Fe1-xS）FeSO4>（Fe1-xS）Fe2O3>（Fe1-xS）FeS. Especially after sulfurating FeSO4, SEM shows that it formed into regular nano-ball and its particle size became much small obviously, the catalytic activity enhanced prominently, and yields of oil and conversion increased percentage points of 11.5 and 7, namely, reached 74.71% and 79.8% respectively.@The optimization concentration of ammonium thiosulfate, ammonium thiocyanate and free ammonia in desulfurization solutions were selected, better temperature of mixing coke oven gas from preliminarily cool tower was chose and the opration parameters of precooling tower, ammonia distillation tower and circulation water were optimized by analyzing the data of ZL method to desulfuration and dehydrogenization in AG. Under these optimal condition, the desulfuration efficiency of the no.1, no.2 and no.3 remove sulfuration tower achieved 40%, 80% and 91% respectively, and the total efficiency of desulfuration and dehydrogenization of ZL method achieved 98%.@In this paper, the desulfurization effect of various desulfurizer in coal washing process was investigated. The removal of total sulfur and various forms of sulfur in coal under different desulfurizer and experimental condition was researched. The results show that the effect of sodium hypochlorite and hydrogen peroxide as oxidant removing inorganic sulfur in coal is very effective, and that methanol and N,N-dimethylethanolamine as extraction agent could remove effectively organic sulfur in coal. The oxidation desulfurizer and the extraction desulfurizer have cooperative effect, so the combination of the both could increase the desulfurization effect of total sulfur in coal. In addition, the irradiation of microwave and ultrasound could improve the desulfurization efficiency of organic sulfur in coal.@By comparing quality of gas coal and lean coal, the coke block pattern of plastometer index and optical texture of coke, it showed the inert structure was high coked from gas coal and lean coal, which can make the blend coal thin. But the coking capacity of them was completely different, comparison of micro-structure of coke formation of single kind of coal, the reactivity of gas coal was higher. The self-caking intensity and the coke microstructure were further compared, the results indicates the grain size of gas coal cannot oversize and also cannot undersize, it should be controlled in the reasonable size, which can improve coke quality when it participated in blending. The coke quality also can be improved by reasonable comminuting lean coal.@High-thermal-conductivity carbon material is a focus of new carbon material research field. With few QIs coal tar pitch as raw material in this work, the thermoplastic elastomer mesophase pitch was prepared by the different thermal polymerization time. The mesophase pitchs containing various TI were moulded respectively at 25 ℃ to 600 ℃ under 3.12 MPa. The effect of hot press molding on the development of ordered mesophase was studied. The results showed that: when TS contents of mesophase pitch lay between 10.7% to 26.3%, the ordered columnar billet was successfully preparaed by hot press molding. It is shown by polarizing microscope that the regional mesophase displayed a sort structure of long fibrous, highly ordered and the mesophase liquid crystal molecules were aligned perpendicular to the compressing direction in the molding process. After carbonization at 1 100 ℃, the longitudinal and lateral resistivity range of the carbon block precursor was 1.78 Ω·m-2.99 Ω·m, 0.83 Ω·m-1.41 Ω·m, respectively. It exhibited a sort of preferred orientation and easy graphitization, so it was the ideal precursor for the high-thermal-conductivity carbon block.@An experimental study was conducted to investigate the devolatilization and morphology characteristics of three typical Chinese bituminous coals in thermogravimetric analysis (TGA) by varying the coal particle size. Coal chars were then analyzed by scanning electron microscopy (SEM) for surface morphology. The devolatilization rate is not greatly influenced by the particle size around millimeter range in this study, however different coal types show distinct morphological characters even under similar proximate and ultimate analysis. For coals with less fluidity, it is easier to crack in pyrolysis process as the particle diameter increases. Coal with fluidity has a rough and quite fluffy surface after pyrolysis and a higher ratio of swelling but shows less cracking tendency.@The differences of property between the desulphurization slag of CFB boiler and the fly ash of PF boiler were compared, the hydrating capacity and the gelling property of the desulphurization slag of CFB boiler was analyzed. It was found that the reactivity of desulphurization slag comes from those amorphous material Al2O3 of and SiO2, and although those materials of CaO and Ⅱ-CaSO4 are beneficial to inducing the pozzolanic activity of slag, to increasing its gelling property, they also provide a great expansive force during hydration, which causes the instability of hydras. The expansibility of hydras is mainly caused by the forming of ettringite during hydration, the concentration of sulfate radical (SO2-4) ion in hydras plays a key role for the long-term stability of ettringite, and the CaO in desulphurization slag has an indirect effect on the expansion of hydras.@The fluidized behavior of ternary mixtures of pine char, coal char, and coal ash has been investigated. The effect of coal ash on the mixing of coal char and pine char was expressed through mixing index. It was found that decreasing ash diameter, increasing ash content in a certain range, and increasing gas velocity would improve the mixing of coal char and pine char. Moreover, the increase of ash content enriched pine char on the upper part of fluidized bed column.@In the co-gasification process of coal and biomass, fluidization properties of the mixtures are the co-fluidization of two kinds of chars in the fluidized bed. This paper reports the experimental findings related to fluidization characteristics of well-mixed binary mixtures composited by coal char and biomass char with different particle sizes and different mass composition ratio. The experimental results showed that the addition of coke can improve fluidization characteristics of biomass chars significantly, and that the mixing and segregation behavior of binary mixtures varied with particle size as well as density and gas flow. For well-mixed mixtures, coke is smaller than corncob-char in diameter, and the minimum fluidization velocities decreased with coke compositions, but on contrary the minimum fluidization velocities increased with coke compositions for segregated mixtures.@An overview is presented on the experiment and modeling study of effective diffusivity through the ash layer, which is a key parameter when describing coal char particle combustion or gasification. There are two theories studying the effective diffusivity. Ash layer is a porous media, so the theory of diffusion through porous media can be adopted. On the other hand, coal char combustion or gasification is gas-solid reaction, so the gas-solid reaction theory can be used. Some suggestions on studying the effective diffusivity in the future are also given.@The production capacity of low-temperature coal tar is increasing with the development of domestic coal low-temperature pyrolysis technique. In order to improve the utilization efficiency of low-temperature coal tar and solve the environmental problems in the combustion process, the properties, composition，processes and economic of two main routes(fuel type and fuel-chemical type)of low-temperature coal tar were researched. The result shows that low-temperature coal tar processing should be selected fuel-chemical type route which extracted phenols first, and then hydrogenation. This route by which the high value-added components in low-temperature coal tar was efficiently used, with a reasonable process and a short investment recovery period, is a prospect route for industrial production.@Investigation of arsenic content and occurrence in coal of Guizhou coal showed that arsenic content is large, and its arithmetic average content reaches 93.31 mg/kg, which is much larger than that in coal of other coal fields in China (4.09 mg/kg). The sequence of the average levels of arsenic occurrence in coal is: residual arsenic(56.74%)＞Fe-Mn oxide arsenic (20-74%)＞sulfide arsenic (15.20%)＞organic arsenic (5.07%)＞carbonate arsenic (1.73%)＞soluble and exchangeable arsenic. Arsenic in coal is mainly residual arsenic, and Fe-Mn oxide arsenic is the second highest. There is a coal sample exception, whose content is lower than other samples relatively, and organ arsenic is the largest in all modes. With previous studies, the result can be inferred that the coal is mainly organic arsenic, but not easy to extract.@By means of non-uniform electric field with DC high-voltage, researches on the positive corona charging characteristics of flowing pulverized coal. In order to find out the optimal technological condition of pulverized coal’s charge-to-mass ratio and its influencing factors, based on single-factor experiments, the main factors as the charged voltage, mean sieving particle size and powder feed concentration are determined. The best technological conditions have been pre-sented by orthogonal test, and the results have been examined by variance analysis. According to the analysis results, obtained regression formula of pulverized coal’s charge-to-mass ratio and its influencing factors by using least square regression analysis.@The effects of particle sizes, atmosphere condition and residual carbon content on the melting characteristics of Huolinhe lignite ash was investigated. Based on the discussion of the change of ash compositions, the variation of the compositions of mineral under different temperatures was employed by XRD. Results shows that the change of ash melting point (AMP) caused by particle size is due to the variation of total alkali content in ash; the modification of AMP in different atmospheres results from the generation of fayalite and hercynite, which come from the reactions between the wustite and gehlenite, anorthite; the difference of AMP caused by residual carbon content is the result of the formation of Fe3C, reducing atmosphere and the “skeleton” of residual carbon within the ash cone.@In order to understand the difference between protogenous trial sample and the grinding trial sample, from Shanxi Lingshi coal preparation plant the author gets the pilot sample, and then gets the protogenous trial sample and the grinding trial sample through preparing, looking for the difference of physical properties between them in quality and density. Insult shows that through grinding of the coal, the ash significantly increase and the ash of coarser coal is higher. Although there are no universal rules of the total sulfur and the granularity of grinding coal, the sulfate sulfur has a negative correlation with the granularity, the pyrites sulfur has a positive correlation with the granularity. The yield and total sulfur in every particle size fraction keep the trend with the protogenous coal, but the ash of different particle size is no homogeneous of the grinding coal.@A float-sink method and a laser particle size analyzer were used to study the mineral matter distribution in industrial pulverized coals. The influence of coal rank, ash contents and mill types were studied. It was found that there is a decrease in ash content with an increase in particle size for all samples. The coal with higher rank or higher ash content showed a larger decrease in ash content with an increase in particle size. But the influence of mill type is negligible.@Coal from Wulanchabu was selected to research the effects of dry distillation on the gaseous products during the coal underground gasification. The pyrolysis experiments were completed in a large diameter fixed bed reactor at 150 ℃-800 ℃. The results show that gas can not release lower than 400 ℃ in large size and the yield rate of total gas increase with the temperature increasing, the average of pore size and pore volume first increased and then decrease. The trends of gaseous of large lump lignite pyrolysis products are similar in different size coal, but there are more slower and large output in 5 cm square coal. During the slow heating and medium-speed heating, the heating speed of 5 ℃/min can significantly increase the weight loss and gas yield.@Rainging from bituminous coals that contain low degree of codification to high rank anthracite, as well as petroleum cokes for coal gasification were carried out in the lab. Under the premise of assuring the mixed coals ash fusion temperature is to meet with discharging liquid ash, some higher rank coal and/or petroleum cokes are chosen as increasing concentration of low rank CWS by blending. The slurryability of mixed coals water slurry was also investigated. The test results show that the CWS’s concentration of high rank coal is higher than that of low rank coal, the CWS’s concentration of middle rank coal is about 70%, the apparent viscosity is 536 mPa·s, and the flowage property is given A grade. When the CWS’s concentration is to keep in 62%, the CWS’s apparent viscosity of 3 kinds of feedstock blend which contains low rank coal is 340 mPa·s-550 mPa·s, and can satisfy the need of CWS’s gasification technology of liquid ash discharge.@The middle distillate oil is the main product of coal liquefaction. In this paper, the group composition change of middle distillate oil from coal liquefaction before and after hydrocracking was investigated in an autoclave at different temperature and time using FV-20 as catalyst. The results show that the content of saturates gradually decrease with the temperature and time increasing before it reachs 400 ℃. It reaches its minimum when it is 440 ℃ after 40 minutes. The n-C12-27 of saturates decreasing with the growing of temperature, whereas cyclic-saturates doesn’t change much. The content of aromatics increases and has its maximum of 82.65% when it is 440 ℃ after 30 minutes, and content of mono-aromatics increase but diand multi-aromatics decrease. The content of polar compounds is also decreasing. When the temperature is lower than 400 ℃, the gaseous hydrocarbon which mainly concludes CH4, C2H6, C3H8 react differently. With the increasing the reaction temperature, C4H10 appears in the gaseous hydrocarbon, but its yield doesn’t changes too much.@Pyrolysis temperature is one of the important factors that affect the char gasification reactivity. In this paper, the coal char samples were prepared under different pyrolysis temperatures with briquette and raw coal of similar size. The effect of pyrolysis temperature on char gasification reactivity was studied, and gasification properties of two kinds of semi-coke were compared. The results show that, the coal chars had high gasification reactivity above 1 000 ℃, and at the same time the reactivity of briquette semi-coke was slightly higher than that of raw lignite char. The two kinds of coal char both had the highest gasification reactivity when pyrolysis temperature was in the range of 650 ℃-700 ℃.@To improve the thermal property of coke, the inhibition to coke deterioration by spraying starch as a new deterioration inhibitor was investigated. The structure and morphology of coke were scanned to explain starch’s inhibition mechanism to coke by SEM. It was found that the CRI decreased by 4.08% and the CSR improved by 3.99% when spraying 1.0% starch. SEM scanning results showed that both the coke surface pore diameter and the depth had decreased sharphy, it helps to reduce CO2 to erode coke.@Hydro-upgrading of Lurgi furnace wide distillation range coal tar from Yunnan Jiehua Company was carried out on 100 mL hydrogenation unit using different property self-made hydrogenation catalysts. The results revealed that the reaction temperature, pressure, volume ratio of hydrogen to oil and liquid hourly space velocity (LHSV) had great effect on catalytic performance of the catalysts. Under the optimized conditions of 12.0 MPa, 360 ℃, 1.0 h-1 and volume ratio of hyrdogen to oil 1 200∶1, the hydrogenation products contains about 9% of naphtha, 78% of diesel oil and 13% of hydrogenation tail oil. Hydrogenation unit realized stable operation and the catalysts exhibited high activity and stability lasted for about 1 114 h without obvious deactivity.@The full-size three-dimensional numerical simulation study on two kinds of low calorific value coal-bed gas burner before and after improvement is conducted. Two kinds of bur-ner’s velocity field, temperature field and concentration field distribution are presented. The results show that the improved burner not only produces central backflow region and outer backflow region, but also has good jet flow rigidity. The improved burner has a wide ratio for regulating the concentration of methane when combusts the gas which mechane volume concentration is low about 20 percent, can also maintain a high combustion temperature, and has a wide region of high temperature distribution, and has high combustion efficiency.@Three different materials such as sodium silicate, bentonite, red mud were chosen as the inorganic binder, which were mixed into the powder of low rank bituminous coals from Shenmu or Yuzhou to make coal briquette in four ration. The results of coal strength determination show that the cold strength is increased with the binder ration, thereinto, the cold strength of coal briquette with bentonite is far higher than that of these briquette with sodium silicate or red mud. Further analysis of micro-structure of coal briquette by electron microscopic also verifies that the cohesion of coal briquette with bentonite is strongest, and it is because that bentonite by form of flower-shaped gels wedges the hole of coal granules and form the net-structure on coal granules surface. Owing to the property of low rank bituminous coal, the coal briquette made of the coal is always sensitive to the forming pressure. The cold strength of coal briquette increases with the forming pressure at first, and 20 kN is the optimum pressure, then it decreases.@The chemical vapor deposition growth of carbon nanotubes (CNTs) from acetylene, catalyzed by mesoporous molecular sieves (Fe/MCM-41 and Fe/ABW) with different Fe-loading was investigated. The effects of the reaction temperature, catalyst kind and catalyst pretreatment were discussed. The structures and morphologies of the products were characterized by field emission scanning electron microscopy, high-resolution transmission electron microscopy, and X-ray diffraction, and the growth mechanism of CNTs was also proposed. The results show that CNTs with uniform diameter of 20 nm-30 nm and good crystallization degree were obtained using H2-reduced catalysts at 700 ℃.@A simple preparation of bimodal porous support was to introduce ZrO2 into bigger pores of formless SiO2 directly, then a kind of eggshell catalyst based on this bimodal porous support was prepared. The structure and reduction property of the catalysts were characterized by SEM, EDS, Brunner-Enunett-Teller(BET) and temperature-programmed-reduction(TPR) techniques. The results show that the BET surface area and pore volume of catalyst were increased compared to the original silica gel and catalyst, catalysis activity and selectivity for C+5 hydrocarbon. The CO conversion are 89.87%-96.58%, the selectivity for C+5 hydrocarbon is 76.8%-84.7%, and the alkene/alkane rate in tail gas is close to zero at the condition of temperature 250 ℃, pressure 2 MPa, and airspeed 500 h-1.@Co-Pd/TiO2 catalysts with V and Mo were prepared by incipient impregnation method. The catalysts were evaluated in fixed-bed reactor, and its catalytic activities for the conversion of CH4-CO2 to acetic acid were studied. The catalyst characterization were determined by XRD, NH3-TPD and H2-TPR. The results showed that the addition of V and Mo affected the carrier crystal and superficial acid state, and was propitious to active metal reduction and the distribution of acetive metal on the carrier surface, thereby promoted the catalytic activity.@In this paper, CO shift reaction which is a section of the methanol synthesis process using the HT-L pulverized coal gasification is simulated by Aspen Plus industrial systems flower software, which is based on a domestic coal chemical industry. The content of CO after shift reaction is investigated by RK-ASPEN and ELECNTL physical property methods under the given conditions. The computational results show that the molar content of CO decreases to 19.700％ from original 69.578％ under the given temperature of 210 ℃ and pressure of 3.6 MPa, and which is suit for the requirement of methanol synthesis process. At the same time, compared with the experimental data, the present model can simulate the CO shift reaction very well.@Based on PROII simulation software, the density of pure H2, CO in methanol synthesis system and the volume of methanol, CH3OH-CO-H2 mixture with the changes in temperature and pressure were researched. Effects of pressure and temperature on the equilibrium composition in methanol synthesis system were further studied based on results. The results showed pressure had greater influence on character. What’s more, the simulated values agreed with experimental values at lower pressure, equilibrium composition was same to experimental results. Lower temperature-higher pressure had advantage to improve equilibrium composition of methanol. And CH3OH synthesis was researched basing on syngas produced by opposed multiple burner pulverized coal gasifier, the optimized conditions were pressure: 9 MPa-10 MPa, inlet temperature: ~260 ℃, inlet CO2 concentration: 6%-8% (percent of volume) when copper-base catalyst was used.@On the range of 60 ℃-110 ℃, 0.5 MPa-1.75 MPa, 1 h-1-3.5 h-1 LHSV, the ratio 0.3∶80-0.3∶350 of oil to gas, the influence of the technologic conditions on the content of light oil and saturated vapor pressure of M15(15% methanol) in the reaction process of light oil of M15 under the catalysis of Hβ zeolite. The result shows that the optimal technologic conditions are 90 ℃, 1.0 MPa, 1.0 h-1 LHSV, the 0.3∶135 ratio of oil to gas. Under these conditions, the content of volatile component decreased and the saturated vapor pressure of M15 reduced remarkably from 75 kPa-76 kPa to 64 kPa-66 kPa.@The basic concept and characteristics of CLC were introduced. The mechanism of solid fuels CLC was analyzed. The research progress of oxygen carriers was summarized. Several kinds of reactors in CLC were discussed, among which interconnected fluidized bed reactor would be focused in future research. Besides, three kinds of extended CLC technologies, i.e. the chemical-looping hydrogen (CLH), chemical-looping reforming (CLR), and chemical-looping with oxygen uncoupling (CLOU) were compared. Finally, the existing problems and further research fields were proposed.@The experimental results of PDU and the technologic characteristics of four types of catalytic gasification process, with the purpose of respectively producing the synthetic natural gas-methane by pressuried fluidized gasifier at the Exxon of USA, the medium heating value fuel gas by pressuried spouted fluidized gasifier at the UBC of Canada, and by internaly circulating fluidized gasifier with draft tube at KAIST of Korea, the industrial fuel gas by the “Catalytic Gasification and Ash-cinder Calcination” integration system (i.e. CGAC) at the Fuzhou University of China, were reiewed and compared. It is clear that in order to provide more effictive information on the scaled-up engineering design the new PDU of catalytic fluidized gasifier providing heat with burning of coal itself needs to be establised urgently and special experiments in this PDU requires quickly in processing. Since the great demand in the market of industrial fuel and synthetic gases, preferentially developing the CGAC integration patent will make more progress in an actual industrialization processing of catalytic gasification technology.@
2013
采用CS2/NMP混合溶剂和反萃取剂，将徐州夹河煤在常温常压下分离为萃余煤组分、沥青质组分、精煤组分和轻质组分四大族组分，通过扫描电镜（SEM）对混合溶剂萃取、反萃取过程进行了追踪研究，主要探讨了族组分中精煤组分和沥青质组分形成的微观机理.结果表明，精煤组分和沥青质组分均是以微纳米颗粒形式从煤大分子基质悬浮到萃取液中，两种颗粒在后续反萃取过程中均发生融并现象.以深灰色呈现的精煤组分颗粒在加入反萃取剂后，融并为网孔状或表层均一的块体；以灰白色（或亮白色）呈现的沥青质组分颗粒在加入反萃取剂前后由分散聚集变为高度聚集，进一步融并成表面极为光滑均一的块体，最后经历了合并和长大的过程，于少量NMP中重新分散成大小均匀的小球体.@将童亭亮煤（TTLY）、童亭丝炭（TTSY）、柴里亮煤（CLLY）和梁家镜煤（LJJY）在超声波条件下依次用CS2、石油醚、苯、甲醇、丙酮和四氢呋喃（THF）进行分级萃取，计算各级各次萃取率，考察超声波的介入对煤萃取率和萃取速率的影响.结果表明：超声波可以显著提高各煤样的萃取速率，但对萃取率的影响则与溶剂、煤阶和煤岩组分有关；当以石油醚、苯和THF为溶剂时，超声波可以提高萃取率.@采用热重分析和热解实验对印尼褐煤的热分解特性进行研究，探讨了印尼褐煤的热解机理、升温速率和热解终止温度对热解过程的影响.结果表明，印尼褐煤的热失重过程包括水分蒸发、挥发分析出和焦炭形成三个阶段；在温度低于300 ℃时，印尼褐煤以水分蒸发和脱除吸附小分子气体为主，300 ℃时开始微热解反应，400 ℃时热分解反应剧烈.在同一热解温度条件下，升温速率为10 K/min～20 K/min的慢速升温热解过程中，焦油产率维持在8.5%（质量分数）附近，升温速率对热解产物产率的影响较小；在400 ℃～600 ℃的低温热解范围内，热解终止温度对焦油产率影响较小，但热解气体产率随热解终止温度的增大而增大，而半焦产率却随之降低.@选择5种有代表性的中变质煤，在实验室条件下进行热解，利用法国Setaram公司的TGA92热重分析仪和瑞士Balzers公司的四极滤质质谱仪QMS422联用组合进行TG-MS分析（热重质谱分析），针对有机挥发分析出的研究表明：1） 烷基侧链的热解导致煤结构的解体，甲基的热解断裂温度高于亚甲基及次甲基，随煤变质程度的增大，它们析出的峰温增高；2） 甲烷的析出有三种类型：一种是煤中甲基的热解脱落，形成甲基离子然后与氢反应形成甲烷，第二种是煤中吸附的甲烷析出，第三种是芳香体系聚合的稠环体系释放出甲烷；3） 苯的析出也有三种类型，第一种类型为煤中芳香结构热解脱落亚甲基和次甲基等形成的苯离子进一步加氢的结果，第二种是煤中芳香结构热解脱落甲基形成苯离子，苯离子与氢反应生成苯，第三种是煤中缩聚反应的结果.@利用TG-FTIR技术对稻壳与褐煤按照不同比例进行的共热解过程进行分析.结果发现，共热解过程的热失重相对于单独热解有所加深，尤其是在稻壳与褐煤按照2∶8比例进行共热解时；共热解过程的热解产物发生变化，其中CO2产物增加明显，CH4产物略有减少，CO产物略有增加，其他有机化合物如酚类化合物、含羰基结构化合物和含芳环结构的化合物都有所减少.根据共热解产物变化规律和生物质与褐煤单独热解反应的机理，分析共热解过程中二者发生协同作用的原因是:生物质中的金属氧化物对煤炭黏结成焦炭过程有抑制作用，从而促进了煤炭的进一步分解；并且在慢速共热解过程中生物质相对于煤炭先产生H2，而H2的存在抑制了煤炭在高温时的缩合反应，从而加强了其裂解反应.@采用XPS分析了渭北高硫煤中硫的赋存形态，考察了硫分在不同粒级、不同密度级煤中的分布特征及在筛分浮沉实验过程中的变化规律，基于此进行了煤中硫可选性评价.结果表明，较高变质程度的渭北高硫煤中有机硫主要以噻吩类杂环化合物以及亚砜型硫等形式存在于煤的有机质结构中.借助高效的物理洗选将煤样破碎至6 mm～0.5 mm，能较好地改善煤中硫的可选性.将煤破碎至3 mm～0.5 mm，理论精煤产率为88.8%，灰分为12.0%，精煤硫分为2.3%，须借助化学方法进一步脱除其中细分散的无机硫以及大量的有机硫.@根据溶胀测量原理，采用位移传感器，可以对煤的溶胀过程进行在线监测.测量获得了L1褐煤和B3烟煤在9种溶剂（4种非极性溶剂、4种极性溶剂和蒸馏水）中的溶胀等温线，溶胀等温线对时间求导得到溶胀速率曲线.同时考察了另外4种煤样（2种褐煤和2种烟煤）在N甲基吡咯烷酮（NMP）中的溶胀曲线.结果表明，采用位移传感器可以在线监测煤样的溶胀过程.L1褐煤在4种非极性溶剂中没有显著溶胀，在4种极性溶剂中溶胀显著，尤其在NMP中溶胀比最大，在蒸馏水中也有显著溶胀.B3烟煤在4种非极性溶剂中除正己烷外均有显著溶胀，在极性溶剂NMP中溶胀比最大，在蒸馏水中也有显著溶胀.由溶胀速率曲线可知，在溶胀初始时刻，L1褐煤和B3烟煤在乙腈和乙醇中溶胀速率最快，两种煤样在二硫化碳中溶胀速率较快.在NMP中，3种烟煤均呈现较大溶胀比，3种褐煤的溶胀行为差异较大，其中1种褐煤的溶胀比显著高于另外2种褐煤的溶胀比，与烟煤的溶胀比相近.@提出煤炭地下催化气化新工艺的概念，研究利用高压雾状催化剂-水蒸气带入装置并以钙基化合物为催化剂进行煤炭地下催化气化.在小型模拟地下气化炉中，以大雁褐煤为煤样，选用氢氧化钙水溶液（质量分数为5%，10%，15%）为催化剂进行纯氧气化.结果表明，添加氢氧化钙水溶液气化后的煤气与不加催化剂、添加10% CaCO3气化后的煤气相比，煤气中甲烷组分可以达到7.58%，煤气热值提高到5.43 MJ/m3~7.87 MJ/m3，产气率提高28%~69%，且可以稳定产气.催化剂组成（质量浓度）以添加Ca(OH)2为10%~15%之间进行气化效果最佳，为提高煤炭地下气化的稳定性开辟了一条全新的路径.@对煤气化随机孔模型的动力学控制区的假设进行了改进，建立了高温煤焦/CO2气化反应碳转化率(X)与反应时间(t)的修正随机孔模型：X=1-exp[-kt(a+bkt+k2t2)]，并在950 ℃~1 400 ℃气化温度范围内，用修正随机孔模型模拟淮南慢速热解煤焦和淮南快速热解煤焦/CO2气化反应，所得表观活化能范围分别为121.99 kJ/mol~153.75 kJ/mol和88.57 kJ/mol~121.39 kJ/mol.结果表明，修正随机孔模型的拟合效果优于随机孔模型和收缩未反应芯模型的拟合效果，能很好地体现煤焦气化反应的动力学特征，且该模型适用于不同煤焦的气化反应模拟.@利用物料平衡、能量平衡和化学平衡，对气化炉入口物料与出口有效气体成分间的数量关系进行了理论计算，并应用Fluent软件对反应器内形成的温度场与出口合成气主要成分的浓度场进行了模拟.得出改变焦炉煤气和煤的比例，可直接生产出氢碳比在1.0～2.0间的合成气.@生物质焦CO2气化主要是通过气化剂CO2和焦中的碳发生反应，从而制取得到高纯度可燃气CO.采用热重分析法研究不同过渡金属催化剂（Ni，Ce，Fe和Cr）以及不同气化温度下松木焦在30% CO2气氛下的气化特性，采用n级反应模型并利用ABSW微分法，计算出高温段710 ℃~990 ℃松木焦催化气化动力学参数.结果表明，随着气化温度的升高，反应完成的时间缩短，气化温度达到850 ℃以上，才能有较高的反应速率，添加4种过渡金属对气化均有明显的促进作用.其催化效果由高到低依次为：Ni，Ce，Fe和Cr.采用n级反应模型可以很好地拟合高温段的实验数据.@以苯酚为原料，通过硫酸磺化与甲醛聚合，再经环氧氯丙烷接枝等反应合成出一种环氧氯丙烷改性磺化酚醛树脂水煤浆分散剂.合成条件为n(苯酚)∶n(浓硫酸)∶n(甲醛)∶n(环氧氯丙烷)=1∶1∶0.7∶1.5，催化剂含量为苯酚质量的0.5%，磺化温度为100 ℃，聚合温度为65 ℃.通过静态接触角、流变性及稳定性等测试，研究了分散剂对陕西神华煤的成浆特性，并通过与木素-萘磺酸盐分散剂对比，发现此环氧磺化酚醛树脂分散剂可有效改善煤表面的亲水性，分子中的环氧链能牢固地结合煤表面的疏水基团，并提供了一定的空间位阻效应，有效阻隔了煤粒间的聚集，使煤粒得到均匀分散，起到了降低水煤浆黏度、提高稳定性的作用.@在合理利用自然资源和保护环境的前提下，将两种及以上单种煤以合适比例均匀配合，可使各种煤之间取长补短，从而以最小经济成本得到符合技术性能要求的焦炭.然而受实际条件限制，单种原料煤的煤质和煤量等参数是变化的，优化配煤必须科学处理此类情况.建立了一种基于区间模糊规划的炼焦配煤优化模型，并应用到案例研究中.结果表明，以成本最小化为目标，基于区间模糊规划的炼焦配煤优化模型可以得到最优解，模型结果可为焦炭行业配煤技术人员提供参考.@以褐煤颗粒中水分蒸发界面为基础，将褐煤颗粒分为干区和湿区，干区考虑传热传质，湿区只考虑传热，并采用有限体积法，建立了一维球坐标系下单颗粒褐煤干燥脱水过程模型.利用Crank-Nicolson六点差分格式对其离散，模拟得到不同工况(初始烟温、停留时间和颗粒粒径等)下的单颗粒褐煤含湿量及其内部温度分布的动态变化.实验结果与模型模拟结果对比表明二者吻合度较好，所建干燥模型可以较好地反映褐煤干燥的实际过程.研究发现，初始烟温越高、停留时间越长以及颗粒粒径越小，干燥效果越好.当粒径为20 mm的褐煤颗粒在初始温度为873 K的热气流下停留131 s时，其含水量即可从25.3%降到12%以下，此时颗粒表面的温度为537 K，略高于挥发分初析温度(520 K)，此工况可以作为褐煤实际干燥过程中的最佳工况参照.@运用Aspen Plus软件进行了煤干燥过程的模拟计算，研究了煤干燥的主要操作参数（干燥介质种类、温度、流量和湿度）与干煤出口温度之间的关系.结果表明，干煤出口温度与干燥介质种类并无显著关系，干煤出口温度随着干燥介质的温度、流量的增大先缓慢增加后迅速增加.当干燥介质流量较小时，干煤出口温度随着干燥介质含水量的增加略有增加；而当干燥介质流量较大时干煤出口温度随着干燥介质含水量基本不变.@以神木西沟煤为煤样，研究了煤灰化学成分和灰熔融性的关系，考察了灰成分对煤灰熔融温度的影响，得出了提高煤灰熔点的最佳方法.实验结果表明，添加适量的氧化物会提高煤灰的熔融温度.要使灰软化温度超过1 350 ℃，SiO2的添加量至少4.0%，Al2O3的添加量至少2.0%，CaO的添加量至少2.0%.从工业生产实际出发，应考虑添加CaO，Al2O3或SiO2，即添加廉价的高岭土、石灰石、蒙脱土之类的添加剂，进而扩大煤的使用范围.@基于煤粉燃烧高效与低污染的综合考虑，出于对“电晕荷电煤粉流的强化着火与燃烧”理论进行验证的目的，进行了荷电无烟煤煤粉流燃烧实验研究.采用气动-螺旋微量给粉器进行煤粉供给与输送，利用电旋风荷电器实现煤粉颗粒荷电，连接于可视滴管炉完成煤粉流着火燃烧，利用高分辨率数码摄影记录其着火与燃烧状态，借助专用软件进行图像分析，通过燃烧残余物取样热分析方法分析其燃尽程度.实验结果表明，荷电无烟煤煤粉流与无荷电无烟煤煤粉流相比，着火距离和着火时间至少分别提前约5%和6%，燃烧掉的可燃物质至少增加约21%；荷电煤粉流燃烧具有较好强化着火与燃烧的效果.@在有机溶剂中制备高选择性固定化脂肪酶是获得高对映体纯度的手性药物中间体的关键步骤.探讨了不同类型的活性炭作为固定化酶载体，应用于拆分手性1-苯乙醇反应，用N2吸附法和扫描电镜表征了活性炭载体.以固定化酶催化拆分(R,S)-1-苯乙醇为典型反应，研究了用不同活性炭为载体制备的催化剂的催化活性以及反应效果随反应时间的变化规律.结果表明，以微孔活性炭作载体制备的固定化酶催化活性最好，当反应时间达到12.8 h时，转化率达到最大理论转化率50%.@采用加氢预精制催化剂、加氢精制催化剂、加氢裂化催化剂以及加氢饱和催化剂适宜的级配方式对高温煤焦油馏分油进行二段加氢改质，结果表明，高温煤焦油馏分油的性质经加氢改质后得到大幅度改善，密度由1 169.7 kg/m3降低到900.9 kg/m3以下，氢碳原子比由0.79提高到1.63以上，残炭降低到0.02%（质量分数）；其石脑油馏分的硫、氮含量分别小于5 μg/g和1 μg/g，芳烃潜含量大于68%（质量分数），是催化重整的优质原料；其柴油馏分的硫含量很低，凝点和冷滤点均小于-30 ℃，十六烷值大于39，是国Ⅳ低凝柴油的优质调和组分；而加氢尾油基本由芳烃组成，不宜作为催化裂化的原料.@利用物性估算的方法估算了蒽、咔唑、二甲苯及氯苯间的范德华引力能，并测定了相应的溶解度.利用气质联用（GC-MS）对原料蒽渣中各个组分进行定性分析，以气相色谱内标标准曲线法对工艺过程中每一步所得产品中蒽、菲、咔唑和芴的含量进行了定量分析.结果表明，氯苯与蒽和咔唑间的引力能均大于二甲苯，与溶解度相一致.采用二甲苯两步溶解结晶后，菲和芴的去除率分别为96%和91%.以氯苯为溶剂精制咔唑，可得到含量为98.68%的高纯咔唑，咔唑的单程回收率在45%以上.@应用PRO/II工程模拟软件对某60万t/a煤气化制甲醇项目低温甲醇洗酸性气体吸收塔进行了模拟，通过对比不同热力学模型的模拟结果，明确了H2-CO2-CH3OH三元体系偏离高压和低温条件下的气液平衡是模拟误差较大的原因.将修正后的SRK-SIMSCI热力学模型用于吸收塔的计算，结果表明，该模型能够较好地反映该工艺装置的实际操作状况.@采用共沉淀法制备了Cu/MgO催化剂并经La和K修饰，研究了含CO2的CO原料气加氢低温甲醇合成性能.采用XRD，CO-TPD和CO2-TPD等手段对催化剂的物相结构和表面吸附行为进行了表征.结果表明，La的添加促进了Cu组分的分散，增强了CO和CO2低温吸附能力，CO2加氢活性提高；进一步经K修饰后，催化剂表面碱性明显增强，CO和CO2高温吸附能力增强，促使CO和CO2同步转化，催化活性和甲醇收率明显提高，但副产物甲酸乙酯含量增加；当n(Cu)∶n(K)为10∶1时，总碳转化率达29.7%，甲醇收率较高，且催化剂具有较好的稳定性.@采用13C-CP/MAS NMR和FTIR测试手段对神东上湾煤及其显微组分富集物进行了分析表征，并对其相关结构特征进行了讨论.结果表明，惰质组富集物较原煤和镜质组富集物有较高的芳香度，桥头芳碳（fBa）也较高，大分子芳香结构以萘和蒽结构为主；镜质组富集物有较多的烷基化取代芳碳和脂肪碳，氢含量相对较多，结构中富含链状烷烃、环状烷烃和芳甲基等，大分子芳香结构以苯结构为主；原煤结构中含有较多的fHal（季碳、CH和CH2）和fOal（氧接脂碳），原煤芳香结构以萘结构为主.三个煤样结构中羟基缔合程度都比较大，有较强的C=C骨架伸缩振动峰，镜质组富集物的Hal/Har为2.18，远远高于原煤（1.52）和惰质组富集物（1.36），说明镜质组富集物有较多的脂肪结构；与原煤相比，镜质组和惰质组富集物大分子结构中有较多伸缩振动的—CH2.@通过对煤样进行正己烷和四氢呋喃索氏萃取处理，脱除了煤中低分子化合物，萃余煤在不同温度下真空干燥处理以避免萃取溶剂的残留，采用位移传感器溶胀测量装置考察并对比了原煤和萃取处理后煤样在乙醇中的溶胀特性.结果表明，不同温度下真空干燥处理萃余煤的热脱附质谱分析显示，110 ℃真空干燥24 h处理萃余煤出现萃取溶剂分子质谱特征碎片离子逸出峰，150 ℃真空干燥24 h处理萃余煤没有出现显著溶剂分子质谱特征碎片离子逸出峰.四氢呋喃萃取处理后煤样，110 ℃真空干燥后，初始时刻溶胀速率较原煤显著增快，且平衡溶胀比显著增加；150 ℃真空干燥后煤样，由于进一步脱除了煤中残留的四氢呋喃，在乙醇中初始时刻溶胀速率降慢，平衡溶胀比减小，与原煤相近；正己烷萃取处理后110 ℃和150 ℃真空干燥后煤样的初始时刻溶胀速率较原煤降低，110 ℃真空干燥后煤样平衡溶胀比与原煤相比显著降低，150 ℃真空干燥后煤样的平衡溶胀比增大，与原煤相近.@通过实验研究褐煤煤粉在提质干燥过程受哪些因素的影响，利用FLUENT6.3.26对实验得到的数据进行温度、速度和压力场的数值模拟（气固两相流）.对实验得到的数据和FLUENT6.3.26的数值模拟情况进行分析可知，褐煤煤粉在低气固比（体积比）进行提质干燥时，褐煤煤粉微粒的湿度有很大变化，提质干燥效果理想；在褐煤煤粉提质干燥过程中提高入口烟气温度，煤粉的干燥效果有很大提高；褐煤煤粉在提质干燥过程中烟气速度对褐煤粉颗粒湿度的影响很小.@以沙曲矿焦煤为发酵底物，以同矿区矿井水中的菌种及实验室保存的白腐菌为投加菌种，研究在35 ℃，初始pH为6.5，无光照和厌氧条件下不同发酵工艺对煤发酵制氢的影响.结果表明，在所设条件下，H2的体积分数最高可达73.7%，产率可达23.56 mL/g；未添加白腐菌液样品的H2产率是添加了白腐菌液样品的1.5～6倍；其他条件相同，提前4 d富集矿井水中的发酵产氢菌可以将H2产量从0.44 mL提高到466.34 mL；在富集矿井水中发酵产氢菌时添加EDTA二钠要比富集完之后再补加的H2产率高2～10倍.可见煤通过微生物作用完全可以制取更加洁净的能源——氢.@对制工业燃气的新型增压气流床气化炉气化过程采用三维数值模拟研究，建立可靠的数学模型，预测了气流床气化炉内的流场分布、温度分布以及气体成分分布，并对模拟结果进行了分析.结果表明，炉内流场能够合理地反映气化炉内的反应趋势及进程；该炉型结构能够使炉内温度场均匀，平均温度水平上升；出口气体成分的模拟值与文献值吻合良好.@采用微型流化床热分析仪(MFBRA)，探讨了不同煤种及其混煤在相同的热解条件下甲烷的析出特征及其生成动力学.结果表明，在相同的热解条件下，煤热解过程中甲烷的开始析出温度随煤中挥发分的升高而降低，甲烷的最大析出速率及甲烷的生成总量都随煤中挥发分的升高而增加；煤热解反应的活化能(E)随煤中挥发分的升高而降低，表示煤的挥发分愈高，煤的热解愈容易进行；配煤改变了单种煤的煤质特征，其水分、挥发分和灰分等煤质指标等于单种煤相应煤质指标的加权平均值，但混煤热解的活化能(E)并不等于配合单种煤活化能(E)的加权平均值.@建立了喷动流化床气化炉，通过数值模拟方法分析了宽筛分颗粒时喷动流化床的流动特性.数值模拟中采用非稳态欧拉欧拉多相流模型和双方程湍流模型，采用用户自定义函数（UDF）编程，编写出宽筛分颗粒模型.结果表明，不同粒径颗粒在密相区出现分层，喷动流化床内的流体动力学受颗粒尺寸分布以及颗粒间能量耗散和传递的影响.@以四氢萘为溶剂，通过离心分离的方法对煤液化沥青进行了净化，结果表明，在四氢萘∶煤液化沥青质量比为3∶1，离心转速4 000 r/min，离心时间20 min时，煤液化沥青的灰分可降至0.02%，QI含量降至0.8%，此时煤液化沥青的收率可达80%以上，溶剂的收率在75%左右.@以煤直接液化低分油为原料，对几种国内外的石油系加氢精制催化剂进行了不同工艺的条件实验.结果表明，催化剂Cat-A具有相对好的加氢脱氮率，催化剂Cat-B具有相对好的加氢脱硫率，而催化剂Cat-C具有非常好的加氢脱硫率，但其氮脱除率很低.实验得到加氢精制较适宜的反应条件为：压力10 MPa，温度350 ℃，氢油体积比800∶1左右.实验发现几种催化剂较易失活，在微反装置上连续运转一周后，催化剂Cat-A的活性下降20%左右.@以2-萘酚、浓硫酸和甲醛为原料合成了磺化萘酚甲醛(NPF)水煤浆分散剂.首先探讨了分散剂的合成条件对其性能的影响并进行了性质分析；其次，通过NPF与萘系(NSF)分散剂进行复配改善了NSF的稳定性能.结果表明，当甲醛和2-萘酚的配比为0.86∶1，聚合温度为130 ℃，反应时间为2 h时分散剂性能最好.用此分散剂，在分散剂用量为0.5％，煤浆浓度为64％时，水煤浆黏度为463 mPa·s，分散性能良好.萘系(NSF)水煤浆分散剂中NPF的掺杂量为20％时，水煤浆黏度降低了150 mPa·s，7 d后析水率下降1.07％,无硬沉淀出现，稳定性提升明显.@以苯乙烯磺酸钠（SSS）、甲基丙烯酰氧乙烯三甲基氯化铵(DMC)和自制聚乙二醇丙烯酸酯大分子单体（PA）为原料，（NH4）2S2O8/Na2SO3氧化还原体系作为引发剂，Na2SO3同时为链转移剂，采用水溶液自由基聚合反应，制得了一种两性聚羧酸系分散剂（PA-SSS-DMC）.通过TGA-DSC，GPC及IR等手段对聚合物的结构、热稳定性以及相对分子质量及其分布进行了表征和分析，并考察了PA-SSS-DMC的合成条件对分散剂性能的影响.用最佳合成工艺制备的分散剂可使神府煤在制浆浓度为63%时黏度为580 mPa·s，与山西神华煤、北宿精煤和纯兖州精煤进行匹配性实验，结果表明，分散剂可适用于多种煤制浆，具有可推广性.@根据煤岩配煤理论，分析以往生产配煤比方案、装炉煤和焦炭质量，结合弱黏煤和其他各煤种性质，制定了五种配煤比方案，利用40 kg焦炉进行实验.通过分析各配煤比方案以及单种煤、装炉煤和焦炭结果，认为弱黏煤配比应控制在3%~5%之间，最后经4.3 m顶装焦炉生产实践验证结果在正常生产的范围内.@对煤催化热解产生半焦的收率、灰分含量、挥发分含量和结构等特性进行了分析，结果表明，催化剂的加入提高了煤炭的转化率，降低了半焦的产率，同时半焦的挥发分含量减小，固定碳和灰分含量提高.催化剂的加入降低了半焦收率，MnO2促进了半焦的纵向和横向热缩聚，使半焦的结晶程度增大；CaO加入促进了半焦的纵向热缩聚而阻碍了横向热缩聚；Fe2O3和TiO2的加入阻碍了煤焦基本晶格单元纵向热缩聚.@通过对气肥煤工业指标、反射率指标、基氏流动度、奥亚膨胀度、单种煤成焦光学组织和与无烟煤成焦的焦炭光学组织结构等方面进行全面分析，同时与常用肥煤相关指标进行比较，结果表明，气肥煤变质程度较低，单种煤成焦光学组织以细粒镶嵌结构为主，不利于其在配煤炼焦中的配用.但气肥煤胶质体丰富，流动性好，形成的胶质体在煤粒间的铺展性好，可促进煤粒间的黏结，有利于改善焦炭质量，在配煤炼焦中应合理应用.@为了考察煤沥青与不同变质程度煤的共炭化特性，利用40 kg小焦炉模拟炼焦试验，进行了单种煤5%与10%的煤沥青添加的各煤种的炭化研究.研究结果表明，沥青对不同变质程度煤生成焦炭的显微结构影响不同.对低变质程度的中低黏结性煤，增加了焦炭光学组织指数OTI；对黏结组分充足的中等变质程度煤的OTI影响较小；对高变质程度煤OTI影响显著.沥青对不同变质程度煤生成焦炭的机械性能影响不同.对低变质程度的中低黏结性煤，溶解作用较明显，对机械强度有较大改善；对黏结组分充足的中等变质程度煤的成焦性能影响较小；对高变质程度煤成焦性能影响最为明显，可显著改善焦炭机械性能和热性质.@研究了微波场中低变质煤与塑料共热解时微波功率对焦油组成的影响.利用色谱质谱联用仪（GC-MS）和傅立叶红外光谱仪（FT-IR）对焦油的组成进行了分析表征.结果表明，随着微波功率的增大，热解焦油呈现出轻质化趋势.当功率由480 W增加到800 W时，焦油中轻质油含量增加13.2%，重质油含量减少24.2%.焦油中烷烃类物质含量增加4.4%，烯烃含量增加9.1%，而芳香烃类物质含量减少14.6%.因此，微波功率对热解后焦油成分具有重要的影响.@借助GC-MS手段分析陕北中/低温煤焦油酚类化合物组成和分布情况.通过常减压蒸馏，将陕北中低温煤焦油切割成170 ℃~230 ℃，230 ℃~270 ℃，270 ℃~300 ℃，300 ℃~340 ℃和340 ℃~360 ℃五个窄馏分并计算收率，并用酸碱抽提法提取各窄馏分中的酚油；通过GC-MS分析了酚油中酚类化合物的组成及分布情况.结果表明，五个窄馏分分别检测出23，23，15，18和10种酚类化合物，酚类化合物占其所在馏分酚油的比率分别为96.89%，60.01%，50.90%，36.51%和36.37%.焦油中所含的酚类化合物占焦油总量的12.91%，酚类化合物主要为低级酚、C3~C4烷基苯酚和萘酚.@研究了低变质粉煤制备型煤工艺对焦油产率的影响，系统讨论了膨润土作为黏结剂时，黏结剂含量、成型压力、水分和原煤粒度对焦油产率的影响，并得出制备型煤的最佳成型工艺条件.结果表明，在膨润土用量为5%，成型压力为40 kN，水分为14%，粉煤粒度<0.28 mm条件下，干馏所得焦油产率为9.2%，型焦抗压强度为600 N/ball，达到气化型焦的标准.@选用煤焦油沥青、高黏结肥煤作为热黏结剂，分别以不同的掺入量和低阶烟煤粉煤及其他原料混合制取型煤.型煤样品热强度测定结果表明：以煤焦油沥青为热黏结剂的型煤热强度高于以高黏结肥煤为热黏结剂的型煤热强度，进一步对型煤微观结构电镜分析也证实了以煤焦油沥青为热黏结剂的型煤其黏结性能和防水性相对较好，电镜切片表明，煤焦油沥青热态下析出的挥发分经过胶质体时产生的气泡相互作用能使胶质体受压形成更坚固的整体网状结构；研究还发现煤焦油沥青的粒度对型煤热强度也有一定的影响.@利用光学显微分析及数字图像处理技术获取型煤显微结构特征，研究不同膨润土黏结剂的添加量及成型压力下型煤显微结构与型煤强度间的关系.结果表明，型煤的冷态强度主要受型煤中的裂隙控制，而型煤中的空隙是次要影响因素.型煤中的裂隙产生与使用的黏结剂、成型压力及原料煤性质相关，而型煤中的空隙与外加水分相关.@利用盐湖镁盐和金属镁渣分别作为型煤黏结剂和固硫剂，研究了盐湖镁盐和金属镁渣对型煤性能的影响.结果表明，盐湖镁盐作为型煤黏结剂可以显著提高型煤的强度和防水性能，随添加量的增加，强度逐渐提高，添加量为6%时，型煤的抗压强度达528 N/ball，跌落强度可达86%；金属镁渣可以提高型煤的固硫率，随着添加量的增加，固硫率不断提高，降低了型煤在燃烧过程中释放的SO2排放浓度，添加量为6%时，型煤固硫率为74%，SO2最高排放浓度是751 mg/m3.@探讨了从风化煤中提取棕腐酸和黑腐酸的方法，分别用紫外可见光谱、傅立叶变换红外光谱和三维荧光光谱对提取的腐植酸进行了表征，并说明了两种腐植酸结构上的差异.结果表明，棕腐植酸和黑腐植酸官能团种类相似，但含量总体是棕腐酸高于黑腐酸.两种腐植酸的紫外可见光谱在整个区间的吸光度是随着波长的增大而减小的混合光谱.两种腐植酸都有荧光效应，且无论随着浓度增加或者pH值增加，棕腐植酸和黑腐植酸的发光峰都有红移现象.@以腐植酸为基本原料，经过磺化，再以丙烯酸为单体，过硫酸钾为引发剂，采用溶液聚合法，制备磺化腐植酸丙烯酸接枝共聚物，并检测其对水煤浆的黏度、流变性和稳定性的影响.还研究了不同分散剂用量对水煤浆成浆性能的影响，结果表明，分散剂有效成分为水煤浆总重量的0.12％时，水煤浆具有最低的表观黏度.@以内蒙古白音华褐煤为研究对象，在管式炉中进行了低温热解实验，考察了低温干馏后原煤和固体产物半焦的结构组成变化，分析了干馏条件对固体产物半焦孔隙结构的影响规律.对原煤和不同干馏条件下半焦的吸附/脱附等温曲线的分析结果表明，半焦具有较宽的孔隙分布，而且中孔和微孔占据了很大的比例；对半焦的孔隙特性参数的测定结果表明，干馏终温和保温时间对半焦的比表面积、孔容积和平均孔径都具有较大的影响.@为探究干燥前后褐煤的爆炸危险性，基于粉尘爆炸机理，通过粒度分析和爆炸性测定实验，分析了干燥前后褐煤粒径分布变化、扬尘特性及爆炸危险性变化.结果表明，干燥褐煤大粒径颗粒频数减小，小粒径颗粒频数增加，粒径变小，扬尘量增加；干燥褐煤最小点燃能量、粉尘云/层最低着火温度较干燥前褐煤都有所降低.干燥褐煤较原煤更易扬尘达到爆炸极限浓度，且更易发生着火燃烧爆炸，干燥褐煤爆炸敏感性和危险性都增加.@通过固-液-气三相模拟反应，研究了煤炭地下气化灰渣在模拟咸水中对二氧化碳的固化作用，考察了反应温度、反应压力、颗粒粒径及反应介质对二氧化碳矿物碳酸化固化率的影响.结果表明，反应温度从50 ℃升至200 ℃，固化率先增加后降低，150 ℃时最高；反应压力从1.0 MPa升至2.5 MPa，固化率从0.93%增至1.65%；颗粒粒径由75 μm~150 μm降至75 μm以下，固化率从1.18%增至1.48%；反应介质由蒸馏水变为模拟咸水，固化率从0.38%增至1.65%.在150 ℃，2.5 MPa，反应时间1 h，颗粒粒径小于75 μm的条件下，气化灰在模拟咸水中的固化率最高，可达1.65%.@在Di 3.0 m×16 m的大型流化床中，以义马矿区机械开采过程中的粉煤为原料，考察了水蒸气和氧气两种气化剂的量对炉温、炉压和炉压差的影响，并对数据进行了不同阶次的曲线拟合.通过比较拟合曲线，说明对于义马矿区粉煤的流化床加压气化，可以采用线性关系式Y=1 353.835-0.079Xv和Y=727.120+0.097Xo分别反映水蒸气量和氧气量对炉温的影响程度，误差均小于1%，完全可以满足工程上的需要.气化剂量的变化对炉压和炉压差无明显影响，尤其对于炉压差.研究结果可为流化床粉煤气化自动化控制、操作及开车设计提供重要的依据，对其现场操作具有一定的指导和参考作用.@利用TG/DTA 6300型热分析仪研究了宁夏石沟驿煤的气化残炭的燃烧特性，从着火特性、燃尽特性和稳燃特性三个方面分析了升温速率、粒径和氧气浓度对气化残炭燃烧特性的影响，并采用正交实验分析了升温速率、粒径和氧气浓度三个因素对气化残炭燃烧特性影响的耦合作用.实验结果表明，提高升温速率可以改善气化残炭的燃尽特性；粒径的减小有助于气化残炭的着火；氧气浓度的增加对改善气化残炭燃烧特性有明显的作用，但这种改善效果随氧气浓度的增加而减弱；升温速率对气化残炭的着火特性影响最大，而氧气浓度对气化残炭的燃尽特性和稳燃特性影响最大.@以煤和低浓度煤层气共气化制备氨合成原料气，煤层气提供合成所需的氮组分，从而取消常规制气的补氮过程或替代空气气化；采用CO2吸收增强制气，在造气工段制得φ（H2）/φ（N2）=3，φ（CO2+CO）≤0.30%，φ（H2）≥70%的粗煤气，可直接进入醇烷化或醇烃化精制岗位.为论证系统的可行性和适宜操作条件，采用热力学平衡模型分析煤气组分随制气反应条件变化的规律，提出可一步制得φ（H2）/φ（N2）=3，φ（CO2+CO）≤0.30%，φ（H2）≥70%的制气反应条件和煤层气流量；根据煤层气温度、压力与爆炸极限的关系，确定催化转化/脱氧反应器的操作参数.结果表明，以合成原料气组分衡量，基于CO2吸收增强气化的煤和低浓度煤层气制气方法可行，且有利于简化调比和气体净化过程.@以NaOH为电解质，对水煤浆（CWS）进行了恒流电解，对电解煤浆制备溶水有机物（WSOCs）的可能性进行了研究.实验对影响总有机碳（TOC）含量的因素进行了考察，包括时间、温度、阳极材料以及NaOH浓度和煤浆浓度.结果表明，电解作用产生的TOC含量高于浸渍作用产生的TOC含量，带有电催化作用的金属电极对TOC含量的增长有促进作用，如Fe和Ni电解作用产生的TOC含量随时间的延长和温度的升高而增大，随NaOH浓度的升高而降低.在85 ℃，1 A电流下电解6 h后，滤液中的TOC含量达到1 717.2 mg/L.此外，相对于单位质量的煤，滤液中的TOC含量随CWS浓度的升高呈先上升后下降的趋势.@以山西省宁武煤田1/3焦煤为主要原料，进行配煤炼焦的生产实验研究，设计出9种配煤方案，使用20 kg铁箱装煤，放入66型焦炉碳化室内进行生产实验，对所生产焦炭进行质量检测.结果表明，利用宁武煤1/3焦煤为主要原料炼制合格的冶金焦是可行的；通过配以肥煤和瘦煤的方法，可以提高宁武煤的使用量，达到减少珍贵煤种主焦煤使用量的目的，实验中未采用主焦煤配制，同样可以炼制出合格的冶金焦；实验结果未能达到一级冶金焦的标准，说明要炼制一级冶金焦，还需配入主焦煤.@利用结渣性测定仪对陕北地区不同变质程度的四种煤样的结渣性进行测定，考察了空气流量和灰熔点对结渣率的影响，并根据煤结渣性的常用判别指标，综合得出了四种煤的结渣倾向.结果表明，煤的结渣特性不仅取决于煤灰中的化学成分，同时也在一定程度上取决于煤灰的熔点温度以及外部条件.@选取着火温度、燃尽率和残灰碳氢含量等指标，利用程序升温热重技术研究了CuSO4和K2CO3对铁法高灰烟煤(TF)的催化助燃效果，同时通过分布活化能(DAEM)动力学模型探讨了活化能变化与催化助燃效果的关系.结果表明，CuSO4和K2CO3的添加比例均为2%时，TF煤的着火温度分别降低了44.3 ℃和31.1 ℃；最终燃尽率从92.19%分别提高到94.75%和96.13%，而残灰含碳量从6.91%分别降到3.37%和2.39%.TF煤燃烧的分布活化能在转化率<15%,20%~85%,>90%三阶段呈现不同的规律性变化，CuSO4和K2CO3对TF煤燃烧的分布活化能影响主要发生在转化率20%~85%之间：CuSO4的添加使得TF煤燃烧的分布活化能呈现波动性变化，而K2CO3能够明显降低TF煤燃烧的分布活化能.@针对适用于低挥发分无烟煤燃烧的撞击预燃式燃烧器在运行过程中存在的燃烧不稳定，燃烧器出口结焦现象严重的问题，采用数值计算方法模拟燃烧器内和燃烧器出口的冷态流场分布及燃烧器内煤粉颗粒轨迹的分布，得出影响燃烧器回流特性的主要因素，并给出燃烧器的优化模型.@在煤粉工业锅炉系统中，煤粉混合器存在呼吸帽正压、风速偏低和供粉波动等问题.使用CFD软件FLUENT对煤粉工业锅炉文氏管煤粉混合器不同工况下的速度场、压力场、颗粒轨迹和供粉浓度等进行了模拟和分析，并通过实验对模拟结果进行了验证.结果表明，上述问题是由下游阻力过大、风机工作点偏差和文氏管负压区偏差等原因导致的.@以一台600 MW四角切圆煤粉锅炉为研究对象，通过Gambit软件建立炉膛的三维结构及网格生成，在FLUENT软件中选择合理的数学模型，进行了空气气氛和富氧气氛下炉内煤粉燃烧的数值模拟.模拟结果表明：O2/CO2气氛下，由于CO2具有较高的比热容，炉膛内烟气的蓄热能力及着火热增加，炉膛整体温度下降，火焰中心上移.随着氧气浓度的提高，煤粉的燃烧得到强化，炉内温度升高，炉内高温区变大，火焰中心逐渐下移，有利于煤粉的着火和燃烧.@以中温煤沥青为原料，三种氯代芳烃为改性剂，对甲基苯磺酸为催化剂，对煤沥青进行了改性研究.改性煤沥青通过FT-IR和TG进行分析，中间相结构采用光学偏光显微镜进行了观察，针状焦采用XRD分析.结果表明，不同氯代芳烃化合物对改性煤沥青炭化产率有着不同的影响，其光学组织结构中的纤维成分均得到提高：其中，经3-氯硝基苯改性后的炭化产率增加了42.5%，其光学组织呈典型的长程纤维结构；而XRD分析亦表明，002峰位往高角度方向迁移，峰形更加尖锐突出，Lc明显增大都表明石墨化进行较充分.@以一种褐煤和一种煤焦油为原料，在高压釜中进行加氢反应，正己烷萃取液相产物，碱抽提法富集萃取物中的酚类化合物并进行GC/MS分析.结果表明，在褐煤液化油体系中共鉴定出24种酚类化合物，在煤焦油加氢体系总共鉴定出21种酚类化合物，煤基油中酚类化合物包含苯酚、茚满酚和萘满酚，高级酚含量居多.煤基油中多数酚类化合物含有烷基侧链，3及3以上碳数的侧链构成多样复杂.@采用甲苯为溶剂溶解粗蒽，利用溶剂萃取、共沸和重结晶的方法制取精蒽，利用蒸馏和重结晶的方法制取精菲，利用混合溶剂和重结晶的方法制取精咔唑.考察了溶剂用量、水浴温度和共沸温度对产品纯度的影响，确定了最佳的溶剂用量、最佳的水浴温度和共沸温度.分离得到的蒽的纯度达到了97.882%，咔唑的纯度达到了91.722%，菲的纯度达到了75.704%.利用红外光谱表征了产物与标准品的结构，并进行了比较分析，利用气相色谱分析了产物中蒽、咔唑和菲的含量.@应用Aspen Plus模拟软件，对20万t/a BRICC非均相悬浮床煤焦油加氢产品的分离流程进行了模拟研究.模拟结果表明，在低温高压分离器分离过程中有较多的轻油组分的损失.在此基础上设计利用常压分馏中油对低温高压分离器气相组分进行油洗回收，以减少轻油组分的损失.得到满足回收要求的最低中油消耗量为3 500 kg/h.油洗后，轻油组分损失量最大的332 K馏分的损失由未油洗前的26.98%降低到5.31%，油洗效果显著.模拟结果对BRICC非均相悬浮床煤焦油加工技术的工业化设计具有重要的指导意义.@高硫高灰煤脱灰脱硫预处理后采用KOH活化法制备活性炭.考察了碱炭比、活化温度、活化时间以及灰分、硫分含量和表面活性剂等对制备的活性炭吸附铜离子的影响.结果表明，在活化温度为820 ℃，活化时间为1.5 h，碱炭比为2.5的条件下制得活性炭比表面积为1 004.5 m2/g，铜离子去除率为67.8%；煤中灰分的脱除和添加表面活性剂有利于提高活性炭的吸附性能，但脱硫煤基活性炭吸附性能降低.@以晋城无烟煤为原料，与KOH活化剂混合均匀，利用正交实验，通过碘吸附值和亚甲基蓝吸附值对其活化功率、活化时间和碱度等工艺条件进行探讨，采用扫描电镜（SEM）和BET比表面等检测手段，对KOH最佳工艺条件下制备的活性炭进行了表征.实验结果表明：KOH微波活化制备晋城无烟煤基活性炭的最佳工艺条件为活化功率480 W，活化时间7.5 min，碱度4∶1，此时制备的活性炭吸附效果最好，其碘吸附值为989.4 mg/g，比表面积为1 057.2 m2/g，其工艺条件对活性炭吸附的影响递减顺序为：活化功率、活化时间、碱度.@应用热重分析法研究了市场上常售的三种活性炭从30 ℃~900 ℃的氧化热解过程.实验结果表明：样品的炭氧氧化过程中有一快速热解阶段，在此阶段样品的氧化动力学参数可以由一级反应方程和Coats-Redfern模型描述，据此求出活化能.活性炭自燃实验表明，活化能低的活性炭容易自燃，活化能高的活性炭不容易自燃.所以可以利用活化能指标来比较活性炭的自燃倾向性.@活性炭中灰分含量对活性炭的比表面积和孔隙结构具有重要影响，进而影响活性炭的吸附性能.以生物质型煤为原料制得活性炭，研究了脱灰方式及酸的类型对活性炭吸附性能的影响，并通过碘吸附法对吸附效果进行了分析.研究结果表明：以牛粪为生物质制得生物质型煤，具有很好的成型效果；但工业分析结果表明，型煤中的灰分含量较高，所得活性炭的吸附性能受到影响；脱灰对提高活性炭的吸附性能具有重要的作用，不同的脱灰方式和酸型影响不同.@在NH3-SCR脱硝保证催化剂活性前提下，在蜂窝体成型过程中添加高含量的黏土与助剂来减少SCR催化剂活性组分的使用量，可降低烟气脱硝SCR催化剂的成本.考察了不同黏土与成型助剂对蜂窝体物理性能的影响，优化了助剂的添加比例.将优化的黏土成型工艺及参数应用于掺混黏土型蜂窝SCR脱硝催化剂的制作，通过模拟烟气评价催化活性，比较了催化剂的添加量对掺混黏土型蜂窝SCR脱硝催化剂的催化活性及抗硫抗水稳定性的影响.结果表明：以黏土为基本载体的蜂窝SCR催化剂具有较高的催化活性，在固定氨氮比0.8，空速4 050 h-1的条件下，自制催化剂2%V2O5-5%WO3/TiO2掺混70%(质量分数)黏土A制得的蜂窝催化剂在250 ℃时的脱硝率为89%，活性温度窗口为250 ℃～450 ℃.170 h的抗硫抗水实验中仅在250 ℃时活性稍有降低，但一直稳定在77%以上，可满足中低温脱硝催化剂的应用要求.@研究了内蒙褐煤、热解半焦及煤-半焦混合物在微波场中的升温特性，并对比研究了300 ℃~750 ℃温度范围内，内蒙褐煤微波热解和常规热解的特性.研究表明，内蒙褐煤是一种弱微波吸收剂，需添加一定量的半焦作为微波吸收剂才能进行热解反应；在添加10%~30%半焦的范围内，随着半焦添加量的增加，煤-半焦混合物的热解升温速率逐渐增加，焦油和气体产率增加，半焦和热解水产率降低；在添加30%半焦，终温保温20 min的条件下，与常规热解相比，微波热解油、半焦和热解水的产率降低，气体产率增加，其中CO和H2产率显著提高.@利用高温沉降炉在1 523 K制备不同热解时间的褐煤焦，采用美国Autoscan33压汞仪基于压力扫描的结果测定了煤粉和不同热解时间煤焦的比表面积、孔容积与孔径的特征.与IUIPAC方法不同，基于孔隙比表面积的变化规律将孔隙分为微细孔和大孔两类.各煤焦实验的比表面积和孔径分布具有相似的特点，煤焦的比表面积和孔容积随着热解时间呈现先增大后减小再增大的非单调变化现象；大孔的比表面积呈增大的趋势，而大孔的平均孔径呈变小的趋势.这表明热解过程降低了部分微细孔的复杂性，使其在形态上转变为大孔，有利于后续的燃烧和气化.@以低质煤为原料，浸渍法制备催化剂，利用综合热分析仪研究了KNO3，DF，DY和DN四种助燃组分对低质煤催化燃烧反应性的影响.结果表明，不同组分及其添加量对低质煤助燃效果不同；由KNO3，DF，DY，DN和十二烷基苯磺酸钠以一定比例组成的复合催化助燃剂(FKYN)可使低质煤煤粉着火点降低12.3 ℃，最大失重率点温度降低8 ℃，燃烬温度降低13.1 ℃，煤灰中含碳量显著降低.催化剂的分散程度对助燃效果有显著影响，以5%煤粉为分散剂时，催化效果最佳.@开发了一种洗涤溶液，并在实验室对该溶液脱除新疆准东煤中钠的效果进行了评估实验及工艺条件摸索.结果表明，温度是影响准东煤脱钠效果的主要因素，而洗涤溶液用量、洗涤时间、压力和颗粒尺寸的影响较小.在合适的工艺条件下使用本技术可将粒度为3 mm~6 mm，孔隙较不发达和钠含量较高的准东煤中钠含量降至2%以下，钠脱除效率高达70%以上.@利用超临界水极强的氧化活性，在超临界水中对褐煤进行气化实验，最终得到H2和CH4等可燃气体，具有很高的利用价值.残余物为水煤渣混合液，处理简单，不污染环境.实验过程中应用了“控制变量法”来设置实验条件，通过反复实验得出褐煤在超临界水中气化的影响因素与规律特征.结果表明，褐煤在超临界状态下比在亚临界状态下更能转化成可燃气体，且在超临界状态下，使用催化剂KOH可使褐煤气化转化率达最高，其值为79.6%，使用催化剂KBH4和K2CO3，转化率分别为62.3%和61.9%.同时，褐煤粒径越小，越有利于将褐煤转化成H2和CH4等可燃气体.@运用超临界水气化技术，在间歇式高温高压反应釜内，分析对比了KOH，K2CO3，Na2CO3和Ca(OH)2四种碱性催化剂及ZnCl2，FeCl3，CuCl2和AlCl3四种金属氯化物催化剂对褐煤在超临界水中气化反应制取CH4的影响.研究表明，反应条件为550 ℃，25 MPa，水煤比10∶1，KOH与煤的质量比为20%，停留时间20 min时，CH产量由高到低的顺序为：KOH>K2CO3>ZnCl2>Na2CO3>AlCl3>Ca(OH)2>不加催化剂>FeCl3>CuCl2.实验发现，ZnCl2对CH4产量有促进作用，其主要原因为ZnCl2具有能促进中间产物降解生成酸，有利于酸催化反应，从而能更好地促进气化反应的进行.而KOH催化效率最高（110.2 mL/g daf coal），比不添加催化剂时增加了1倍多，其主要原理为KOH在超临界水中的自由基反应及碱性金属对水气置换反应的促进作用.@以煤直接液化油航空煤油馏分为原料，对其进行理化性质、硫/氮化合物分布、烃类组成分布及酚油含量的检测.结果表明，煤直接液化油航空煤油馏分部分指标不符合3号喷气燃料规范要求，如密度偏大、热值偏低、酸值偏高、硫/氮含量偏高和芳烃含量高，但煤直接液化油航空煤油馏分又具有高闪点、低冰点和富含环烷烃等突出优点.煤直接液化油航空煤油馏分的上述特性将使其通过加氢精制的方法获得合格的大比重喷气燃料.实验通过碱洗酸提方法富集酚，测得煤直接液化油航空煤油馏分中酚油约占26%左右，低级酚含量约占总酚量的72%.@对一种工业废焦油渣的基本性质、结构组成及热稳定性进行了分析，并添加该种废焦油渣于配煤中,使用实验焦炉进行了炼焦实验.应用SCHERRER′S公式研究了焦炭微晶结构的变化，并探讨了添加焦油渣对焦炭微孔结构及碳溶反应动力学的影响.结果表明, 添加焦油渣促进了焦炭微晶结构的生长，焦炭微晶结构的网状平面尺寸（La）及堆垛高度（Lc）明显增加，层间距d002减少.碳原子更加容易进行重排并向石墨结构进行转变，焦炭石墨化度增加.添加焦油渣的焦炭微孔结构发生了变化，孔径更细，表面积增加，孔体积下降.就焦炭的碳溶反应而言，焦炭的反应性和反应动力学变化不明显.@采用邯钢炼焦原料煤研究了瘦煤、贫瘦煤和无烟煤不同粒度对焦炭质量的影响规律；采用气孔率、SEM扫描电镜分析了所得焦炭的孔结构对焦炭热性能的影响；从机理上分析了高变质程度煤粒度对焦炭质量的影响.不同粉碎粒度瘦煤的配煤炼焦实验结果表明，瘦煤粒度<0.2 mm时，焦炭的M40提高3%，CSR提高7%.当用无烟煤替代5%的瘦煤（粒度<0.2 mm）后，无烟煤粒度的变化对焦炭的热性能影响不大，但相对于空白实验的CSR来说要有所提高，且无烟煤粒度<0.5 mm时，焦炭的M40提高3%.贫瘦煤替代5%瘦煤的配煤炼焦实验结果表明，贫瘦煤粒度<3 mm时，焦炭质量劣化，但贫瘦煤粉碎到<1 mm时，不仅能保证焦炭质量，而且CSR提高5%.@选择一种山西肥煤（YX）、新西兰1/3焦煤（NXL）和一种山西焦煤（JX）为研究对象，模拟工业炼焦条件，在水平管式炉中制备了300 ℃～1 000 ℃的半焦，用化学分析法分析了原煤及不同温度下半焦中的形态硫含量的变化，并用XRD考察了热解过程中煤中硫铁矿晶型的转变.结果表明，三种煤中的全硫都随热解温度的升高而降低，随着变质程度的升高，全硫降低最大的温度区间向高温偏移.除YX外，其他两种煤中的硫酸盐硫随温度的变化不明显；三种煤中的硫铁矿先分解成FeS1-x，当温度超过600 ℃，FeS1-x进一步分解为FeS；三种煤中的有机硫变化无明显的规律.@以某种低温煤焦油为原料，研究了低温煤焦油的乳化现象，综合采用加热静置、添加破乳剂、搅拌、超声以及离心处理等破乳方法对低温煤焦油进行脱水，分析比较了各种方法的脱水效果，获得了优化的脱水实验条件.其结果为：在80 ℃恒温静置30 min，破乳剂DH投加300×10-6，100 r/min搅拌5 min，0.4 W/cm2超声1 min，5 000 r/min离心10 min条件下，可得到51.3%的脱水率.@以陕北中低温煤焦油的轻油为原料，考察其常压馏分中化合物的组成与分布情况.在常压蒸馏装置中切取＜100 ℃，100 ℃～170 ℃，170 ℃～200 ℃，200 ℃～240 ℃，240 ℃～270 ℃，270 ℃～300 ℃，300 ℃～340 ℃，340 ℃～390 ℃和＞390 ℃九段馏分，采用GC/MS鉴定了不同馏分中化合物的组成情况，重点考察了其中酚类化合物的分布.结果表明，轻油中含有脂肪烃、芳香烃和酚类化合物及少量含氧化合物和含氮化合物.酚类化合物主要富集在100 ℃～200 ℃，200 ℃～240 ℃和240 ℃～270 ℃三段馏分中，分别占各馏分质量的51.44%，44.31%和29.12%，所含酚类化合物主要为低级酚、C3～C4烷基苯酚、茚酚、苯二酚、萘酚和烷基萘酚等.@以太西高纯无烟煤作为前驱体，通过高温热处理技术及氧化还原方法制备多层石墨烯.研究表明，在太西无烟煤中添加少量硫酸镍、氧化铁及硼酸作为催化剂，通过一定的高温热处理过程，可以制备出超纯微细石墨粉，进而通过氧化还原法制备得到煤基石墨烯.这一工作的开展不仅扩宽了石墨烯制备的原料来源，而且为太西无烟煤的高附加值利用提供了新思路.@采用H2O2-CH3COOH溶液体系对高硫煤进行了脱硫研究，结果表明，H2O2-CH3COOH的溶液体系可有效脱除煤中的硫铁矿硫和有机硫，实验获得的较佳脱硫条件是溶液初始的H2O2质量分数为10%，n(H2O2)∶n(CH3COOH)为10，温度为室温，反应时间60 min，液固比为3∶1，搅拌速率300 r/min；在此条件下，煤中硫铁矿硫的脱出率和有机硫的脱出率均可达到65%以上.对该体系的脱硫机理分析表明，H2O2的氧化性在CH3COOH的催化作用下得以加强，促使反应生成更多的羟基自由基（·OH）和过氧羟基自由基（·OOH），这些自由基具有较高的电负性或电子亲和能，能够加速脱硫反应的进行，从而实现硫铁矿硫或有机硫从煤中的脱除.@以腐植酸为原料，通过磺甲基化和缩聚反应，合成了一种具有良好水溶性和较高分子量的新型腐植酸系水煤浆分散剂.改变亚硫酸钠及甲醛用量对所合成分散剂进行工艺优化，确定最佳用量分别为22%和40%.采用红外、热重及凝胶渗透色谱等分析方法对产物进行结构表征；根据分散剂的不同添加量对水煤浆的黏度及稳定性进行分析，得出当水煤浆浓度为63%，分散剂用量为水煤浆总重量(干基煤)的0.6%时，水煤浆具有最低的表观黏度588 mPa·s.@为说明风化煤中腐植酸的分子结构，主要运用元素分析、傅立叶红外光谱和固体13C交叉极化/魔角转换核磁共振(13C CP/MAS NMR)对从风化煤中提取的棕腐酸(ZFS)和黑腐酸(HFS)的分子结构进行表征.结果表明，ZFS和HFS的分子核主要是由芳香环构成，但HFS的芳香碳原子含量是ZFS的2倍，HFS的芳构化程度略高于ZFS.在芳环的周围有脂肪侧链，ZFS在芳环中约有50%的碳原子被取代基取代，且取代基脂肪侧链主要由直链烷基构成，在较长的烷基侧链上含有氧原子，以甲氧基或醚的形式存在.ZFS中脂肪碳含量明显高于HFS.HFS中脂肪碳的一部分很可能以环状形式存在，环中可能含有氧或者氮，芳核中约有1/3碳上的氢被取代，环上还有少量的酚羟基或者甲氧基.总的来说，ZFS的含氧官能团含量是黑腐酸的2倍，两种腐植酸的芳环上都有一部分的羧基，ZFS的含量是HFS的4倍.@以煤矸石、滑石粉和氧化铝为原料，按堇青石理论比配料，在1 150 ℃～1 220 ℃下烧结2 h～4 h，合成了堇青石；正交实验分析表明，对于样品体积收缩率，影响最大的因素是烧结温度；SEM表征显示，产品颗粒形貌不规则；XRD分析发现，杂质存在能显著降低烧结温度，但同时会导致出现较多杂质晶相,因此要特别注意控制原料中杂质的含量.合成堇青石的最佳条件为烧结温度1 220 ℃，保温时间4 h，磨料粒度45 μm.@从工程实际出发，结合水夹点优化技术，应用水系统逐层优化法对某煤制甲醇工厂用水进行节水潜力分析.结果表明，在不添加设备的情况下，可节约新鲜水54 t/h，降低废水排放54 t/h.若增加浓水回收反渗透设备，则可减少新鲜水用量和降低废水排放各159 t/h.水系统逐层优化法尤其适用于现有工艺用水网络改造优化.@气化反应活性是各种气化技术选择原料时都要考虑的性质指标，其测定和表征对煤炭资源的合理利用、气化技术的选择以及生产工艺的优化具有指导性意义.详细介绍了目前测定、表征煤（焦）气化反应活性的方法，分析、比较了各种表征方法和指标的优缺点和适用范围，结合煤气化技术的现状和发展趋势，提出了进一步完善煤（焦）气化活性评价方法的途径.@为了在提高煤层气采收率的同时促进二氧化碳的资源化利用，在分析现有煤层气采收率方法作用机理的基础上，提出了一种利用微生物促进ECBM埋藏CO2甲烷化的新方法.该方法将注入二氧化碳趋采煤层气、微生物降解煤技术集约整合，通过产甲烷菌将因驱替煤层气而吸附在煤层表面的二氧化碳转化为甲烷，从而达到提高煤层气采收率同时减排二氧化碳的目的.煤层间微生物菌群降解煤的机理说明，产甲烷菌本身就具有利用煤分解生成的二氧化碳和氢气合成甲烷的能力，而外加二氧化碳可以在微生物降解煤的早期就启动消耗氢气生成甲烷气体的过程，并同时促进煤组分分解生成氢气的速度.由二氧化碳对产甲烷菌的影响、氢的来源、微生物激活和注入二氧化碳的先后顺序等角度的理论分析结果进一步论证了此种技术方案的可行性.@
Xuzhou Jiahe coal was all separated into four group components including residue, asphaltene component, ultra-pure coal and light component at room temperature and pressure with CS2/NMP mixed solvent and strippant. The process of extraction and stripping was tracked by SEM to study ultra-pure coal and asphaltene component formation mechanism in microscopic. The results show that ultra-pure coal and asphaltene component that belong to micro-nano particle give priority to the floating mode from coal macromolecule matrix to extract liquid. Both ultra-pure coal and asphaltene particle occurred fusion phenomenon during the process of stripping. Dark gray ultra-pure coal melt into mesh or surface uniformity block after adding stripping reagent. Offwhite(or white) asphaltene component change from the scatter-gather into a high degree aggregation before and after joining stripping reagent and melt into extremely smooth and uniform surface block in further. After the process of merging and growing up, it redispersed into a small sphere of uniform size in NMP reagent at last.@Tongting clarain (TTLY), Tongting fusain (TTSY), Chaili clarain (CLLY) and Liangjia vitrain (LJJY) were grading extracted under ultrasonic conditions using CS2, petroleum ether, benzene, methanol, acetone and tetrahydrofuran (THF) in order. The extraction yields of all grades and times were calculated to investigate the impacts of extraction yield and rate of coals in the intervention of the ultrasonic. The results show that the extraction rate of all coals can significantly improve, but the extraction yield related with the solvent, coal rank and maceral can improve with petroleum ether, benzene and THF under ultrasonic extraction.@The pyrolysis characteristics of Indonesian lignite were studied by means of thermal gravimetric analysis and pyrolysis experiments. The pyrolysis mechanism of Indonesian lignite and the effects of heating rate and the final pyrolysis temperature on the pyrolytic process also were studied in detail. The results showed that the pyrolytic process of Indonesian lignite can be divided into three stages: water evaporation, volatile release, semi-coke formation. The water and small molecules adsorbed of coal were removed at reaction temperature less than 300 ℃. Then the initiate pyrolysis temperature of Indonesian lignite is about 300 ℃ and the pyrolytic reaction was intensified at 400 ℃. At the low heating rate range of 10 K/min-20 K/min, the yield of tar was kept as 8.5% of weight and the heating rate had less effect on pyrolysis products. At the low pyrolysis temperature range of 400 ℃-600 ℃, the final pyrolysis temperature had less effect on the yield of tar, but the yield of pyrolysis gas increased and the yield of semi-coke decreased with the improvement of pyrolysis temperature.@Five representative coal samples used for coking were carbonized in a thermogravimetric analyzer to simulate an industrial coking process. The gaseous organic compounds generated were analyzed with a coupled mass spectrometer. During coal carbonization, thermal detachment of aliphatic side groups causes disintegration of the coal structure. Methyl groups detach at higher temperatures than methylene and methine groups, and the temperatures corresponding to peak generation of these groups increase with the metamorphic grade of the coal. Methane is generated by three mechanisms: below 370 ℃, methane adsorbed in coal is thermally released; at about 510 ℃, methyl groups are thermally detached from the coal to form CH+3 ions, which further combine with hydrogen to form methane; finally, at about 720 ℃, methane is produced as a result of the condensation of aromatic rings to form larger fused rings. Benzene is also generated by three mechanisms: at 400 ℃-500 ℃, aromatic structures in coal lose side groups (e.g. methylene or methine) to form benzene ions, which subsequently react with hydrogen to form benzene; at 500 ℃-700 ℃, benzyl structures in coal lose methyl groups to form benzene ions, which then combine with hydrogen to form benzene; finally, at about 800 ℃, condensation of fragments in coal also forms benzene.@TG-FTIR was used to analyze the co-pyrolysis process of rice husk and lignite. It was found that the co-pyrolysis mass lost were larger than mono-pyrolysis, especially when mixed ratio of rice husk and lignite was 2∶8. The co-pyrolysis products component changed, with CO2 increased, CH4 decreased, CO increased a little, while other organic compounds like phenols, carbonyl compounds, and aromatic compound all decreased a little. The mechanism of co-pyrolysis process was investigated. The metallic oxide in biomass could restrain the process of coal bond into coke so biomass and coal co-pyrolysis process took place the synergistic effect; thus it contributes to the further decomposition of coal. In addition, the biomass generates H2 earlier than coal during co-pyrolysis, and the condensation reaction of coal at high temperature is inhibited because of H2; so the prolysis of coal is promoted.@XPS was applied to investigate the mode of occurrence of sulfur in high-sulfur coal from Weibei coal field. The distribution characteristics of sulfur in different particle sizes and different densities, and the changes of sulfur by sieving, float and sink analysis were presented. According to these analysis, the washability evaluation on sulfur in coal was made. The results indicate that higher metamorphic and high-sulfur coal from Weibei coal filed is enriched in heterocycle thiophenic structure and sulfoxide et al. The washability of sulfur in coal can be improved by crushing the particle size to 6 mm-0.5 mm. The theoretic yield of fine coal of 3 mm-0.5 mm coal is 88.8%, ash content is 12.0%, and the theoretic sulfur content is 2.3%. Other chemical methods must be further employed to remove organic sulfur and fine dispersed inorganic sulfur.@According to the swelling measurement principle, combined with a linear variable differential transformer (LVDT) deformation transducer, an apparatus for measuring coal swelling in solvent was made. The swelling isothermals of L1 and B3 in nine solvents (four non-polar solvents, four polar solvents and distilled water) were obtained by the linear variable differential transformer (LVDT) deformation transducer. The swelling rate curves were obtained by derivative swelling isotherms. Furthermore, the swelling behaviors of other four coal samples (two lignites and two bitumites) in N-methyl-2-pyrrolidone (NMP) were investigated. There is no significant swelling for L1 in four non-polar solvents; but swelling in the four polar solvents significantly, especially in NMP having the maximum swelling ratio; and swelling in distilled water significantly. The swelling of B3 in four non-polar solvents except for n-hexane were significant, even the swelling ratio in toluene greater than in polar solvent acetonitrile. The swelling ratio in the polar solvent NMP was the maximum, showing a significant swelling in distilled water. At the initial time, the maximum swelling rate for two coals in non-polar solvents was shown in carbon disulfide. In all experimental solvents, the swelling in acetonitrile showed the maximum swelling rate. In NMP, three bitumite showed large swelling ratio and the swelling behaviors of three lignites were quite different. The swelling ratio of a lignite was significantly higher than that of the other two lignites and was equal to the bitumite.@This paper come up with a new concept, the method of catalysis on UCG, by introducing stream, a high-pressure vaporific catalysts, into installation so as to conduct UCG with calcium salts as its catalysts. In another oxygen gasification experience, we utilise the catalysts of calcium hydroxide water solution, the mass fraction of which are respectively 5%,10%,15%,and 20%. It is found that the CH4 components and value of gas can be 7.58% higher, 5.43 MJ/m3-7.87 MJ/m3 after gasification under high-pressure vaporific catalysts than that with 10% CaCO3 and no any catalysts; the former, also brings higher rate of 28%-69% of producing gas and more stable production. This paper demonstrates that an optimized gasification result will come if mass fraction of Ca(OH)2 range from 10% to 15% .This shows a brand new way to ensure UCG stablitiy.@The hypothesis, which is the dynamics control areas of the coal gasification, of random pore model was improved, and the carbon conversion rate (X) and reaction time (t) by a modified random pore model (MRPM) of the high temperature coal char gasification/CO2 conversion reaction was described as X=1-exp[-kt(a+bkt+k2t2)]. During 950 ℃-1 400 ℃ gasification temperature, the apparent activation energies of the Huainan slow and rapid pyrolysis coal chars-CO2 gasification were calculated by MRPM which respectively is 121.99 kJ/mol-153.75 kJ/mol and 88.57 kJ/mol-121.39 kJ/mol. The results show that the effect of MRPM is better than that of random pore model and shrinking core model, it can well reflect the kinetic behavior of char gasification characteristics, and the model is suitable for simulation the gasification of different coal chars.@The numerical relationship between the gasifier entrance material and the export effective gas compositions is computed theoretically using the principle of material balance, energy balance and chemical equilibrium. In this paper, the Fluent software is used to simulate the temperature field formed in the gasifier and the concentration field of the export syngas’ main components. We get first step conclusion that the syngas with the hydrogen carbon ratio in the range of 1.0-2.0 can be produced directly when changing the proportion of the coke-oven gas and coal.@Biomass char gasification with CO2 can produce high purity CO through the reaction of gasification agent CO2 with carbon in char. The effects of four transition metal catalysts (Ni, Ce, Fe and Cr) and four different gasification temperature on gasication of pine char were studied under 30% CO2 condition by using gravimetric analysis. And then the nth level reaction model was applied to calculate the kinetic parameters of catalytic gasification for pine char from 710 ℃ to 990 ℃ by ABSW differential method. The results indicated that with the increase of gasification temperature, the reaction time was obviously shortened. When the gasification temperature reached up to 850 ℃, high reaction rate can be obtained. Moreover, the gasification reactivity of pine char with CO2 was significantly improved through the addition of four different transition metal catalysts. The order of catalytic activity from high to low was Ni, Ce, Fe and Cr. According to this study, it was found that the experimental data agreed better with the nth level reaction model at high temperature range.@This paper focused on the preparation of a kind of dispersant. As raw material, phenol was sulfonated by sulfuric acid, polymerized by formaldehyde, and then grafted by epoxy chloropropane to get the epichlorohydrin modified sulfonated phenolic resin dispersant used in coal water slurry (CWS). The best condition of synthesis was n(phenol)∶n(sulfuric acid)∶n(formaldehyde)∶n(epoxy chloropropane)=1∶1∶0.7∶1.5. Sulfonation temperature was 100 ℃, polymeric temperature was 65 ℃. The static contact angle, rheology and stability were tested to analyze the interaction of dispersant and the surface of coal particles. The dispersant can improve hydrophilicity of coal surface, epoxy chain of the dispersant can combined with the hydrophobic groups on coal surface, and sulfonic acid groups have a strong hydrophilicity, so the dispersant can prevent coal particles from gathering through steric hindrance effect to increase the stability of CWS effectively.@With consideration of utilization of resources rationally and protection of environment,two or more than two kinds of single coal are mixed according to certain proportion for coking with minimum economic cost. However, the quality and quantity of coal is uncertain, scientific decision-making on coal blending must be used to solve the problems. In this paper, an optimization model of coal blending for coking based on interval fuzzy programming under uncertainty were studied. Application shows that optimal solution of the model in this article can be obtained, which can provide reference for technicians of coal blending for coking according to actual conditions.@Based on finite volume method, the model of the drying process of a single spherical lignite particle in hot gas was developed. In the paper, the lignite particle was divided into dry region and wet region by water evaporation interface. Crank-nicolson scheme was used to discretize the transport equations so that a single lignite particle dynamic process of moisture content and temperature distribution within the particle under different conditions (initial gas temperature, particle size, resident time) was identified. It is suggested that the model values are more closed to the experimental results and the actual drying process of lignite can be simulated successfully by the model. It was found that longer residence time, larger particle size and drying medium of higher original temperature lead to lower moisture lignite. At the initial gas temperature of 873 K, the moisture content of the lignite particle size of 20 mm decreases from 25.3% to 12% within the residence time of 131 s and the surface temperature of lignite particle is just 537 K, a little higher than the initial evolution temperature of volatile (520 K). Hence, it can be used as the reference of the actual drying process of lignite.@The relationships between main operating parameters of coal drying (type, temperature, content of water of drying medium) and temperature of dry-coal have been studied with Aspen Plus. The results show that the type of drying medium has little effect on temperature of dry-coal. As increasing of temperature and flow of drying medium, temperature of dry-coal increases rapidly after a slowly increase. At low flow of drying medium, with increasing of water-content of drying medium, temperature of dry-coal does not increase apparently and at high flow of dry medium, the temperature of dry-coal does not change.@As Shenmu Xigou coal for sample, we studied the relationship between chemical composition and ash fusibility, investigated the influence of the ash composition on the temperature of coal ash melting, and concluded the best approach to improve the ash fusion temperature. The experimental results showed that the ash melting temperature was increased when adding appropriate amount of oxides. In order to make ST exceeding 1 350 ℃, the addition of SiO2 was at least 4.0%, the addition of Al2O3 was at least 2.0%, the addition of CaO was at least 2.0%. To take account of the conditions of industrial production, CaO, Al2O3, SiO2 or bualget kaolin, limestone, imvite should be added to enhance the ash fusion temperature in order to enlange the range of coal’s application.@Based on the pulverized coal combustion efficiency and low pollution into consideration, in order to confirming the theory of corona coal powder flow enhanced ignition and combustion, the combustion test research on charged pulverized anthracite flow was finished. Using pneumatic screw micro-feeding powder for pulverized coal supply and transportation, the use of corona charging appliance of the pulverized coal particles in electriccyclone, connected to the drop tube furnace pulverized coal combustion in a stream of visual completion, using high resolution digital photographic equipment finished the records of the ignition and combustion state, with the aid of special software for image analysis. By means of thermogravimetry for some residua samples, proceed with the exploration of charged pulverized coal flow complete combustion characteristics. Comparing the charged anthracite powder flow with general anthracite powder flow, the results of the experiment analysis show that , the ignition distance and ignition delay of charged anthracite powder flow is about 5% and 6% ahead of percentage, is about 21% increased combustible matter consumption at least. The charged pulverized coal flow combustion displays better effectiveness of enhanced ignition and combustion.@Making immobilized lipase with high selectivity in organic solvent is a critical step in producing chiral intermediate of enzymatic resolution. The research concentrated on the chiral separation reaction of (R,S)-1-phenylethanol catalyzed by immobilized lipase supported by different coal-based activated carbon. The properties of activated carbon were characterized by the N2 adsorption/desorption method and the scanning electronic microscope. By researching the catalytic separation reaction of (R,S)-1-phenylethanol catalyzed by immobilized lipase, the catalytic activity of lipase with different carrier of activated carbons as well as the reaction effect with reaction time were studied. The result showed that the immobilized lipase supported by microporous activated carbon was excellent for its catalytic effect, whose conversion rate was nearly 50% when the reaction time reached 12.8 h.@The process of two-stage hydro-upgrading of high-temperature coal tar has been proved to be feasible with adapted proportion of catalysts for hydro-pretreating, hydro-finishing, hydro-cracking and hydro-saturation. The results of lab experiments show that the qualities of the high-temperature coal tar can be significantly upgraded by hydro-upgrading, such as density reduced from 1 169.7 kg/m3 to 900.9 kg/m3 and less, H/C ratio increased from 0.79 to 1.63, the carbon residue content reduced to 0.02%; while the potential aromatics content in the hydro-upgraded naphtha fraction is more than 68% , sulfur and nitrogen contents are less than 5 μg/g and 1 μg/g, respectively, so the naphtha is a high quality feedstock for catalytic reforming process. With an ultra low sulfur content, freezing point and cold filter plug point less than -30 ℃, and a cetane number higher than 39, the hydro-upgraded diesel fraction is also an excellent blending component for low freezing point diesel. Meanwhile, the hydro-upgraded tail oil is not suitable to be directly used as feedstock for FCC process due to its highly aromatic composition.@Solvent selection is the key of solvent crystallization method. In this paper, based on the Matlab software, the intermolecular Van der Waal’s attractive energy was calculated between anthracene, carbazole, xylene and chlorobenzene molecules. GC-MS and GC with internal standard curve method were applied to determine the components of anthracene residue and content of anthracene, phenanthrene, carbazole and fluorene in the resulting products. The results showed that the intermolecular van der Waal’s attractive energy between chlorobenzene and anthracene/carbazole was higher than that of xylene, which was consistent with the solubility data. After using xylene two steps of dissolution and crystallization, the removal efficiency of phenanthrene and fluorene was 96% and 91% respectively. DMF+IPA co-solvent and chlorobenzene were applied to the process of anthracene and carbazole separation and carbazole refining, can get high purity carbazole with the purity of 98.68%, the total recovery yield of carbazole is higher than 45% without mother liquor recycling.@With the aid of process software PRO/II, a rectisol acidic gas absorption column of the 600 000 t/a coal-to-methanol plant is set up and the calculation is performed. By comparison with the results of the different thermodynamics models, it was clear that vapor-liquid equilibrium of H2-CO2-CH3OH system deviated from the situation which under high pressure at low temperature. That's the reason for the simulation error. By improved SRK-SIMSCI thermodynamics model，the result showed that the model was satisfactorily agree with the real operation condition of the industry unit.@La and K promoted Cu/MgO catalysts were prepared by coprecipitation method. The catalytic performance of the catalysts on low-temperature methanol synthesis from CO2-containing syngas was investigated. The catalysts were characterized by means of XRD and TPD measurements. The results indicated that La2O3 addition improved Cu dispersion, which enhanced the low temperature CO and CO2 adsorption ability and promoted the conversion of CO2. With the further addition of K2O, the improved surface basicity caused an increase in CO and CO2 high temperature adsorption. The simultaneous conversion of CO and CO2 was achieved, and the activities of the catalyst and methanol yields were enhanced, while the selectivity of ethyl formate was increased. The catalyst with Cu/K molar ratio of 10∶1 showed high activity and stability, and the total carbon conversion of 29.7% was obtained with high methanol yield.@Shendong Shangwan coal and its macerals of vitrinite and inertinite were analyzed by 13C-CP/MAS NMR and FTIR and relative structural parameters were also discussed. The results indicate that inertinite has a higher aromaticity and aromatic bridgehead carbons than those of parent coal and vitrinite. The types of naphthalene and anthracene were main aromatic structure in inertinite macrostructure. Vitrinite had more alkylated aromatic, paraffin hydrocarbon, cycloalkanes, aliphatic carbon and higher hydrogen content. The type of benzene was the main aromatic structure; the macrostructure of parent coal has more fHal（quanternary carbon, CH and CH2） and bonded to oxygen(fOal) and naphthalene was its main aromatic structure. The degree of hydroxy association of three sample and CC stretching vibration are also stronger. The ratio Hal/Har of vitrinite 2.18 is much higher than that of parent coal(1.52) and inertinite(1.36), which was consistent with the fact that vitrinite had lower aromaticity; the macrostructure of vi-trinite and inertinite have more stretching vibration —CH2 than that of parent coal.@Soxhlet extraction treatment of coal by hexane and tetrahydrofuran (THF) was used to remove low molecular weight compounds. In order to avoid extraction solvent residues in coal, the extracted coal was dried under vacuum at different temperatures. The swelling behaviors of raw coal and extracted coals in ethanol were compared by linear variable differential transformer (LVDT) deformation transducer apparatus. The results showed that thermal desorption-mass spectrometry analysis of extracted coals showed there are extraction solvent residues in coal for drying at 110 ℃ for 24 h, while the amount of solvent residues is reduced by drying at 150 ℃ for 24 h. After drying under vacuum at 110 ℃, the initial swelling rate of extracted coal by tetrahydrofuran is faster than that of raw coal, and the equilibrium swelling ratio increased significantly. After drying under vacuum at 150 ℃, the initial swelling rate and the equilibrium swelling ratio decreases for reducing the amount of residue tetrahydrofuran. For under vacuum at 110 ℃ and 150 ℃ dried hexane extracted coal, the initial swelling rate is slower than that of raw coal. The equilibrium swelling of hexane extracted coal dried at 110 ℃ is less than that of raw coal. After drying under vacuum at 150 ℃, the equilibrium swelling ratio increases and is close to raw coal.@Study on lignite coal powder in the drying process to mention the quality by which factors and how the factors are affected. Experimental data is used for the numerical simulation of the temperature, velocity and pressure fields by FLUENT6.3.26. It showed that lignite coal particles humidity changes when the brown one was upgrading and dry in low solid-gas ratio, and the results of upgrading and dry of the lignite is perfect; the drying effect of the pulverized coal had greatly improved when the inlet flue gas temperature was raised in the drying process, the flue gas velocity has little effect on the humidity of lignite powder particles.@As we know, coal could be transformed into biogenic methane by microbiological action, but biogenic hydrogen production from coal has not yet been reported. This study will constitute an important complement to the coal bed methane bioengineering. Takingcoking coal in Shaqu mine as fermentative substrate, taking mine water strains in the same mining area and the white-rot fungus preserved in laboratory as bacterial source, the impact of bio-hydrogen production by different fermentation technology was studied at conditions which temperature is 35 ℃, initial pH is 6.5 without illumination and anaerobic environment. The results show that: under the conditions of the experiment, the hydrogen volume fraction could reach to 73.7%, the hydrogen production rate could achieve 23.56 mL/g coal; compared to the samples that didn’t mix white-rot fungus, the hydrogen production rate of the samples which added the white rot fungus were decreased 1.5-6 times; other things being equal, hydrogen production could be increased from 0.44 mL to 466.34 mL if hydrogen producing bacteria in mine water were enriched for 4 d; compared mixed edentate disodium at the beginning of enrich hydrogen producing bacteria with adding it after enrich strains, the former hydrogen production rate were 2-10 times than the latter. Obviously, more clean energy-hydrogen could be obtained from coal by microbiological action. @In recent years, with the rapid development of glass industry as well as ceramics factory, industrial gas markets have even broader prospects. In this paper，the gasification process of a new type of the industrial gas pressurized entrained flow coal gasifier is simulated using three-dimensional numerical simulation method. The reliable model have been established and predict the flow distribution, temperature distribution，and gas composition distribution of the entrained flow coal gasifier. As a conclusion the simulation results is also analyzed. From the results，it can be investigated that the flow field in the gasifier can reasonably reflect the trends and processes of reaction in the gasifier；temperature field in the gasifier becomes more even，average temperature increases；and the outlet gas composition is consistent with the measurement data.@The micro fluidized bed reaction analyzer(MFBRA)was used to research the emission characteristics and the formation kinetics of methane which is released from the different kinds of coal and the coal blended during the process of coal pyrolysis.The result shows that in the same pyrolysis condition,as the volatile content of coal increased,the beginning temperature of the methane to be released decreased,the maximum releasing rate and the total amount of methane increased, the activation energy (E) of its pyrolysis decreased, which means that the higher the volatile content of coal ,the easier to its pyrolysis reaction.Blended coal can change the quality index of the single coal. The quality index of the coal blended as the water content, volatile content and the ash content etc equals to its weighted average of corresponding single coal.But the activation energy (E) of coal blended doesn’t equal to the weighted average of corresponding single coal.@A spout-fluid bed gasifier was built up for gasification of coal. The effect of wide sieve particles on flow characteristics of the spout-fluid bed was analyzed through numerical simulation methods. Unsteady Eulerian multi-phase flow model and the standard k-ε turbulence equation were adopted in numerical simulation, and using the user defined function (UDF) writing out wide sieve particles model.Results show that in dense-phase different size particles appear stratification, the fluid dynamics of spouted fluidized bed was influenced by particle size distribution and energy dissipation and the transfer between particle.@The coal liquefaction pitch was refined with tetralin by centrifugal separation. when the ratio of tetralin to coal liquefaction pitch was 3∶1, and centrifugal speed was 4 000 r/min, centrifugal time was 20 min, it was demonstrated that the ash could be decreased 0.02%, and QI could be decreased 0.8%, while the yield of pitch could exceed 80%, and the yield of tetralin  was about 75%.@Several oil field hrdrofining catalysts home and abroad were tested by using coal direct liquefaction oil under different operating conditions. The test results showed that the catalyst Cat-A possessed relatively good hydrodenitrogeneration rate, the catalyst Cat-B hold higher hydrodesulfurization rate. The catalyst Cat-C possessed the best hydrodesulfurization rate and the worst hydrodenitrogeneration rate. The suitable reaction conditions for hydrofining was above pressure 10 MPa, temperature 350 ℃, hydrogen oil volume ratio 800∶1. We found that catalysts were easily inactivation.Such as after a week continuous operation, the catalyst Cat-A activity fell about 20%.@A new coal water slurry(CWS)dispersant named sulfonated naphthol formaldehyde (NPF) was synthesized with 2-naphthol, concentrated sulfuric acid and formaldehyde. Firstly, properties of the polymer on different polymerization conditions were analyzed. Secondly, the stabilities of NSF was enhanced through the NPF/NSF were compounded. The results showed that when the monomer,formaldehyde, 2-naphtholmolar ratio was 0.86∶1, polymerization temperature was 130 ℃, polymerization time was 2 h, the dispersion agent performance is optimal. The coal water slurry viscosity is 463 mPa·s with this dispersant when the dosage is 0.5%, the concentration is 64%, indicating that the dispersant has a high dispersion. Coal water slurry viscosity has reduced by 150 mPa·s when the percentage composition of NPF in the NSF ascertain is 20%. The water precipition ratio reduced by 1.07% without hard deposit after 7 d, indicating that the stabilities were enhanced obviously.@An amphoteric polycarboxylic series dispersant(PA-SSS-DMC) was prepared through radical aqueous solution polymerization using polyethylene glycol-acrylate ester (PA), styrene sulfonic sodium (SSS) and methacryloxyethyl trimethyl ammonium chloride (DMC) as raw meterial, (NH4)2S2O8/Na2SO3 redox system as initiator, Na2SO3 as chain transfer agent. The copolymer was characterized by TGA-DSC, GPC and IR. The effect of synthetic condition on dispersion efficiency was investigated. When the prepared slurry density is 63%, the min apparent viscosity value of the coal water slurry made from Shenfu coal would be 580 mPa·s. The matching experiment results of the polycarboxylic dispersant synthesized at optimal conditions for coal water slurry made from Shenhua coal, Beisu cleaned coal and Yanzhou cleaned coal showed that the dispersant should be applied to a variety of coals and should be used widely.@According to the coal blending theory, the previous production of coal blending ratio scheme, coal and coke quality were analyzed. Combined with weakly caking coal and other coal properties, five coal blending ratio scheme were made, tested with 40 kg coke oven. Through the analysis of the blending ratio scheme and single coal, coal and coke results, it was considered that weakly caking coal ratio should be controlled in 3%-5%, finally by 4.3 m top charging coke oven production practice, and it is thought that the result is correct.@In order to investigate the effects of catalyst on characteristics of semi-coke from the coal fast pyrolysis process, the characteristics of semi-coke including yield, ash content, volatile component content, and structure were studied. The results show that catalyst could decrease the semi-coke yields while improve the volatile release, which caused the decrease of volatile component content and the increase of fixed carbon and ash contents in semi-coke. MnO2 promoted the transverse and longitudinal thermal polycondensation of basic lattice in semi-coke, CaO could promote the longitudinal thermal polycondensation and hindered the transverse thermal polycondensation of basic lattice in semi-coke, and Fe2O3 and TiO2 hindered the longitudinal thermal polycondensation of basic lattice in semi-coke.@The proximate analysis, vitrinite reflectance, Gieseler fluidity, Arnu-Audibert’s dilatometer, coke optical texture of gas-fat coal and coking texture with anthracite were studied. At the same time, it was compared with commonly used fat coal.The result showed that gas-fat coal’rank is lower, coke optical texture of single coal is mainly fine mosaic structure, which are not useful for coal blending. But gas-fat coal’s plastic layer is very affluent and with good caking property, they can well spread crack of coal grains. All these are helpful to coal grains caking and coke quality improvement. Gas-fat coal should be rationally blended.@To study the co-carbonization between coal tar pitch and different rank of coal, experiments of charring between 5% and 10% of coal tar pitch and coals were studied, which were test in coke oven of 40 kg. The results showed that, the microstructures of cokes charred from different rank of coals and coal tar pitch were different. The pitch increased the Optical Texture Index (OTI) of the coke from low rank of coals and high rank of coals, and had little effect on that from middle rank of coals. The mechanical behaviors of cokes charred from different rank of coals and coal tar pitch were also different. The cokes from low rank of coals had high mechanical strength because of obviously dissolution; the cokes from middle rank of coals had little effect with pitch; however, the pitch obviously improves the mechanical capacities and thermal properties of the coke charred from high rank of coals.@The mixture of low metamorphic coal and plastic is studied under the condition of microwave co-pyrolysis, using FT-IR analysis and GC-MS to characterize the bluecoal and tar, and the effects of microwave power on the tar yield and component are investigated that is focused on. This research shows that with the increase of the microwave power, the tar get more and more cleaner. When the microwave power increased from 480 W to 800 W,the light of oil, alkane and olefins increase by 13.2%, 4.4% and 9.1% in the tar. But the heavy oil and aromatic hydrocarbons decreased by 24.2% and 14.6%. Therefore, microwave power has an important impact on the co-pyrolysis.@The composition and distribution of phenolic compounds in middle/low temperature coal tar from Northern Shaanxi was investigated by GC-MS. Five fractions were isolated from middle/low temperature coal tar from Northern Shaanxi by distillation into 170 ℃-230 ℃, 230 ℃-270 ℃, 270 ℃-300 ℃, 300 ℃-340 ℃ and 340 ℃-360 ℃ respectively and figured out the ratio. Soda wash method was used to extract the phenolic compounds in each fractions and the crude phenols was analyzied by GC-MS. It was found that 23, 23, 15, 18 and 10 types of phenolic compounds corresponding to the crude phenols of the five fractions, which contributed the 96.89%, 60.01%, 50.90%, 36.51% and 36.37% of the corresponding crude phenols of the five fractions. And these phenolic compounds accounting for 12.91% of the low temperature coal tar. The main phenolic compounds in the low temperature coal tar were low-rank phenols，C3-C4 alkyl-phenols and naphthols.@The paper investigates the influence on coal tar yield during the preparation process for briquette with low rank pulverized coal. The important factors, which effect on the coal tar yield, include content of bentonite, forming pressure, moisture and particle size of coal. These factors are systematically discussed when using the bentonite as binder. The optimum conditions are as followed: content of bentonite is 5%, forming pressure is 40 kN, moisture content is 14%, and fine coal particle size is less than 0.28 mm. Under the optimum conditions, the coal tar yield is 9.2% and compressive strength of formed coke is 600 N/ball. It satisfied the standard of gasification behavior of formed coke.@Two different materials such as coal tar pitch, fat coal with high adhesion were chosen as the heat binder, which were mixed into the powder of low rank bituminous coals from Shenmu or Yuzhou and other raw materials to make coal briquette in different ration. The determination results show that the thermal strength of coal briquette with tar pitch is higher than that of coal briquette with fat coal. Further analysis of micro-structure of coal briquette by electron microscopic also verifies that the cohesion and water resistance of coal briquette with tar pitch is stronger, and it is because that interaction of air bubble poduced by volatile separated under hot state through colloid pressures the colloid and form the stronger netstructure on coal granules surface. Moreover, the particle size of tar pitch also have certain effect on thermal strength of coal briquette.@The primary issue concerning briquette manufacture was the strength of the briquettes, which was dominated by its microstructure. The relationship between microstructure of briquettes made by different amount of bentonites with different pressure and its strength was studied using optical microscopic analysis method and digital image processing technology. The strength of briquettes was controlled by its fracture, followed by its porosity. The emerging of fracture in briquettes was related to the binders used, the pressure loaded and the properties of feed coals, while porosity related to water added.@Magnesium salt and magnesium smelting slag were used as binder agent and sulfur retention agent of coal briquette, compressive strength, falling strength, redrying strength, and sulfur retention efficiency of coal briquette were tested. Results showed that magnesium salt could significantly improve strength of coal briquette, when mass ratio was 6%, the compressive strength was 528 N/ball, falling strength was 86%. Magnesium smelting slag could improve sulfur retention efficiency, when mass ratio was 6%, sulfur retention efficiency was 74%, the highest density of SO2 was 751 mg/m3.@Extraction of brown humic acid and black humic acid from weathered coal was briefly introduced here. Two kinds of humic acid extracted were characterized respectively by ultra violet-visible spectra, Fourier transformed infrared spectra and three-dimensional fluorescence spectra and the structural differences of them were also illustrated. The structure of functional groups in them was similar but the content of functional groups in brown humic acid was higher than black humic acid overall which was gotten by Fourier transformed infrared spectra. The absorbance ultra violet-visible spectra of both humic acids in the spectroscopy region was decreased with wavelength increasing, which was a mixed spectrum. Both kinds of humic acid had fluorescent effect and the redshifts would happen no matter with concentration increasing or pH value increasing.@To humic acid potassium as basic raw materials, through sulfonation ,was purified humic acid, and then as raw materials, acrylic acid as monomers of copolymerization, potassium persulfate as redox system initiator, the grafted copolymers of sulfonated humic acid and acrylic acid are synthesized by means of aqueous solution of copolymerization. And detect their effect on viscosity, rheology, and stability of coal water slurry. This paper also studies different dispersant dosage on the property of coal water slurry, dispersing agent for coal water slurry of effective components of 0.12% of the total weight, coal water slurry has minimum apparent viscosity.@Experimental analysis of the lignite pyrolysis characteristics of Inner Mongolia Baiyinhua lignite was carried out in tube furnace, the structure of the raw coal and solid pyrolysis products of semi-coke composition changes had been investigated.The adsorption/desorption isotherms of raw coal and semi-coke obtained under different carbonization conditions showed that the semi-coke had a wide pore size distribution, and mesopore and micropore account for a substantial proportion; the semi-coke pore characteristics showed the final dry distillation temperatures and holding time of lignite pyrolysis had a significant impact on specific surface area, pore volume and average pore diameter of semi-coke.@In order to explore the explosion hazard of the raw lignite and dried lignite, the paper based on the mechanism of dust explosions, makes the particle size analysis and explosive experiments, analysis the changes of dust particle size features, dust raising characteristics and explosive characteristic parameters between raw and dried lignite particle size distribution changes. The results show that the large particle size frequency of dried lignite decreases, small particle size frequency increases; the minimum ignition energy, the minimum ignition temperature of dust layer/clound become low. It is easier for dried lignite to reach the explosive limit concentration than raw coal, and it more likely to catch fire to explosion, the sensitivity and hazard of the dried lignite increase.@The action of curing between ash and carbon dioxide in the presence of simulated salt water was studied in the solid-liquid-gas three-phase simulated reaction. Abundant experimental studies were performed in the paper to investigate the factors that influenced the curing rate of carbonation reaction, such as reaction temperature, reaction pressure, particle size and reaction medium. The results showed that the mineral carbonation curing rate increased and then decreased with the increment of reaction temperature from 50 ℃ to 200 ℃ . At 150 ℃, carbonation curing rate reached the highest. When the reaction pressure was increased from 1.0 MPa to 2.5 MPa, the mineral carbonation curing rate increased from 0.93% to 1.65%. With the decrease of particle size from 75 μm-150 μm down to 75 μm, the mineral carbonation curing rate increased from 1.18% to 1.48%. When the distilled water was replaced by simulated salt water as the reaction medium, carbonation curing rate increased from 0.38% to 1.65%. At 150 ℃, 2.5 MPa, reaction time 1 h, the particle size less than 75 μm, carbonation curing rate of gasification ash in simulated salt water medium was up to 1.65%.@This text analyses the effect on temperature and pressure of gasifying agent quantity in a 3 m×16 m fluidized gasifier, taking high-ash powdered coal of Yima as raw material. It was found the effect on gasifier temperature of vapor or oxygen quantity can be illustrate by Y=1 353.835-0.079Xv or Y=727.120+0.097Xo, within error of 1%. Moreover, the effect on pressure and pressure drop of gasifying agent quantity is not evident, especially on pressure drop. This test can provide reference for aotumation control, operation and design in the gasifying pilot process for the powdered coal, especially for practical operation.@The thermal analysis instrument (TG/DTA 6300) is used to study the characteristics of residual carbon after gasification of coal from Ningxia Shigouyi. The effects of heating rate, particle size and oxygen concentration on the combustion characteristics of residual carbon are investigated from three aspects, including ignition characteristics, burnout characteristics and stable combustion characteristics. Orthogonal experiments are conducted to study the coupling effect of heating rate, particle size and oxygen concentration on residual carbon of gasification. Experimental results show that increasing heating rate can improve the burnout characteristics of the residual carbon, and the decrease in particle size contributes to the ignition of the residual carbon. Increasing oxygen concentration plays an obvious role in improving the combustion characteristics of the residual carbon, while the improving effect will become weaker with the increase in oxygen concentration. The heating rate affects the ignition characteristics of the residual carbon most, while the oxygen concentration has the greatest influence on the characteristics of burnout and stable combustion of the residual carbon of gasification.@An alternative process of syngas production for NH3 synthesis was proposed. Syngas is made of coal and coal mine gas(CMM)  by CO2 absorption enhanced gasification. Due to higher N2 content in CMM, it is possible to remove N2 supplement section or to replace air gasification by steam gasification. With the in situ absorption of CO2, the syngas compositions at gasifier outlet can meet the inlet contents criteria of syngas refinery section which should be φ（H2）/φ（N2） equals to 3 and φ（CO2+CO）less than 0.30%. In order to analyze the feasibility and operation conditions of the proposed process, syngas production reactor was simulated by thermodynamic model, from which the variation of syngas compositions with operation parameters were studied. Based on this work, it is able to determine the suitable operation parameters for gasifier operation and corresponding CMM flow rate. Considering the explosion limits variation of pressurized CMM, the feasible parameters for O2 removal reactor operation was calculated.  Analysis results show that it is feasible to produce syngas for NH3 synthesis by coal and CMM co-gasification with in situ CO2 capture. Moreover, it is advantage to simplify components adjustment section and syngas purification section.@With NaOH as the supporting electrolyte, electrolysis of coal water slurry (CWS) were carried out with a constant current, so as to investigate the possibility of producing water soluber organic compounds (WSOCs) from electrolysis of (CWS). Effects of different factors on total organic carbon (TOC) content were examined, including time, temperature, anode materials and concentration of both NaOH and CWS. Within a basic electrolyte，the TOC content from electrolysis was larger than that of from soaking, and anode materials with electrocatalytic characteristics could increase the TOC content, such as Fe and Ni. The TOC content increased with time, temperature, while it decreased with increasing NaOH concentration. After electrolysis with a current density of 0.11 A/cm2 for 6 h, and at a temperature of 85 ℃, the TOC content was 1 717.2 mg/L. In addition, the TOC content from unit mass coal after electrolysis was increasing with the NaOH concentration firstly, and then decreased.@This production practice on coking used 1/3 coking coals of Ningwu coalfield, Shanxi Province as the main raw materials. Nine blending schemes have been designed. The coals is loaded into 20 kg iron box ,and the coal blending test was conducted in 66 type coke oven carbonization chamber. Quality testing and analysis of the coke production show that Ningwu coalfield 1/3 coking coal is possible to product qualified metallurgical coke as the main raw material. The good proportion of the fat coal and lean coal can increase the amount of Ningwu coal, to achieve the purpose of reducing the amount of the precious main coking coal. In this experiment, qualified metallurgical coke have been producted without using main coking coal. The coke production were failed to achieve first-class metallurgical coke, which shows that main coking coal is required for prudcting first-class metallurgical coke.@Four coal samples of different degree of metamorphism in Northern Shannxi were determined using slag-bonding tester. The impact of the air flow and ash fusion temperature on slag-bonding rate examined, the discriminant index of coal slag is analyzed and the tendency of four coal slag is concluded. Experimental results show that coal slag characteristics depend not only on the chemical composition, but also on the melting temperature of the coal ash as well as the external conditions at a certain extent.@Based on the indices of ignition temperature, burnout in isothermal area and carbon and hydrogen in residual ash, catalytic effects of CuSO4 and K2CO3 on TF coal combustion were investigated with a temperature programmed method by a thermal-gravimetric analysis. On the other hand, the relationship of activation energy and catalytic effects was also discussed with a distributed activation energy model(DAEM). The results showed that with 2% CuSO4 and 2% K2CO3, the ignition temperature of TF coal was lowered by 44.3 ℃ and 31.1 ℃ respectively; when the final burnout increased from 92.19% to 94.75% and 96.13%, the carbon in residual ash decreased from 6.91% to 3.37% and 2.39% respectively. The distributed activation energy of TF coal combustion showed different on the three stages of conversion: <15%, 20%-85% and >90%. The effect of CuSO4 and K2CO3 on energy change during the conversion of 20%-85% was: K2CO3 could lower the energy obviously, and E of TF coal with CuSO4 showed a fluctuation change.@For solving the problems of unsteady combusation of pre-ignition burner applying for the firing of low-volatile anthracite and serious coking at burner outlet，the flow field distribution in the burner and at outlet are simulated, and pulverized coal particle trajectory in the burner is also simulated, the main factors of affecting the characteristics of recirculation region are found, and the optimization models of the burner are available.@In the system of pulverized-coal industrial boiler, Venturi pulverized-coal mixer have problems include positive pressure in breathing cap, low speed wind and pulverized-coal feeding instability. Including velocity field, pressure field, particle trajectory and coal powder concentration it is simulated and analyzed Venturi pulverized-coal mixer by CFD software FLUENT in different working conditions. And the results compared with the experimental data. The results show that these problems are caused by downstream resistance, fan operating point deviation, Venturi negative pressure deviation and so on.@Taking a 600 MW coal-fired boiler in a power plant serving as the object of study, three dimensional structure of the furnace has been established and a mesh being produced through Gambit software. A reasonable mathematic model has been chosen from FLUENT software and the combustion in furnace being numerically simulated under condition of burning coals with different quality. In O2/CO2 atmosphere, CO2 has a higher specific heat capacity that heat storage capacity of the furnace flue gas and ignition heat increase, furnace overall temperature drops and the flame center moves. As the oxygen concentration increased, the combustion of pulverized coal have been strengthened, the furnace temperature and the temperature inside the zone change, the flame center gradually moves down, which is in favor of the pulverized coal ignition and combustion.@With three kinds of different atoms chlorinated aromatic compounds in the presence of p-toluene sulfonic acid, coal tar pitch has been modified successfully. The properties of the modified coal-tar pitch (MCTP) were observed by Fourier transform infra-red spectroscopy and thermo gravimetric analyzer (TG) respectively. Polarized microscope was employed to study its mesophase structure of the MCTP; and the crystallinity of the needle coke obtained through MCTP was investigated by X-ray diffractometer (XRD). The results show that the carbonization yield of MCTP1 produced by 1-chloro-3-nitrobenzene as a modified agent is the highest among the selected modified agents, which arrive at 50.1%. And the optical structure of its mesophase emerges a typical long fibrous organization. For the needle coke from MCTP1, the results of XRD showed that the 002 peak moves to higher angle and becomes sharper, and Lc increases significantly comparing to the coke from MCTP, which was not modified. It indicates that the degree of graphitization has been enhanced greatly after modification.@A lignite and a coal tar is hydrogenated to oil in autoclave respectively. The liquid in autoclave is extracted by hexane. Phenolic compounds in extract are enriched by alkali extraction and analyzed by GC/MS. The results show that 24 phenolic compounds are identified in lignite liquefaction oil and 21 phenolic compounds in coal tar hydrogenation oil. Phenolic compounds in coal-derived oil are phenols, indanols and naphthalenols among which high rank phenols have the most amount. Most phenolic compounds of coal-derived oil are alkyl substituted with side chain’s diversity and complication of 3 or over 3 carbons.@The toluene was used as solvent to dissolve crude anthracene.The methods of sovlent extraction,azeotropic and recrystallization were used to prepare refined anthracene.The methods of distillation and recrystallization were used to prepare refined phenanthrene.The methods of mixed solvent and recrystallization were used to prepare refined carbazole. The effect of solvent quality, water-bath temperature and azeotropic temperature on the product purity were ivestigated and the best solvent quality, water-bath temperature and azeotropic temperature were determined, in this condition the purity of anthracene,carbazole and phenanthrene from separation could reached 97.882%,91.722% and 75.704%.The structure of production and standard were characterized by infrared spectra and the result was compared and analyzed.The content of anthracene,carbazole and phenanthrene in the product were analyzed by gas chromatography.@By the application of Aspen Plus simulation software, the product separation process of BRICC coal tar hydrocracking with heterogeneous suspending-bed reactor which the scale is 200 000 t/a was studied. According to the analysis of the simulation results, more light oil component was lost in separation process of high pressure separator at low temperature. In order to reduce the loss of light oil, we used atmospheric distillation medium oil as wash oil to wash and recover the gas phase component of high pressure separator at low temperature in this work. The simulation results show the minimum quantity of medium oil consumption to satisfy the recovery is 3 500 kg/h. And after oil washing, the loss of the most light component 332 K has reduced to 5.31% from 26.98%.The effect of recovery is obvious. The simulation results have important guiding significance to industrial design of BRICC coal tar hydrocracking with heteroge-neous suspending-bed.@The coal-based activated carbon was prepared with KOH activation method. Effect of processing factors on Cu(Ⅱ) adsorption capacity has been researched, in which included ratio of alkali to carbon, activation temperature, activation time, ash content, sulfur content and surfactant. As activation time was 1.5 h and ratio of alkali to carbon was 2.5, the BET surface area of the prepared activated carbon at 820 ℃ was 1 004.5 m2/g, and removal ratio of Cu(Ⅱ) was 67.8%. Deashing from coal and adding surfactant were benefit to increasing the adsorption capacity of the activated carbon, but desulfurization from coal was not.@Jincheng anthracite as raw material was mixed with KOH activating agent. Activation of its power, the activation time and the alkalinity of process conditions was disscussed through the iodine adsorption value and methylene blue adsorption by orthogonal tests.By using scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and BET surface area and other means of detection, the activated carbon prepared under the optimum conditions of the KOH were characterized. The results show that: the optimum conditions of preparation of Jincheng anthracite by KOH in microwave is the activation power 480 W, the activation time 7.5 min, alkalinity 4∶1. And the activated carbon prepared under this condition has the best absorbing effect: the iodine adsorption value 989.4 mg/g, specific surface area 1 057.2 m2/g. The effect of process conditions on activated carbon decreased as following: power, activation time, alkalinity.@Thermogravity analysis technique was used to study the course of thermal oxidizing decomposition from 30 ℃ to 900 ℃ for the activated carbon. The result suggested that the fast pyroysis process including the oxidizing decomposition of activated carbon can be described as a first-order chemistry reaction and Coats-Redfern method, thus activation energy can be got. The spontaneous combustion experiment of proved the activated carbon which has lower activation energy would be easy to spontaneous combustion. So spontaneous combustion tendency of activated carbon is divided by using activation energy index.@The ash content in activated carbon had important effect on the specific surface area and pore structure of activated carbon, and the adsorption performance of activated carbon is obvious. Activated carbon was made by the biomass type coal, and the deashing method and the type of acid were studied on the adsorption performance of activated carbon, and the adsorption effect of activated carbon was analyzed through the iodine adsorption. The results show that the deforming effect of type coal is better for cow dung and coal, but the ash content is high very much; so the adsorption performance of activated carbon is decline ;the deashing had important effect on the adsorption performance of activated carbon, and the effect was different for the different ways and acid type.@Blending high concentration clay and additives in the honeycomb SCR catalyst molding process can reduce the dosage of active component and thus decrease the SCR catalyst cost. The effects of different clay and additives on the physical properties of honeycomb catalyst were detected and the ratios of additives were optimized. The catalytic de-NOx performance of the resulting honeycomb catalyst was tested with respect to different blending ratios of catalyst, while the honeycomb catalyst itself was also characterized with XRD and BET. The results showed that the clay-blended honeycomb SCR catalyst exhibited good strength and de-NOx activity at temperatures of 250 to 450 ℃. The realized NO removal reached above 89% for the honeycomb blending 70% clay and 2% V2O5-5% WO3/TiO2 under conditions of the ratio of NH3 to NO is 0.8 and GHSV=4 050 h-1.@This paper investigated the temperature rising characteristic of Inner Mongolia lignite(IML) and its pyrolyzed char and the coal-char mixture(CCM) during microwave heating, the production distributions of CCM during microwave and conventional pyrolysis at the temperature of 350 ℃-750 ℃ were also studied. The results shows that IML is a poor microwave absorbent and need to mix with its pyrolyzed char, so that it can be decomposed in microwave field; with the added amount increasing of the char, the heating rate of CCM during microwave pyrolysis is increased, the tar and gas yield are increased also, while char yield is readuced; compared with conventional pyrolysis at similar conditions, microwave pyrolysis produces less char, tar and water, but more gas; and microwave pyrolysis has higher H2 and CO yield than that of conventional pyrolysis evidently.@Different lignite chars which have different pyrolysis time were produced under 1 523 K in a high-temperature sedimentation furnace, the characteristics of specific surface area, pore volume and pore diameter of pulverized coals and chars of different pyrolysis time were determined with American Autoscan33 mercury porosimeter based on the pressure scan results. Being different with IUIPAC methods, pores were divided into micropores and macropores in this paper according to variation of specific surface area. The specific surface area and pore size distribution test results about different chars showed similar characteristics. The specific surface area and pore volume presented behavior of first increasing, then decreasing and increasing with the pyrolysis time passing; the specific surface area of macropores was increasing, while average pore diameter of macropores was decreasing. This indicates that the pyrolysis process reduces the complexity of part of micropores, and turns them into macropores, which facilitates subsequent combustion and gasification.@Being prepared the catalyst by a method of dipping, the effect of KNO3, DF, DY and DN catalyst on the characteristics of low-quality coal combustion was investigated by thermo-gravimetric analysis. The results showed that the low-quality coal has a different combustion characteristics with different components and additve aomount of catalyst. The new catalyst(FKYN) compound of KNO3, DF, DY, DN and sodium dodecyl benzene sulfonate with a certain ratio decreases the ignition point by 12.3 ℃, the maximum weight loss temperature point by 8 ℃, burn-out point by 13.1 ℃. And it decreases carbon content notablely in coal ash. The dispersion of catalyst have a notable effect on combustion supporting. Adding 5% pulverized coal to be a dispersant, the catalytic effect will be perfect.@On the basis of the research on the existence form of sodium in coal, a method for sodium removal from Zhundong coal using a washing solution has been presented in the paper. The effects of temperature, pressure, coal particle size and washing solution amount on the sodium removal from Zhundong coal with the particle size of 3 mm-6 mm and poor pores was investigated. The experimental results show that the temperature employed is the main influencing factor for sodium removal and washing solution amount, the washing time, pressure and coal particle size has little influence on the results. After treatment with the right processing conditions, the upgraded Zhundong coal with the sodium content below 2% (based on ash yield) is obtained and the sodium removal efficiency is higher than 70%.@Hydrogen, methane and other combustible gases would be obtained during the lignite gasification experiments in the conditions of supercritical water using its oxidative activity. The results had a high value since the residual waste was mixed liquor of water and coal cinders which could be disposed easily without environmental pollution. Control variable method was applied to set the conditions in the experimental process. The influencing factors and laws of lignite gasification in the conditions of supercritical water could be drawn through repeated experiments. The experimental results show that lignite can be more likely to turn into combustible gases under supercritical condition than under subcritical condition. In the state of supercritical water, the highest conversion rate of lignite can be acquired with the use of KOH as catalyst，which value is 79.6%. The values of conversion rate with the use of KBH4 and K2CO3 as catalysts are 62.3% and 61.9% respectively. The results also show that the smaller of the particle size of lignite is more conducive to the conversion of lignite into combustible gases such as hydrogen and methane.@For the production of CH4, supercritical water gasification of lignite was investigated in a high temperature and pressure batch autoclave. The influences of four basic catalysts (KOH, K2CO3, Na2CO3 and Ca(OH)2) and four metal chloride catalysts (ZnCl2, FeCl3, CuCl2 and AlCl3) were discussed. The reaction condition was 550 ℃, 25 MPa, 10∶1 mass ratio of H2O to lignite, 20% mass ratio of KOH to lignite, 20 min residence time. The results show that the effect of catalysts on yield of CH4 from high to low order is KOH>K2CO3>ZnCl2>Na2CO3>AlCl3>Ca(OH)2>no catalyst>FeCl3>CuCl2. It was found that ZnCl2 can promote the yield of CH4, which can be  explained that intermediate products can be degraded to acid by ZnCl2 which is good for acid catalyzed reaction and can promote the gasification reaction better. Compared with no catalyst addition, the addition of FeCl3 and CuCl2 turns to lower yield of CH4. And catalytic efficiency of KOH is the highest. Yield of CH4 is 110.2 mL/(g daf coal) which is almost double to that of no catalyst addition when KOH was added. The main mechanism is the free radical reaction and promoting of basic metal to the water-gas shift reaction in supercritical water.@The composition and property of coal direct liquefied aviation kerosene distil-late were studied in this paper. The test results showed that some of the physical and chemical properties were not fit for No.3 jet fuel specification.Such as high-density, low-calorific value, high-acid value, high-sulfur/nitrogen content and high-aromatics content .On the other side, it’s excellent in some performace such as high-flash point, low-freezing point and rich naphthenic hydrocarbon. Coal direct liquefied aviation kerosene distillate would be used for qualified high-density jet fuel through hydrofining method.We found that phenol oil in the coal direct liquefied aviation kerosene distillate accounted for about 26%. Low phenol oil contented of about 72% in the total amount of phenol oil. @The principle properties, composition, and carbon solution reaction kinetics of tar residue were analyzed in this paper. Coke making was carried out by employing coal blends tar residue. The changes of micro-crystals of cokes have been investigated by employing Scherrer’s equation. Effect of tar residue introduction on micro-pore and carbon solution kinetics of coke were also studied. The results revealed that the addition of tar residue  facilitated the growth of micro-crystals in coke and the increases of crystal parameter La, Lc and graphite degree g. The pore structure of cokes was measured by nitrogen adsorption. It was found that the micro-pore volume and average pore diameter decreased, specific surface area increased after tar residue being added to coal blends. For carbon solution reaction, no obvious changes were found.@The influence of different particle sizes of lean coal, meager lean coal and anthracite on the quality of coke was studied based on the coal resource of Han’gang Coking Factory. The porosity and SEM were used to analyze the influence of pore structure on the thermal properties of the as-prepared coke. The influence of the particle sizes of high metamorphic grade coal on the quality of coke was analyzed from the mechanism. Based on the coal blending experiment with different particle size of lean coal, the result shows that: when the lean coal particle size <0.2 mm, the M40 of the coke was improved by 3% and the CSR was improved by 7%. When 5% of the lean coal was substituted for anthracite, the thermal properties of the coke was not affected so much and the CSR was improved than the blank experiment with the varied particle sizes of anthracite. Besides, the M40 of the coke was improved by 3% when the anthracite particle size <0.2 mm. When 5% lean coal was substituted for meager lean coal and the particle size of the meager lean coal <3 mm, the property of the coke was deteriorative. However, the quality of coke was maintained and the CSR can be improved by 5% when the particle size of meager lean coal <1 mm.@In order to research on the sulfur forms transformation of high-sulfur content coking coal during pyrolysis, char of a Shanxi fat coal(YX), a Shanxi coking coal(JX) and a New Zealand 1/3 coking coal (NXL) were prepared under simulation of industrial coking conditions in horizontal tube furnace during  300 ℃-1000 ℃. The change of sulfur forms content and crystal structure transformation of pyrite were investigated by wet chemical method and XRD, respectively. The results show that the total sulfur content decreases with pyrolysis temperature increases, and with the increase of metamorphic grade, the temperature of maximum desulfuration shifts to high temperature. Sulfate sulfur content in NXL and JX coal does not change significantly with temperature except for the YX. Pyrite in three kinds of coal are first decomposed into pyrrhotite, with the temperature rise further, pyrite decomposed into troilite completely, and change of the content of organic sulfur in coal is not regulated.@The self-emulsification of low temperature coal tar was examined by considering asphaltene and colloid contents inside the tar. Experiments for dewatering low temperature coal tar was conducted by employing the following methods sequentially: heating, adding demulsifiers, stirring, ultrasonic treating, and centrifuging. The dewatering efficiency of each method was carefully optimized and analyzed. The results indicate that the final dehydration rate of coal tar could reach 51.3% at the optimal conditions :holding at 80 ℃ for 30 min, adding the demulsifier DH 300×10-6, stirring at 100 r/min for 5 min, treating with ultrasound at 0.4 W/cm2 for 1 min and then centrifuging at 5 000 r/min for 10 min.@The composition and distribution of phenolic compounds in low temperature coal tar from Northern Shaanxi were investigated, nine fractions were isolated from L-tar by distillation in <100 ℃, 100 ℃-170 ℃, 170 ℃-200 ℃, 200 ℃-240 ℃, 240 ℃-270 ℃, 270 ℃-300 ℃, 300 ℃-340 ℃, 340 ℃-390 ℃ and ＞390 ℃ respectively. Their compositions and distributions were characterized by gas chromatography/mass spectrometry (GC/MS). The results show that phenols decrease with temperature rising. Phenols mainly enriched in fractions of 100 ℃-200 ℃, 200 ℃-240 ℃ and 240 ℃-270 ℃, which contributed respectively 50.5%, 44.3% and 29.1% of their fractions in quality. The main phenolic compounds in L-tar were low-rank phenols, C3-C4 alkyl-phenols, indenols, hydroquinones, naphthols and alkyl-naphthols.@In this paper, we report a new way to prepare graphene from anthracite through high-temperature heat treatment technology and oxidation reduction method. The results show that the pure superfine graphite powder can be obtained from anthracite with nickel sulfate, ferric oxide and boric acid as catalyst respectively. And then, we prepared the graphene through the redox with the pure superfine graphite powder as the precursor. This work not only extends the raw material source of graphene preparation, but also provides a high additional value utilization approach of anthracite.@Desulfurization of high-sulphur coal with H2O2-CH3COOH solutions was studied. The results showed that H2O2-CH3COOH solution could remove organic sulfur and pyrite sulfur effectively from coal. Based on the experiments, the optimum desulfurization conditions was the initial concentration of H2O2 solution of 10%, n(H2O2)∶n(CH3COOH) of 10, room temperature, reaction time of 60 min, solid-liquid ratio of 3∶1, stirring rate of 300 r/min. Under these conditions, removal rate of pyrite sulfur and organic sulfur in coal could both reach more than 65%. According to further desulfurization mechanism analysis on H2O2-CH3COOH solution system, the results indicated that H2O2 has powerful oxidation by adding CH3COOH. Under the catalytic action of CH3COOH, H2O2 and CH3COOH could react to generate more hydroxyl free base (·OH) and perhydroxyl radical (· OOH) with high electronegativity or electron affinity, which could improve desulfurization reactions and removal more pyrite sulfur or organic sulfur from coal.@Humic acid as basic raw materials, the subjected to sulfomethylation and condensation polymerization reaction, synthesis of a humic acid based dispersant has a good water solubility and higher molecular weight of the new. Change of the amount of sodium sulfite and formaldehyde synthesis of the dispersant process optimization, to determine the optimum amount of 22% and 40%. Using IR, TG and GPC other analytical methods to structural characterization. It was obtained when CWS the concentration of 63% and 0.6% of the amount of dispersant for CWS total weight(dry basis coal)analysis according to the added amount of the dispersing agent on the viscosity and stability of the coal water slurry having the lowest apparent viscosity 588 mPa·s.@In this work, by method of element analysis, Fourier infrared spectrum and 13C CP/MAS NMR, characterizing the molecular structure of brown humic acid (ZFS) and black humic acid (HFS) which extracted from weathered coal. The result showed that aromatic nucleus of ZFS and HFS is mainly composed of aromatic ring structure. HFS aromatic carbon content is two times of ZFS, and aromatization degree of HFS is higher than ZFS. There is some aliphatic side chain existed around the aromatic ring. About half of the carbon atom in aromatic ring of ZFS is replaced by substituent of aliphatic side chain, which mainly consists of linear alkyls. In the long alkyl aliphatic side chain, there are some oxygen atoms which existed in the form of methoxyl or ether. In addition, ZFS aliphatic carbon content is obviously higher than that of HFS. On the other hand, HFS aliphatic carbons may constitute rings containing oxygen or nitrogen atoms. About a third of carbon in aromatic nucleus was replaced. There are also small amounts of phenol hydroxyl or methoxyl groups existed on the rings. To sum up，content of Oxygen-containing functional groups in ZFS is 2 times of HFS and there are some of carboxyl groups existed on the aromatic ring in both kinds of humic acids. Moreover, content of carboxyl group of ZFS is four times of HFS.@This paper takes coal gangue, talcum powder and aluminum oxide as raw materials, according to the theory composition of cordierite to burden, in 1 150 ℃-1 220 ℃ sintering about 2 h-4 h, we synthesize cordierite. Orthogonal analysis shows that, to sample volume shrinkage, the biggest factor is the sintering temperature; SEM shows that the product particle morphology is irregular; XRD analysis finds that impurity existence can significantly reduce the sintering temperature, but at the same time will leads to more produce of impurity phase, so we must pay special attention to the control of the content impurities in raw material. Synthetic cordierite optimal conditions is that sintering temperature is 1 220 ℃, holding time 4 h, abrasive particle size 45 μm.@Water system integration optimization technology theories develop rapidly in recent years. A case study for water system design of a certain coal to methanol factory is undertaken with step analysis method(SAM) by combining water pinch technology with practical condition. Results show that the factory could save fresh water 54 t/h and reduce wastewater discharge 54 t/h without equipment addition.If add reverse osmosis equipment to regenerate concentrate, the factory could reduce fresh water consumption and wastewater discharge 159 t/h respectively. This method particularly applies to retrofit the existing process water network.@Gasification reactivity has to be considered when all kinds of gasification technology select raw materials. It is useful for reasonable utilization of coal, selection of gasification technology and optimization of production process to evaluate gasification reactivity. The methods of measurement and characterization of coal (char) gasification reactivity was introduced in this paper. The advantages, disadvantages and application suitability of these characterization methods were discussed and compared. Combined with status and development of coal gasification technology, the ways to improving the evaluation method of coal/coke gasification activity was put forward.@Two major challenges in today’s energy industry are: increasing the total amount of available energy resources and securing a sustainable future through energy saving and recycling. In order to potentially address these two problems through a single pathway, a new approach which converts coal and induced carbon dioxide into methane by utilizing methanogens originating in coal, is proposed. The approach is evaluated based upon an analysis and comparison of current methods of enhanced coalbed methane recovery (ECBM) including: water injection, CO2-ECBM, hydrofracturing and microbial conversion. A mechanistic study shows that the methanogens are able to generate methane from carbon dioxide and hydrogen during the process of microbial coal decomposition, while induced carbon dioxide may initiate methanogenesis at an early stage and accelerate this process. The feasibility of the approach in-field is further supported by a theoretical analysis of the following: the impact of carbon dioxide on methanogens, the source of the hydrogen, and the sequence of bioactivation and carbon dioxide injection.@
2012
以新疆伊犁南台子煤为考察对象，在常压固定床反应器上和温度500 ℃～700 ℃范围内，系统研究了以氧化铁为主催化剂和硫为助剂时，催化加氢热解过程中产物的分布.结果表明，氧化铁的加入最高可使焦油产率增加约2%，半焦产率下降约4%,水产率增加约4%，气产率略有降低.助剂硫的加入有利于与铁生成Fe1-xS，从而有利于煤的催化加氢热解.@采用等体积浸渍法制备了CoMoP/13X催化剂，利用TG-FTIR技术研究了该催化剂对黄土庙煤热解失重特性和气态产物生成规律的影响，并对不同条件下的煤热解过程进行了动力学分析.结果表明，CoMoP/13X催化剂对黄土庙煤加氢热解有明显的催化作用.与原煤热解相比，催化加氢热解的第二个热解峰温和二次脱气阶段的表观活化能分别降低了27.7 ℃和7.9 kJ/mol.在线FTIR实验结果表明，CoMoP/13X催化剂可以改善黄土庙煤热解产物的组成与分布，热解产物中CO2较大幅度降低，芳烃化合物和脂肪族化合物显著增加，CH4和CO等高热值气体有不同程度的增加.@研究了试样中加水量对褐煤与稻壳共热解过程的影响.在原料中加水再进行热解，考察不同加水量下热解气体产物总量变化规律，并利用气相色谱分析热解气体产物组分的变化情况，同时分析加水量对热解剩余固体产物的影响.结果发现，随着加水量的增多，共热解气体产物总量增多，当加水量为原料质量的60%时气体产物增加最多；此外，加水量增多可以提高共热解气体产物中H2/CO比，但对CO2组分影响不大；不同加水量下固体转化率变化不大，但不同加水量对剩余物表面官能团有一定影响，从加水量为60%开始剩余固体表面含氧官能团有明显减少，这与加水量对气体产物的影响规律相对应.@采用TGA/DSCI/1600HT型同步热分析仪，在氮气气氛下对烟煤、造纸污泥及两者混配物的热解特性进行了研究.结果表明：造纸污泥与烟煤混配物的挥发分综合释放特性指数（即D值）高于烟煤；造纸污泥的加入使混配物的热解反应比单一烟煤更加容易进行,且其挥发分析出特性也明显优于混配前的单一烟煤.@进行了微波加热条件下陕北孙家岔低变质煤与塑料共热解的实验研究.结果表明：随着塑料添加比例的增大，兰炭产率逐渐降低，焦油产率明显提高.当塑料加入量为10%时，焦油产率可达到17%，同时煤气中H2，CO和CH4的含量显著增加，分别可达到44.21%，18.75%和21.97%.塑料的加入有利于提高焦油的回收率，优化热解煤气成分，对煤气的进一步综合利用具有重要意义.@在对等离子体炬辅助煤气化过程中活性物种的特征和反应参数分析的基础上，设计了以证实活性组分的作用实验.通过量子化学计算，发现活性组分单线态氧和O+2等与水分子的氧原子直接作用更显著地改变了水分子结构，更有利于断键形成自由基OH·，OH·可以与煤中的碳发生反应.根据实验工作气体中氧含量对实验主要产物H2,CO和CO2体积分数的回归方程，提出活性组分诱发煤气化反应的可能化学反应通道.@以O2/水蒸气作为气化剂，对褐煤半焦气化过程进行实验研究.结果表明,随着气化温度的提高，在生成的煤气组成中CO和H2含量增加，而CO2和CH4的含量减少，煤气热值和合成气产率均增加；在温度一定时，随着氧气流量的增加，煤气中CO含量和H2含量先增加然后逐渐减少，CO2含量增加，CH4含量减少，煤气热值和合成气产率均存在一个最大值.@采用循环伏安法考察了H2S气体吸收转化生成的含硫物质HS-和S2-x在五价钒V(V)和氧化栲胶以及两者共同作用下的氧化转化过程.结果表明，反应过程可分为初始快速反应阶段和稳定慢速反应阶段.在各反应中，含硫物质和五价钒V(V)的反应速率比其和氧化栲胶的反应速率快；另外，氧化栲胶有助于S2-6的生成，五价钒V(V)能够促进含硫物质向单质硫转化.@对霍林河14煤、补连塔2-2煤和新疆41煤三个不同变质程度煤样，分别进行了加氢液化实验.结果表明，三种煤样的油产率和转化率高低顺序为霍林河14煤、新疆41煤、补连塔2-2煤，并采用红外光谱实验方法对三种煤样液化的差异进行了分析.分析认为，煤中芳香氢和脂氢强度的不同是导致不同煤液化转化率和油收率差异的重要原因；羟基和含氧官能团的丰度则对不同煤液化水产率的高低和气体产物中CO2和CO气体的多少具有较高的影响；此外，利用三个煤样的元素分析数据和红外光谱实验结果，采用Chem3D软件分别模拟建立了三种煤样的分子结构，通过与实验数据比较，认为所建立的煤分子结构比较合理.@以Andreason理论和可压缩堆积模型为基础，对水煤浆颗粒进行了调质计算和堆积效率计算，通过实验验证了计算结果的准确性，探讨了粒度范围和添加量等因素对堆积效率的影响.结果表明，通过调质可以实现煤粉粒度分布的优化，使其尽可能靠近紧密堆积理论所规定的粒度分布特征；用可压缩堆积模型可以很好地预测粉体颗粒的堆积密度，经过调质后原料的堆积效率提高了6.0%；紧密堆积条件下，增大水煤浆颗粒粒度范围有利于提高其堆积效率；随着调质料的增加，系统堆积效率增大，且逼近紧密堆积条件下的堆积效率；只添加细粉时，堆积效率与原料的粒度组成相关.@将干燥的块状煤泥研磨至不同粒度的煤粉，与造纸黑液按一定比例配制成水煤浆，考察其综合性能指标.当黑液添加量为7.2％，煤粉粒度小于160目时，制备的水煤浆浓度为67.44％，流动性为A级，稳定性达到20 d保持良好.改变黑液的pH值，研究其配制的水煤浆，发现废液pH对水煤浆的成浆性没有太大的影响.由于造纸黑液中含有大量有机质，因此还可提高同等条件下水煤浆的燃烧热值.利用GB 213-87测定所制备水煤浆的恒容高位发热量为21.63 MJ/kg，低位发热量为15 MJ/kg.@采用马钢炼焦原料研究了无烟煤与添加剂配煤炼焦新工艺.用无烟煤取代部分焦煤的炼焦实验结果表明，在黏结剂PRT和CMC分别为0.5%条件下，无烟煤配入量为14%时所炼出的焦炭的粒焦反应性比9%无烟煤时所炼的焦更低，而反应后强度则高于加入9%无烟煤时所炼的焦，与不加无烟煤所炼的焦的差距很小；此外，在无烟煤配入量为14%时，改变添加剂配比的炼焦实验结果表明，对3-2，3-3及3-5号配方所炼的焦，具有比较好的落下强度与转鼓指数、较低的粒焦反应性和较高的反应后强度，比较接近不加无烟煤的基准焦配方3-1.@采用固定床反应器对煤焦进行部分氧化处理，然后测定氧化后煤焦在水蒸气和CO2中的气化行为，并用SEM,XRD和N2/CO2吸附对煤焦结构进行表征.结果表明，煤焦低温氧化处理可以显著改善煤焦的孔隙结构，大幅增加比表面积，降低煤焦的有序化和石墨化程度，从而提高其气化活性；并且随氧化程度（burnout）增加，煤焦气化活性不断增加. 随氧化温度升高（>600 ℃），氧化过程逐渐过渡到扩散控制，O2主要在煤焦外表面反应，因而氧化几乎不会改变煤焦的结构，表面积略有增加，对其后续气化活性无明显影响.@以超临界乙醇为抽提溶剂，采用恒容升温法对洗油组分中的氧芴、芴及苊进行超临界乙醇抽提工艺研究，对抽提产物进行GC分析，计算其超临界溶解度和抽提百分比.结果表明，氧芴与芴在超临界乙醇中的溶解性接近,均在反应温度为255 ℃，反应压力为7.0 MPa达到最大超临界溶解度；在反应温度为265 ℃，反应压力为11.0 MPa时超临界乙醇抽提百分比达到最高；苊在超临界乙醇中的抽提效果规律性不明显；超临界乙醇抽提洗油效果差异性明显；抽提完成后溶剂易于回收利用.@以半焦焦粉为主要原料，采用冷压成型工艺制备型煤.重点研究了黏结剂、原料粒度和水分等因素对型煤性能的影响.结果表明，以有机黏结剂制备的型煤抗压强度最大，发热量高，但热稳定性较差；以无机黏结剂制备的型煤抗压强度低，发热量小，但热稳定性好；采用复合黏结剂可以取长补短，发挥出最佳黏结效果.@以膨润土为黏结剂，采用冷压成型制备出型煤，主要研究了膨润土含量、水分、成型压力和粉煤粒度对型煤抗压强度的影响.结果表明：型煤抗压强度、灰分均与膨润土含量成正比，并得出其线性方程，可根据其工艺需要确定膨润土加入量，计算产品的灰分.水分控制在14%~16%，成型压力为40 kN，膨润土含量为7%时，可制备出平均抗压强度为1 420 N/个，灰分为11.7%的型煤.@兰炭末加入黏结剂混合成型，经炭化和活化制得成型活性炭.利用TG-DTG对热解过程中成型料的炭化行为进行探讨；测试不同炭化温度的成型活性炭的收率、抗压强度和碘吸附值，采用N2吸附法和红外光谱对450 ℃炭化成型活性炭的孔结构及表面化学性质进行表征.结果表明，炭化温度越高，成型活性炭的收率越小，抗压强度越小，碘吸附值越大.经450 ℃炭化、800 ℃水蒸气活化60 min制得的活性炭表面具有大量的羟基、羰基和烃羟基等活性基团，比表面积为384.53 m2/g，属于中孔隙发达的活性炭.@利用热塑性中间相沥青为黏结剂，短炭纤维为增强体，一步热压成型制备C/C导热复合材料.采用SEM和偏光显微镜观察等分析手段，研究了2∶1,2.5∶1和3∶1三种不同管径比对C/C复合材料的影响.结果表明：通过热压模具空腔结构的改变可以引起炭前驱体挤出形态的变化，使得轴向基体炭有序生长与短炭纤维增强体呈现有序排列.其中间相液晶分子垂直和平行于模压压力方向均排列成纤维状长程有序结构，短切纤维呈现出与压力平行方向排布.当空腔管径比为3∶1，轴向导热系数由86.2 W/(m·K)增大至115.5 W/(m·K)，各向异性比由1.6减小为1.2.由此所得块体C/C复合材料具有显著的二维取向结构，轴径向导热系数趋于平衡.@以负载型固体碳酸盐为吸附剂，采用流化床反应器对烟道气中二氧化碳的捕集进行了研究.测定了不同吸附剂、操作温度和反应时间对吸附效果的影响及吸附剂再生性能.结果表明，吸附剂为负载的固体碳酸钠，在65 ℃~85 ℃范围内，吸附时间为4 min~10 min，二氧化碳的脱除率达97.5%，吸附剂经过10次再生后达到稳定状态，可以长期使用.@用沉淀法制备了涂覆在微通道内壁面的Ni/Al2O3催化剂，在自行搭建的实验系统上进行了微通道内甲烷/湿空气催化重整的实验研究，考察了催化壁面温度、空碳比及甲烷体积流量对甲烷/湿空气重整转化效率的影响，并与数值计算结果进行对比.结果表明，随着催化温度的升高，甲烷转化率不断升高；相同水碳比下，甲烷的催化转化率随着空碳比的增大而增大；随着甲烷体积流量的增大，甲烷转化效率呈现先增大后减小的变化规律.反应温度为1 023 K，甲烷体积流量为20 mL/min时，实验所得甲烷转化率达到最大值，为61.3%.@从微波加热对煤的除湿干燥，微波辐照对煤可磨性的影响，微波在煤炭脱硫领域的应用和煤的微波热解等方面对微波技术在煤炭加工利用过程中的应用情况进行了综述.指出微波技术具有选择性加热材料、穿透性强、升温速率快、加热效率高、易于控制和安全卫生无污染等特点，使其在煤炭领域中的应用具有广阔前景.@分析了粉煤灰吸收二氧化碳的反应原理，综述了粉煤灰作为二氧化碳吸收剂的研究历程及在节能减排中的应用现状.粉煤灰中吸收二氧化碳的有效成分（氧化钙和氧化镁）含量很低，粉煤灰单纯地作为二氧化碳吸附剂的效率相应较也低，减排的效率低.但利用二氧化碳与粉煤灰的反应，将粉煤灰转变为工业化产品，是一个资源化利用粉煤灰的好方法.@运用文献计量学方法对《煤炭转化》和《燃料化学学报》2010年所刊载的基金论文，从基金论文数量、作者的地域分布、机构分布、基金资助的类型以及作者间合作等方面进行了定量分析.旨在揭示能源化工领域的研究状况并对这两种期刊作了相应的评价，为今后的工作提供参考.@尝试利用电子顺磁共振（EPR）法观察不同产地的中低阶煤在不同温度（350 ℃~600 ℃），不同停留时间（0 min~30 min）下煤热解过程中产生的自由基各参数的变化情况，研究中低阶煤热解过程中自由基的演变.结果表明，用EPR法研究煤热解机理快速直接；依据建立的标准曲线法测定煤热解过程中自由基的浓度更为准确；不同产地的中低阶煤热解过程其自由基的变化趋势基本一致，但其绝对值不同，胜利煤初始自由基浓度3.034 6×1018/g，温度为550 ℃，停留时间10 min时达到最大值26.686 0×1018/g，新疆煤初始自由基浓度为15.283 0×1018/g，温度为600 ℃，停留时间10 min时达到最大值57.537 0×1019/g；该方法为进一步探讨煤热解机理和提高轻质焦油产率的工艺提供理论依据.@以山西沁水盆地寺河矿无烟煤为研究对象，采用溶剂萃取法，对四类不同煤体结构的煤样分别用苯、四氢呋喃（THF）和1-甲基-2-吡咯烷酮（NMP）溶剂进行萃取，结合柱层析法，对煤样萃取物进行了族组成分析.研究发现，随煤体结构破坏程度的增加，煤样的溶剂萃取率增大.其中NMP溶剂的萃取率最大，THF次之，苯溶剂萃取率最小；随着煤体结构破坏程度的增高，萃取物中的族组成呈现总烃的含量相对下降、非烃类化合物含量总体增加的变化规律.其中，饱和烃类含量减少，芳香烃含量和非烃含量相对增加，而沥青质组分的相对含量减少.@为了分析溶损反应动力学行为对焦炭反应后强度的影响，在1 050 ℃～1 300 ℃的范围内，对三种典型焦炭进行了等温溶损反应实验.当焦炭的溶损失重率为25%时停止反应，通过I型转鼓检测焦炭的溶损后强度.结果表明，不同反应性的焦炭发生最严重的劣化梯度反应时的温度不同，高反应性焦炭为1 100 ℃左右，低于其他两种焦炭.虽然高反应性焦炭发生最严重的劣化梯度反应后的强度很低，但改变反应温度使反应速率加快或减慢都能使高反应性焦炭的反应后强度显著地提高.@对西北地区石炭纪高硫煤进行热解实验，考察了热解温度（200 ℃~1 000 ℃）和热解停留时间（20 min~100 min）对煤中形态硫的迁移特性的影响，并通过FTIR分析了热解过程中半焦的结构变化情况.研究表明,高硫煤中全硫随热解温度的升高先减小后增大，在600 ℃时达到最低；硫酸盐硫的含量较低，维持在0%~0.5%之间；硫化铁硫随着热解温度的升高逐渐减小；有机硫随热解温度的升高先减小后增大，在500 ℃时达到最低.无机硫脱除率高于有机硫脱除率.煤热解过程中氧和硫等杂原子官能团在半焦中不断减弱.@采用微波加热技术对低变质煤与油页岩的共热解特性进行探讨，研究了不同配比混合物的热解产物产率及成分，并通过气相色谱-质谱（GC-MS）联用技术对液体产物的成分进行了分析.结果表明：微波热解过程中，适当配入低变质煤可提高焦油产率，增加热解气中可燃气体CO，CH4及H2的含量；微波热解共混物所得焦油成分主要是烃类（约50%~80%），其中烷烃和芳香烃居多（约40%~50%左右），其次是少量的以苯酚类为主的含氧化合物，而并未检测出含氮化合物，这一组成有利于焦油的进一步加氢处理.@利用自行设计的新型煤气化炉，实现了不同碳质原料的气化实验.分析了气化对载能材料的纯度、晶体形态及产量的影响，研究了烟煤的高温孔隙结构和焦炭的高温表面碳微粉对6H-SiC多型含量的影响，指出气化对载能材料质量无影响,烟煤高温孔隙率高、断面结构复杂及烟煤焦炭的高温表面碳微粉是造成6H-SiC多型含量高的主要原因.@针对淮南矿区高灰熔融性煤难以直接用于现有液态排渣煤气化工艺的问题，利用智能灰熔点测定仪和X-射线衍射仪(XRD)在弱还原性气氛下，分别对淮南矿区煤样以及添加助熔剂后灰熔融温度和煤灰矿物行为进行了研究.结果表明，随着灰化温度的升高，高岭石转变为莫来石；碳酸盐矿物逐渐分解.助熔剂ADF和ADC在不同的温度下，容易与煤灰中其他矿物形成硬石膏、赤铁矿、铁尖晶石、铁橄榄石和钙长石等助熔矿物，从而降低煤灰熔融温度.@以兖州煤为研究对象，采用微型反应釜研究了两种铁系催化剂对煤高温快速液化的影响.结果表明，担载Fe2S3的催化剂和高分散铁系催化剂对煤的热解行为影响较小；担载Fe2S3催化剂促进了氢气参与反应和煤液化产物向轻质化转化，在优秀和足量的供氢溶剂条件下，溶剂的供氢速度明显优于氢气转换的供氢速度,催化剂的作用不明显；对比添加高分散铁系催化剂并加助剂S和添加Fe2S3催化剂的煤高温快速液化，发现元素S的作用与S和主催化剂铁的结合形态有关.@在溶煤比为2.75∶1，氢初压为6.0 MPa和反应时间为60 min条件下，考察了温度、飞灰加入量、CoSO4和NiSO4用量及其加入方式等因素对五彩湾煤直接液化性能的影响.结果表明，在给定的条件下，在飞灰加入量为3%（daf，质量分数）和温度为415 ℃时，可获得最大油产率为64.59%；当CoSO4和NiSO4与飞灰和煤样机械混合加入时，对液化油产率和转化率产生负效应；当NiSO4和CoSO4浸渍担载加入时，油产率分别达到68.01%和66.58%.尽管煤质分析结果表明该煤样加氢液化性能较差，但以飞灰、CoSO4和NiSO4为催化剂时，还是获得了良好的液化效果.@由于神府煤内在水分含量高且氧含量高，很难制得高浓度的水煤浆.通过粒度配比和分散剂复配等实验，研究其成浆工艺条件，得出神府煤三级级配粒度比为500目∶325目∶200目=5∶1∶4，复配添加剂月桂醇聚氧乙烯醚和木质素磺酸钠比为0.8∶0.8时，可以制备出黏度为1 020 mPa·s，稳定性为15 d，浓度为62%的较高浓度水煤浆.@以贵州省开阳煤为研究对象，分析了开阳煤的煤质特性，按照烟煤成浆性难度指标D对开阳煤成浆性进行了评价.以开阳煤为原料配制水煤浆，对成浆性和流变特性进行了分析.结果表明，开阳煤比较容易制浆，煤浆具有较好的流动性，并表现出假塑性流体特性.添加剂YKL用量为0.15%时，煤浆更具有经济实用的优势.从煤浆黏度、流动性和流变特性分析得出，浓度63%的开阳煤水煤浆满足水煤浆加压气化技术的要求.@在氧化还原体系中，以淀粉为主链，以苯乙烯和丙烯酸羟乙酯为单体，通过无皂乳液聚合法制备了一种梳状淀粉接枝共聚物水煤浆分散剂，通过红外光谱、Zeta电位和动态接触角对其结构和性能进行表征和分析，并考察了分散剂的用量和水煤浆浓度对神华煤制浆性能的影响.分散剂用量为0.5%（质量分数），水煤浆浓度为65%（质量分数）时，水煤浆的分散性能最佳，表观黏度为852 mPa·s.@利用计算流体动力学（CFD）软件，采用标准k-ε模型、组分传输模型、多孔介质模型以及P1辐射模型对内热式低温干馏方炉内温度场进行了数值模拟.研究表明，改变燃气比时，燃气入口处温度分布趋势不变，低温干馏炉内达到的最高温度受燃气比影响较大，当燃气比为0.6时，最高温度可达到1 870 ℃.根据低温干馏原理，并结合炉内煤层温度分布的模拟结果，确定了最优的燃气比为1.8.@以乌煤和自洗蒙古煤为原料，采用TG-DTG法，应用非等温动力学方法研究了升温速率和粒径对煤着火特性的影响，并得出两种煤燃烧过程的动力学参数.根据煤燃烧产物释放特性指数R的大小来确定煤的燃烧性能.在实验条件下得出以下结论：1） 乌煤在升温速率较低时，挥发分释放特性指数R值大，燃烧特性好，对煤着火有利；而升温速率对自洗蒙古煤的燃烧性能影响不大；2） 乌煤:粒径0.2  mm~0.3 mm失重量最大，粒径小于0.15 mm和0.15 mm~0.2 mm失重量基本一致.自洗蒙古煤：粒径0.2 mm~0.3 mm失重量最小，粒径小于0.15 mm失重量和0.15 mm~0.2 mm失重量基本一致；3） 通过对两种煤燃烧过程的动力学分析，得出乌煤燃烧过程的活化能高于自洗蒙古煤.@在内辊式高压型煤机上将一种印度尼西亚褐煤压制成高强度的无黏结剂型煤，对其比表面积、孔容积和表面官能团进行分析，测定了型煤的相对着火温度和绝热氧化升温速率，研究了其热解和燃烧行为特性.结果表明，印尼褐煤在干燥和高压成型过程中，发生了孔的收缩和崩塌，特别是微孔收缩程度要更大一些；干燥和成型过程中有羟基、羰基和羧基含氧官能团的分解；经过提质处理后，褐煤的自燃着火倾向降低，热解和燃烧反应性降低.@为研究燃煤过程中亚微米颗粒的形成机理，选取了三种烟煤在沉降炉内燃烧，用X射线荧光光谱和透射电子显微镜能量色散谱仪联用对煤和亚微米灰中的矿物质进行分析，研究内生态和游离态的矿物质的转化过程.结果表明,与碳结构的结合方式决定了矿物质向亚微米颗粒的转化.游离态矿物质很少转化成亚微米灰颗粒，但其组成却影响着Si和Al的转化.@采用浸渍法制备了不同Cr2O3含量的Cr2O3/γ-Al2O3系列催化剂，研究了Cr2O3/γ-Al2O3催化剂焙烧温度、甲烷浓度及反应空速对甲烷催化活性的影响，并考察了催化剂的抗硫中毒能力.结果表明，该法制备的Cr2O3/γ-Al2O3系列催化剂具有较好的低温催化活性，且随Cr2O3含量的增加，催化剂活性先增加后降低；Cr2O3含量为20%的Cr2O3/γ-Al2O3催化剂的甲烷催化燃烧活性与甲烷浓度呈正相关，与反应空速呈负相关关系.实验表明，400 ℃焙烧制备的Cr2O3含量为20%的Cr2O3/γ-Al2O3催化剂具有较好的甲烷低温催化活性，且具有较强的抗硫中毒能力.@单一氧化锌负载型脱硫剂脱硫精度可达到0.1×10-6，但其硫容量相对较低.采用共浸渍法制备ZnO-MnO2/γ-Al2O3负载型H2S脱硫剂，通过XRD和BET等手段研究了MnO2对脱硫剂物相及比表面积的影响.并在固定床反应器中考察了Zn/Mn摩尔比、负载量、烧结温度和脱硫温度对脱硫性能的影响.结果表明,活性组分锌锰摩尔比为8∶1，负载量为20%的脱硫剂有较好的脱硫性能,脱硫精度小于0.1×10-6的同时，最高硫容量可达19.08 g S/100 g(ZnO-MnO2). MnO2的加入可以明显改善氧化锌负载型脱硫剂的脱硫性能.@对CaO吸收CO2反应的特性进行了实验研究，采用未反应收缩核模型分析碳酸化反应动力学特性.结果表明，化学反应速率常数在650 ℃~750 ℃范围内基本为一常数，产物层扩散系数随着温度的增加而增大.化学反应控制段的活化能Ea=29.70 kJ/moL，产物控制段的活化能Ea=92.80 kJ/moL.温度一定时，随着CO2体积分数增加，碳酸化反应速率加快，转化率增大.@以多种陕北机制兰炭为原料，采用KOH活化法，在氮气氛的管式炉中进行高温活化，制备出了BET比表面为810.017 2 m2/g，BJH平均孔径为6.579 3 nm的活性炭.考察了活化温度、时间、碱炭比、碱炭混合方式和兰炭种类等对活性炭吸附性能的影响，确定活性炭的最佳制备工艺为：以兴茂兰炭为原料，KOH干粉法活化，活化条件为800 ℃下1 h，碱炭比为5∶1.@为了研究煤热解过程中升温速率及热解温度对热解产物分布及热解过程吸热量的影响，采用热重和热红联用技术对煤热解过程进行了分析.研究了不同升温速率和热解温度对煤热解过程的气态产物分布的影响，并对所产生的焦炭性质进行了分析.结果表明：煤的整个热解过程的吸热量随升温速率的增加而减小；煤热解产生的焦油组分含量包括芳香族、脂环族和脂肪族含量达到最大值所对应的热解温度随升温速率的增加产生滞后现象，但是煤热解产生的煤气成分随着升温速率增加而急剧释放；随着热解温度的升高，焦炭结构逐渐致密，裂纹及裂缝产生，芳香晶核增大，同时焦炭中的氧和氮含量由于含氮和含氧化合物的继续分解而降低.@采用热重分析仪和微型流化床分别考察了不同煤阶五个煤样的程序升温和等温快速热解的挥发分析出特性和反应动力学.程序升温实验揭示了热解气体的析出顺序依次为CO2，CO，CH4和H2，而等温热解实验证明CO2和CO的析出先于CH4和H2.微型流化床等温快速热解的挥发分气体总量析出活化能为17 kJ/mol～35 kJ/mol，小于程序升温热解的活化能.CO2和CO的反应级数与1接近，而CH4和H2的反应级数与1偏差较大，反映了这两类气体在生成机制上存在差异.@以煤岩组分浮选分离为目标，研究了pH值、表面活性剂以及无机调整剂对不同煤岩组分Zeta电位的影响及其规律性.结果表明，改变体系pH值、添加阳离子表面活性剂CTAB及无机调整剂AlCl3都有利于增大镜煤与丝炭的表面电性差异，且pH值和药剂量对神府煤岩组分Zeta电位的影响具有协同作用.@立足于煤泥的生产现状，利用热分析方法，研究了石圪台煤泥和浮选后的精细煤泥在不同的升温速率条件下的二氧化碳气化反应，得到了气化反应的TG/DTG曲线，并计算了气化转化率，考察了浮选对煤泥气化特性的影响.选用Coats-Redfern和Doyle近似式对气化过程进行动力学模拟，求解了气化反应活化能和指前因子.结果表明，煤泥和精细煤泥的活化能均随升温速率的增大而减小；在相同的升温速率下，两者的活化能相差不大；煤泥中含量较高的矿物质和灰分对气化具有催化作用.@基于Aspen Plus流程模拟软件，运用Gibbs自由能最小化方法建立了Shell粉煤气化模拟计算模型，对新疆准东一采区的煤种进行气化过程模拟优化.以（CO+H2）摩尔分数最高为目标函数，通过单因素研究确立的最佳操作条件为：气化压力2 MPa，氧煤比0.73 kg/kg和蒸汽煤比0.09 kg/kg；而通过虚拟正交实验研究，获得的最佳操作条件为：气化压力2 MPa，氧煤比0.78 kg/kg和蒸汽煤比0.05 kg/kg.各因素对气化过程影响大小顺序为：氧煤比和水煤比的交互作用＞氧煤比＞水煤比＞气化压力.@利用高压釜和加压固定床反应器，通过对水热改质前后煤的工业分析、元素分析以及水热改质废水气化过程中的碳转化率、气体产物分析，研究了内蒙褐煤在不同温度下的水热改质效果及水热改质废水在催化剂作用下的气化特性.结果表明，水热改质可以脱除煤中水分，降低氧含量，提高固定碳和元素碳含量；水热改质废水中有机质的气化反应活性较好，催化气化时气化速率和碳转化率较高；气化能将水中的含碳有机质转化为可回收利用的燃气，燃气的主要成分为H2，CO2和CH4，而CO含量很少.@对影响神华煤直接液化性能的8个因素进行分析可知，各因素对煤液化反应具有不同的影响；在工业生产中，对影响液化生成油液固分离因素分析可知，液固分离效果对液化油产率有很重要的影响.同时对影响因素进行分析并提出了优化装置操作的调整措施，为实际生产调整操作、装置稳定运行以及进一步确定合适的工艺条件提供一定的参考，为提高装置的生产效率和煤直接液化技术逐渐走向成熟打下基础.最后提出了煤直接加氢液化产业化的关键不仅仅是工艺技术问题，其设备运行的可靠性也不可忽视.@以四氢呋喃为抽提溶剂，利用索氏提取器对兖州煤进行了抽提处理.对原煤与所得到的抽余煤进行了扫描电镜、N2吸附脱附、热重和红外分析并进行了高温快速液化实验.通过与原煤的对比，考察了溶剂索氏抽提对煤的结构和液化反应性的影响.结果表明：抽余煤结构和热解行为均发生了明显改变；与原煤相比较，其高温快速液化的转化率有明显提高；低分子化合物对无外在活性氢来源的煤高温快速液化明显起到提供氢源的作用.@采用综合热分析仪(STA409PC)，系统研究了分别配加0%，20%，40%，60%，80%，100%烟煤对无烟煤煤粉燃烧特性的影响.结果表明，随着烟煤配加量的增加，燃烧DTG曲线呈现双峰状向低温区移动，着火温度及燃尽温度降低，燃尽时间缩短，综合燃烧指数明显提高，燃烧特性得到改善；采用非等温模型Flynn-Wall-Ozawa（FWO）对主要燃烧过程进行动力学分析，当烟煤配加量从0%~100%时，煤粉燃烧活化能从133.94 kJ/mol降低到78.03 kJ/mol，且烟煤的配加量低于60%时，能够显著降低煤粉燃烧的活化能.@燃煤在循环流化床锅炉中的破碎特性极大地改变了物料的粒度分布，对床内颗粒浓度、物料传热传质及煤颗粒的燃烧过程都有重要影响.由于循环流化床锅炉本身的复杂性及实验现象难于观察，在1台管式炉中研究了各种煤的一次破碎特性.实验发现，烟煤、贫煤、无烟煤和煤矸石的破碎形式并不相同.烟煤颗粒遵循环核分层破碎；贫煤、无烟煤既有表面破碎也有中心破碎，且少数颗粒因热爆性而迅速变为细小颗粒；煤矸石沿着颗粒层面发生破碎，破碎为一些碎片；此外，深入研究了颗粒粒径、炉膛温度和加热气氛对西山贫煤和阳泉无烟煤一次破碎特性的影响.@通过数值模拟的方式，研究了新型液排渣燃烧器在不同过量空气系数下的速度、温度以及组分浓度的分布情况.结果表明，在较小的过量空气系数（α=0.7,0.8）时，煤的燃尽情况较差；α≥1.0时，煤粉燃烧更完全，但却不利于氮氧化物的控制.采用分级燃烧的方式，控制燃烧器内为欠氧燃烧（取α=0.9）以降低局部氧浓度，既能达到液态排渣要求，又可抑制NOx的生成，并在高温烟气进入炉膛降温之后再补充燃尽风，使得可燃成分在炉膛内再次燃烧，提高燃尽率.通过模拟与实验相结合的方式，对燃烧器进行三种不同负荷下的热态实验研究，该燃烧器负荷适应性好，模拟结果与实验结果相吻合.@研究“褐煤干燥-炭化-脱杂-成型-活化”制备高碘吸附值的碳质吸附剂的工艺，得出活化温度、活化时间和水蒸气用量对碳质吸附剂产品产率和碘吸附值的影响规律.通过实验得到最佳工艺条件为：活化温度为700 ℃，活化时间为4 h，水蒸气用量分别控制为1.2 kg/（kg料·h），0.9 kg/（kg料·h）和0.78 kg/（kg料·h）时得到各碘吸附值的碳质吸附剂产品产率分别可达28%(1 048 mg/g），31%（800 mg/g）和32.5%（700 mg/g）.经过扫描电子显微镜的观察，碳质吸附剂产品结构更加疏松，微孔有增大的趋势.@通过吸附穿透曲线和吸附容量，考察了两种活性炭吸附剂在不同气氛条件下SO2和NO的常温吸附性能.结果表明，无氧条件下，活性炭对NO吸附能力较弱；有氧时，O2可促进NO在活性炭上的吸附转化；无氧条件下，活性炭吸附SO2的性能远远强于吸附NO；O2的存在均可提高两种活性炭对NO和SO2的吸附能力.预吸附NO形成的某些NOx物种可促进SO2吸附.SO2对NO的吸附有明显抑制作用.同时吸附时，SO2和NO不会单独占据同一活性中心，即SO2与NO可能有共同的吸附位，并形成新的吸附态中间产物.且比较两种活性炭的常温吸附性能，椰壳活性炭强于煤质活性炭.@活性炭纤维是以高聚物为原料，经高温炭化和活化而制成的一种纤维状高效吸附分离材料.利用废旧有机丝为原料，探索在不同工艺条件下制取活性炭纤维的可行性.经扫描电镜、X射线衍射、红外分光光度计及亚甲基蓝吸附实验分析得出优化的工艺条件为：炭化温度，650 ℃；用CO2活化，活化温度为950 ℃，活化时间为60 min，制得吸附性能优良的活性炭纤维.@用四川宜宾贫煤、大安寨油基钻屑及废泥浆配制三元型煤,以洁净型煤标准中的低位发热量和干燥无灰基挥发分为主要指标,通过正交实验优化得到最优配比为56∶35∶9,实测主要指标符合洁净型煤标准规定值,并优于普通民用型煤.三元型煤为钻井废物资源化提供了一个低碳环保的技术路线.@以小麦秸秆和电厂粉煤灰为原料，辅以外加药剂（水泥、石灰、石膏及水玻璃），经混合、成球、陈化和养护工序，制得小麦秸秆-粉煤灰纤维陶粒（以下简称纤维陶粒）.以比表面积（SSA）为主要考察指标，通过单因素实验和正交实验，考察了秸秆用量、秸秆粒径及外加药剂对秸秆-粉煤灰纤维陶粒性能的影响.结果表明，外加药剂对秸秆-粉煤灰纤维陶粒SSA的影响主次顺序为：石灰>水玻璃>水泥>石膏；最佳制备方案为：选用经2次粉碎后的小麦秸秆，秸秆的用量为10%，即秸秆与粉煤灰的质量配比为1∶9，外加药剂：石灰8%，水玻璃2%，水泥3%及石膏2.5%，在优组合下制得的纤维陶粒的SSA为7.925 m2/g.@从生物质原料的工业分析结果和木质素含量两个角度出发，分析了二者对生物质炭化的影响.对生物质炭化原料进行选择，认为木材类生物质适合作为生物质炭化的原料，可加强对树木枝条、锯末及薪炭林的炭化；为实现生物质炭化的工业化，还应设计利用烟气余热等热源来热解生物质的换热器，这项设计需知道生物质热解需热量.运用热重-差示扫描（TG-DSC）同步热分析仪对选用的木屑进行热解实验并利用DSC曲线对木屑炭化需热量进行分析.结果表明，木屑炭化终温为500 ℃时(初始温度为40 ℃)，需热量为491 kJ/kg.提出DSC曲线在工业用热解换热器传热设计和校核中的应用方法.@通过实验确定了生物质煤基燃料炭（BCFC）的制备工艺，研究了BCFC的成型机理和燃烧特性.结果表明，BCFC的制备工艺是将禹州煤、玉米秸秆和黏结剂按照81∶6∶13的质量比混合成型，再经700 ℃炭化处理.生物质型煤的内部结构、禹州煤和有机黏结剂的黏结性是BCFC成型的保证.市售燃料炭在燃烧初期燃烧强度较大，但持久性逊于BCFC，这与二者挥发分、固定碳和发热量的差异有关.@以生物质型煤为炭化原料，以Na2CO3，NaHCO3及NaOH为催化剂，研究了催化活化在活性焦制备过程中的作用，并通过烧失率和碘吸附值对影响效果进行了分析.结果表明，Na2CO3，NaHCO3及NaOH在型煤炭化制备活性焦过程中都具有一定的作用，而Na2CO3的催化效果最为显著；催化剂的碱性对活化同样具有重要的影响，碱性越强则效果越好.@研究了粉煤灰两步法水热合成沸石过程中，粉煤灰中Si和Al在不同NaOH浓度溶液下的溶出规律及溶出浓度；采用XRD和CEC测试手段探讨了晶化过程中的温度、时间和NaOH浓度三个参数对晶化产物的影响，得到了最佳的工艺参数：晶化温度为100 ℃，时间为4 h，NaOH浓度为2.5 M.在此条件下，合成出了结晶良好且纯度较高的NaA沸石，其CEC值为4.3 mmol/g.@在单向晶须增强树脂基复合材料的轴对称模型和已有研究成果基础上，利用有限元分析方法，研究该类复合材料中晶须长径比的变化对材料整体力学行为的影响.结果表明：1) 晶须长径比对晶须应力作用明显大于对基体的影响；2) 晶须的长径比h/r≤30时，随着晶须长径比的增大，发生在晶须端部处的集中应力急剧增加；但当长径比h/r≥30时，长径比的进一步增加对集中应力影响不大；3) 随着晶须长径比的增大，界面剪切应力减小，分布曲线下移；但当长径比h/r≥30时，长径比的进一步增加对剪切应力影响不大；4) 随着晶须长径比的增加，复合材料的拉伸强度逐渐增大.@为了揭示煤中可溶组分的赋存形式和溶出行为，用溶剂CS2对梁家长焰煤镜质组（LJJY）进行了索氏萃取，对按时间段分批（次）提取萃取物进行了FTIR和GC/MS的定性分析和定量分析.结果表明，LJJY用CS2溶剂进行索氏萃取时，初期萃取速率较快，后期减慢，总萃取率不高；CS2可溶物的溶出过程为：萃取初期溶出的主要是脂肪烃而取代芳烃较少，随反应进行，脂肪烃溶出量越来越少而取代芳烃含量则相对增多，此后溶解的主要是非取代的芳族化合物和含氧化合物；煤变质过程中主要存在着三类反应即芳构化反应、裂解碎化稳定反应和缩合反应.@采用酸洗脱钙和添加矿物质的方法，运用灰熔点测定仪研究了不同赋存形态的含钙矿物及含量对褐煤灰熔融特性的影响.结果表明，有机钙在灰化过程中生成的氧化钙微晶比含钙矿物质生成的氧化钙颗粒更易于与其他矿物质作用形成玻璃体或钙长石、钙黄长石等低熔点共融物，从而导致褐煤灰熔点的下降.两种褐煤灰的灰熔点都随CaO含量的增加先降低后升高，在CaO含量为30%~35%时达到最低值.随着CaO含量的增加，霍林河煤灰在SiO2-Al2O3-CaO三元相图中由高熔点的莫来石区移动到较低熔点的钙长石和钙黄长石区，最后到达灰熔点较高的硅酸二钙区；小龙潭煤灰由钙长石到钙黄长石区，最后达到硅酸二钙区.@将野生浮萍与长焰煤以不同比例掺混，采用自行设计的煤干馏实验装置进行生物质与煤共热解实验，对液体产物煤焦油进行GC-MS分析，以探索生物质与煤低温共热解的反应及煤焦油轻质化规律.同时采用热重分析仪，探讨生物质添加对煤热解过程的影响机理.结果表明，随着混合样品中生物质量的增加，焦油收率增大10%左右，焦油中直链烷烃及高附加值的萘、酚和芴等化合物得到一定的富集，实现了低温煤焦油轻质化的目的.样品失重率增大，TG曲线向低温区移动，热解活化能逐渐减小，长焰煤、生物质及其混合物热分解动力学模型符合准一级动力学方程，两者的掺混促进了整个反应的进行.@研究了低变质煤与塑料混合物在微波场中的热解.采用红外分析和GC-MS法对焦油进行了分析表征，重点阐述了冷凝温度对焦油产率及成分的影响规律.结果表明，随着冷凝温度的降低，焦油产率逐渐增大，煤气产率逐渐降低.当冷凝温度从25 ℃降低为-10 ℃时，焦油中烷烃、烯烃和酚类的含量呈现下降的趋势，而芳香烃的含量却呈现明显的上升趋势，其中烷烃、烯烃和酚类物质含量分别降低为12.701%，7.044%和7.923%，芳香烃含量增加到50.572%.焦油中C5~C10的轻质油组分由43.545%降为22.976%，而C11~C18中质油含量由32.730%增加到51.374%，而C19以上的重质油成分变化不是很明显.@针对褐煤的热解-部分气化残炭燃烧梯级利用工艺，以宁夏石沟驿褐煤为原料，采用水平管式炉在700 ℃～950 ℃温度范围内分别制备快速和慢速热解煤焦，考察了煤焦微晶结构和比表面积随制焦条件的变化.利用热重质谱联用技术研究煤焦CO2气化反应特性，并采用不同评价指标对煤焦气化活性进行了表征.结果表明：气化温度每升高50 ℃，煤焦CO2气化反应速率增加50%以上；热解温度升高，虽然煤焦微晶结构的有序化程度加深，比表面积减小，但煤焦CO2气化反应活性主要受气化温度影响；快速热解煤焦的CO2气化反应活性高于慢速热解煤焦，二者的差异随着气化温度升高而增大；表征煤焦CO2气化活性的平均比气化速率和反应性指数存在线性关系.@针对目前我国能源短缺及高灰粉煤难以有效利用的现状，选用义马跃进矿煤为原料，结合其煤质特点，对其合适的高效利用方式进行了探讨，提出了利用流化床气化是比较适宜的加工利用方式，并且在内径3.0 m，高16 m的工业化气化炉上进行了工业化实验验证.通过对工业化实验的稳定性进行分析，发现在气化过程过中气化炉温度、压力、煤气产率及其组成波动较小，气化炉基本处于稳态运行（尤其在100%负荷下），进一步验证了选用流化床气化加工跃进煤的可行性.@选择超临界甲醇处理的方法脱除锡林浩特褐煤中的含氧化合物，主要考察了温度、压力、催化剂种类和预处理方式等对脱氧效果的影响.结果表明，在一定温度和压力范围内，脱氧率随温度和压力的增加而增加.温度330 ℃时脱氧率达到最大，继续升高温度脱氧率有所降低.碱性催化剂比酸性催化剂更有利于提高脱氧率.在相同的温度和压力等处理条件下，经过溶胀预处理的煤样脱氧率比原煤提高了5.39%，而煤样含水与否对脱氧率的影响则不明显.因此若得到较高的萃取率，应先对煤样进行溶胀预处理，使用碱性催化剂，温度和压力至少达到甲醇临界状态.煤粉经甲醇浸泡溶胀8 h后，采用5∶1的溶煤比，以煤样质量1%的NaOH固体为催化剂，在温度330 ℃，压力8.2 MPa条件下处理60 min，该条件下脱氧率达到了32.94%.@以洗油为供氢溶剂，考察了溶煤比、反应温度和氢初压对新疆五彩湾煤样加氢液化性能的影响.结果表明，在煤液化中，洗油部分加氢，生成具有强供氢能力的物质，增强其供氢能力，可以作液化溶剂，且溶煤比由四氢萘为溶剂的3降低到1.75；虽然氢初压为8.0 MPa，但反应终压为16.3 MPa，与四氢萘为溶剂时相当；油产率达到59.24%，转化率达到81.05%.@新疆煤水分含量高不宜制取水煤浆，但因其灰分含量低，用其制备油水煤浆有广阔的应用前景.实验研究了新疆煤制油水煤浆的成浆条件，以及不同条件下煤浆的性能.实验结果表明，以木质素磺酸钠为分散剂，聚丙烯酰胺10 000为稳定剂，煤粉50 g，柴油23 mL，水26 mL时，制取的油水煤浆的静态稳定性和黏度最佳.以十二烷基苯磺酸钠和月桂醇聚氧乙烯醚按1∶1进行复配制取的煤浆比使用单一分散剂制取的煤浆效果要好.@以催化裂化油浆为原料，采用带程序升温控制多管井式坩埚炉和单管井式坩埚炉，及带有气流导向结构的反应器制备了高度有序中间相焦.重点考察了两种反应器结构对中间相有序生长的影响，依此探索气流导向作用对中间相焦有序生长的影响和中间相有序结构在高温处理过程中的发展变化.结果表明，原料在带有气流导向装置反应器中进行热聚合反应的过程中，在上升气流的引导作用下中间相微球之间实现有序融并、逐步发展为区域结构，由此可制备得到有序性发展良好的中间相焦.合理的煅烧温度制度可以使中间相焦有序结构与性能进一步完善和提高.@采用自主开发的低温萃取系统对盛隆煤焦油中的轻质组分和重质组分进行了萃取分离.对投料方式进行了比较优化，分析讨论了溶剂配比对轻质组分和重质组分萃取率的影响，探讨了萃取次数对组分溶解析出规律和工艺可操作性的影响.采用GC/MS对轻质组分进行了定性和定量分析，发现其中多为纯多环缩合芳烃，轻质组分当中含有较高量的萘，其相对含量为23.10%.@在不同浓度的硝酸中对针状焦样品进行活化处理后，用红外光谱和X射线衍射分析表征了样品的表面成分及其内部结构，通过循环伏安法测试了样品的电化学性能.研究结果表明，经硝酸活化处理后针状焦的表面含氧官能团羧基、羟基和羰基的含量增加；针状焦的平均微晶尺寸有所降低；针状焦的比电容从活化前到活化后提高了64.1%.@采用超滤分级的方法筛选出相对分子质量在5 000~10 000的木质素磺酸钠，对其进行了丙烯酸接枝聚合.通过傅立叶红外光谱分析(FTIR)对其结构进行了表征，并测定了其表面张力、接触角以及进行了水煤浆性能测试.实验表明，与木质素磺酸钠相比，接枝聚合产物LA能更有效地降低表面张力，接触角θLA<θ木质素磺酸钠，应用于水煤浆(CWS)添加剂可使黏度降低100 mPa·s~300 mPa·s，与萘磺酸钠作添加剂的水煤浆黏度相当, 水煤浆的静态稳定性也明显增强.@N2吸附法是表征多孔材料孔结构的最常用的方法，具有操作简便、样品可回收的优点.N2吸附法测量结果通过不同的数学模型处理，获得微孔（<2 nm）和中大孔（2 nm~100 nm）数据.应用N2吸附法和扫描电镜对煤基活性炭进行了系统的表征研究，从理论上对BJH法进行了探讨，归纳出了四种典型活性炭的吸附等温线.结合N2吸附法的吸附-脱附数据及扫描电镜表征结果，对其孔结构特点进行全面分析.@利用热重分析仪研究生石灰对褐煤燃烧特性的影响，采用了描述煤燃烧着火及燃尽性能的燃烧特性指数S，可燃性指数C和着火稳燃特性综合判别指标Rw，并根据热动力学方法计算各过程的热动力学参数，即活化能E和频率因子A.结果表明，在加入生石灰后，褐煤燃烧明显分为两个阶段，并且随着生石灰混合比例的增加，前期的燃烧强度逐渐减弱，后期的燃烧强度逐渐增强.当生石灰的添加量在20%左右时，试样的活化能较原煤略有降低，且最大燃烧速率比原煤快，但随着生石灰添加量继续增加，燃尽性能变差.@采用热分析技术详细研究了生物质玉米秸秆及牛粪对粉煤燃烧特性的影响.结果表明，在粉煤中添加一定量的玉米秸秆或牛粪，能显著改善粉煤的燃烧性能.生物质与粉煤混合料的着火点明显低于粉煤，混合料达到最大燃烧速度时的温度范围明显小于粉煤，使粉煤在一个较窄的温度区间内迅速完全燃烧.随着混合料中粉煤比例的逐渐增加，生物质的促燃效果逐渐减弱.玉米秸秆对粉煤燃烧性能的优化效果明显好于牛粪.@考察了焙烧温度对Ni-SiO2作为浆态床甲烷化催化剂性能的影响，通过浆态床反应器评价以及TG，TPR，XRD和BET表征，得出Ni-SiO2催化剂在350 ℃时就完全转化为氧化镍形态.焙烧温度是影响催化剂活性组分粒径大小及比表面积的非常重要的因素.在实验范围内，随着焙烧温度的升高，活性组分的粒径在增大，催化剂的比表面积降低，催化剂(经还原后)的催化活性则先增加后降低.说明对于Ni-SiO2甲烷化催化剂，焙烧温度过高或者过低都会降低催化剂的催化活性，在实验范围内催化剂的焙烧温度在450 ℃~550 ℃范围内比较适宜.@选取贵州省某村煤、粉煤灰、土壤及农作物作为研究对象进行砷含量研究，并采用逐级化学提取法对粉煤灰进行形态分析.结果表明：该研究区煤、土壤及粉煤灰中砷含量均严重超标，普遍超出100 mg/kg；粉煤灰中砷主要以残渣态存在（57%），其次是铁锰氧化物结合态（17.62%）、有机结合态（12.08%）、硫化物结合态（11.68%）、碳酸盐结合态（0.97%）、水溶态和可交换态（0.65%）；研究区居民日常燃煤的砷排放量较大，每户日均排放量高达576.22 mg，排放率为48.07%，年均排放量达到0.21 kg；高砷煤利用过程中砷已经对农作物造成了一定影响.@分别对IGCC系统、IGCC燃烧前捕捉CO2系统以及CO2循环利用的纯氧燃烧系统的产气率和能耗进行了计算.结果表明，当煤种和气化条件不变时，燃烧前捕捉CO2会使IGCC系统的燃气轮机和蒸汽轮机做功量减少，热效率降低5.851%.当减排86.55%的CO2时，系统热效率为42%，有利于IGCC清洁高效运行.若采用CO2循环的纯氧燃烧技术，其系统热效率比未循环CO2的燃烧前捕捉系统低，但可以实现CO2的零排放.@用密度泛函理论（DFT）研究了单金属Ni2及NiMn，NiFe，NiCo和NiCu四种双金属与γ-Al2O3之间的相互作用及其对CO2吸附的影响.通过计算NiM在MgO上结合能、电子结构以及CO2在NiM/γ-Al2O3上的吸附能发现：NiM和γ-Al2O3之间的作用是电子的，NiM和γ-Al2O3之间电子的转移数以及NiM的d-带中心的变化能表现了NiM和γ-Al2O3之间相互作用的强弱；NiM和γ-Al2O3之间相互作用的强弱直接影响催化剂对CO2的吸附能力，相互作用越强，CO2的吸附越强；除了NiCu/γ-Al2O3，其他三种负载型双金属对CO2的吸附能力均强于负载的单金属Ni催化剂，其中，NiFe/γ-Al2O3对CO2的吸附能力最强.@分别在20 ℃，37 ℃和45 ℃三个温度条件下以间歇方式运行大肠杆菌生物燃料电池（MFC），研究功率密度、电极电势、电化学阻抗等电化学性质随温度的变化规律.结果表明：温度从20 ℃提高到37 ℃，最大功率密度从53.35 mW/m2(275 mA/m2)增加到610.5 mW/m2(2 775 mA/m2)，增长了10.5倍；同时阳极电极电势降低；且阳极电化学阻抗由741.9 Ω降低到42.4 Ω.在一定温度范围内，升高温度不仅能提高电池功率输出，而且能增强其电化学活性.但是，太高的温度反而不利于生物燃料电池的运行.45 ℃时的最大功率密度只有171 mW/m2(600 mA/m2)，比37 ℃时最大功率610.5 mW/m2(2 775 mA/m2)减少72%；同时阳极电化学阻抗由42.4 Ω增加到416.1 Ω.大肠杆菌生物燃料电池在37 ℃时具有最佳的电化学性能.可见，温度在生物燃料电池运行中是一个非常重要的操作参数.@热解是煤转化过程中重要基础，其实质是自由基反应过程.自由基的形成、转移和稳定对于理解煤热解过程机理与产物生成至关重要.详细综述了煤中自由基研究方法，煤中固有自由基同煤自身性质的关系，以及煤转化过程中自由基形成和演变行为的研究进展与现状.最后结合煤中自由基研究面临的困难和挑战，指出了煤转化过程自由基研究在未来的发展方向.@
Taking Nantaizi coal of Xinjiang Yili as the research object, the experiment systematically studied the distributions of the products in the catalytic hydropyrolysis process, which is carried out in a fixed bed reactor, under atmospheric pressure and 500 ℃-700 ℃.The catalyst and promoter of the process are Fe2O3 and sulfur respectively.It shows that the addition of Fe2O3 could make tar yield increases about 2%,char yield decreases about 4%,water yield increases about 4% at the most.And the gas yield reduced slightly.The addition of sulfur is in favor of the generation of Fe1-xS,so it can accelerate the catalytic hydrogenation pyrolysis process.@CoMoP/13X catalyst was prepared by incipient wetness impregnation method. The effect of CoMoP/13X catalyst on the pyrolysis characteristics and gas evolution of HTM coal was investigated by TG-FTIR technique. The kinetic parameters of the thermal decomposition reactions were calculated based on TG experiment. TGA results indicate that the second peak temperature of HTM coal pyrolysis was decrease by 27.67 ℃ over CoMoP/13X catalyst under hydrogen atmosphere, and the calculated activation energy of second pyrolysis stage (660 ℃-710 ℃) was decrease by 7.9 kJ/mol, indicating superior catalytic effects of CoMoP/13X on HTM coal pyrolysis under hydrogen atmosphere. FTIR analysis results show that the CoMoP/13X greatly varied distribution of pyrolysis products,in which CH4,CO,aliphatic and aromatic hydrocarbon increase with different extent, while the CO2 yield decrease remarkably.@The influence of adding H2O was investigated during co-pyrolysis of rice husk and lignite. Adding H2O into the co-pyrolysis raw material, then the samples were pyrolysised with different content of H2O.The variation trendy of gas yield and gas content were detected through gas chromatogram. And the effect of H2O content on solid residence products was also analyzed. The result showed that the gas yield increased as the content of adding H2O. The gas yield increased most when the adding ratio of H2O was 60%. In addition, the ratio of gas product H2/CO increased with the adding H2O increased, while CO2 did not change a lot. The convention of solid residence products almost kept the same under different adding H2O content. However, the surface functional groups of solid products had a marked change since the adding ratio of H2O was 60%, which consistent with the change regularity of gas yield.@Pyrolysis characteristics of soft coal,papermaking sludge and both of the two mixed ligand complexes have been researched with TGA/DSCI/1600HT type synchronous thermal analyzer in nitrogen atmosphere.The results show that the comprehensive release feature index of volatile（D reducation time） of two mixed ligand complexes of papermaking sludge and soft coal is higher than soft coal;as a result of the papermaking sludge being added,pyrolysis reaction of two mixed ligand complexes is more easily than soft coal,and obviously the character of its volatilize being released is also better than single soft coal.@Recycling and harmless handling can be achieved by co-pyrolysis of coal and plastic. In this paper, we study on co-pyrolysis of different proportion of Sunjiacha coal and plastic under microwave heating conditions. The result indicates that with the increasing of proportion of plastic, char yield gradually reduced, the yields of tar markedly improved. When the proportion of plastic is 10%,the content of char yield goes up to 17%,at the same time the content of H2, CO and CH4 increased obviously in coal gas，the content of H2 is up to 44.21% and the content of CO and CH4 up to 18.75% and 21.97%. Therefore, the addition of plastic is not only benefit to improve the recovery of tar and optimize the component of pyrolysis gas，but have an great effect on the further comprehensive utilization of gas. @On the basis of the analysis for the active species character and the reaction parameter in the process of the plasma jet aid coal gasification, the experiments for confirming active species action has been designed in this paper. Through quantum chemistry calculation, it is found that the water molecule structure was changed observably by direct action between the active ingredients: singlet oxygen, O+2etc and oxygen atom in the water molecule in the coal gasification, and these actions was favorable to form free radical OH·, which react with the carbon in the coal by the broken O—H bond. Likely reaction channel induced by the active ingredients has been posed according to the regression equations on oxygen contents in the working gas to the volume fractions of the staple: H2, CO and CO2 in the experiment.@In the test gasification of lignite semi-coke was investigated by using pure oxygen and steam. Results showed that CO and H2 content of gas, calorific value and yield of syngas increase with increasing gasification temperature.CO2 and CH4 content of gas reduce with increasing gasification temperature. At the same gasification temperature, with rise of pure oxygen flow, CO and H2 content of gas increase first and then reduce. CO2 content of gas increases and CH4 content of gas reduces. The calorific value and yield of syngas have a maximum value.@Reaction H2S absorption solution and pentavalent vanadium, tannic extract with oxidization state (Teos) was investgated using cyclic voltammetry method. The results show that H2S is absorbed to produce bisulfide ion HS- and polysufide ion S2-x, then these sufur-containing substances will be oxidized by pentavalent vanadium and Teos. The reaction can be divided into initial rapid reaction stage and slow reaction stage. For different reactions, reaction rate of sufur-containing substance and pentavalent vanadium is faster than that of sufur-containing substance and Teos. Additionally, Teos contributes to the formation of S2-6, and pentavalent vanadium can promote to the transformation from sulfur containing substance to elemental sulfur.@The liquefactions of Huolinhe 14 coal, the Bulianta 2-2 coal and the Xinjiang 41 coal show that the conversion yield and oil yield of Huolinhe 14 coal is highest, the Bulianta 2-2 coal’s is lowest. The FTIR result shows that the conversion yield and oil yield results in the aroma hydrogen and the aliphatic hydrogen in coal, the CO2, CO in gas production and the water yield lies on the oxygen-containing groups and the hydroxyl groups． Besides, the coal molecule structures of the three coals are appropriate by comparing with experimental data.@Based on the theory of Andreason and compressible packing model, the calculations of modifying and packing density of the coal particles have been carried out ,and the calculation results have been also verified by experiments. Meanwhile，the influences of the size range and adding volume on packing density has been discussed. The result indicated that the particle size distribution can be optimized by modifying, and it is close to the one of close packing; the packing density of coal particles are well predicted with compressible packing model and it is increased by 5.977% after modifying; under the condition of close packing, the large size range is helpful for improving the packing density of the system; with the increasing of modifying material, the packing density is also increasing and it is close to the packing density under close packing; just adding power,the packing efficiency is relevant with partile size composition of raw materials.@Based on the character of high ash and large amount of moisture in the coal slime, and hard to handle of the actual situation of black liquor for paper making which contains abundant organism, it is an useful attempt by using dry method to make water coal mixture both as the raw material. The water coal mixture is made from powdered coal of different particle size which abrading the dry nubby coal slime and black liquor for paper making by a certain percentage in order to research the indicator of comprehensive performance. When the add content of black liquid is 7.2％ and the particle size of powdered coal is less than 160 mesh, the concentration of water coal mixture is 67.44％, liquidity will be A grade and the stability will retain almost 20 d in good condition. The experiment results indicate that the pH value of waste almost has no effect on the slurry-ability of water coal slime if the pH value of black liquid is changed to research the prepared of water coal slime. Due to the black liquid of paper making contains large amount of organic matter, therefore, it can also improve the combustion heat value of water coal slime under the same conditions. The constantvolume high heat of the prepared water coal slime is 21.63 MJ/kg, low heat is 15 MJ/kg, which is measured by GB 213-87.@A new coking technology for anthracite and additives was studied by using Magang coking raw materials. The coking experiment results of anthracite instead of part coking coal show that, the reactivity index of coke coked at 14% anthracite is low than the reactivity index of coke coked at 9% in the condition of binders PRT and CMC respectively 0.5%, and the post-reaction strength of coke coked at 14% anthracite is high than the post-reaction strength of coke coked at 9%, and these two indexes approach to benchmark coke. Furthermore, the coking experiment results of changing additive adding amount at 14% anthracite show that, the cokes coked at 3-2，3-3 and 3-5 coal blending ratio possessed  better falling intensity and drum strength, low reactivity index of coke and high post-reaction strength of coke, and approach to benchmark coke 3-1 coked in the condition of absence of anthracite. @In order to study the effects of O2 on coal char structure and gasification beha-viour, Jincheng coal char was first partially oxidized in a fixed-bed reactor, and then its physicochemical characteristics were studied via scanning electron microscopy(SEM), X-ray diffraction(XRD), and N2/CO2 adsorption. In addition, char gasification behaviour was characterized using a thermobalance. Low temperature oxidation can significantly improve char pore structure, increasing char specific surface area while decreasing the degree of char graphitization. Besides, oxidation can notably promote char gasification reactivity, and char reactivity increased with increasing char burnout. However, with the increase of oxidation temperature(>600 ℃), the controlling step of char oxidation process changed from chemical reactions to O2 external diffusion resulting O2 consumption mainly on the external surface. As a result, high temperature oxidation has little influence on char structure and gasification behaviour.@With the method of constant volume heating, experiment of dibenzofuran, diphenylenemethane, acenaphthene extracted by supercritical ethanol was conducted. The characteristics of extracted products obtained from the supercritical ethanolysis experiment were analyzed through GC, and the supercritical solubility and the supercritical exhaust percent were calculated. The results show that dibenzofuran and diphenylenemethane have the maximum supercritical solubility under the conditions of temperature at 255 ℃, pressure at 7.0 MPa and the maximum supercritical exhaust percent under the conditions of temperature at 265 ℃, pressure at 11.0 MPa. And there is not significant regularity of acenaphthene in supercritical ethanol. There is significant discrepance in supercritical extracted gas absorber oil. The solvent is recyclable after experiment of extraction.@A kind of briquette was prepared with the semi-coke breeze as raw material by cold-pressed process. It was studied that the binder, particle size of raw material, moisture on the impact of briquette properties. The result shows that the prepared briquette with organic binder has the largest compressive strength and the larger calorific value, but lower thermal stability; quite the contrary, the prepared briquette with inorganic binder of the least compressive strength, the less calorific value, but higher thermal stability; composite binder can use each other, it can play the best results.@The influence of bentonite content, moisture content and granularity of fine coal on the compressive strength by the binder of bentonite was studied.The results showed that the compressive strength of briqutte and ash content were proportionate to bentonite content. A liner formula was gained. Content of bentonite can be determined according to demand of process. And the ash content of the product can be calculated by the formula. When moisture content was in the range of 14%-16%, compacting pressure was 40 kN and the bentonite content was 7%, briqutte with compressive strength of 1 420 N/ball and ash content of 11.7% was synthesized.@Blinder was put into blue-coke powder and mixed uniformity, then modeled. The formed activated carbon based on blue-coke was produced after carbonization and activation. Carbonized behavior of the material was studied by TG-DTG during the pyrogenation process. The yield, compressive strength and iodine adsorption value of formed activated carbon which were prepared at different carbonization temperature. The pore structure and surface chemical properties of activated carbon which were prepared at 450 ℃ carbonization temperature were characterized by N2 adsorption and infrared spectrum respectively. It is found that the yield and compressive strength of products are reduced along with the rising of the carbonization temperature, while the iodine adsorption value is increased. There are a large number of hydroxyl, carbonyl, hydroxyacid and other active groups on the surface of products prepared under this experimental condition: 450 ℃ and 800 ℃ were selected to be carbonization and activation temperature and activated for 60 min using water vapor. And it is mesopores activated carbon.@C/C composites have broad application prospects in some particular fields. To prepare C/C composites with hot-pressing mold, thermoplastic mesophase pitches used as binders, kneading with short carbon fibers were moulded from RT to 650 ℃. Then after process of carbonization(1 000 ℃) and graphitization(2 700 ℃), C/C composites with thermal conductivity were prepared. The experiment showed that the extrusion structure of carbon precursor changed with structure of cavity in the mould, which made matrix carbon in the axial direction growing orderly and short carbon fibers(SCFs) for the heat transmission medium arranging orderly in the matrix carbon. After observed through polarizing microscope and scanning electron microscope(SEM), the mesophase pitch liquid crystal moleculars presented fibrous long-range order structure both in two-dimension directions. In addition, SCFs were distributed parallel to the hot-pressing direction. When the ratio of tube cavity was 3∶1, thermal conductivity of C/C composites in axial direction increased from 86.2 W/(m·K) to 115.5 W/(m·K) and the anisotropy ratio of thermal conductivity decreased from 1.6 to 1.2 C/C. Composites obtained from this method had obvious two-dimensional orientation structure, which made the coefficient of thermal conductivity in two-dimension direction balanced.@At present the experimental study on carbon dioxide dry capture is mainly given priority to with mechanism, in industrialized device research has not seen the report. With supported solid carbonate as the adsorbent, the experimental study on carbon dioxide capture from flue gas is carried out with fluidized bed adsorption reactor. Experiment measured the effect on the adsorption of different adsorbent, temperature, reaction time, and adsorbent regeneration performance test. The results showed that the adsorbent is the solid sodium carbonate, in the range of 65 ℃-85 ℃. Moreover, absorption time is about 4 min-10 min. In this case, the removal rate of carbon dioxide can reach 97.5%, and adsorbent can reach steady state after 10 times regeneration, so adsorbent can use long-term.@The Ni/Al2O3 catalyst coated in the inner wall of micro-channel prepared by precipitation method was employed to conduct experiments of methane-wet air catalytic reforming. The influence of catalytic temperature, air/CH4 mole rate of the raw gases and the CH4 volume flow rate on CH4 conversion were investigated and compared by the simulation results. The experiment results show that CH4 conversion was increasing by the catalytic temperature increased, and also increased by increasing the air/CH4 mole rate; but with the increase of CH4 volume flow rate of the reaction gases, CH4 conversion increased first and then decreased. When the temperature was 1 023 K, CH4 volume flow rate was 20 mL/min, CH4 conversion got a maximum value 61.3%.@The characteristics of microwave heating are selectivity, penetrability, fast heating rate, easy to control, safety and no pollution. The application of microwave technology in from drying coal, grindability, desulfurization and pyrolysis is reviewed and its application prospect in the field of coal conversion processing is predicted.@This article described the development of research in this field, analyzed the mechanism of the reaction, and discussed the possibility of applying coal ashes as a tool to reduce carbon dioxide emission in China through analysis and calculation using the data from the coal mines in Ordos of Inner Mongolian and Datong of Shanxi Province. That the total amount of calcium oxide and magnesium oxide, both of which are the active constituents in coal ashes to react with carbon dioxide, is very low in the coal ashes, and as a result, the effect of coal ashes in “absorbing” carbon dioxide is quite limited. Therefore, the coal ashes can not serve as an efficient carbon dioxide absorbent that leads to dramatic reduction of carbon dioxide. However, the reaction with carbon dioxide could effectively turn coal ashes into key intergradient of some important industrial products, such as sulfide absorbents and cements, to serve in the purpose of waste recycling.@By using literature metrology method, the author carries out quantitative analysis of fund paper in 2010 published in COAL CONVERSION and JOURNAL OF FUEL CHEMISTRY AND TECHNOLOGY from the following aspects: number of fund paper, organizations and geographical distribution of writers, the fund types and cooperation between the author. To reveal  the present situation of energy and chemical and to provide a reference for future work.@In order to study the rule of free radical changes, free radicals in coal at differ-rent temperatures (350 ℃-600 ℃), different holding times(0 min-30 min) were measured by using EPR. The results show that the EPR method is rapid and direct; the determination of free radical concentration in coal based on standard curve method is more accurate; the radical change rule of coals that from different places is consistency, but its absolute value of initial free radicals concentration is difference, the initial free radical concentration of Shengli coal is 3.034 6×1018/g, and reached the maximum value 26.686 0×1018/g at 550 ℃, 10 min, Xinjiang coal initial free radical concentration is 15.283×1018/g, and reached the maximum value of 57.537×1018/g at 600 ℃, 10 min; this method can provide theoretical basis for the further study of coal pyrolysis mechanism and improvement of the light tar yield.@Exampled by anthracite coal from Sihe coalmine of Qinshui coal basin, Shanxi Province, four coal samples with different deformed extent were extracted by three solvents, including benzene, tetrahydrofuran (THF) and 1-methyl-2-pyrrolidinone (NMP) under the condition of room temperature, the group composition of the extraction were separated and measured by column chromatography method and the extract yield were calculated. The study shows that with the increasing of the damage extent of coal body structure, the extraction ratio shows the increasing trend, in which the maximum extraction rate of the solvent was NMP, THF the second, and then benzene in turn. For the three solvent, the group composition of the extraction shows the same rule: as the damage extent of coal structure increasing, the relative contents of total hydrocarbon decrease, in which the content of alkane hydrocarbons decreases but the content of aromatic hydrocarbons relative increases. And the total contents of non-hydrocarbon increase, in which resin content increases but asphaltene content relatively decreases.@In order to clarify the solution loss kinetics behavior on coke strength after reaction, three representative cokes were used for solution loss reaction experiment. Isothermal reaction between coke and CO2 at 1 050 ℃-1 300 ℃ was stopped at a weight loss of 25%, and the strength of coke was tested by I type drum. The results showed that the temperature of gradient reaction brings the most serious degradation to three cokes were different due to different reactivity, and the temperature of the high reactive coke is about 1 100 ℃ which is lower than another two cokes. Although the strength of high reactive coke after gradient reaction of most serious degradation is poor, reaction rate is accelerated or declined by changing reaction temperature, post-reaction strength of high reactive coke increased markedly.@The pyrolysis experiment of carboniferous high sulfur coal form northwest area of China was made. The influence of different pyrolysis temperature (200 ℃ to 1 000 ℃) and different holding time (20 min to 100 min) on the changes of sulfur forms content were investigated. FTIR was used to analyze the coal samples and their products. The pyrolysis experiment shows that the total sulfur increases firstly with temperature rising and then decreases, reaching to the lowest at 600 ℃. Sulfate sulfur content is low at a range of 0%-0.5%. Pyrites sulfur decreases with the temperature. Organic sulfur content firstly decreases and then increases with the pyrolysis temperature rising. At 500 ℃, organic sulfur decreases to the lowest. The pyrites sulfur removed rate is higher than the rate of organic sulfur. The heteroatom functional groups of oxygen and sulfur in semi-cokes decrease with the rising temperature.@This research mainly explored co-pyrolysis characteristics between low metamorphic coal and oil shale under microwave irradiation, discussed the yield and composition of co-pyrolysis product, and analyzed components of liquid products by gas chromatography-mass spectrometry (GC-MS) combined with techniques. The results show that appropriately add low metamorphic coal to oil shale can improve the yield of tar and increase the content of flammable gas-CO, CH4 and H2.Tar is composed mainly of hydrocarbons (about 50%-80%) in which some hydrocarbons such as alkanes and aromatic hydrocarbons are majority (about 40%-50%), and secondly of less oxygenated compounds with phenol-based and none of nitrogen compounds.@Self-inventing new coal gasification furnace is used to complete gasified experiment of varied carbonaceous material. The effects of gasification on purity, crystal morphosis and yield of energy carrier material were analysed.The effects of micro-porosity of bituminite at high temperature and fine powdered carbon in the surface of coke at high temperature on the content of 6H-SiC were studied.It is found that new coal gasification has no effect on the quality of energy carrier material and the high porosity, complexed sectional structure and fine powdered carbon in the surface of coke at high temperature are main reasons for the high content of 6H-SiC.@According to the high ash fusibility coal from Huainan Mining Areas was hard directly to apply to the available liquefaction technique with the liquid coal ash discharging, under the weak reduction air, the  intelligent ash fusion detector and X-ray diffractometer were applied to study the ash fusion characteristics temperature and mineral behavior of typical coal samples with base flux. It is shown that, as the ashing temperature go up, the mullite derived from kaolinite was formed, the transimittance of carbonate decrease gradually. Fluxes of ADC and ADF which react with other minerals in coal ash to form fayalite, hereynite, gehlenite, anhydrite at high temperature can lower the ash fusion temperature effectively.@The effects of two kinds of iron-based catalyst on quick coal liquefaction at high temperature (QCLHT) are investigated by using a micro-autoclave reactor when Yanzhou coal is selected as object of study. The results shows that the pyrolytic behavior of the coal is influenced slightly when Fe2S3 and high dispersion iron-based catalyst are respectively supported in the coal; hydrogen can participating in coal liquefaction more easily when the coal is impregnated by Fe2S3, at the same time, a lighter distribution of products of coal liquefaction can be realized; under the condition of excellent and sufficient hydrogen donating solvent, the hydrogen donating rate of solvent is much higher than that of hydrogen conversion and the role of catalyst is not obvious. The role of elemental sulfur is in relation to its combination form with the iron series main catalyst according to the comparison of the catalytic results of QCLHT when high dispersion iron-based catalyst with S as additive and impregnated Fe2S3 are selected as catalyst respectively.@Effects of temperature, contents of steelmaking flue dust, CoSO4 and NiSO4 and adding ways were investigated on liquefaction of coal sample from Wucaiwan under reaction conditions that ratio of solvent to coal was 2.75∶1, reaction time 60 min, and initial hydrogen pressure 6.0 MPa. Results indicated that under the given conditions, we obtained maximum oil yield of 64.59% when the amount of steelmaking flue dust was  3% and temperature was 415 ℃. When CoSO4 and NiSO4 mixed with the dust and sample, yields of oil and conversion decreased. Oil yield were 68.01% and 66.58% respectively, when NiSO4 and CoSO4 were added by supported. We still obtained a good liquefaction results when steelmaking flue dust, NiSO4 and CoSO4 as cata-lysts, although analytical results of the coal sample showed that liquefaction performance of the sample wasn’t enough well.@Due to SF coal has high content of moisture and oxygen-containing groups, so it’s difficult to obtain high-concentration coal-water slurry. In this paper, we have studied the preparation process conditions of coal-water slurry has particle classification and dispersant compound etc. Research has demonstrated that when the ratio of particle classification 500 mesh, 325 mesh and 200 mesh is 5∶1∶4, the ratio of dispersant of ethoxylated dodecylalcohol and sodium lignin sulfonate is 0.8∶0.8, the coal-water slurry has the lowest apparent viscosity for 1 020 mPa·s, the best stability of 15 d and the higher concentration of 62%.@Kaiyang coal in Guizhou Province was used and systemically analyzed. The slurryability of Kaiyang coal was evaluated according to the slurryability index D of bituminous coal. The slurryability and rheological behaviour of Kaiyang coal water slurry were analyzed. The results show that the slurry prepared from Kaiyang coal has higher slurryability and good mobility. The rheological behaviour of Kaiyang coal water slurry exhibits pseudoplasticity. Kaiyang coal water slurry has more economic and practical advantages when the amount of YKL accounted for 0.15% of Kaiyang coal. Kaiyang coal water slurry prepared by concentration of 63% meets the requirements of coal slurry pressurized gasification technology.@The starch graft copolymer was prepared by the radical polymerization using styrene(St) and hydroxyethyl acrylate (HEA) as graft monomers in oxidation-reduction initiator system. The copolymer was characterized and analyzed by infrared spectrum (FT-IR), dynamic contact angle and Zeta potential. It was investigated that the added quantity of the dispersant and the amount of CWS affect the Shenhua coal slurry preparation performance. The experiment demonstrates that CWS show the best behavior and the apparent viscosity would be 852 mPa·s when the amount of CWS is 65% and the dosage of dispersant produced on optimum conditions is 0.5%.@The temperature distribution of internal heating type low-temperature distillation furnace was simulated by computational fluid dynamics (CFD) software in this paper. Standard k-ε model, species transport model, porous medium model and P1 radiation model were selected. It is found that the temperature distribution trends near the entrance remain stable when changing the ratio of re-blow coal gas and air. The highest temperature in the furnace was considerably influenced by the ratio and reached the maximum point 1 870 ℃ at the ratio of 0.6. The optimal ratio of re-blow coal gas and air 1.8 was determined according to the principle of low temperature dry distillation and the simulation results of the temperature distribution of the coal seam in the furnace chamber.@The ignition properties of Zixi Mongolia coal and Wu coal were investigated using the thermogravimetry technique (TG-DTG). The influence of ignition propertyes in different heating rate and different particle size were discussed. Kinetic parameters of coal combustion process were obtained. According to the index R of the release of combustion products of coal, the ignition properties of coal was determined. Under the experimental conditions the following conclusions were obtained: 1) the heating rate is lower, the index R of the release of combustion products is larger. So the lower heating rate is beneficial to the ignition. But the heating rate has little effect on the  ignition properties of Zixi Mongolia coal; 2) the same rate of temperature conditions, the Wu coal: 0.2 mm-0.3 mm weightlessness is the largest, less than 0.15 mm and 0.15 mm-0.2 mm basic consistently; since the burning of Zixi Mongolia coal: 0.2 mm-0.3 mm weightlessness minimum, less than 0.15 mm weightlessness and 0.15 mm-0.2 mm weightlessness are basically the same; 3) through two kinds of coal combustion process for the dynamic analysis of the Wu coal combustion process that the activation energy of higher than the Zixi Mongolia coal.@An Indonesian low rank coal was compressed into high strength binderless briquettes in a double roller briquetting machine. The BET surface, pore volume and surface functional group of raw coal and briquette coal were analyzed and compared. The briquette’s relative ignition temperature and adiabatic oxidation heating rate were measured. The pyrolysis and combustion characteristics have been studied. The results showed that the collapse of pores in coal, leading to coal shrinkage, took place while hydroxyl, carbonyl and carboxyl groups decomposed during drying and high pressure binderless briquetting. The upgraded coal had lower spontaneous combustion propensity, and its reactivity during pyrolysis and combustion decreased.@Coal ash is China’s largest single source of solid waste, of which the submicron fly ash are particularly troublesome, since they are enriched with the toxic heavy metals and have a high probability of escaping common air pollution control devices. To investigate its formation mechanisms during coal combustion, the interaction between different minerals in the coal and its effect on the formation of the submicron fly ash were studied. Three bituminous coals were combusted in the drop tube furnace and the produced ash was collected and separated by low-pressure impactor. The X-ray fluorescence(XRF)and the transmission electron microscopy-energy dispersion spectroscopy(TEM-EDS)are used to characterize the minerals in the coal and the submicron ash. With respect to the influence of the modes of occurrence of elements, it was investigated from the consideration of the mineral association in parent coals, i.e., included or excluded particles. According to the experimental results, it was concluded that the association of inherent minerals with the carbonaceous matrix was primarily important for determining their transformation into submicron ash. The excluded minerals barely contribute to submicron ash formation. The transformation behaviors of Si and Al were possibly affected by the amount of excluded in raw coals. @A series of Cr2O3/γ-Al2O3 catalysts with different Cr2O3 loading ratio were prepared by incipient wetness impregnation method. Then the influences of the calcination temperature, methane concentration and space velocity on the activity of palladium catalyst were investigated as well as their sulfur resistance ability. According to the research results, it is found that Cr2O3/γ-Al2O3 catalysts showed a good performance on catalytic activity, which enhanced with the increasing of Cr2O3 loading ratio at first and then decreased. It is also observed that the activity of Cr2O3/γ-Al2O3 catalyst with 20% Cr2O3 loading ratio was positive correlation with methane concentration, but negative correlation with space velocity. Based on an overall consideration, Cr2O3/γ-Al2O3 catalyst with 20% Cr2O3 loading ratio calcinated at 400 ℃ had the highest catalytic activity for lean methane oxidation as well as a relatively strong sulfur resistance ability.@As for the single zinc oxide loading type desulfurizer, desulfurization accuracy can reach 0.1×10-6, but its sulfur capacity is relatively lower. In this study, the supported ZnO-MnO2/γ-Al2O3 sorbents were prepared by the impregnation method. The effect of MnO2 additive on phase, texture and specific surface area of Zn based sorbents were investigated by XRD and BET, respectively. The desulfurization performance was studied from Zn: Mn loading, sintering temperature and sulfidation temperature in a fixed bed reactor. The results revealed that H2S could be removed from 65×10-6 to less than 0.1×10-6 and the largest sulfur content was 19.08 g S/100 g (ZnO-MnO2) by the sorbent with 8∶1 mole ratio of Zn∶Mn and 20% loading. The additive MnO2 phase can obviously enhanced the properties of single zinc oxide loading desulfurizer.@The reaction characteristics of CaO absorbing CO2 were investigated by discussing the influence of reaction conditions on the carbonated reaction and analyzing the dynamic property with unreacted shrinking core model. The results showed that the chemical reaction rate constant of the carbonation reaction is nearly a constant at 650 ℃-750 ℃; the product layer diffusion coefficient increasing with the increase of temperature; the activation energy of chemical reaction control section was Ea=29.70 kJ/mol, and of the product control section was Ea=92.80 kJ/mol; with the volume fraction of CO2 increasing, the reaction rate and conversion rate increased.@With Shanbei machine-made semicoke as the raw material, the actived carbon was prepared in the N2-atmosphere tube furnace by KOH activation method, whose BET specific surface area is 810.017 2 m2/g and BJH mean pore size is 6.579 3 nm. The activation temperature and time, alkali/semicoke ratio, mixed styles of alkali and semicoke, and semicoke types were considered to have effects on the adsorption performance of active carbon. The optimum preparation procedure is determined that Xingmao semicoke is used as the raw material, KOH powder is used as the activated agent, the activation temperature is 800 ℃, the activation time is 1 h and the ratio of alkali/semicoke is 5∶1.@In order to investigate the effect of heating rate and pyrolysis temperature to products distribution and absorption of heat in the coal pyrolysis process, the coal pyrolysis processes were researched with TG/ DTG and TG-FTIR analysis in this paper. The influence of heating-up speed and temperature of coal pyrolysis to gas product distribution were investigated, and the properties of the coke from reaction were analyzed. The results indicate that the whole absorption of heat in the coal pyrolysis process decreased with the increase of the heating rate. The pyrolysis temperature, at which the coal tar components(mainly aromatic, aliphatic, fat alicyclic) reached a maximum content, increased with the heating rate, while the gas components  released quickly with the increase of heating rate. Coke structure was gradually dense with the increase of pyrolysis temperature, crack produced in the coke and aromatic forms increased at higher temperature, and at the same time, the oxygen and nitrogen content of coke decreased with the increase of pyrolysis temperature due to the continuous cracks of nitrides and oxygenates. @This article investigated the volatile evolution characteristics and estimated the corresponding reaction kinetics of five coal samples belonging to different coal rank in the pyrolysis via programmed and isothermal heating realized in thermogravimetric analyzer and micro fluidized bed (MFB) respectively. The pyrolysis via programmed heating demonstrated that the release sequence of the volatile gases was CO2, CO, CH4 and H2 in succession, whereas the isothermal pyrolysis in MFB showed that the gas release of CO and CO2 was also preceded CH4 and H2. For the isothermal fast pyrolysis in MFB, the activation energy of the five coal samples was 17 kJ/mol-35 kJ/mol, obviously lower than that for the pyrolysis via programmed heating. The reaction order of CO2 and CO was found to be close to 1 and that for the formation of CH4 and H2 obviously deviated from 1, which demonstrates essentially the difference in the formation mechanism for these two groups of volatile gases.@In order to separate the macerals in Shenfu coal, the influence of pH values, surfactants and inorganic modifier on the surface electrical properties of macerals were investigated. The results show that changing the pH values of the system, addition of the cationic surfactant CTAB and inorganic modifier AlCl3 to the system are beneficial to increase the differences between the vitrain and fusain. The influence of pH values and agent concentration on maceral zeta potential is synergistic.@Based on the present utilization situation of coal slime, this paper investigated the carbon dioxide gasification of Shigetai coal slime and fine coal slime after flotation at different heating rates using thermogravimetric analysis, and by TG/DTG curve of the gasification reaction, calculated the gasification conversion and examined the influence of flotation on coal slime gasification. Coats-Redfern and Doyle approximations were used to simulate the gasification behaviors for seeking activation energy and pre-exponential factor. The result showed that the values of the activation energy and the pre-exponential factor of coal slime and fine coal slime decrease with the increase of heating rate, while both are similar at same heating rate; high levels of minerals and ash in coal slime have catalytic action on the gasification.@With Aspen Plus software, the model of coal gasifying process for Shell furnace was established, and used for simulation and optimization of coal gasifying process in Xinjiang Zhundong. With the aim of high content of (CO+H2), by single-factor research, the optimum operation conditions are 2 MPa of pressure, 0.73 kg/kg of O2/coal and 0.09 kg/kg of H2O/coal; by multi-factor research, the optimum operation conditions are 2 MPa of pressure, 0.78 kg/kg of O2/coal and 0.05 kg/kg of H2O/coal. The sequence of influence of factors is the interaction of  O2/coal and H2O/coal＞O2/coal＞H2O/coal＞pressure.@The autoclave and pressurized fixed bed reactor were used, and the proximate and ultimate analysis of raw and hydrothermal pretreated lignite, the carbon conversion and gas product component were analyzed. By these methods, the hydrothermal upgrading of Inner Mongocla lignite and the catalytic gasification behaviors of its wastewater at different temperatures were studied. The results showed that: the hydrothermal process can remove moisture，reduce the oxygen content but increase the fixed and elemental carbon content; the gasification reactivity of the organic matter in the hydrothermal wastewater was higher, resulting in its higher catalytic gasification rate and carbon conversion; the organic matter can be converted into recyclable gas, and the main component of the gas were H2, CO2 and CH4, while the CO content was lower.@The research showed that various factors with different implications by analyzing the eight factors in affecting the performance of Shenhua coal direct liquefaction reaction, and the separation performance of liquid oil and solid for the liquefied oil yield was also significant. The analysis of the impact reasons and proposed corrective measures for optimizing plant operations could provide the reference for adjusting the actual production operation, installation and stable operation, further deciding the appropriate process conditions, and providing the basis for improving plant productivity and coal direct liquefaction technology gradually maturity. Finally, it proposed the key of the direct hydrogenation of coal liquefaction industrialization was not just technology issues, the reliability of equipment operation should not be ignored.@In this paper，Yanzhou coal is extracted in a soxhlet extractor with tetrahydrofuran（THF） as extracting solvent. Both the raw coal and the THF extracted coal are analyzed by SEM,BET,TG and IR spectrum. Experiments on quick coal liquefaction at high temperature (QCLHT) of raw coal and its THF extracted coal are carried out. The effect of soxhlet extraction of solvent on the structure and liquefaction performance of the extracted coal is investigated by the comparison with raw coal. The results show that both the structure and pyrolysis behavior of the residual coal are changed; the conversion rate of QCLHT of the residual coal is higher than that of raw coal; low molecular compounds can play a role of hydrogen donor in the QCLHT reaction without external active hydrogen resource.@Non-isothermal combustion experiments of different additive amount of bituminous (0%, 20%, 40%, 60%, 80%, 100%) were conducted by synthesized thermogravimetry analyzer(STA409PC) from room temperature to 900 ℃ in air. The changes of combustion characteristic parameters of pulverized coals in different atmospheres are analyzed. The results show that DTG curves of coal combustion move to low temperature zones when the amount of bituminous increases. It indicates that both ignition and burn out temperature are lower, burn out time decreases, combustion characteristic index obviously increases, and combustion performance of blending coal are improved. The isoconversional method involving Flynn-Wall-Ozawa（FWO） methods was used for the kinetic analysis of the main combustion process. The results indicated that when the additive amount of bituminous varied from 0 to 100%, the value of activation energy which would sharply reduce if the additive amount of bituminous was under 60% increased from 133.94 kJ/mol to 78.03 kJ/mol by using FWO method.@The fragmentation characteristic of coal in the circulating fluidized bed boiler greatly changes the particle size distribution of the bed material,and it has large effects on the granule concentration in the bed, heat and mass transfer of bed material and the combustion process of coal particles.Because of the complexity of the circulating fluidized bed boiler and the difficulty to observe the phenomenon,the primary fragmentation characteristics of different coals are determined in a tube furnace.The research results show that different kinds of coal have different fragmentation forms.Bituminous coal particles follow the ring nuclear-layer fragmentation form； lean coal and anthracite coal both show the center-fragmentation and the surface-fracture,some particles break into fine particles rapidly due to their heat explosion characteristics；the fragmentation of coal gangue happens parallel to its bedding planes,and the particles break into fragments.In addition,the effects of particle size, bed temperature and heating atmosphere on the primary fragmentation of Xishan lean coal and Yangquan anthracite coal are further researched.@Numerical simulation on a novel liquid slag-removal burner is performed to study the influence of excess air coefficient on velocity, temperature and component concentration distribution. Results show that small excess air coefficient (α= 0.7, 0.8) can result in low burn-out rate of pulverized coal. When α is no lower than 1.0, pulverized coal can burn more completely, but NOx emission increases. In this paper, staged combustion is carried out in the burner with less oxygen (α=0.9) to reduce local oxygen concentration, which can not only realize liquid slag discharge, but also inhibit the generation of NOx.Over-fire air added into the furnace after high temperature flue gas gets cool makes the combustible components burn again, which improves the burn-out ratio. Thermal state experiment is conducted on the burner to investigate the influence of heat load by combining simulation with experiment, which shows the burner has good adaptability to variable heat load. The numerical simulation results tally with the experiment results.@In this paper, process of preparation of carbon adsorbent by drying of lignite-charring-removing impurity-shaping-activation is researched and activation experiment of the obtained carbon adsorbent was introduced primarily by using steam. The effect law of activation temperature，activation time and steam consumption on yield and iodine adsorption value of carbon adsorbent product was obtained. In the test the best process condition is: when the activation temperature is 700 ℃，the activation time is 4 h，the steam consumption is 1.2 kg/(kg adsorbent ·h)，0.9 kg/(kg adsorbent ·h) and 0.78 kg/(kg adsorbent ·h), the yield and iodine adsorption value of carbon adsorbent product obtain 28%（1 048 mg/g），31%（800 mg/g）and 32.5% （700 mg/g） respectively. The obtained carbon adsorbent was characterized by scanning electron microscope observation，we found that carbon adsorbent product structure is more loose and microporous has an increasing trend.@The characters of two types of activated carbon absorbents in the processes of NO and SO2 adsorption at room temperature were investigated by adsorption breakthrough curve and adsorption capacity in this work. The results show that, in the absence of O2, the adsorptive capability for NO of these two activated carbon absorbents are extremely weak. Obvious improvement of NO adsorption could be observed in the adsorption process under the O2-attendance conditions. For individual component adsorption, the two sorbents show a higher adsorption capacity in SO2 than in NO, and the presence of O2 could promote the adsorption both NO and SO2. Coal activated carbon has better capacity of absorbing SO2 and the process might be promoted by certain species produced by NO pre-adsorption. SO2 has an inhibiting effect on NO adsorption. In the simultaneous adsorption of NO-SO2-O2, NO and SO2 may not occupy the same active site independently. It means that new adsorbed intermediate species may formed during the co-adsorption of NO-SO2-O2. The coconut shell activated carbon performed better than the coal activated carbon in the co-adsorption process at room temperature.@The activated carbon fiber is a kind of highly effective separation and adsorption material, which takes polymer as raw material while carbonization and activation in high temperature. In this study, we use waste organic silk as raw material, seek feasibility to manufacture activated carbon fiber in different condition. In the end, through the SEM, XRD, IR and adsorption of methylene blue trihydrate, we has preparated excellent performance activated carbon fiber and concluded optimal conditions: carbonization temperature is 650 ℃, activation is in CO2 atmosphere, activation temperature is 950 ℃, activation time is 60 min.@Oil-based drilling cuttings (ODC) and waste drilling mud (WDM) both are typical and difficult degradation substances containing high concentration of organic contaminants. However, if they serve as the binder of briquette, it will be able to digest organic contaminants easily, recycle the heat value and improve the sulfur retention rate at the same time. In this paper, the three-component briquette (TCB) was made from meager coal (PM, from Yibin in Sichuan Province), ODC and WDM (from Daanzhai oil field). Besides, the optimal proportion of three components was obtained by taking low heat value (Qnet,ad) and dry ash free basis volatile matter (Vdaf) of clean briquette as indexes through orthogonal experiment design. The results showed that the optimal proportion was 65∶35∶9, and the TCB not only met the code of clean briquette but also was more energy-efficient and more environmental than ordinary briquette. This work has provided the resource utilization of the drilling waste with a promising technique route, for it is low-carbon and environmental-friendly.@Fiber ceramsite was made from fly ash, wheat straw and admixtures (cement, lime, gypsum and water glass) by the processes of mix, balling, aging and maintenance. Took specific surface area (SSA) as the main investigation index, the effect of admixtures, straw particle size and its dosage on fiber ceramsite's SSA were analysed through single factor experiment and orthogonal test, and the results showed that, the primary-secondary influencing factors of admixtures on SSA could be arranged as follows: lime>water glass>cement>gypsum; the optimum preparation solution of fiber ceramsite made from wheat straw and fly ash was: selected and used 10% wheat straw grinded twice, that was to say, the mass ratio of wheat straw and fly ash was 1∶9; the use level of admixtures was: lime 8%, water glass 2%, cement 3%, gypsum 2.5%, and the SSA of fiber ceramsite obtained under this condition was 7.925 m2/g.@Biomass materials for producing char had been selected after analyzing the influences of the two aspects on biomass carbonization. The two aspects are respectively the results of proximate analysis and lignin content of biomass materials. Forest biomass is suitable for biomass carbonization. The use of forest branches, sawdust and fuel forest for carbonization should been strengthened. In order to realize industrialization of biomass carbonization, heat exchanges for biomass pyrolysis utilizing residual heat of the flue should been designed. It needs to know the caloric requirement of pyrolysis. TG-DSC simultaneous thermal analyzer was used for experiments of sawdust. The analysis of caloric requirement of biomass carbonization was made. When the carbonization temperature was 500 ℃（the initial temperature was 40 ℃）, caloric requirement was 491 kJ/kg. This paper also pointed out a DSC curve’s application method in heat transfer design and verification of heat exchange for biomass pyrolysis.@The preparation process of biomass coal-based fuel charcoal（BCFC） were obtained by experimental, then its briquetting mechanism and combustion characteristics were studied. The optimal process parameters of BCFC were determined as following: Yuzhou coal, corn stalk and organic binder are mixed at a mass ratio 81∶6∶13, and carbonized after briquetting. The bio-briquette structure and caking property of Yuzhou coal and binder are the foundation of the BCFC briuqetting. The combustion intensity of commercial fuel charcoal is higher than that of BCFC in the initial stage of combustion, while their magnitude of combustion prolongation is on the contrary, because of the difference of their volatile mater, fixed carbon and calorific value.@The catalyst were used in the process of carbonization for the biomass type coal such as Na2CO3, NaHCO3 and NaOH, the effect were studied in the process of preparation for the active coke, and the ignition loss and the adsorption value of iodine was analyzed. The research results showed that Na2CO3, NaHCO3 and NaOH have a certain effect on the process of preparation for the active coke, and the catalytic effect of Na2CO3 is the most significant; the alkaline of catalyst  also has an important influence, the stronger the alkaline is, the better the results are.@During synthesizing NaA zeolite from fly ash with two step process, the dissolve law and concentration of Si and Al in fly ash with different NaOH concentration solution was investigated. The influences of temperature, time and NaOH concentration was analyzed by XRD and CEC during crystallization. The results show that the best process parameters are: the crystallization temperature is 100 ℃, the time is 4 h,the NaOH concentration is 2.5 M. Under the conditions above, pure and well-crystallized NaA zeolite was synthesized with CEC 4.3 mmol/g.@Based on the single whisker axisymmetrical and others research production, the effect of varied whisker aspect ratio on the mechanical behavior of this composites is analysed by the finite element analysis method. It is shown that, 1) the effect to the whisker than to the resin by the aspect of whisker; 2) the more of the aspect ratio of the whisker, the larger of the concentrated stress occur on the bottom of whisker when the aspect ratio less than 30,however when the aspect ratio beyond 30,the effect of aspect ratio on the concentrated stress is very small; 3) the more of the aspect ratio of the whisker, the smaller of the shearing stress occur on the interface when the aspect ratio less than 30,however when the aspect ratio beyond 30,the effect of aspect ratio to the shearing stress is very small; 4) the more of the aspect ratio of the whisker ,the larger of the tensile-strength in the composites.@To reveal the exiting state and solubilization behavior of solule components in coal, vitrinite from Liangjia long flame coal (LJJY) was extracted using Soxhlet extractor with CS2 and soluble components sampled as time in batches or times were analyzed using FTIR and GC/MS for qualitative and quantitative analysis. The results show that the initial extraction rate of LJJY extracted using Soxhlet extractor with CS2 is rapidder, subsequently slows down and the total extraction rate is not high. The dissolution process of CS2 extracts as follows: more alipha-tic hydrocarbons and less substituted aromatics are dissolved in early extraction, over time, aliphatic hydrocarbons decrease and substituted aromatic contents relatively increase, and finally the non-substituted aromatic compounds and oxygen-containing compounds are main dissolution. The process of coal metamorphism mainly exists three types of reaction, which are aromatization reaction, splitting and stability reaction and condensation reaction.@By the methods of acid decalcification and added minerals, the effects of different fractions in calcium mineral and its contents on lignite ash melting characteristics were investigated on the ash fusion temperature analyzer. The results show that calcium oxide micro-crystallites, which generated from ashing process of organic calcium, are more easily interact with other minerals and form glassy materials, or low melting point eutectic materials (e.g. anorthite, gehlenite), than calcium oxide particles from the transformation of inorganic calcium minerals, and results in the drop of lignite ash melting point. Both two lignite ash melting points firstly decreased, and then increased with the increase of calcium oxide content, and when the calcium oxide content is in the range of 30%-35%, the ash melting point is the lowest. With the increase of calcium oxide content, the position of HLH ashes in SiO2-Al2O3-CaO three phase diagrams moves from high melting point mullite district to the lower melting point of anorthite and gehlenite area, finally reaches the high melting point di-calcium silicate zone, and XLT ashes move from anorthite to gehlenite to di-calcium silicate zone.@Co-pyrolysis characteristics of low rank coal mixed with biomass（duckweed ）in different proportions were studied in a dry distillation equipment, and focusing on the coal tar of the product with GC-MS in order to investigate the reaction mechanism of the co-pyrolysis between biomass and coal. Furthermore， the research studied on the pyrolysis mechanism with biomass added by thermogravimetric analyzer. The results show that low-temperature tar could be upgraded with the increasing of biomass content, straight chain alkanes and high-value chemicals such as naphthalene, phenol, anthracene were enriched. The biomass can do favor to the pyrolysis process of coal by reducing the temperature of coal’s pyrolysis and active energy(E), The co-pyrolysis process belongs to first-order kinetic reaction, and the synergetic effect was found during coal and biomass co-prolysis by comparing with the individual pyrolysis.@The mixture of low metamorphic coal and plastic is studied under the condition of microwave pyrolysis, using infrared analysis and GC-MS to characterize the blue-coal and tar, and the effects of condensing temperature on the tar yield and component are investigated that is focused on. This research shows that with the decrease of the condensing temperature, the tar yield increased gradually, while the gas yield decreased. When the condensing temperature decreased from 25 ℃ to -10 ℃, the content of alkane, olefin and phenols showed a downward trend that decreased respectively to 12.701%, 7.044% and 7.923%, while the content of aromatic hydrocarbon increased significantly to 50.572%. The light components of C5-C10 in the tar decreased from 43.545% to 22.976%, while the intermediate components of C11-C18 increased from 32.730% to 32.730%, and the heavy components over C19 changed a little.@Based on the step utilization of brown coal pyrolysis, partial gasification, and residual carbon combustion, a brown coal from Shigouyi Coal Mine in Ningxia was chosen as research object to produce the rapid and slow coal chars at temperature of 700 ℃950 ℃ in a horizontal tube furnace.The effect of pyrolysis conditions on carbon microcrystal structure and BET surface area of chars was investigated. The carbon dioxide gasification reactivity was analyzed by thermogravimetric-mass spectrometric technology, and different evolution indexes were used to characterize the reactivity of chars. It is found that the gasification rate of Shigouyi chars increases by more than 50% with the temperature increasing by 50 ℃. When the pyrolysis temperature rises, the carbon microcrystal structure of coal chars becomes more orderly and the BET surface area decreases. However, the gasification reactivity is mainly controlled by gasification temperature. The gasification reactivity of rapid pyrolyzed coal char is better than that of slow pyrolyzed coal char, and the difference between them become greater as gasification temperature rises. Average specific reaction rates of both rapid and slow pyrolyzed chars have a linear relationship with reaction index.@Much consumption of fossil fuels has caused serious crisis and environmental impact locally and globally. On the base of high-ash coal  idle, this text  analyses the best  utilization way and  pilot test on a 3 m×16 m fluidized gasifier, taking high-ash powdered coal of Yima as raw material. It was found that the temperature, pressure, composition and flow rate of coal gas had a small change and the test process was steady and successful especially on fully load. Moreover, this test improves that the fluid bed is appropriate for the high-ash powdered coal.@The paper chooses supercritical methanol treatment to remove oxide from lignite and mainly focuses on the effect of temperature, pressure, catalysts and pretreatment ways on deoxidizing rate(R). Experiment results indicate that the deoxidizing rate increases with temperature and pressure within a certain range of temperature and pressure. The deoxidizing rate reaches its maximum at 330 ℃ and decreases if temperature is above that value. Base catalysts are better to raise the deoxidizing rate than acid catalysts. Under the same temperature and pressure, the deoxidizing rate of the sample after swelling is 5.39% higher than that of the original sample. While the water in the lignite sample has no effect on the deoxidizing rate. So that a high deoxidizing rate needs swelling the coal at first and base as catalysts. Temperature and pressure should reach the critical state at least. After swelling pretreatment in methanol for 8 h, the lignite is treated with methanol for 60 min at 330 ℃, 8.2 MPa. The weight ratio of methanol：Xilinhaote lignite is 5∶1. Solid NaOH is added as catalyst(1%). Under these conditions, deoxidizing rate can reach 32.94%.@As a hydrogen donor solvent of wash oil, it was investigated to affect of three factors such as ratio of solvent to coal, reaction temperature, and initial H2 pressure on liquefaction properties of the sample of Wucaiwan coal from Xinjiang. Results show that in the coal sample hydro-liquefaction progress，the material which has strong hydrogen donor ability formed so that  enhancing its hydrogen donor ability，after wash oil was partially hydrogenated. Compared with tetrahydronaphthalene，ratio of solvent to coal reduced from 3 to 1.75, final pressure was 16.3 MPa，which was similar to under condition of tetrahydronaphthalene as a solvent, although the initial H2 pressure was 8.0 MPa. Oil yield was 59.24%, and conversion was 81.05%.@Xinjiang coal is hard for the preparation of coal-water slurry for its high moisture content. Due to Xinjiang coal’s low ash content, there will be a broad application prospects to prepare oil-coal slurry with it. The preparation conditions and the performance under different conditions of Xinjiang oil-coal slurry were studied. The results show that: when using sodium lignosulphonate as dispersant and polyacrylamide 10000 as stabilizer, pulverized coal is 50 g, diesel is 23 mL, water is 26 mL, the oil-coal slurry has the lowest apparent viscosity and the best stability. The performance of the oil-coal slurry prepared with composite dispersant which was made by SDBS and ethoxylated dodecylalcohol in accordance with the ratio of 1∶1 is better than that with a single dispersant.@With the FCC slurry as raw material, using multi-tube and single-tube well-crucible furnace controlled by programmed heating, and a reactor which contained pneumatic guide structure to prepare highly ordered mesophase coke. The experiment focuses on two reactor structures’ influences on the ordered growth of mesophase, in accordance with the exploration of the impact on the ordered growth of mesophase coke by gas current and the changes of ordered mesophase structure in high temperature process. The experiment discovered that during the process of materials’ thermal polymerization in the reactor with pneumatic guide structure, the mesophase spherule guided by the upcurrent melts orderly and gradually develops to domain structure. Thus it can prepare well-ordered mesophase coke which can be used to develop good intermediate phase differentiation burnt. Proper calcinations temperature would result in the further perfection and improvement of ordered mesophase coke structure and performance.@The light and heavy components of Shenglong coal tar was extracted and separated through an independent development of low-temperature extraction system. Feeding type was optimized and the influence of solvent ratio to the extraction yield of light and heavy components was analyzed and discussed. The influence of extraction number to the rule of solution and precipitation of the components and the process operability was discussed. The qualitative and quantitative analysis of light components was identified by GC/MS. Main components in light components are polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons and the higher relative content of naphthalene is found which is 23.10%.@This experiment studied on the sample of needle coke which were activated in different concentrations of nitric acid, then the surface composition and internal structure of the samples were analyzed by infrared spectra and X-ray diffraction; and the electrochemical cyclic voltammetry of the samples were tested. The results of electrochemical performance test showed that: the content of carboxyl, hydroxyl and carbonyl of needle coke surface oxygen functional groups which were activated by nitric treatment had increased; the average microcrystalline size of needle coke had reduced; the specific capacitance of needle coke had increased by 39.8% after activation.@The sodium lignosulphonate was fractionated by means of ultrafiltration, and the grafted copolymer was prepared by using the 5 000-10 000 fraction and acrylic acid. The structure of the products was characterized by FTIR, and surface tension, contact angle and the properties of coal water slurry (CWS) were examined. The results showed that: the grafted copolymer(LA) was more available to decrease the surface tension, and the contact angle of LA was less than that of sodium lignosulphonate. When the grafter was used in additives for CWS, the CWS viscosity could be reduced 100 mPa·s to 300 mPa·s which was equal to sodium naphthalene sulfonate and it could give a better static stability.@N2 adsorption method is a popular method in measuring materials with pore because it is easier in operation and its sample can be recycled. By using different mathematic models to deal with the adsorption data, the result of micropore（<2 nm） as well as mesopore and macropore（2 nm-100 nm） can be obtained at the same time. Coal-based active carbons were characterized by N2 adsorption method and scanning electronic microscopy in the research. The BJH method was introduced in theory and four typical isotherm of active carbon were summarized. By combining N2 adsorption analyzing method with SEM, their characteristics of pore were clarified completely. The research results may be useful for the research works as well as production action involving active carbons.@The effects of quick lime （CaO） on combustion characteristics of lignite was studied by TGA. The comprehensive combustibility parameter S, the combustibility indexes C and the composite indexes on ignition and burning Rw, which can well indicate the combustion characteristics, were adopted. Then the chemical kinetics parameters, i.e. activation energy E and frequency factor A were calculated in this paper. The result showed that: burning process was clearly divided into two phases after addition of quick lime. With the ratio of quick lime increasing, the pre-combustion intensity was gradually weakened, the post-combustion intensity was gradually increased. The content of quick lime reaches 20%, the activation energy of the samples decreased slightly and the maximum burning rate of lignite and quick lime blending was faster than raw coal. But with the amount of quick lime increasing, burnout performance of sample get worse.@Effect of the corn straw and cow dung on the combustion characteristic of the powdered coal was studied by thermal analysis technology in this paper. The results show that the combustion characteristic of the powdered coal improved significantly by adding a certain amount of corn straw or cow dung. The fire point of mixture for biomass and coal is lower than powdered coal obviously, and the temperature range reaching maximum combustion speed is less than the powdered coal obviously. The powdered coal could completely combust in a narrow range of temperature quickly. The effect of biomass is gradually decreased with the content of powdered coal increasing. The corn straw is better than cow dung in the combustion characteristic of the mixture for coal and biomass.@Effects of the calcination temperatures on the activity of Ni-SiO2 for catalyzing methanation reaction was studied. The experiments were conducted in a slurry bed reactor. The prepared catalysts were characterized by TPR, XRD and BET.  The results showed that the active species Ni in catalysts could  completely form NiO at 350 ℃.  The calcined temperature was a very important factor, affecting both catalyst’s specific area and particle size of active species.  The particle sizes of active components increased while the specific surface area decreased as calcination temperature increased. However, the CH4 yield from the catalysts increased and then decreased with increasing the calcination temperature from 350 ℃ to 700 ℃.  It illustrated that, for the experimental conditions examined, the optimal calcination temperatures of Ni-SiO2 catalyst were among 450 ℃-550 ℃, and higher or lower than that would reduce the catalytic activity.@The arsenic content of coal, fly ash, soil and crop in a village of Guizhou Province was studied in this paper, and sequential chemical extraction method was used for fly ash. The results shows that the arsenic content of coal, soil and fly ash in the researched area are all serious excessive with the standard, generally exceeded 100 mg/kg. The arsenic in fly ash are mainly exist as residues state (57%), the next are iron and manganese oxides combined state (17.62%), arsenic in organic combined state (12.08%), sulfide combined state (11.68%), carbonate combined state (0.97%), and water soluble and exchangeable arsenic content (0.65%). The arsenic emissions of resident’s daily coal use are comparatively large, the daily average emission of every family user reaches to 576.22 mg, the emission rate is 48.07%, the average annual emission is 0.21 kg. The utilization of high-As coal has caused serious problems on crops.@Gas producing ratio and energy consumption rate were computed respectively in the IGCC system, the IGCC system with pre-combustion CO2 capturing and that with oxy-combustion CO2 recycling. It was showed from the computed results that when coal and the gasification were in the same condition, the steam and gas turbine’s work declined and the IGCC system thermal efficiency reduced by 5.851%, which was due to the capturing of CO2 gas. When CO2 reduction rate was 86.55%, the thermal efficiency was 42% and conducive to the operating of IGCC efficiently and cleanly.If adopting the CO2 recycling combustion technology, the system thermal efficiency was lower than that of the pre-combustion CO2 capturing system, but in which zero CO2 emission could be achieved.@The interactions of NiM (M=Mn, Fe, Co, Ni and Cu) with γ-Al2O3 (110) surface and their effects on the adsorption of CO2 have been investigated by using density functional theory (DFT) slab calculations. On the basis of binding energies and electronic structures of NiM on γ-Al2O3 as well as the CO2 adsorption energies on NiM/γ-Al2O3, we can get that the interaction between NiM and γ-Al2O3 is electronic, the transferred charge between NiM and γ-Al2O3 as well as the d-band center of NiM can reflect the interaction of NiM with γ-Al2O3 well; the interaction between NiM and γ-Al2O3 affects the adsorption ability of catalyst to CO2 directly, the stronger the interaction of NiM with γ-Al2O3 is, the stronger of CO2 adsorption is; bimetal catalysts all show stronger CO2 adsorption than pure Ni catalyst except NiCu/γ-Al2O3, and NiFe catalyst shows the strongest adsorption ability to CO2.@The microbial fuel cells(MFCs) were tested in batch mode at different temperatures of 20 ℃, 37 ℃, 45 ℃. Power density, electrode potential, electrochemical impedance were examined as a function of temperature. The temperature increased from 20 ℃ to 37 ℃, the peak power density enhanced by over 10.5 times from 53.35 mW/m2(275 mA/m2) to 610.5 mW/m2(2 775 mA/m2). In the temperature range between 20 ℃ to 37 ℃, the anode potential gradually decreased, while the anode polarization resistance decreased from 741.9 Ω to 42.4 Ω；elevated temperatures not only enhanced the power output, they also influenced the bioelectrocatalytic performance of MFCs. MFCs grown at elevated temperatures were more electrochemically active  than those at lower temperature. But too high operation temperature was disadvantageous to the perform of MFC. At the temperature of 45 ℃, the peak power density was just 171 mW/m2(600 mA/m2), which was far lower than 610.5 mW/m2 at temperature of 37 ℃;while anode polarization resistance increased from 42.4 Ω to 416.1 Ω. At 37 ℃, MFC displayed an optimum electrical chemistry performance. From the data, we proposed that the temperature was a crucial operational parameter in the yield of MFCs.@Coal pyrolysis is the important basis of coal conversion and its essence is the process of free radicals reaction. The formation, transfer and stabilization of free radicals are essential for understanding the mechanism of coal pyrolysis process and the composition of products. The research method of free radicals in coal and the relation between the native free radicals and coal properties, and the research situation of the formation and transformation of free radicals in coal conversion process were summarized in details. Finally, based on the difficulties and challenges of investigation into coal free radicals, the study on coal-derived free radicals in the future development direction is presented.@
2015
通过超声萃取的方法，采用苯、二硫化碳（CS2）和四氢呋喃（THF）三种溶剂对山东金源气煤的四种不同煤体结构煤（原生结构煤、碎裂煤、碎粒煤和糜棱煤）进行了分级萃取，结合元素分析、工业分析以及柱层析法，对煤样的化学组成和族组成进行了测试.结果表明，随着变质程度的增加，溶剂萃取率有增大的趋势；溶剂萃取作用下，C元素和H元素含量增加，S元素和O元素含量减小，这种变化趋势主要是煤中主要元素相对含量变化的体现；随着煤体破坏程度增加，气煤萃取物中的总烃含量增大，非烃类含量减小，与无烟煤呈现相反的变化趋势；尽管煤体结构不同，但各煤样的不同溶剂萃取物的族组分相对含量均呈现一致性的对比关系.@利用低温差热法分析了我国内蒙古两种典型褐煤中水分的存在形式，并用恒温干燥的方法对褐煤中各部分水的析出情况进行了研究.结果表明，我国褐煤中存在三种具有不同冷凝特性的水，分别为自由水、束缚水和不冻水，其含量与煤种有关；从等温干燥实验得出，自由水的析出速率明显大于束缚水的析出速率；由不同存在形式水分含量及冷凝特性可以推测，大唐五间房褐煤具有比锡林郭勒褐煤更大比例的微孔，我国褐煤孔隙分布中的微孔所占体积比例比澳大利亚褐煤大.同时，通过孔隙测定验证了大唐五间房褐煤具有比锡林郭勒褐煤更大的微孔比例，且与其水分冷凝特性关系相符.@针对10 mm~25 mm粒径的大唐五间房褐煤，通过单颗粒高温烟气干燥实验，得到了600 ℃~900 ℃烟气温度下的干燥特性曲线，研究了干燥介质温度和粒径对褐煤高温脱水效果的影响，发现干燥过程主要处于降速干燥阶段；高温条件下，温度对干燥速率的影响并不显著；针对褐煤水分在干燥过程中的迁移特点以及大唐五间房褐煤的孔隙特征，基于努森扩散定律，建立了水分蒸发为蒸汽再扩散出煤粒的缩核干燥动力学模型；得到了不同温度下的有效水分扩散系数，并利用Arrhenius公式求出了10 mm~25 mm粒径下的干燥活化能.@以伊宁煤为原料，将其粉碎至5 mm~8 mm粒径置入固定床热解炉中，分别在N2和CO2两种气氛下程序升温至终温为500 ℃，600 ℃和700 ℃，收集热解产物并用GC-MS联用仪定量分析了焦油中的7种酚类化合物，对比分析了两种气氛下热解产物的分布，考察了CO2热解气氛对焦油及酚类化合物生成的影响.结果表明，CO2气氛能促进焦油的生成.700 ℃时，CO2气氛下煤热解生成总酚量为N2气氛下生成总酚量的1.3倍.两种气氛下总酚的生成量均随热解终温的升高而减少.CO2气氛还影响了酚类化合物中不同种类酚所占的比例，特别是二甲基苯酚在总酚中的比例不断增大，700 ℃达到最大，为7.66%.@采用自行改装设计的干馏炉，基于L9（34）正交实验对凤眼莲和低阶煤低温共热解进行条件优化，以提高热解油产率.正交实验得出因素主次关系为：终温>配比>粒径>保温时间，并且当凤眼莲添加量为35%，终温为550 ℃，凤眼莲粒径为0.355 mm~0.500 mm，保温时间为25 min时，热解油产率达到最大值11.70%，比优化前提高了3.36%.并对热解油进行了GC-MS检测，优化后热解油中苯类物质得到了大量的富集，其质量分数达到了63.17%，比优化前提高了81.99%.元素分析和热值分析得出优化前后热解油n(H)∶n(C)和热值变化不大，在不影响热解油品质的情况下实现了提高热解油产率的目的.@选取贵州典型高灰熔点煤种老矿中煤，在柱塞流反应器中进行气化特性研究，在未反应碳缩核模型以及动力-扩散模型两种气化反应动力学模型的基础上，建立了相应的一维柱塞流气化小室模型.结果表明，当反应温度从1 200 ℃上升至1 500 ℃时，CO2的体积分数下降约15%，CO的体积分数上升约16%，H2的体积分数上升约2%，碳转化率上升约20%；在相同温度下，水煤浆浓度增加5%，CO的体积分数约增加3%，H2的体积分数约增加0.5%，碳转化率下降约1.5%，气化模型计算结果与实验结果吻合较好.同时建议在实际气化炉运行过程中，应提高水煤浆浓度，以保证碳转化率同时尽量提高合成气有效成分.@采用Aspen Plus软件对我国准东煤合成气生产系统进行模拟，研究气化炉的主要操作参数（即n(O)∶n(C)和气化剂中水蒸气比例）对气化结果（合成气温度、合成气产出率、冷煤气效率和效率）的影响；比较了相同气化条件下准东煤与烟煤经济性的差异；对粗合成气显热回收对经济性的影响进行了讨论.结果表明，准东煤的气化经济性比烟煤的高，而综合效率却相反；当气化剂中水蒸气含量高时，加热气化剂回收显热比激冷回收要好.@对激冷式煤气化炉内顶部浸没式气体射流冲击液池的行为过程进行数值模拟，将模拟结果与可视化实验结果进行对比；获得气体射流冲击液池形成冲坑的演变过程；引入特征深度和特征半径两个特征参数表征冲坑特性.研究发现，在冲坑停滞阶段，冲坑特征深度和特征半径随气体射流速度的提高呈现逐渐加速并最终趋于平缓的增长趋势；随着下降管出口静态淹没深度的降低，冲坑特征深度和特征半径随气体射流速度的增长程度相对平缓，同时特征深度和特征半径减小.@以新疆阜康西沟原煤(200目)为研究对象，四氢萘为制浆和供氢溶剂，利用正交及单因素实验确定西沟煤适宜的液化条件.结果表明，T=435 ℃，p=7 MPa，m(solvent)∶m(coal)=1.75∶1和t=60 min为适宜的液化条件.此条件下，η(oil)=75.33%.进一步探讨了煤粒径及超声处理对液化效果的影响.西沟原煤经胶体磨研磨后直接液化：研磨1 h，粒径9.98 μm，η(oil)=59.96%；研磨2 h，粒径2.60 μm，η(oil)=60.03%；研磨3 h，粒径1.10 μm，η(oil)=60.02%；研磨4 h，粒径0.76 μm，η(oil)=60.06%.若研磨后先超声处理再液化，研磨1 h，2 h，3 h和4 h后油产率为80.73%，81.25%，84.27和82.63%，比不超声分别提高了20.77%，21.22%，24.25%和22.57%.@通过Mayer键级预测反应过程，基于过渡态理论，在分子水平上研究了含吡啶氮的armchair煤焦边缘模型在燃烧过程中产生前驱体HCN以及直接与O2反应释放NO分子的全过程，并计算得到了每一步反应的反应能量和能垒大小.结果表明，含吡啶氮armchair煤焦模型化合物产生HCN的过程中N2—C4键和C1—C3键的Mayer键级最小，这两个键最先断裂后分离出HCN分子，该过程需要克服的能垒为451.671 kJ/mol，而用相同模型与O2直接氧化产生NO的过程中，C1—N2的Mayer键级最小，中间体M1需要克服259.81 kJ/mol的能垒形成中间体M2，中间体M2需要克服133.1 kJ/mol的能垒，并最终析出NO分子.对上述两过程进行能量对比发现，所选模型与O2直接发生异相反应释放NO气体的过程更容易发生.@选择有代表性的捣固焦炭，在连续热反应装置内，考察不同温度下焦炭与CO2反应行为，揭示捣固焦炭在高炉内的劣化机理.结果表明，等温条件下，不同焦炭与CO2反应至30%的水平时，转化率随时间总体呈线性规律变化，反应动力学符合零级反应特征，表观活化能为89 kJ/mol~151 kJ/mol，碳溶反应后粉化程度与焦炭显气孔率及表观活化能有关，且粉化主要以扩孔和开孔为主.@以陕北中低温煤焦油轻油为原料，在减压（1 kPa）蒸馏装置中切取<100 ℃，100 ℃~170 ℃，170 ℃~200 ℃，200 ℃~240 ℃，240 ℃~270 ℃，270 ℃~300 ℃和300 ℃~340 ℃ 7段馏分.利用气相色谱-质谱联用技术（GC-MS）鉴定了馏分中化合物的组成和结构.结果表明，蒸馏终温为340 ℃可得到煤焦油约95%（质量分数）；在各个馏分中都分布有脂肪烃类化合物；蒽菲类化合物主要分布在170 ℃~240 ℃馏分中；低级酚主要分布在<100 ℃馏分中，酚类含量约占45%，其中苯酚含量为7.46%，甲酚含量为13%；高级酚分布于100 ℃~170 ℃和170 ℃~200 ℃馏分中；270 ℃~300 ℃和300 ℃~340 ℃馏分中也有少量低级酚和烯烃被发现，可能是高温下长链脂肪烃和高级酚类化合物发生热裂解所致.@首先利用热重法考察了氧解耦化学链燃烧(CLOU)中CuO载氧体在不同氧气气氛以及不同温度等工况下的释氧特性、Cu2O在不同温度下的吸氧特性以及CuO载氧体的持续循环能力.最后采用Achar-Brindley-Sharp-Wendworth方法对氧化铜在不同氧气浓度下的动力学参数进行了拟合求解.结果表明，CuO释氧速率随反应温度的提高而增加.氧气浓度越高，CuO在释氧温度区间的活化能大幅增加，因此开始析出氧气的温度也越高.对于Cu2O，温度越高，反应后阶段的吸氧速率越快.经过20次循环，CuO的释氧吸氧能力逐渐降低.@利用热重-微分分析仪和灰熔点测试仪，研究了O2/CO2和O2/N2气氛下添加剂对重庆南桐高灰分劣质烟煤燃烧特性和煤灰灰渣熔融温度的影响，并进行了动力学分析.结果表明，添加剂CaCl2，Ca(OH)2和CaCO3均能有效地增加煤粉反应表面的活性，降低煤粉反应表观活化能、煤粉点燃温度和燃尽温度，提高煤粉可燃性指数C和燃尽指数Cb，但三种添加剂对煤粉燃烧促进作用有差异，其促进性能大小顺序为CaCl2＞Ca(OH)2＞CaCO3.添加剂CaCl2的加入能够提高煤粉的燃烧效率.添加剂Ca(OH)2和CaCO3的加入显著降低了煤灰熔融点温度，增加煤灰结渣可能性，而添加剂CaCl2的加入对煤灰灰渣熔融点温度降低不明显.CaCl2作为劣质煤燃烧添加剂，具有较好的综合性能.@以太西无烟煤为原料，对在不同处理温度下作为锂离子二次电池负极材料的电化学性能进行了研究.实验结果表明：太西无烟煤在1 000 ℃~1 150 ℃温度处理下，在0 V~0.12 V的电压范围内显示出最高的可逆容量，在处理温度为1 100 ℃时，显示出最高容量为370 mA·h/g.较大的可逆容量归因于其硬碳在石墨化后产生了一定量的微孔，有效地改善了材料的比表面积，有利于电解液和电子的扩散.@生物质含有较高的挥发分，炭化产物中草木灰呈碱性，且碱金属钾元素含量较高.研究了秸秆及牛粪等不同生物质对炭化所得活性炭性能的影响.结果表明：秸秆及牛粪对炭化过程具有重要的影响；通过烧失率计算及碘吸附值测定发现，秸杆对炭化产物性能的影响明显优于牛粪，炭化产物经脱灰处理后吸附性能显著提高.@以石槽村煤泥为主要原料进行冷压成型制备型煤，采用单因素实验和正交实验等方法，重点研究黏结剂掺比和配煤比对型煤质量的影响.结果表明，添加少量的A或D黏结剂即可使型煤具有良好的冷压强度.配煤比和D黏结剂掺比是型煤质量指标的主要影响因素，D可与煤粒固化形成高强度的型煤“骨架”，但会增加型煤灰分，降低其发热量；配入原煤可提高煤泥型煤发热量，降低灰分，但会降低型煤强度.煤泥单独进行成型时，较优的黏结剂配方为：A掺比5%或D掺比4%；配煤成型时，以配煤比为8（煤泥）∶2（原煤）、D掺比7%为宜.@以高反应活性的SO3/1，2-二氯乙烷体系作为磺化试剂，在温和条件下对腐植酸（HA）进行磺化改性.对磺化剂用量、反应时间和温度等工艺条件进行了优化.结果表明，最优条件为1 g HA∶1.28 g SO3，室温反应4 h.通过FTIR分析、元素分析和XPS等表征，证明了磺化产物中引入—SO3H.与传统的浓硫酸磺化法相比，SO3/溶剂体系磺化HA新工艺的磺化效果更好，可引入2倍的—SO3H.@利用一套4 t/h燃煤热水示范锅炉对5种煤进行实验，分析煤质对锅炉大气污染物的影响，并计算不同煤种锅炉大气污染物的排污系数.结果表明，在相同条件下，不同煤种锅炉大气污染物产排放情况不尽相同，其中烟尘产生浓度在328.86 mg/m3～3 634 mg/m3之间，排放浓度在30.26 mg/m3～72.91 mg/m3之间，烟尘产生量在0.7 kg/h～11.7 kg/h之间，排放量为0.07 kg/h～0.31 kg/h；SO2的产生浓度在199 mg/m3～3 565 mg/m3之间，产生量在0.83 kg/h～16.21 kg/h之间；排放浓度为69 mg/m3～1 443 mg/m3，排放量在0.34 kg/h～7.51 kg/h之间；NOx的产生浓度在173 mg/m3～336 mg/m3之间，产生量为0.75 kg/h～1.52 kg/h；排放浓度为159 mg/m3～371 mg/m3，排放量为0.67 kg/h～1.93 kg/h；SO3产生浓度在0.000 4 mg/m3～0.001 5 mg/m3之间，排放浓度在0.000 15 mg/m3～0.000 93 mg/m3之间.实验发现烟尘浓度主要与煤质灰分有关，二氧化硫与燃煤含硫量有很大的关系，氮氧化物浓度与煤质中的氮含量关系不大.从排污系数来看，本实验锅炉烟尘排污系数小于全国污染源普查系数，二氧化硫和氮氧化物的排污系数与普查结果比较接近.@运用反射偏光显微镜和扫描电镜等手段研究霍林河14#煤中矿物分布特征，运用浮沉实验和煤岩组分定量统计方法研究了煤中6种微量元素的分布赋存特征以及有机亲和性.结果表明，霍林河14#煤中矿物含量较高，以伊利石黏土矿物为主；霍林河煤中微量元素As，Cr和Hg含量较高，Pb，Cd和Se含量较低；元素As，Cr，Hg和Pb明显富集于矿物中，主要为无机态，与有机组分亲和性较低，而元素Cd和Se与有机组分亲和程度比其他4种元素高，基本上均匀分布于有机组分和矿物中.@采用自行设计的低温干馏装置，将不同配比下的低阶煤-浒苔混合物进行低温共热解，考察随着浒苔配入量的增加各热解产物的产率和品质的变化.结果表明，当浒苔配入量为30%时，焦油产率达到最大值11.39%，比低阶煤单独热解提高了28.61%.此时，热解焦油中烷烃类含量为48.66%，酚类含量为9.12%，明显高于原始焦油中相应组分的含量，热解焦油的n(H)∶n(C)提高了9.87%，表明热解焦油达到了一定程度的轻质化.同时煤气成分中CH4和H2的含量有所增大.SEM检测显示，混合热解时半焦表面变得粗糙，形成了明显的裂纹中心.混合热解的半焦热值相对于浒苔单独热解的半焦热值有显著提高.@采用红外光谱法确定褐煤中含氧官能团的种类，利用化学法分析干燥前后褐煤表面含氧官能团的变化，吸水性能用最高内在水分来表征，研究低温干燥过程中温度、干燥程度和干燥气氛对褐煤含氧基团及其吸水性能的影响.结果表明，褐煤中羧基和酚羟基含量较高；惰性气氛低温干燥时，酚羟基含量基本不变，羧基发生少量分解；空气下干燥时，羧基含量先减小，之后在氧化作用下，羧基和酚羟基含量同时增大.随着干燥程度的加深，煤样最高内在水分先减小后增大.@采用μRC微量热仪研究了宝日希勒褐煤及其500 ℃热解半焦在25 ℃下的润湿热.结果表明，褐煤的含水量对润湿热有较大影响，含水量低于16%的干燥煤润湿热随着含水量的降低而增加，含水量高于16%的宝日褐煤润湿时的放热量可忽略不计；半焦在空气中由于氧化吸湿，润湿热降低，暴露48 h后润湿热降低为原来的1/2，暴露240 h后润湿热降为原来的12%，并不再随暴露时间的增加而降低；半焦的润湿热与半焦粒度无关，而润湿时的放热速率随粒度的增大而降低；褐煤的表面官能团与半焦的表面官能团有较大差别.研究表明，表面官能团对润湿热有较大影响.@以课题组独创的催化剂添加方式，实现了对煤的催化解聚.研究了锌基催化剂对内蒙褐煤催化解聚产物分布的影响.结果表明：催化解聚对产物的分布影响显著.相比原煤热解，催化煤解聚焦油产率提高26.88%，煤气热值提高30.79%，半焦比表面积提高80.65%.催化煤解聚相比原煤热解显示出一定的潜在优越性.@以乙醇为溶剂在索式萃取器中对北宿煤进行了萃取，并利用傅立叶转换红外光谱仪(FTIR)和气相色谱-质谱联用仪(GC/MS)对萃取物成分进行分析.结果表明：萃取物中共检测到89种物质，主要分为脂肪烃、芳烃、含氧化合物和其他种类物质四类组分.其中，芳烃的种类和含量均最多，共65种，相对含量高达73.88%.萃取机理可能主要基于乙醇与煤有机质大分子网络结构形成O—H…O，O—H…N和O—H…π等形式的氢键.@为了考察煤炭地下气化工业试验基地废水的催化活性，探究利用该废水进行地下催化气化工业性试验的可行性，对乌兰察布褐煤进行了不同压力下的活性评价实验.结果表明，煤炭地下气化废水对乌兰察布褐煤的气化起到了良好的催化效果，在添加一定量煤炭地下气化废水后，其碳转化率由80.19%提高到89.82%；煤气产率由4.2 m3/kg增加到5.2 m3/kg，增加了原来的23.8%.随着反应压力的提升，碳转化率及煤气产率均呈现不同程度的降低，煤气组分中H2，CO和CO2含量也呈现不同程度的降低；而CH4含量随着压力的提升持续增加.@对无烟煤水焦浆(APCWS)的成浆性与稳定性做实验研究，并进行工业化气化实验.结果表明，APCWS的表观黏度随石油焦加入量的增大而减小，萘系聚合物(NSP)的分散性优于磺化木质素(LS)的分散性，采用LS添加剂的APCWS稳定性更好；工业化气化实验结果显示，APCWS的气化温度、石灰石加入量和氧浆比都比精煤水煤浆(RCWS)的要低，气化活性较好，具有更高的碳转化率，气化渣中碳含量较RCWS气化渣中碳含量低，且气化渣颗粒性较好，较容易过滤；利用APCWS比RCWS浆吨氨气化原料成本降低，经济效益显著.@通过热红外技术研究了秸秆灰对煤焦气化反应性的影响.结果表明，在实验条件下，添加秸秆灰煤焦达到最大气化反应速率所需时间缩短了近10 min，完成气化反应所需时间缩短了近17 min；同时秸秆灰对煤焦气化反应性的影响与秸秆灰添加量密切相关，添加量为30%时效果最佳.红外光谱分析结果表明，秸秆灰的加入，对煤焦表面的官能团结构产生重要影响.秸秆灰对煤焦气化反应性的影响是通过改善煤焦的表面物理化学性质实现的.@在0.5 L搅拌式高压釜上开展了中温煤焦油与新疆黑山煤共处理的实验研究，考察了中温煤焦油添加量对新疆黑山煤制浆性能和液化结果的影响，探索中温煤焦油加工利用新途径.结果表明，添加中温煤焦油增加了油煤浆输送时的黏度，在油煤浆浓度为42%时，中温煤焦油添加量不高于18%.与新疆黑山煤单独液化相比，中温煤焦油与新疆黑山煤共处理具有氢耗、气产率、转化率和油产率高的特点；添加适量的中温煤焦油对新疆黑山煤液化具有正协同效应，添加量大于20%时反而对煤转化不利；最佳添加量为5%，与煤单独处理的结果相比，转化率高1.6% ，油产率高1.1%；添加量大于20%时，油收率下降.因此，添加适量的中温煤焦油与新疆黑山煤共处理，既可提高煤的转化率和油收率，又可加工利用中温煤焦油，提高煤直接液化的经济效益.@在50 L高压釜上研究了不同反应条件对煤与催化裂化油浆共处理反应压力变化的影响.结果表明：在400 ℃，H2气氛和5.0 MPa(室温)条件下，使用Mo系列催化剂时，体系总压力最低，压降最多而且压力下降时温度最低；使用Fe系列催化剂次之；无催化剂时结果相反.说明Mo催化剂加氢性能最好.油浆与煤投料比例对压力的变化规律影响不明显.随反应温度的升高，压力增加.在低温400 ℃保温段，反应1 h压力不回升，延长反应时间到3 h压力也不回升，但压降主要发生在保温前期.在高温425 ℃和450 ℃保温段，压力随反应时间的延长会回升，可能是发生缩聚反应所致.温度越高，缩聚越严重.气氛对反应影响较大.N2气氛下，在保温段压力一直增加，可能是缩聚反应产生小分子所致.@以高温煤焦油和长焰煤为主要原料，研究了高温煤焦油作为溶剂进行煤油共处理时的反应特性.通过热天平实验，评价了煤和高温煤焦油的热解性能，在500 mL机械搅拌式高压釜上实验考察了不同温度点下的釜内压力变化情况和产物组成变化情况并分析了原因.结果表明，不同反应温度下釜内压力变化趋势相同，反应主要分为快速加氢、平衡裂解和降速缩聚三个阶段.研究了煤焦油预加氢前后氢分布变化对供氢性能的影响.结果表明，预加氢后的高温煤焦油结构发生明显变化，Hα和Hβ含量提高，通过高压釜实验验证，供氢性能提高，促进了加氢裂化反应，油收率提高2%.@在20 L爆炸球中，通过化学点火，在不同喷雾压力条件下对比煤基柴油与-10号军用柴油和-35号军用柴油云雾的燃爆特性.采用液体燃料持续燃烧性能测定仪测试燃料的燃烧性能，分析不同温度下燃料的燃烧情况.结果表明，随着喷雾压力的升高，三种柴油的最大爆炸压力和最大爆炸温度都有上升的趋势，在同一喷雾压力条件下，煤基柴油的最大爆炸压力和温度大于-10号军用柴油和-35号军用柴油的最大爆炸压力和温度.无约束条件下煤基柴油的燃烧性能一定程度上要优于-10号军用柴油和-35号军用柴油的燃烧性能.实验获得了三种柴油不同实验条件下的燃爆参数，并进行了定量评价.@2台不同导流角度的新型螺旋夹套式余热回收装置用于4.3 m焦炉上升管进行传热特性实验研究，测试了荒煤气在一个结焦周期内的温度波动及总体传热效果.结果表明，荒煤气的温度随着结焦时间呈现周期性波动，最高可达825 ℃，荒煤气温度波动对传热量的影响较大，但对总体传热系数影响不大.稳定氮气侧流量190 m3/h，入口温度30 ℃，91#装置(导流角度4°)的havg为30.23 W/(m2·℃)，92#装置(导流角度3°)的havg为25.2 W/(m2·℃).针对荒煤气的流动特性和本实验装置结构特点所提出的传热模型同实验数据匹配较好，最大相对误差控制在±20%以内.@通过实验室模拟高炉反应条件，对高温下冶金焦炭、兰炭与CO2气化反应特性进行研究，并结合兰炭微观结构分析了其反应机理.结果表明，兰炭起始反应温度低，气化反应速率远高于冶金焦炭，并且随着温度升高而迅速增加.富碱后，碱金属可以分布到兰炭内部，使兰炭在较长时间内保持较高的反应速率.冶金焦炭结构致密，镶嵌组织含量高；兰炭结构呈层片状，比表面积大，各向同性组织含量高，易与CO2发生反应.@采用淀粉作为黏结剂，将低变质粉煤冷压成型、干馏制备出型焦，通过测定型煤与型焦的抗压强度、落下强度和浸水强度，采用扫描电镜分析型煤与型焦的微观结构，研究原淀粉、糊化淀粉和碱化淀粉对型煤与型焦强度的影响.结果表明，糊化淀粉的黏结作用最好，型煤的抗压强度最大，为3 930 N/ball；碱化淀粉作黏结剂制备的型焦抗压强度与落下强度较好，其数值分别为2 410 N/ball和49%.@选用新阳高硫炼焦原煤，研究在微波-KMnO4协同作用下煤中有机硫的脱除效果，考察了微波辐照功率、辐照时间、KMnO4用量和稀硝酸用量对脱硫率的影响；以均匀化实验设计开展实验，选用DPS软件对实验结果进行逐步回归分析，创建最优回归方程，并对回归方程进行模型优化，获得了实验条件选取范围内微波-KMnO4协同法脱硫效果的最优实验条件组合；采用XPS对实验前后煤中有机硫组分进行分析，得出不同类型有机硫组分在微波-KMnO4协同作用下的脱除情况.@在湿法脱硫系统模拟实验台上研究飞灰等氧化物颗粒对SO2氧化特性的影响，着重探讨水溶液温度和氧气浓度等因素.结果表明，飞灰中Si，Al，Ca和Fe等元素的存在形式主要为SiO2，CaO，Fe2O3，Al2O3以及莫来石和斜长石等；飞灰的存在使得SO2的氧化程度加剧；无论混合气是否携带飞灰，SO2的氧化程度均随着水溶液温度的升高而增大；混合气未携带飞灰时，随着氧气浓度的增加，SO2的氧化程度明显增大，但飞灰存在时影响较小；Al2O3与Fe2O3对SO2的氧化存在协同促进作用.@结合XPS和FTIR分析微波联合不同浸提剂脱硫前后，煤中硫的赋存形态和变化规律.结果表明，新峪精煤中硫主要以噻吩、R—O—S—S—R′和无机硫的形式存在；微波联合HAc+H2O2的脱硫率明显高于微波联合NaOH的脱硫率.经微波联合HAc+H2O2处理后，煤中噻吩和R—O—S—S—R′显著降低，并新生成了二苯氧硫和硫酸铁.经微波联合NaOH处理后，噻吩和R—O—S—S—R′含量有所降低，而硫酸铁和无机硫含量有所升高.同时对脱硫机理进行了探讨.@利用沉降炉燃烧系统，研究了五种冶金工业废渣对三种典型的烟煤燃尽率及氮氧化物释放的影响，并对添加剂的助燃机理进行了初步探讨.结果表明，煤种对于添加剂的催化性能起着重要作用，添加剂催化作用的大小和添加量有关，添加量并不是越大越好.在本实验范围内，钢渣适用于较低变质程度的烟煤；脱硫渣对于三种煤均有一定的催化助燃作用，但对于燃尽率的增幅都不是很大；锰尾矿适用于低变质程度的烟煤；铬渣适用于较高变质程度的烟煤.添加剂的加入能够影响煤中氮氧化物的释放，煤种和添加剂的添加量都能够对添加剂的脱硝效果起到重要的影响作用.通过对燃烧残余物的电镜扫描，发现加入废渣后燃烧产物颗粒外观由平整变为不规整的蜂窝状；此外，X射线衍射分析发现添加剂改变了燃烧残余物的组成.@在负载型离子液体溴代正丁基吡啶/活性炭([BPy]Br/AC)脱除SO2性能研究的基础上，通过改变模拟烟气组成，分别研究了该脱硫剂在同一担载比(0.36∶1)相同载体质量(4 g)条件下，水蒸气、氧气、二氧化碳及氧气、二氧化碳和水蒸气相互组合对该脱硫剂脱除SO2性能的影响.结果表明，在研究的条件范围内，烟气组分水蒸气、氧气、二氧化碳与SO2同时存在时，存在竞争反应，水蒸气及二氧化碳对该脱硫剂有明显的负面影响.氧气对该脱硫剂脱硫性能的影响相对较弱.@以石英砂作为循环颗粒，研究了颗粒与换热管束壁面的换热特性.在导向管喷动床环隙内，砂子以移动床的形式向下移动.为测定移动床层与埋管表面的换热系数，自制了组合热探头，并用调压器调节组合热探头的功率，使其稳定在不同温度下工作.分别考察了不同电压、不同吹松气量和不同床层轴向位置等对换热系数的影响.通过电压递增与递减的验证性实验，考察了两种方式对实验结果的影响.通过实验可知，换热系数随颗粒循环量的增加而增加.实验在常温常压下进行，喷动床材质为有机玻璃，移动床层与埋管换热壁面的平均换热系数在300 W/(m2·K-1)~400 W/(m2·K-1)之间.@以淖毛湖煤为研究对象，利用高温高压萃取装置将原煤(RC)分级成残渣(RD)、不溶物(DP)和可溶物(SL)三种固体物质，考察了煤的添加量、温度、粒径和溶剂种类对DP和SL萃取率的影响，并对RC，RD，DP，SL作了工业分析、元素分析、热重分析和红外分析.结果表明：当溶剂用量一定时，随着煤的添加量增加，DP萃取率增高，SL萃取率略有降低；升高温度有利于DP和SL的萃取，当温度高于375 ℃时，由于发生大量热解反应，SL萃取率迅速升高；粒径对萃取率影响很小.以四氢萘和1-甲基萘为溶剂时，DP和SL总萃取率相似，DP和SL萃取率均高于以甲苯为溶剂时DP和SL萃取率.RC中富含羟基的物质和脂肪烃主要集中到了DP和SL中，灰分集中到了RD中，RD，DP和SL的水分均远低于RC的水分.@通过显微组分富集物的红外光谱分段分峰拟合对比和结构参数对比，分析镜质组和惰质组结构上的差异.分段分峰拟合对比结果：两者羟基氢键的分配既有相似之处，又有区别；镜质组较惰质组含有更高比例的CH2，CHx和C=O基团吸收峰，同时含有更低比例的R3CH，C=C和—O—基团吸收峰；惰质组较镜质组芳环结构的取代方式更复杂.结构参数对比结果：镜质组芳香度和缩合环指数均较惰质组低；脂氢与芳氢比，镜质组较惰质组要高；氧化程度参数，镜质组较惰质组更高；芳构化参数比较，惰质组缩合比较镜质组缩合比高，而脂肪比较镜质组脂肪比低.因此可得出：石马洼煤惰质组较镜质组芳构化程度更高，脂肪链长度较短，支链较多，且氧化程度较弱.@使用氧化剂对无烟煤进行预氧化处理，利用TPD-MS和TG-DTA等表征方法，研究了煤表面官能基团种类、含量的变化及其对煤氧化活性的影响.结果表明，使用氧化剂处理煤样可以不同程度地改变煤表面官能基团及其分布.双氧水、次氯酸钠处理后的无烟煤，其氧化反应活性的变化不明显；硝酸处理的无烟煤，其低温氧化反应活性有所提高.根据处理前后煤表面基团及其分布的变化推测：无烟煤中的羧基等含氧基团明显提高煤的低温氧化活性，而烷基对煤的低温氧化活性影响不明显，但对煤氧化反应热有一定影响.@为研究表面活性剂在氧化煤表面的吸附特性及其对煤表面润湿性的影响，系统考察了溶液温度、初始浓度、溶液pH值和吸附时间对阳离子表面活性剂十六烷基三甲基溴化铵(CTAB) 在氧化煤表面吸附量的影响，研究了吸附CTAB对氧化煤表面润湿性改性的影响.结果表明，提高温度，增大CTAB溶液初始浓度，会增加CTAB在氧化煤表面的吸附量，CTAB溶液pH值在5~7之间时，有利于CTAB与煤吸附过程的进行；氧化煤表面极性含氧官能团的增加明显有利于CTAB在煤表面的吸附.氧化煤吸附CTAB后，接触角随时间变化由急剧减小变为略有下降，平衡接触角由0°变为70°，水分复吸率下降，其表面润湿性发生了明显的由亲水性向疏水性的反转.@在定制微波炉中进行了H2气氛中低变质煤的微波热解实验研究，系统考察了微波功率、热解时间、煤样粒度和氢气流量等对低变质煤微波热解产品收率及成分的影响.研究表明，低变质煤在微波功率为800 W，热解时间为40 min，煤样粒度为5 mm～10 mm，氢气流量为0.4 L/min的优化工艺条件下热解，兰炭收率达59.8%，液体产品(煤焦油和热解水)收率达28.2%.热解获得的煤焦油中烷烃类化合物含量高达45.2%，兰炭中酚羟基和羰基官能团含量较高，固定碳含量高，硫和挥发分含量低.@对陕北孙家岔（SJC）煤和聚丙烯塑料（PP）进行了微波共热解实验，采用红外光谱仪、气相色谱-质谱联用仪、煤气分析仪等仪器对热解产物进行了分析表征，主要研究了热解终温为800 ℃时，不同的微波热解功率对热解产物组成的影响规律.结果表明：随着微波功率的降低，热解后所得固态产物中灰分的含量逐渐降低，挥发分的含量逐渐升高，其他元素的含量变化不大，C元素的含量基本保持在一定区域内而不发生变化；CO和H2含量逐渐减小，CH4含量呈现增加的趋势，CnHm和CO2含量基本不变；热解后所得焦油成分中烷烃类和烯烃类物质的含量逐渐减小，而芳香烃类物质的含量逐渐增大.@利用热重-傅立叶红外联用技术(TG-FTIR)考察了粒度为3 mm~6 mm神东上湾煤的中低温热解行为.结果表明，130 ℃时上湾煤失水速率达到最大值1.1%/min~1.2%/min；以10 ℃/min的速率将温度从室温升高至250 ℃可实现煤样的充分干燥；随着热解终温的升高，失重率增加，并且出现两个热解阶段.整个热解过程中都伴随着CO2，H2O，CH4和轻质碳氢化合物(LHCs)的释放，而且其生成量都随热解温度的升高而增加；而CO的释放仅存在于终温为750 ℃和850 ℃的热解过程中.LHCs以650 ℃温度前的释放为主，在750 ℃时达到最大值38.5 mg，但由于热缩聚反应的加剧，850 ℃时LHCs生成量明显降低.@选育出细菌N6，真菌M6和放线菌G1三株菌株，与5种煤进行正交实验，运用Pearson相关性检验方法，分析煤的微生物溶解性与煤镜质组反射率及煤显微组分的关系.结果表明，煤的镜质组反射率越低，其微生物溶解性越好.煤的镜质组和矿物组含量越高，其微生物溶解性越好；煤的壳质组和惰质组含量越低，其微生物溶解性越好.其中，煤的镜质组反射率对煤微生物溶解性的影响最为明显.@基于Aspen Plus模拟软件，对煤制气甲烷化反应过程中的析碳现象进行了热力学研究，作出了析碳判别图.结果表明，原料中氢氧物质的量比小于5时，温度越高，析碳可能性越大，大于5时则相反；对于具有不同氢氧碳比例的原料来说，压力对析碳的影响并不相同；对于企业托普索甲烷化工艺中的甲烷化反应器来说，起始反应器和末尾反应器(第一台反应器和第五台反应器)出口气体组成点落在相应温度下的析碳区，有析碳的可能性，但通过调节水蒸气比例可以减少或消除析碳.@采用X射线衍射分析、等离子体原子发射光谱(ICP-AES)分析和炉渣灰熔融性分析等方法研究了五种气化炉渣的化学组成、相组成、高温相组成、熔融温度和高温黏度；并通过高温熔融淬冷及FactSage软件模拟探究不同温度下炉渣物相组成演变及高温黏度变化情况.结果表明，在高温情况下，由于化学组成不同五种气化炉渣形成的物相有所差异；且随着温度的升高，炉渣逐渐熔融为非晶相.通过软件模拟的数值结果与实验结果基本保持一致，即利用FactSage绘制的CaO-Al2O3-SiO2三元相图和黏温曲线可以很好地解释气化炉渣的高温相组成变化规律及黏温特性.@对超声波辅助浸渍法制备褐煤半焦为载体的Fe及Fe-Cu脱硫剂可行性进行了研究，考察了脱硫剂最佳制备工艺和硫化温度对脱硫剂硫化性能的影响.通过X射线衍射仪(XRD)及带有能谱分析的电子扫描显微镜(SEM-EDS)分析硫化前后脱硫剂的晶体结构和表面形貌的变化，利用傅立叶红外仪(FTIR)分析表征脱硫前后的脱硫剂官能团变化.结果表明，当超声清洗器功率为100 W时，制取脱硫剂的最佳条件是超声浸渍时间为5 h，共沉淀时间为3 h，超声波水浴温度为60 ℃.活性半焦负载的脱硫剂能够有效脱除焦炉煤气中的H2S和COS.随着硫化温度的升高，穿透时间和硫容均增加，在脱硫温度为400 ℃时具有最大的穿透硫容和穿透时间，且Cu元素的加入使半焦负载的铁基脱硫剂脱硫效果明显增强.@利用陕北地区的兰炭末制备水炭浆，研究了兰炭末的粒度配比、制浆搅拌作用及温度对水炭浆表观黏度、流动性和稳定性的影响.兰炭末用实验室球磨机研磨好并筛合成＞830目(D1)，200目~320目(D2)，100目~200目(D3)和60目~100目(D4)四种粒径范围.结果表明，当兰炭末的粒度配比m(D1)∶m(D2)∶m(D3)∶m(D4)=5∶2∶2∶1，搅拌速率为1 500 r/min，搅拌时间为15 min，环境温度为30 ℃～40 ℃时，制备出的水炭浆质量分数可达到60%，表观黏度360 mPa·s，浆体可以保持一个月内稳定并且流动性良好.随着细粒度兰炭颗粒加入量的增加，水炭浆表观黏度增大，流动性变差，稳定性增强.搅拌速率过高和搅拌时间过长会导致浆体老化，流动性变差.当温度逐渐升高时，水炭浆的表观黏度呈现出先降低后增加的趋势.@选取三种不同生物质(松木、花生壳和稻草)与炼焦煤在固定床上进行共碳化实验，生物质质量分数分别为0%，3%，6%，9%和12%.结果表明，当松木、花生壳和稻草质量分数由0%增加到12%，焦炭产率由75.39%分别降低至66.29%，68.40%和67.39%；焦油产率由6.88%升高至12.98%，12.16%和11.42%；而气体产率由13.64%升高至15.63%，15.27%和16.97%.共碳化产物产率实验值与理论值存在一定偏差，这说明生物质与煤共碳化过程发生了协同作用.随着生物质掺入量的增加，生物质与煤共碳化气态产物中CO和CO2体积分数升高，而H2和CH4体积分数降低.@以碱渣(质量分数分别为1%和2%)为添加剂配入吕家坨焦煤中炼焦，考察不同碳溶反应温度(850 ℃~1 200 ℃)下焦炭的热性质.结果表明，添加碱渣可以提高焦炭的反应性，降低碳溶反应的起始温度；焦炭反应后比表面积最大值的失碳量随着碱渣添加量的增加逐渐增大，说明碱渣的添加可以增加焦炭碳溶反应的活性点；电镜分析结果表明，碱渣的添加对焦炭反应前的微观结构影响不显著，但碱渣能够促进焦炭表面的溶损，抑制焦炭内部溶损，从而减缓焦炭的劣化.@开发了一种粒焦动态反应性测量装置，通过分析焦炭溶损反应尾气中CO2的含量变化，构建了焦炭溶损速率和动态粒焦反应性的数学模型.通过对两种不同热性质工业焦炭进行实验，测得粒焦反应性的相对标准偏差小于0.5%，模拟计算粒焦反应性指标与实验值相对误差小于1%.通过对焦炭溶损速率曲线分析，确定了焦炭溶损反应过程中化学反应控制、混合控制和气体内扩散控制的反应阶段，阐明了不同反应性焦炭的溶损反应规律.通过溶损速率分析揭示了块焦反应性和粒焦反应性的关系.@采用甲醛聚合改性煤沥青，运用热聚合工艺制备出中间相炭微球(MCMB)，并对MCMB进行高温热处理.利用扫描电子显微镜(SEM)、X射线衍射仪(XRD)和电池测试仪等对MCMB的微观结构和电化学性能进行研究.结果表明，高温热处理可有效改善MCMB中碳原子排列和微晶结构的有序化程度.并随着热处理温度的提高，MCMB的可逆容量、不可逆容量和首次充电容量降低，库仑效率和充放电效率升高，循环性能增加.1 400 ℃热处理后，MCMB的充放电效率最高，循环性能最优.@采用热重分析法对煤矸石中高岭石的脱羟基特点进行研究，结合X射线衍射对煤矸石煅烧后的晶相组成进行分析，运用Coats and Redfern方法研究煤矸石中高岭石的脱羟基动力学.结果表明，煤矸石中高岭石脱羟基反应发生的温度区间为400 ℃~800 ℃，在650 ℃左右达到脱羟基的最大失重率，且随着升温速率的增加，最大失重率所对应的温度向高温偏移；650 ℃，1 h煤矸石煅烧样中，高岭石的衍射峰全部消失，完成了高岭石向偏高岭石的相转变；[(1-y)-1/3-1]2机理函数与实验数据吻合较高，且表观活化能EA为231.55 kJ/mol，指前因子A为3×1011 s-1.@以贵州某地煤矸石为原料，经机械活化，在微波条件下进行酸浸提取煤矸石中的钛，探讨了酸矸比、微波功率、微波加热时间和溶解温度等因素对煤矸石中钛的提取率的影响，并以单因素实验和正交设计实验进行工艺优化.结果表明，微波提取的最佳工艺条件为：酸矸比1.5，微波功率800 W，微波加热时间90 min，溶解温度75 ℃，此工艺条件下，钛的提取率达到79.85%.用X射线衍射(XRD)、X射线光电子能谱(XPS)和扫描电镜(SEM)对样品结构进行了表征，酸浸产物主要是以Ti(SO4)2的形式存在.@以Fe为催化剂，利用CO2气体对分离煤层气所用的活性炭进行改性实验，分别研究铁碳比、活化温度、CO2流量和活化时间对活性炭孔结构及CH4吸附量的影响.结果表明，nFe∶nC=0.12，活化温度650 ℃，CO2流量3.0 L/min，活化时间1.5 h是最佳的改性条件；改性后活性炭孔结构更加发达，表面积增大，特别是新增了孔径为5 nm~9 nm的中孔；在相同的压力(107 kPa)和吸附分离因子维持不变的情况下，改性后活性炭对甲烷气体的吸附量相对于原始活性炭提高了16.55%.@以煤矸石和沥青为主要原料制备X沸石/活性炭型体复合材料，并以酚醛树脂作为沉积剂，研究碳沉积对复合材料的孔结构及CH4和N2吸附分离性能的影响.X射线衍射、低温N2吸附/脱附和273 K下CO2的吸附等温线表征结果表明，酚醛树脂可通过碳沉积的形式对复合材料中活性炭的微孔结构进行精细调节，随着碳沉积次数增加，微孔比表面积和微孔孔容降低，但其中0.45 nm~0.55 nm的微孔相对含量增加，微孔分布更加均一.复合材料在298 K下对CH4和N2的吸附等温线测试结果表明，虽然碳沉积使得CH4和N2吸附容量降低，但CH4/N2分离比提高至2.7.@基于固体核磁共振(13C NMR)测试方法，对五类不同煤化程度的10种煤样进行分析测试,对谱图分峰后所得的结构参数进行研究，揭示了不同煤化程度煤中各官能团的存在形式及内在联系，阐明了各官能团结构演化规律.结果表明，脂肪碳和芳香碳含量整体呈互补关系，随煤化程度的加深，脂碳率下降，芳碳率上升.氧接芳碳和侧支芳碳含量减少，氧接脂碳含量增加；受煤化程度、构造应力和破坏类型等多方面因素的影响，其他结构参数变化趋势并不明显.@以空化洗油为溶胀剂，对新疆准东煤田西沟煤样进行自然溶胀和微波溶胀处理.借助peakfit软件，对三种煤样的FTIR谱图进行分峰处理，定性和半定量分析比较了原煤样的分子结构特点，以及自然溶胀和微波溶胀对其分子结构中各官能团的作用.FTIR分峰结果为：1) 三种煤样的红外谱均可大致分为四段，即3 600 cm-1~3 100 cm-1处羟基官能团、3 000 cm-1~2 800 cm-1处脂肪氢、1 800 cm-1~1 000 cm-1处含氧官能团和900 cm-1~700 cm-1处苯环取代结构；2) 煤样分子结构中存在的5种羟基官能团，其脱落的难易程度为：羟基环氢键＜羟基π氢键＜自缔合羟基氢键＜羟基N氢键＜羟基醚氢键；3) 与原煤样相比，自然溶胀煤样面内不对称—CH2增加88.76%，—CH减少65.42%，含氧官能团和芳环结构变化不大，苯环四取代和五取代结构减少50%左右，三取代和二取代结构分别增加150%和57%，说明与苯环相连的侧链断裂；4) 与自然溶胀煤样相比，经进一步微波溶胀，煤样的—CH3和—CH分别增加2.7倍和3.6倍，含氧官能团含量增加，苯环取代结构变化不大，芳环结构减少，这表明微波辐射能够增强溶胀剂对芳环结构的溶解.@以半焦作为微波吸收剂和CH4裂解催化剂，在固定床反应器上考察了CH4气氛下神木煤微波热解特性，对CH4气氛下神木煤-半焦混合物在不同温度(450 ℃~700 ℃)下微波热解产物的生成规律进行了研究，并与相同条件的N2气氛下微波热解结果进行了比较.研究表明，CH4气氛下神木煤的微波热解半焦产率比N2气氛下的半焦产率低；而焦油产率和热解水产率高于相同条件N2气氛下的焦油和热解水产率.在CH4气氛下煤-半焦混合物微波热解，H2和CO产率高于N2气氛下的结果，而CO2产率低于N2气氛下微波热解的CO2产率.综合对比两种气氛下热解产物的生成规律可知，在半焦催化作用下，CH4在微波加热条件下可以实现对神木煤的直接加氢，提高煤的热解转化率.@对烟煤与木质素类生物质松木屑、纤维素类生物质秸秆在固定床反应器中共热解行为进行了系统的实验研究，并对气体产物和焦油组成进行了分析.结果表明，烟煤与两种生物质共热解时存在明显的协同作用，挥发分产率的实验值较计算值有所增加，且使用松木屑时增幅较大.松木屑与烟煤共热解时焦油中愈创木酚类含量显著提高，在400 ℃松木屑配比为80%时，增量高达25.89%.焦油中酚类含量比计算值高，而PAH和烃类含量则明显降低，同时焦油产生了一定的轻质化.@研究了褐煤、生物质及其不同配比混合物在快速热解条件下，热解产物半焦的产率、工业组成、热值以及表面结构等特性，探讨了其随热解温度和原料组成的变化规律.结果表明，由于受褐煤和生物质各自组成和性质的影响，褐煤与生物质混合快速热解过程，生物质配入比例和热解温度对半焦的产率、工业组成、热值及表面结构的影响较为复杂.总体趋势是，控制适宜的热解温度和适宜的生物质配入量(生物质配入比例<50%)，可获得高的半焦产率和半焦热值，同时降低半焦中灰分含量.生物质掺混比例为50%，热解温度为600 ℃时，热解产物半焦产率为52.1%，半焦热值可达23.75 MJ/kg.由于生物质的引入，混合物热解产物半焦的表面结构比褐煤单独热解时半焦的表面结构有所改善，半焦孔隙增加，有利于增加半焦的吸附性和反应性.@通过自制的微波热解实验台架，采用微波加热方式，考察微波吸收剂加入比例、微波输出功率及热解时间等实验条件对花生売与神华5#褐煤微波共热解特性的影响.采用SEM和FTIR分析微波热解前后样品的表面形貌及化学结构，利用GC-MS对液体产物进行分析.结果表明，微波加热条件下，增加微波吸收剂加入比例和微波输出功率，共热解程度加深，液体焦油与热解气产率大幅增加，而固体半焦产率则随之下降.@为探索高含水率褐煤原位CO2气化工艺的可行性，建立了移动床管式炉实验装置，以未经干燥的褐煤为原料，考察了温度和CO2流量对产物产率、气体组分、燃气热值等气化过程评价指标的影响.结果表明，褐煤与原位蒸汽、CO2的气化反应同时进行；在CO2流量为1.1 L/min条件下，随着气化温度的升高，气体产率和碳转化率明显提高；CO2流量的增加使其与新生半焦的气化反应加强，产气率和碳转化率提高，燃气总热值也相应增大.结果证明，高含水率褐煤原位CO2气化工艺是褐煤高效、清洁利用的新途径.@根据煤液化残渣的组成特点，选取不同馏分段的煤液化油和煤焦油洗油作为溶剂进行了残渣萃取分离实验研究.结果表明，在常温下，溶剂和残渣质量比为2∶1时，馏程为137 ℃~213 ℃的煤液化油对煤液化残渣的萃取率(干燥基)为22.85%，与煤液化残渣中的正己烷可溶物含量相当；馏程为230 ℃～317 ℃的煤焦油洗油，对煤液化残渣的萃取率为44.63%，与煤液化残渣中的四氢呋喃可溶物含量相当.采用煤液化油和煤焦油洗油对煤液化残渣进行了两级萃取分离，得到了萃取物和萃余物，并分别在煤加氢液化循环溶剂和水煤浆制备等应用方面进行了探索性研究.@对锡林浩特煤通过压滤得到的液化残渣(DLR)的理化性质进行了研究，并考察了上述液化残渣在热解温度为300 ℃～425 ℃范围内液相产物的析出规律.结果表明，DLR中正己烷可溶物(HS)含量高达40.45%，沥青质含量为24.14%，与减压蒸馏得到的液化残渣相比，DLR含有较多的正己烷可溶物和较少的沥青质；DLR中正己烷可溶物主要由1~4环烷基取代芳烃和酚类、蒽醌、酯和咔唑等杂原子化合物组成，脂肪烃含量极少；当热解温度达到400 ℃和425 ℃时，低温热解产物中的正己烷可溶物的收率较DLR中正己烷可溶物的含量分别提高了7.61%和10.10%；在本实验的热解条件下，DLR中的大部分沥青质转化为小分子的正己烷可溶物；低温热解是实现液化残渣高附加值利用可行且经济的方法之一.@采用沉淀-空气氧化法分别制备了以Si含量2%~7%(物质的量比，下同)，Al含量2%~15%改性的FeOOH催化剂.采用BET，XRD，SEM和TG-DTG等表征手段，考察了Si和Al改性催化剂的微观结构和形貌，并在500 mL高压釜内评估了对神东煤的直接液化催化性能.结果表明，随Si量增加，催化剂由α-FeOOH和γ-FeOOH转化为无定型六线水合氧化铁，Si超过5%时发生团聚；Si不影响FeOOH各物种的热分解温度，但会降低失重率.Al能持续改善催化剂织构性质，并取代Fe形成FexAl1-xOOH，使各物种分解向高温偏移.Si和Al改性FeOOH催化剂的煤转化率不变，但能降低氢耗，促进沥青向油转化，提高油收率；Si为5%，Al为10%~15%时催化性能分别达到最优.@将焦炭在惰性气氛保护下，分别经1 100 ℃，1 200 ℃，1 300 ℃，1 450 ℃，1 600 ℃和1 800 ℃六个温度加热处理，考察了表面形貌、微孔结构及灰分含量的变化情况.结果发现，微孔结构及灰分含量的变化与加热温度密切相关，而且孔结构与灰分的析出逸出有较大的关联性.随着加热温度的升高，焦炭灰分不断析出到焦炭表面，在1 300 ℃焦炭表面灰分量最大；其后灰分开始逸出焦炭，灰分含量不断下降，并随着温度的升高而加速；焦炭的微孔体积和比表面积则呈现出先略有下降，然后升高，再大幅升高的特征.@为更准确地描述不同变质程度炼焦煤黏结性特征的差异，将6种炼焦煤中的镜质组进行了富集.研究了不同变质程度炼焦煤的黏结指数(G值)随镜质组含量增加的变化规律.结果表明，G值随镜质组含量的增加呈线性增大，拟合出的线性方程的斜率倒数1/k和Y轴截距y0可作为新的考察镜质组活性质量的指标，运用高斯曲线拟合后能精确的描述炼焦煤镜质组活性质量随镜质组Rmax增加的变化规律.@精制煤焦油经空气氧化法得到一系列不同软化点的氧化沥青，对精制煤焦油和氧化沥青进行1H-NMR、灰分、真密度、元素分析和族组成等分析.结果表明，空气吹扫可促进脱氢缩合反应和交联反应的进行，随着氧化程度的不同，氧化沥青的软化点、组成和结构也不同.精制煤焦油和氧化沥青经焦化反应和煅烧反应后得到煅后焦，对煅后焦的性能和形貌等进行分析，并探究氧化沥青对焦化行为的影响.结果表明，选择合适氧化度的氧化沥青为原料，可生成优质的各向同性焦.@对13种不同变质程度的炼焦煤进行三维扫描荧光光谱测定，分析了荧光特性参数(IF，max，IF，450和IF，470)与黏结性指标(黏结指数G值、吉氏流动度lgα和奥亚膨胀度b值)之间的关系.结果表明，当G<90时，IF，max，IF，450和IF，470随G值的增加变化不大；当G>90时，IF，max，IF，450和IF，470随G值变化线性增加.流动度与荧光特性参数也有同样规律，转折点在lgα=3.0处.表明荧光特性参数能够很好地区分强黏结性炼焦煤.荧光参数随b值增加先增大后减小，在b值为195%时有最大值.@研究了陕北地区黄陵煤、延安车村煤、子长禾草沟煤和神木河畔煤低温干馏时，保温时间、干馏温度和升温速率对四种煤干馏产物产率的影响规律；分析了不同温度下的半焦发热量及半焦形貌.结果表明，升高温度对延安车村煤焦油产率影响最大；禾草沟煤干馏温度达到550 ℃时，半焦低位发热量比原煤提高了23.47%，且半焦结构逐渐紧密，反应性降低.改变升温速率，对车村煤半焦影响最大，由84.29%降低为81.54%.改变保温时间对四种煤低温干馏产物产率影响不大.@为进一步改善生物质与煤低温共热解油的品质，采用自行改装设计的干馏炉，进行了对野生凤眼莲(EC)和低阶煤(LC)低温共热解添加不同质量半焦的实验研究.结果表明，当半焦添加量为30%时，热解油的产率为11.16%，比未添加半焦时11.7%的热解油产率降低了4.62%；选取添加半焦前和添加不等量的半焦作催化剂所产生的热解油进行GC-MS检测，添加30%半焦作催化剂时所得热解油中直链烷烃类含量(27.256 6%)比未添加半焦时(23.593 6%)提高了15.53%；同时，羰基类化合物和苯及其衍生物的含量明显下降，说明半焦的添加明显改善了热解油的品质，实现了一定程度的轻质化.@利用固定床快速热解装置制得锡林浩特褐煤半焦，以水蒸气为活性剂，在不同条件下对半焦活化制得活性焦.对活性焦的苯酚吸附性能进行了测试，同时将活性焦的碘值和亚甲基蓝吸附值与苯酚的吸附量进行了线性拟合，拟合发现碘值可以更好地反映活性焦对苯酚的吸附能力.实验还考察了活化过程中活化温度、活化时间和水蒸气流量对制得活性焦吸附性能的影响.研究表明，活化温度、活化时间和水蒸气流量对活性焦的吸附性能都有重要影响；相比活化温度和活化时间，水蒸气流量可以同等程度地改变活性焦微孔和中孔数量；活化时间80 min，水蒸气流量8 g/h，活化温度800 ℃条件下制得的活性焦对苯酚的吸附性能最大，其吸附量为13.8 mg/g.@利用硝酸活化法对煤基电极材料进行活化改性处理，研究了硝酸浓度对其表面结构与吸附性能的影响规律.采用扫描电子显微镜(SEM)与电子探针、X射线衍射(XRD)、傅立叶红外光谱(FTIR)、Beohm滴定法及N2吸附法等手段对煤基电极材料的吸附性能、表面化学性质和孔径分布等进行了分析表征.研究表明，随着硝酸浓度的增大，改性后的煤基电极材料的碘值先增大后减小，其收率和抗压强度逐渐减小，其表面含氧官能团的总含量逐渐增多，其中羧基含量增加了185.83%，内酯基含量增加了90.00%，酚羟基含量增加了150.00%.当硝酸浓度为40%时，煤基电极材料的收率可达67.64%，其碘值为301.72 mg/g，抗压强度为0.234 MPa，比表面积为256 m2/g，平均孔径为1.978 nm，总孔容积为0.127 cm3/g.@利用ANSYS CFX软件对甲烷化固定床反应器进行了数值模拟，通过CEL语言编写源项的形式将甲烷化反应速率方程添加到模拟过程中，从而获得了反应器内部流场、温度场及组分浓度的分布.经与现场检测的出口温度和组分浓度的对比，证明了模拟结果的准确性.通过改变进气口方式和增加扰流装置获得了均匀的场分布，进而研究了产率与结构之间的关系.@
By means of the fractional extraction method assisted by ultrasonic vibration, four gas coal samples with different deformation degree from Jinyuan coalmine, Shandong province extracted by three solvents, including benzene, carbon disulfide(CS2) and tetrahydrofuran (THF) under the condition of room temperature, and further the group compositions and chemical compositions of coal samples were measured by column chromatography method, ultimate and proximate analysis method. The results show that the extraction rate shows the increasing trend with the increasing of the deformation extent of coal body structure; under the effect of solvent extraction, the content of element C and H increase but that of element S and O decrease. The tendency is mainly caused by the change of the relative content of each element; as the deformation degree of coal body structure increases, the content of total hydrocarbon increases but the content of non-hydrocarbon decreases in the extracted gas coal. It shows the opposite trend of anthracite with different deformation degree. Although the coal body structure is different, the relative content of group composition of different solvent extraction in each coal sample shows a consistency tendency.@The existence forms of the water contained in the two kinds of the lignites from Inner Mongolia, China were investigated by the methods of low temperature differential scanning calorimetry and constant temperature drying. The results show that the lignites contain the water with three different congelation characteristics, free water, bound water and nonfreezable water and the content of three waters is closely related to coal type. It is also found that the drying rate of the free water is much greater than that of the bound water. According to the existence form and congelation characteristics of the water contained in the lignites, it can be inferred that Datang Wujianfang lignite possess a larger ratio of micropore volume to total volume than that of Xilingol lignite and the ratio of micropore volume of the Chinese lignite is larger than that of Australia lignite. Meanwhile, it is verified by the porosity analyzing result that the ratio of micropore volume of Datang Wujianfang lignite is greater than that of Xilingol lignite and the result is consonant with the change in the congelation characteristics of the water contained in the lignite.@In order to investigate the influence of flue gas temperature and particle size, an experiment was carried out to obtain the drying features of lignite particles at different initial gas temperature (600 ℃-900 ℃) and particle size (10 mm-25 mm). It was found that the falling-rate drying period was the main drying period. And the influence of flue gas on the drying was less significant during the high temperature (600 ℃-900 ℃) compared with the low temperature. Specific to the lignite drying process feature of water migration and pore characteristics, this kinetics model that the reducing of water was mainly resulted from evaporation out of coal particles drying was established on the basis of Knudsen diffusion law, and the effective diffusivity coefficient (De) of different flue gas temperature was calculated. At the same time, the activated energy for the moisture diffusion of different particle size(10 mm-25 mm) were calculated by applying Arrhenius type relationship.@Yining coal was crushed to 5 mm-8 mm and heated up to 500 ℃, 600 ℃ and 700 ℃ under N2 atmosphere or CO2 atmosphere, respectively, in a fixed bed reactor through temperature programming. Seven species phenols in tar were identified and quantified by GC-MS. Effect of CO2 on distributive characters of pyrolysis products was investigated by comparing with the yield of products in N2 atmosphere. The results showed that CO2 atmosphere promoted Yining coal tar formation. At 700 ℃, total amount of phenolic compounds under N2 atmosphere was 1.3 times higher than that under N2 atmosphere. In addition, the production of 7 species phenolic compounds decreased with temperature increasing. CO2 atmosphere had effect on the ratio of phenolic species. The proportion of xylenols increased to 7.66% at 700 ℃.@The product distributions of co-pyrolysis of biomass and coal are closely related to the operation conditions. Low-temperature co-pyrolysis of Eichhornia crassipes and low-rank coal blends were undertaken in a special fixed bed reactor by way of orthogonal experiments to explore the optimal way and improve the yields of pyrolysis oil. The results show that the logical progression of factors are as follows: final temperature＞proportion＞particle diameter＞heat preservation time. The maximum yield of pyrolysis oil is 11.70% when the EC ratio is 35%, the final temperature is 550 ℃, the particle diameter of EC is 0.355 mm-0.500 mm and the heat preservation time is 25 min, which increased by 3.36% compared with before. After optimization, the content of benzene reaches 63.17% supported by GC-MS, which rise by 81.99%. Ultimate analysis and heat value analysis indicates that there is little or no variation in n(H)∶n(C) and heat value of pyrolysis oil. The yield of pyrolysis oil has been increased without impairing the quality.@Study on gasification characteristics of typical coal in Guizhou Province with high ash fusion temperature is carried out during plug flow. A corresponding gasification model which is based on the shrinking core model and the dynamic-diffusion model has been built in accordance with the boundary conditions of the experimental gasifier. The result shows that when the temperature increased form 1 200 ℃ to 1 500 ℃, the volume fraction of CO2 decreases by 15%, the volume fraction of CO increases by 16%, the volume fraction of H2 increases by 2%, the carbon conversion increases by 20%; at the same temperature, when the concentration of coal slurry increases by 5%, the volume fraction of CO increases by 3%, the concentration of H2 increases by 0.5%, the carbon conversion decreases by 1.5%. The calculated result is corresponding to the experiment result well. It is suggested that the concentration of coal slurry should be improved as high as possible, so that there will be more effective components of syngas.@Aspen Plus software is used to simulate the production system of syngas in Zhundong. The effect of some important operation parameters such as n(O)∶n(C) and the steam proportion of gasifying agent in coal gasifier on the gasification production has been studied. The differences in economical efficiency between Zhundong coal and bituminous coal are compared under the same gasifying conditions. The effect of sensible heat reclaiming of crude syngas on economical efficiency has been discussed. The result shows that the gasification economical efficiency of Zhundong coal is higher than bituminous coal but the integrated efficiency is opposite. Using sensible heat to heat the gasifying agent is better than quench process when the steam proportion of gasifying agent is high.@A numerical simulation based on volume of fluid to simulate the impact process of gas jet in quench chamber of gasifier. The simulation results were compared with the results of experiments. The evolution process of scour pool has been obtained. Two parameters such as characteristic and characteristic radius were introduced. Research shows that the depth and the radius of scour pool present the trend of accelerating growth and becomes steady finally with the increasing of the velocity of gas jet. With the decreasing of the static submerged depth of downcomer outlet, the increase of depth and radius of scour pool presents relatively flat and these two parameters decrease.@The coal object was obtained from Xigou in Xinjiang, tetralin as hydrogen donor and pulping solvent, the appropriate liquefaction conditions of Xigou coal was determined with orthogonal and single factor experiment. The result showed that the suitable liquefaction conditions was T=435 ℃, p=7 MPa, m(solvent)∶m(coal)=1.75∶1 and t=60 min, under this condition, η(oil)=75.33%. The effect on liquefaction of coal particle size and ultrasonic treatment were further discussed and carried on direct liquefaction experiment of Xigou coal after grinded with Colloid mill. The result showed that the particle size was 9.98 μm of grinded 1 h coal and oil yield was 59.96%; the particle size was 2.60 μm of grinded 2 h coal and oil yield was 60.03%; the particle size was 1.10 μm of grinded 3 h coal and oil yield was 60.02%; the particle size was 0.76 μm of grinded 4 h coal and oil yield was 60.06%. If the grinded coal after ultrasonic treatment were carried on direct liquefaction, coal of grinded 1 h, 2 h, 3 h, 4 h, the oil yield were 80.73%, 81.25%, 84.27% and 82.63% and increased 20.77%, 21.22%, 24.25% and 22.57% than without respectively.@A comparison of two pathways on NO desorption reaction between the nitrogen-containing char edge model in armchair configuration and O2 was explained in this paper based on Mayer bond order theory and transition state theory at the molecular level. To release intermediate HCN firstly in the char combustion process was the first pathway for the formation of NO. Another pathway was to release NO from the reaction with O2 directly. The reaction energy and energy barrier of every step in the two pathways were calculated. The results show that the model’s Mayer bond orders of N2—C4 and C1—C3 are minimum so that it can extract HCN when the two bonds break. The energy barrier for this process to overcome is 451.671 kJ/mol. On the other hand in the process of direct oxidation to produce NO it can be found that the Mayer bond order of C1—N2 is minimum when the model’s Mayer bond order is calculated. NO can be desorpted in the end when the bond is break. The energy barrier from M1 to M2 to overcome is 259.81 kJ/mol. The energy barrier from M2 to NO is 133.1 kJ/mol. Therefore, the second pathway, which is to generate NO directly by the reaction between O2 and the selected char edge model, is relatively easy.@The representative stamping cokes were selected to investigate the reaction behavior of coke and CO2 at different temperature through the continuous thermal weight loss equipment in this paper. The results indicated that the conversion of reaction coke with CO2 was shown a linear rule to reaction time at the isothermal condition and 30% finally weight loss of coke. The reaction dynamic was according with zero level reaction and the apparent activity energy was about 89 kJ/mol-151 kJ/mol. There was a high correlation between pulverized degree of carbons solution loss and the apparent porosity and activity energy of cokes. The coke pulverization was main due to extended and opened pore.@This paper presented the preparation of L-tar (light coal tar) fractions in a low temperature coal tar from Shanbei by vacuum distillation. Seven fractions containing <100 ℃, 100 ℃-170 ℃, 170 ℃-200 ℃, 200 ℃-240 ℃, 240 ℃-270 ℃, 270 ℃-300 ℃ and 300 ℃-340 ℃ were isolated. The composition and distribution of fractions were characterized by gas chromatography-mass spectrometry (GC-MS). The results show that about 95%(mass fraction) of coal tar is obtained at 340 ℃ fraction. Fat hydrocarbon compounds are distributed in each fraction. Anthracene phenanthrene compounds are mainly enriched in 170 ℃-240 ℃ fraction. Low-boiling phenols are concentrated in the fraction of <100 ℃, and the content of phenols is about 45%, in which the contents of phenol and cresol are 7.46% and 13% respectively. High-boiling phenols were mainly distributed in 100 ℃-170 ℃ and 170 ℃-200 ℃ fractions. A few of low-boiling phenols and olefin are found in 270 ℃-300 ℃ and 300 ℃-340 ℃ fractions, may be caused by the thermal decomposition of long-chain alkane and high-boiling phenols at high temperature.@The oxygen uncoupling and absorption properties of CuO oxygen-carrier for chemical-looping with oxygen uncoupling (CLOU) process were investigated using thermogravimetric analysis (TGA), including oxygen uncoupling properties under different oxygen partial condition, different heating rates, different temperatures and oxygen absorption properties of Cu2O at different temperatures. Then the resistance abilities were also tested in TGA. At the latter part of the paper, dyramic parameters of the CuO carrier were put into calculation and analysis applying Achar-Brindley-Sharp-Wendworth equation. According to the research results, it is found that the oxygen uncoupling rate was faster at higher reaction temperatures. And the oxygen uncoupling temperature rises with the increase of oxygen concentration, which is evidenced by the increasing apparent activation energy of CuO. As for Cu2O, oxygen absorption rate seems to be faster when temperature increases. In addition, the oxygen uncoupling and absorption properties of CuO oxygen-carrier decreases with the increasing cycle numbers.@The effect of additives on the combustion characteristic and ash melting temperature of Chongqing Nantong high ash content bituminous coal under O2/CO2, O2/N2 atmosphere was studied by the thermogravimetric-differential analyzer and ash melting point tester. The experimental results show that CaCl2, Ca(OH)2 and CaCO3 can effectively enhance the activity of pulverized coal response surface and reduce the temperature of coal reaction activation energy, the igniting and the burnout. And these additives can improve coal combustibility index C and burnout index Cb as well. The ability of promoting effects is CaCl2＞Ca(OH)2＞CaCO3. CaCl2 can increase the heat quantity of unit pulverized coal, and improve the combustion efficiency of pulverized coal. Additive Ca(OH)2 and CaCO3 can significantly reduce the ash melting temperature, and increase the possibility of coal ash slagging. Therefore, CaCl2 has good comprehensive performance and it is an effective additive for inferior coal combustion.@Adopting Taixi anthracite as raw material, the electrochemical performance as lithium ion secondary battery anode materials was studied in the different processing temperatures, the experimental results show the Taixi anthracite have a high reversible capacity calcined at 1 000 ℃-1 150 ℃ in low potential range of 0 V-0.12 V. The highest capacity of 370 mA·h/g was obtained with the Taixi anthracites calcined at 1 100 ℃. The large reversible capacity due to its hard carbon produced a certain amount after graphitization microporous, the specific surface area of the material was effectively improved, it was advantageous to the electrolyte and the spread of the electron.@The percentage of volatile matter is higher in biomass than coal, the plant ash is in alkaline in carbide, and the content of potassium is higher. The effect of cow dung and straw on the performance of activated carbon was studied in this paper. The results of the study show that the straw and cow durg have important effect on the process of carbonization, the effect of straw is more superior to cow dung in adsorption capacity of carbide, the improvement of adsorption performance was significantly by the treatment of ash of carbide.@A briquette was prepared with Shicaocun coal slime by cold-pressed process, single factor and orthogonal experiments were adopted to study the effect of the ratio of binder and coal blending on the briquette quality. The results show that adding a small amount of binder A or D could make the briquette having good cold strength. The ratio of coal blending and binder D were the main factors of briquette quality, high strength briquette “skeleton” could be cured with binder D and coal particles, but the briquette ash content increased and the calorific value reduced. Blended with raw coal would increase the coal slime briquette calorific value and reduce its ash content, but it also will reduce the briquette strength. Forming with coal slime, the optimum formulation was 5% binder A or 4% binder D. Forming with slime and raw coal, the appropriate ratio of coal blending was 8(slime)∶2(coal) and 7% binder D.@The SO3/DCE system was proved to be a high reactive sulfonation reagent used to sulfonate HA under mild conditions. After optimization of the dosage of sulfonating agent, reaction time and temperature, the optimal conditions of sulfonation process was found to be as following, 1 g HA reacts with 1.28 g SO3 at 25 ℃ for 4 h. The successful substitution of —SO3H had been illustrated by FTIR, ultimate analysis and XPS. Compared with the traditional sulfuric acid method, the sulfonation effect of this new process was better, and the degree of —SO3H substitution increased 2-fold.@A demonstrative experiment of 4 t/h coal-fired boiler is applied to make a burning test that using five kinds of coals, monitored the air pollutants emission in different conditions of coal property, and calculated the air pollutants emission coefficients of different coals. The results showed that under the same conditions, the boiler’s air pollutants emission is different to five kinds of coals. The produce concentration of dust smoke is between 328.86 mg/m3 and 3 634 mg/m3 while its emission concentration is from 30.26 mg/m3 to 72.91 mg/m3, the output of dust is 0.7 kg/h-11.7 kg/h and the emissions is 0.07 kg/h-0.31 kg/h. The formation concentration of SO2 is from 199 mg/m3 to 3 565 mg/m3 with the production of 0.83 kg/h-16.21 kg/h, its emission concentration is between 69 mg/m3 and 1 443 mg/m3 while its emissions is 0.34 kg/h-7.51 kg/h. The formation concentration of NOx is from 173 mg/m3 to 336 mg/m3 with the production of 0.75 kg/h-1.521 kg/h, while its emission concentration is between 159 mg/m3 and 371 mg/m3 with the emissions of 0.67 kg/h-1.93 kg/h. Generated concentration of SO3 at 0.000 4 mg/m3-0.001 5 mg/m3 and its emission concentration is 0.000 15 mg/m3-0.000 93 mg/m3. The experimental results also indicate that the concentrations of dust and SO2 are individually mainly related to ash content of coal and sulfur content of burning coal, but the concentration of NOx isn’t relevant to nitrogen content of coal. In addition, the discharging coefficients of SO2 and NOx are similar with national survey of pollution sources coefficients, while the dust emission coefficient is smaller.@Mineral distribution in 14# Huolinhe coal was studied by means of reflection polarizing microscope and scanning electron microscopy (SEM). Float-sink analysis and maceral quantitative statistical method were used to study the distribution, occurrence and the organic affinity of 6 trace elements in 14# Huolinhe coal. The results show that the mineral content is higher in 14# Huolinhe coal, mainly illite clay minerals; content of trace elements As, Cr and Hg in coal is higher, other three trace elements on the contrary; trace elements As, Cr, Hg, Pb are enriched in minerals conspicuous, mainly for the inorganic state, and the organic affinity is low, the organic affinity degree of trace elements Cd, Se is higher than other 4 trace elements, trace elements Cd and Se basically uniform distribution in organic and mineral components.@The pyrolysis of low rank coal (LRC), enteromorpha(EN) and their mixture were carried out in a special prolysis equipment. The experiments showed that the maximum tar yield of blends was 11.39% with an EN ration of 30%, which increased by 28.61% compared to LRC pyrolysis alone. At this time,the alkanes’ content was 48.66% and the phenolic was 9.12%, which was significantly higher than the content of the corresponding components of the original tar. The n(H)∶n(C) was increased by 9.87%. It indicated the pyrolysis tar became lighter on some degree. The contents of CH4 and H2 in the pyrolysis gas were increased. SEM analysis showed the surface of co-pyrolysis semi-coke became rough and formed obvious center cracks. The calorific value of co-pyrolysis semi-coke was higher than that of semi-coke which was from pyrolysis of LRC.@To study the effect of temperature, drying degree and atmosphere on lignite oxygen-containing functional group and moisture absorption during low-temperature drying, the type and content of oxygen-containing functional group was determined by IR and chemical titration, and moisture absorption characterized by moisture holding capacity. The results showed that the content of carboxyl and phenolic hydroxyl were high in lignite. Phenolic hydroxyl content kept constant, and a small amount of carboxyl decomposed during low-temperature drying at an inert atmosphere. While, when drying at air atmosphere, the content of carboxyl and phenolic hydroxyl increased in consequence of oxidation. With the deepening of drying, MHC of lignite decreased and then increased.@The heat of immersion of Baorixile lignite and its 500 ℃ pyrolysis semi-coke were measured at 25 ℃ in water by μRC micro-calorimeter. The results show that the heat of immersion of semi-coke does not depend on particle size, and the rate of immersed heat release increases with decreasing particle size. Moisture content has substantial influence on the heat of immersion of lignite or semi-coke: no immersed heat release is observed when the moisture content of lignite is more than 16%. When the moisture content of dry coal was less than 16%, the heat of immersion of dry coal increase with decreasing moisture content. The heats of immersion of fresh semi-coke are smaller due to oxidation and moisture adsorption. After 48 h exposure, the heat of immersion of oxidative semi-coke is lowered to 50% of that of fresh semi-coke. The heat of immersion drops to 12% of that of fresh semi-coke after 240 h exposure and remains this level under longer exposure time beyond 240 h. The lignite and semi-coke exhibit significant differences in surface functional groups, which are shown to account for the difference in heat of immersion.@An original creation catalyst adding way was proposed and it can promote the catalytic depolymerization of coal. Based on that, we studied the product distribution and characteristics of catalytic depolymerization of coal. The results show that compared to coal pyrolysis, the catalytic depolymerization of coal can promote tar yield increasing by 26.88%, promote gas calorific value increasing by 30.79% and promote semi-coke surface increasing by 80.65%. It shows that coal catalytic depolymerization has a certain advantages compared to coal pyrolysis.@Beisu coal was extracted with ethanol by Soxhlet extraction. Detailed characterizations of the extract were performed with Fourier transform infrared (FTIR) spectrometer and gas chromatography/mass spectrometer (GC/MS). The results show that 89 organic species were identified from the extract, and they can be classified into 4 groups components: aliphatic hydrocarbons, arenes, organic-oxygen compounds and other species. The arenes are the most abundant compounds whose relative content is 73.88%, and there are 65 arenes detected in the extractable fraction. The extraction mechanism was based on the formation of O—H…O, O—H…N and O—H…π hydrogen bonds interaction between ethanol and coal organic macromolecular network structure.@In order to explore the catalytic activity of UCG waste water and test the feasibility of the underground coal gasification based on waste water, the catalytic gasification of Ulanqab lignite were carried out under different gasification pressure. The results show that the underground coal gasification waste water has beneficial catalytic effect. The carbon conversion increase from 80.19% to 89.82%. The gas yield increases from 4.2 m3/kg to 5.2 m3/kg, increased 23.8%. Following with the elevation of the reaction pressure, the carbon conversion and gas yield were reduced in different degree, the content of H2, CO and CO2 reduced also; but the content of CH4 continued to increase.@The slurry properties, stability and an industrial gasification test of anthracite petroleum coke water slurry (APCWS) were studied. The results showed that the apparent viscosity of APCWS decreased as petroleum coke addition increased, the disparity of APCWS with naphthalene series of polymer additive was superior to that of lignosulfonate, and the stability of APCWS with lignosulfonate additive had better stability. The industrial gasification test results showed that both of the gasification temperature and limestone content of APCWS were lower than that of refined coal water slurry (RCWS), as well as the oxygen coal slurry ratio during the gasification process was lower. APCWS in test had high gasification reactivity, high carbon conversion and lower carbon content with gasification slag, and which had a better effect of filtering due to uniform particle size. The raw material cost of APCWS for one ton synthetic ammonia production lower than that of RCWS and the economic benefit was notable.@Effect of straw ash on the gasification reaction of char by thermal infrared technology was studied. The results show that under the condition of experiment, the time of coal tar maximum gasification reaction rate shorten about 10 min with straw ash added, the time need to complete the gasification reaction shorten nearly 17 min; and the effect of straw ash on char gasification reactivity is closely related to the straw ash content, when adding amount is 30% the effect is best. Infrared spectrum analysis results show that the addition of straw ash have important influence on functional group structure on the surface of coal tar. Effect of straw ash on char gasification reactivity is realized by improving the surface physical and chemical properties of the coal tar.@The coprocessing of Xinjian Heishan coal with medium temperature coal tar was evaluated with the coal liquefaction experiments in 0.5 L stirring autoclave. The effect of different medium temperature coal tar addition on coprocessing of Xinjian Heishan coal was investigated and compared with direct coal liquefaction. The results show that compared with Xinjiang Heishan coal liquefaction, coal tar coprocessing has the characteristics with high gas yield, hydrogen consumption, conversion and oil yield. The proper coal tar addition benefit coal conversion and oil yield. The optimum addition of coal tar is 5%. The coal conversion and oil yield are increased by 1.6% and 1.1% respectively. When the addittion is more than 20%, the oil yield is reduced. The proper coal tar addition can improve the coal conversion and oil yield and process coal tar. The economic efficiency of coal liquefaction plant is increased.@In 50 L autoclave, pressure variation was studied at different reaction condition for coal and FCCS(fluid catalytic cracking slurry) co-processing. The results show that compared with Fe catalyst and without catalyst, reaction system has lowest reaction pressure and the highest pressure fall when using Mo catalyst. In addition, reaction temperature is lowest using Mo catalyst. Fe catalyst is the next. It shows that Mo catalyst is the better catalyst than Fe. The ratio of coal and FCCS doesn’t show obvious effect on reaction pressure. But reaction temperature shows the important effect on reaction pressure. When reaction temperature is at 400 ℃, pressure always decreases with reaction time, but with the increasing of reaction temperature, the pressure firstly decreases and then increases. The reaction time with pressure fall decreases with the increasing of reaction temperature. The pressure is always increases at constant reaction temperature under N2 atmosphere which result from polycondensation reaction.@Using high temperature coal tar and long flame coal as the main raw material, the paper studied the hydrogenation reaction characteristics of coal processing with tar, and evaluated the pyrolysis properties of coal and high temperature coal tar by TG experiment. Using 500 mL mechanical agitator autoclave experiment, the internal pressure changing under different reaction temperature was studied and the reason was analyzed. The results showed that the internal pressure had the same change trend under different reaction temperature and the reaction was mainly divided into rapidhydrogenation reaction, equilibrium cleavage reaction and speed reducing condensation reaction three stages. The experiment studied the effect of hydrogen distribution changing before and after hydrogenation on the hydrogen donor capacity. The results showed that high temperature coal tar structure altered obviously after prehydrogenation as the content of Hα and Hβ improved. The coal tar performed better as hydrogen donor and promoted the hydrocracking reaction so that the oil yield increased 2% through autoclave experiment validation.@In standard 20 L explosion sphere vessels, using chemical ignition, comparative study on combustion and explosion characteristics of coal-based diesel, military diesel -10 and military diesel -35 was performed. Using continued burning performance analyzer, the combustion performance of diesel was tested, and the burning performance at different temperatures was analyzed. The results show that the maximum explosion pressure and maximum temperature have a rising trend with the spray pressure increase. The maximum explosion pressure and maximum temperature of the coal-based diesel are bigger than that of military diesel -10 and military diesel -35. In unconstrained condition, the burning performance of the coal-based diesel is better than that of military diesel -10 and military diesel -35 to some extent. The experiments obtained the combustion and explosion parameters of the three kinds of diesel under different experimental conditions and carried out quantitative evaluated.@To study the waste heat recovery effect of coke oven gas (COG), two kinds of spiral jacketed pipes at different diversion angle are used in 4.3 m high coke oven’s ascension pipes to test the temperature fluctuation and averaged heat transfer effect of COG. It shows that the temperature of COG fluctuate periodically with coking time. The maximum temperature can reach 825 ℃ and the temperature fluctuation of coke oven gas mainly affect the heat transfer capacity, but less affect the averaged heat transfer coefficient. When the volume flow of nitrogen is 190 m3/h and the temperature of N2 input is 30 ℃, the havg (average heat transfer coefficient) of 91# ascension pipe(diversion angle 4°) is 30.23 W/(m2·℃) and the havg of 92# ascension pipe(diversion angle 3°) is 25.2 W/(m2·℃). The heat transfer model was derived as the flow characteristic of COG and structure of experiment device. The prediction of the model matches the experimental data well, and the maximum relative error is controlled within ±20%.@The gasification reaction behaviors of metallurgical coke and semi-coke were investigated by simulating the conditions of blast furnace. The microstructures of semi-coke were tested by SEM and LOM in order to explain the mechanism of reaction. It is shown that the beginning reaction temperature of semi-coke was low. The reaction rate of semi-coke was much higher than metallurgical coke, which increased quickly with the reaction temperature increasing. After alkali-rich, the alkalis could get into the inside of semi-coke, which lead to high reaction rate of semi-coke for long time. The microstructures of coke are compact which contains lots of mosaic textures. However, the microstructures of semi-coke which contains lots of isotropic texture are lamella in shape that resulted in large specific area. Therefore, the semi-coke was easy to react with CO2 at high temperature.@The coke was prepared by cold pressing and dry distillation with the low rank pulverized coal powder as material , and the starch as the binder . The compressive strength,drop strength and strength after soaking compressive of coke and briquette were measured. The scanning electron microscopy(SEM) was adopted to analyze the type of briquette and coke microstructure. The impacts of the types of  starch, gelatinized starch, starch alkalizing on the strength of coke and briquette were analyzed.The results showed that the compressive strength of briquette (3 930 N/ball) was maximum with gelatinized starch as the binder. The high compressive strength (2 410 N/ball) and drop strength (49%) of coke were obtained with alkaline starch as the binder.@In this paper, the desulfurization of Xinyang high-sulfur coking coal was developed with microwave and potassium permanganate. The effects of microwave irradiation power, irradiation time, the dosage of potassium permanganate and nitric acid on the desulfurization efficiency were studied detailedly, and the optimal experimental condition of Xinyang coal desulfurization by uniform design experimentation was reported in detail. The components of organic sulfur in coal was concluded by XPS analysis. So through the analysis of test results, the removal effects of various organic sulfur compounds with microwave and potassium permanganate were compared.@The test of oxidation of SO2 under the effect of fly ash and pure oxide particles were conducted in a wet flue-gas desulfurization system. And different affecting factors including water temperature and oxygen concentration have been considered synthetically. The results indicate that the main elements in fly ash are Si, Al, Fe, and Ca etc.. And the main forms are SiO2, CaO, Fe2O3, Al2O3, mullite and plagioclase. The degree of SO2 oxidation has increased greatly when fly ash was added into the mixed gas. Regardless fly ash the degree of SO2 oxidation increase obviously with the increase of water temperature, but the increasment decrease. When there is no fly ash in the mixed gas, the degree of SO2 oxidation will increase greatly with the increase of oxygen concentration. However, the influences will disappear when the fly ash exist. The comparative results of experimental values and calculated values show that there are synergies between different oxides.@In this paper, the changes of sulfur chemical forms in coal before and after microwave desulfurization combined with different leaching agent were analysed by XPS and FTIR. The results show that the sulphur exists in Xinyu clean coal in the forms of thiophene, R—O—S—S—R′ and inorganic sulfur; the desulfurization rate of microwave combined with HAc+H2O2 was significantly higher than that of NaOH. After microwave desulfurization combined with  HAc+H2O2, the content of thiophene and R—O—S—S—R′ reduced significantly, and diphenyl oxide sulfur and ferric sulfate were generated. After microwave desulfurization combined with NaOH, the content of thiophene and R—O—S—S—R′ reduced, while ferric sulfate and inorganic sulfur were increased. Meanwhile, the mechanism was discussed.@In this paper, burn-off rate and nitrogen oxides release during three kinds of typical bituminous coals combustion with five kinds of metallurgical industrial wastes were studied by using laboratory-scale drop tube furnace combustion system, and the combustion mechanism was discussed. The results showed that the coal types played an important role in the catalytic properties, additive amounts could affect catalytic properties, additive amounts were not the bigger the better. In this work, steel slag was applicable for coal of lower metamorphic degree, desulfurization slag had certain catalytic combustion effects, manganese tailings were applicable for coal of low metamorphic degree and chromium slag was applicable for coal of higher degree of metamorphism. The additives could affect the release of nitrogen oxides, coal types and additives amounts had important influence on denitration effects. Based on the electron microscope scanning of combustion residue, it was found that the appearance of combustion residue with additives were like honeycomb, X-ray diffraction analysis showed that the additives changed the composition of the combustion residues.@Based on the removal capacity of SO2 by [BPy]Br/AC, the effect of different composition, which were water vapor, oxygen, carbon dioxide and the combination of oxygen, carbon dioxide and water vapor, of the simulated flue gas on the removal capacity of SO2 of the esulfurizer was studied at the same loading ratio (0.36∶1) and a fixed carrier mass (4 g) .The results suggestted that, there was a competition reaction at the presence of water vapor, oxygen, carbon dioxide and SO2; water vapor and carbon dioxide had a significant negative effect on the desulfurizer, the effect of oxygen was relatively weak, within the given condition.@The slica sand in the annulus of spouted bed move downwards in the form of moving bed. The heat coefficient between the draft tube surface and the moving bed were measured by the assembled heat probe. The electric power of the assembled heat probe is regulated by voltage regulation. The paper has mainly studied the effects of voltage,flow rates of loose gas and different axial position of bed on heat coefficient. The experiment was carried out at room temperature and atmosphere pressure. The spouted bed with draft tube was made of organic glass. The average heat transfer coefficient between the moving bed and the buried tube surface is 300 W/(m2·K-1)-400 W/(m2·K-1).@Taking Naomaohu coal as research object, raw coal (RC) was divided into three solid products, which were residue (RD), deposit (DP) and soluble (SL), using high temperature and pressure extraction apparatus. The effects of the coal addition, temperature, coal particle size and solvent type on the extraction yields of SL and DP were investigated. Proximate and ultimate analysis, TG-DTG and FTIR analysis were determined. The results showed that when the dosage of solvent was certain, with the amount of coal adding, the yield of DP increased, the yield of SL decreased slightly; temperature increase promoted extraction of SL and DP, and at higher temperature than 375 ℃, the yield of SL increased rapidly because of large pyrolysis reaction; coal particle size had little influence on extraction; tetralin and 1-MN choosed as solvents, the total yield of SL and DP was similar, which was higher than that choosed toluene as solvent. Hydroxyl substance and aliphatic hydrocarbon contents of RC were mainly collected in SL and DP, ash content was mostly collected in RD, the moisture content of RD, DP and SL was far below that of RC.@The structural characteristics of vitrinite and inertinite were studied using FTIR experiments in combination with subsection peak separation method and structural parameters contrast. The results of subsection peak separation: vitrinite and inertinite have something in common in the distribution of hydroxyl type, but different for proportion of every hydroxyl type; vitrinite is characterized by higher CH2, CHx and C=O proportions as well as lower R3CH, C=C and —O— proportions than inertinite; the mode of distribution of aromatic hydrogen of inertinite is more than that of vitrinite, suggesting more relative complicated substitution mode of aromatic in inertinite. The results of structural parameters contrast: inertinite is characterized by higher aromaticity and ring condensation index and condensation ratio, as well as lower parameter of degree of oxidation of organic matter, n(Hal)∶n(Har) and aliphatic ratio than vitrinite. It indicates that there are higher degree of aromatization, shorter relative length of aliphatic chain, more abundance of aliphatic branch chain, and lower degree of oxidation of organic matter in inertinite than in vitrinite.@This article investigated the changes of surface functional groups of coal and their effect on the activity of coal oxidation by pre-oxidation treatment of anthracite, using TPD-MS, TG-DTA and other characterization methods. The results indicated that oxidant treatment can change the surface functional groups of coal in different degrees. Hydrogen peroxide and sodium hypochlorite treatment have little effect on the activity of oxidation reaction, while the nitric acid treated anthracite has a high low-temperature oxidation reaction activity. According to the variation of coal surface groups, we can infer that oxygen-containing groups in anthracite such as carboxyl significantly improve the low-temperature oxidation activity of coal. The alkyl does not have an obvious effect on low-temperature oxidation activity of coal, but has a certain influence on the coal oxidation reaction heat.@For the study of adsorption characteristics of surfactants on the surfaces of oxidized coal and its influence on coal surface wettability, the effects of solution temperature, initial concentration, pH value and adsorption time on the cationic surfactant cetyltrimethyl amonium bromide (CTAB) adsorbing capacity on the oxidized coal surface were investigated. The influence of CTAB adsorption on the oxidized coal surface wettability modification was studied. The obtained results show that enhancement of CTAB solution temperature and initial concentration can increase the adsorbance of CTAB on the oxidized coal surfaces. It was observed that the optimum pH value for the adsorption process of CTAB on coal surfaces was range from pH 5 to pH 7. It was proved that the adsorption capacity of CTAB on coal surfaces increased with a rise in the amount of oxygen containing functional groups for all the studied samples. The adsorption of CTAB on the oxidized coal surfaces leads to a very significant change of the contact angle change with time from the sharp decrease into slight decrease, as well as equilibrium contact angle changed from 0° to 70° and moisture re-absorption decline. These changes are attributed to the wettability alteration from hydrophilicity to hydrophobicity of CTAB adsorption on the coal surfaces.@To explore systematicly the effect of microwave power, pyrolysis time, particle size of coal samples and hydrogen flow rate on the yield and composition of microwave pyrolysis products of low rank coal, it was suggested to carry out the co-pyrolysis experiment of the low rank coal under hydrogen atmosphere through the single factor experiment in the customized microwave oven. The results indicated that the yield of the blue-coke and liquid products were up to 59.8% and 28.2% respectively when the optimal process conditions with the microwave power of 800 W, pyrolysis time of 40 min, coal samples particle size of 5 mm-10 mm and hydrogen flow rate of 0.4 L/min was selected. The content of alkane hydrocarbons in the coal tar obtained by microwave pyrolysis of coal was up to 45.2%. The content of functional groups with phenolic hydroxyl and carbonyl in the blue-coke was higher relatively, and the content of fixed carbon was higher, the content of sulfur and volatile matter were lower.@Sunjiacha (SJC) coal in Northern Shaanxi and polypropylene plastic (PP) were co-pyrolyzed. Pyrolysis productions were analyzed by FTIR, SEM and gas analyzer. Influences of microwave powers on the contents of the production were studied at 800 ℃ (terminal temperature). The results showed that the ash content in the coke decreased gradually, volatile content increased and the other element content was basically constant with the decrease of the microwave power. The content of CO and H2 reduced, the content of CH4 rised and the content of CnHm and CO2 was constant as the microwave power decreased. Alkane, olefin content in the tar decreased and aromatic hydrocarbon content increased with the increase of the microwave power.@The low-temperature pyrolysis of Shangwan coal (particle size 3 mm-6 mm) was studied using TG-FTIR. The results showed that the maximum water loss rate was 1.1%/min-1.2%/min at 130 ℃. Shangwan coal was totally dried from room temperature to 250 ℃ at constant speed of 10 ℃/min. The yield of weight loss increased and severe pyrolysis reaction occurred with the rising of temperature. The release of CO2, H2O, CH4 and light hydrocarbons (LHCs) occurred in the pyrolysis stage. The release yield increased with the increase of pyrolysis temperature. The release of CO existed only in the pyrolysis process of the final temperature of 750 ℃and 850 ℃. The notable release of LHCs appeared before 650 ℃, and the maximum yield of LHCs reached 38.5 mg at 750 ℃, but obviously decreased at 850 ℃ due to the critical thermal polymerization.@Three strains (a bacteria named N6, a fungi named M6 and an actinomycete named G1) were cultivated, and an orthogonal biosolubilization test was done with these strains and five different coals.Then,with the method of Pearson test, the correlation between coal biosolubilization, vitrinite reflectance and coal component was analyzed. The results show that the lower vitrinite reflectance is, the better coal biosolubilization is. The more vitrinite and minerals group coal has, the easier to be dissolved. The smaller content of liptinite and inertinite coal has, the better coal solubility is. Especially, biosolubilization of coal is greater influenced by vitrinite reflectance.@Based on Aspen Plus simulation software，thermodynamics of carbon deposition was investigated for syngas methanation, and the diagnosis diagram of carbon deposition were obtained. The results show that when the mole ratio of H and O in the raw material is less than 5, the higher the temperature is, the more likely the carbon deposit, and when the ratio is greater than 5, the result is on the contrary. For the raw material that varies in proportion of hydrogen, oxygen and carbon, the effect of pressure on the carbon deposition is different. For Topsoe syngas methanation process, because the compositions of the outlet gas in the starting reactor and the last reactor (the first reactor and the fifth reactor) are at the range of carbon deposition in the corresponding temperatures, it’s probable to deposit carbon, but it can be reduced or eliminated by adjusting the ratio of water vapor.@X-ray powder diffractometry, ICP-AES and slag melting property deteminator were used to investigate chemical composition, phase composition, high-temperature phase composition, fusibility and viscosity-temperature characteristics of five kinds of gasification slags, and phase composition evolution and the changes of viscosity-temperature were studied by quenching at high temperature and simulating of FactSage. The results show that the main chemical composition of gasification slags are SiO2, Al2O3, CaO, Fe2O3 and residual carbon. Under high temperature conditions, phases of five different gasification slags vary because of the difference of the chemical composition. As the temperature rises, molten slags are turned into amorphous phase gradually. The measured value and calculated value of slag viscosity are basically consistent, CaO-Al2O3-SiO2 ternary phase diagrams and viscosity-temperature curve drawn by phase diagram of FactSage can be well use to explain the high-temperature phase evolution and viscosity-temperature characteristics of gasification slag.@Lignite char-supported Fe and Fe-Cu sorbents for coke oven gas desulfurization by means of ultrasonic method. The effects of temperature and optimal preparation process on their properties during sulfidation were studied. The physical and chemical properties of the sorbents were analyzed by X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscope (SEM) and Fourier transform infrared (FTIR), respectively. The results of desulfurization experiments show that ultrasonic-assisted irradiation optimum condition of preparing sorbent are 5 h for ultrasonic impregnation time, 1 h for co-precipitation time and ultrasonic water bath temperature is 50 ℃ (the experimental ultrasonic cleaner power is 100 W), respectively. The char supported iron-based sorbents can simultaneously remove the H2S and COS from coke oven gas with high desulfurization efficiency. As the increased temperature, the desulfurization efficiency and sulfur capacity of the sorbents increased obviously, and the highest sulfur capacity can be reached when the temperature is 400 ℃. Moreover, the addition of Cu into iron-based sorbents can obviously improve desulfurization efficiency.@This paper investigated the effect of particle size distribution, slurry stirring and ambient temperature on the properties of coke water slurry, which was prepared by blue-coke fines in Northern Shaanxi. The blue-coke samples were ground with a laboratory size ball mill, and the particles were screened and separated into the following size range: ＞320 mesh(D1), 320 mesh-200 mesh(D2), 200 mesh-120 mesh(D3), 120 mesh-60 mesh(D4). The results indicated that the optimum conditions for the preparation of coke water slurry were as following: the granularity ratio (D1∶D2∶D3∶D4) is 5∶2∶2∶1; the stirring speed is 1 500 r/min; the stirring time is 15 min; the surrounding temperature at a range of 30 ℃ to 40 ℃. Under conditions above the slurry could keep its stability for one month long and show good fluidity, the mass fraction reached 60% and the apparent viscosity could reach 360 mPa·s. When adding fine-grained blue-coke particles, the apparent viscosity improved, fluidity reduced, and the stability reinforced. Excessive agitation had a contrary influence on the pulp, which would lead to poor fluidity and aging slurry. Along with the increase of temperature, apparent viscosity of coke water slurry decreased firstly and then rose up, as a result, got the minimum value(360 mPa·s) in the range of 30 ℃ to 40 ℃.@In this study, three different biomass including pine sawdust, peanut shell and straw combined with the coking coal were carbonized in fixed bed reactor. The mass fraction of biomass was 0%, 3%, 6%, 9% and 12%, respectively. The experimental results indicated that the mass fraction of pine sawdust, peanut shells and straw increased from 0% to 12%, the yield of char reduced from 75.39% to 66.29%, 68.40% and 67.39% respectively. At the same time, the yield of tar increased from 6.88% to 12.98%, 12.16% and 11.42%. As for gas, the yield improved from 13.64% to 15.63%, 15.27% and 16.97%. Moreover, there is a deviation between experimental value and calculated value of the co-carbonization product yield. Hence, it can be concluded that synergetic effect was occurred during the co-carbonization process. When biomass was added into coking coal, the content of CO and CO2 in coke gas was improved, while the H2 and CH4 were decreased.@Soda residue was added to Lüjiatuo coking coal with different blending ratios and cokes were then prepared from these blended coal samples. The thermal properties of these cokes at different reaction temperatures (850 ℃-1 200 ℃) were investigated. The results show that the addition of soda residue enhances coke reactivity and lowers the starting temperature of solution loss reaction of coke. The carbon loss amount at the maximum of surface area of coke after reaction increases with the increase of adding amount of soda residue, which shows that addition of soda residue increases the active points of solution loss reaction of coke; the SEM study shows that addition of  soda residue has little effect on the micro-morphology of coke before reaction. However, soda residue can promote the solution loss of coke surface, control the solution loss of internal coke, which would slow down the degradation of cokes.@A dynamic reactivity of particulate coke analyzer was described. Mathematical models for the solution loss rate and the dynamic reactivity of particulate coke were derived from the CO2 content in the exhaust after reaction. Two kinds of industrial cokes with different reactivity were selected to carry out the solution loss reaction test. The relative standard deviation of the reactivity index of particulate coke (PRI) is less than 0.5%. The relative error of PRI derived from the mathematical model is less than 1%. The chemical reaction control, mixed control and internal diffusion control during the solution loss reaction process were verified through the solution loss rate curves of cokes. And the characteristics of the solution loss reaction of two kinds of industrial cokes were identified using the mathematical model. The analysis of solution loss rate of coke revealed the relationship between the coke reactivity index (CRI) and reactivity index of particle coke (PRI).@Mesocarbon microbeads (MCMB) were prepared via pyrolysis condensation of coal-tar pitch modified with formaldehyde. The microstructure and electrochemical properties were investigated using scanning electron microscope (SEM), X-ray diffraction (XRD) and battery tester. The results indicate that MCMB treated by high temperature can effectively improve the ordering degree of carbon atoms arranged and microcrystalline structure in MCMB. With the increase of heat treatment temperature, reversible capacity, irreversible capacity and first charge capacity of MCMB decreased, coulombic and charge-discharge efficiency increased, and cycle performance enhanced. The charge-discharge capacity of MCMB heat-treated at 1 400 ℃ was the highest, and the cycle performance was the excellentest.@The kaolinite dehydroxylation characteristic of coal gangue was studied by thermogravimetric analysis, the crystal phases of calcination coal gangue was tested by X-ray diffraction, and the kaolinite dehydroxylation kinetics of coal gangue was analyzed by Coats and Redfern method. The results showed that temperature range of kaolinite dehydroxylation in coal gangue was 400 ℃-800 ℃. The weight loss rate of dehydroxylation reached a maximum at 650 ℃. The temperature at which the weight loss occured shifted higher as the heating rate increased. The XRD signal of kaolinite in calcination coal gangue(650 ℃, 1 h) disappeared and phase transformation from kaolinite to metakaolinite completed. Mechanical function ([(1-y)-1/3-1]2) agreed with experimental data. The overall activation energy(EA) was 231.55 kJ/mol and pre-exponential factor(A) was 3×1011 s-1.@The gangue was treated with mechanical activation and microwave-assisted radiation in order to increase the extraction of titanium. The effects of liquid-solid ratio, microwave extraction time and temperature in the initial reaction medium were investigated. In order to optimize procedure for extraction, single factor experiments and the orthogonal design were performed. In condition of the liquid-solid ratio 1.5, microwave radiation power 800 W, microwave extraction time 90 min and dissolution temperature 75 ℃, the extraction of titanium was 79.85%. Meanwhile, X-ray diffraction (XRD), X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) and scanning electron microscopy (SEM) were used to analyze the extraction of samples, the results indicated that the titanium mainly crystallized as Ti(SO4)2 phase in these products.@The activated carbon(AC) used for separating coalmine gases were modified by replenishing CO2 with Fe served as the catalyst. The effects of nFe∶nC, activation temperature, CO2 flow and activation time on the pore structure of AC and the adsorption of CH4 were investigated. The results showed that the best condition was correspondingly: 0.12, 650 ℃, 3.0 L/min and 1.5 h. Pore structures and the specific surface area of AC after the physical modification were enhanced, particularly the mesopores with diameter from 5 nm to 9 nm. Under the condition of 107 kPa and the same separation factor, the saturated CH4 adsorption of modified AC was 16.55% higher than that of the original ones.@Zeolite X/activated carbon composite was prepared from elutrilithe and pitch power, phenolic resin was used as carbon deposition material to adjust the pore structure of the composite, and the effect of carbon deposition numbers on the pore structure and gas adsorption separation ability of the composite material was investigated. The crystalline and pore structure of the samples were characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), adsorption isotherms of N2 and CO2 at 77 K and 273 K. CH4 and N2 uptakes on the composites were determined for pressures up to 101 kPa at 298 K. The results show that the micropore structure of zeolite X/activated carbon composite is regulate finely after carbon deposition. With the increase of the carbon deposition numbers, the micropore surface area and the micropore volume decrease shapely, CH4 and N2 uptakes on the composites decrease, but the separation ratio of CH4/N2 increase. The separation ratio of CH4/N2 reaches 2.7, attribute to the micorpore of 0.45 nm-0.55 nm increase for the forth carbon deposition.@The solid state high resolution 13C CP /MAS NMR technology was employed to analyze five kind different coalifications of ten new coal samples. The resulting spectrums of the structural parameters were studied after peak separation. It revealed the forms of various functional groups in coal and their inherent relationship with different coalification. It also expanded the structural evolution of functional groups. The results showed that the aliphatic and aromatic carbon content made up a complementary relationship, that is, with the degree of coalification deepens, fat carbon ratio decreased, and aromatic carbon ratio increased. With the increasing of the coalification degree, aromatic carbon and oxygen pick collateral aromatic carbon content had a decreasing trend, while carbon content of oxygen by lipids increased. Other structural parameters were not notable, and it was influenced by coalification degree, tectonic stress, and destruction type and so on.@Xigou coal sample from Xinjiang Zhundong field were swelled by cavitated creosote oil as solvent at the condition of natural and microwave. Combined with peakfit software and FTIR spectra, the characteristics of the molecular structure of raw coal sample and the effect of swelling the sample in the natural and microwave on its molecular structures were analyzed with qualitative and semi-quantitative. Results of FTIR analysis were that: 1) three coal samples can be divided into four region which were 3 600 cm-1-3 100 cm-1 hydroxyl group, 3 000 cm-1-2 800 cm-1 aliphatic, 1 800 cm-1-1 000 cm-1 oxygen-containing groups and 900 cm-1-700 cm-1 aromatic bonds; 2) the peeling off order of five kinds of hydrogen groups exsisted in coal molecular structure was: cyclic OH<OH—π<self-associated OH<OH—N<OH—ether O; 3) compared with raw coal sample, in the natural swollen coal sample, the contents of asymmetric aliphatic —CH2 increased 88.76%, —CH decreased 65.42%, oxygen-containing group and aromatic unchanged, one and two adjacent H deformation all deceased nearly 50%, three and four adjacent H deformation increased 150% and 57%, respectively, which indicated that the chain connected with benzene ring break; 4) compared with natural swollen coal sample, in the microwave swollen coal sample, the contents of —CH3 and —CH increased 2.7 and 3.6 times, respectively, oxygen-containing group increased, benzene ring structure changed a little, aromatic decreased, which indicated that microwave radiation could enhance the dissolution of solvent to the aromatic.@In order to investigate the characteristics of microwave pyrolysis of Shenmu coal(SM) under CH4 atmosphere in a fixed bed reactor, the char of SM was added to the raw coal as the microwave absorbent and catalyst CH4 decomposition, the formation and distribution of products in the process of microwave pyrolysis of coal-char mixture(CCM) at various temperatures(450 ℃-700 ℃) under CH4 atmosphere were analyzed and compared with that under N2 atmosphere at the same condition. The results showed that the char yield of CCM under CH4 atmosphere was lower than that under N2 atmosphere; however, microwave pyrolysis of coal under CH4 atmosphere had higher tar and water yield than that under N2 atmosphere. Under CH4 atmosphere, the CCM had higher H2 and CO yield but less CO2 yield compared with N2 atmosphere. In the comprehensive comparison of the generation and distribution of microwave pyrolysis products between the two kinds of atmosphere, it could prove that coal pyrolysis could be hedrogenated by CH4 directly with the help of char’s catalytic effect on CH4 decomposition.@Rapid co-pyrolysis behavior of bituminous coal with two types of biomass, pine sawdust (lignin-rich) and cornstalk (cellulose-rich) was carried out in a fixed bed reactor. The oil and gas products from pyrolysis were subsequently analyzed. The results showed that there was a synergy effect between bituminous coal and two biomass samples during co-pyrolysis process. During co-pyrolysis, the yield of volatile matter increased compared to the calculated values. The most significant change was observed in case of pine sawdust. The concentration of guaiacols in tar from pine sawdust and bituminous coal co-pyrolyssis increased significantly up to 25.89% compared to the calculated values, especially at 400 ℃ and pine sawdust ratio of 80%. The concentration of phenols in co-pyrolysis tars was increased compared to the calculated values, while the concentration of PAH and hydrocarbons was significantly decreased. There seemed to be a shift of oil components towards the smaller molecular weight products.@The pyrolysis experiments were carried out on lignite and biomass. The char characteristics, such as yield, proximate components, calorific value and surface texture were studied under the condition of different pyrolysis temperature and mixture ratio of lignite and biomass. Results showed that these characteristics of char were influenced by the ratio of biomass and pyrolysis temperature in a complicate way during the process of flash pyrolysis, due to the constitute and character of lignite and biomass. But the overall trend was that high char yield and calorific value could be got and ash content in char reduced through controlling suitable pyrolysis temperature and suitable biomass ratio (the ratio less than 50%).  When the biomass blending ratio was 50%, the pyrolysis temperature was 600 ℃, the char yield of pyrolysis products was 52.1%, and the heating value of char was 23.75 MJ/Kg. Compared with single pyrolysis of lignite, surface texture of char were improved by adding biomass, and pore of char increased, which were benefit to increase adsorbability and reactiveness.@In this study, systematic experiments on microwave co-pyrolysis of biomass and Shenhua lignite using a modified domestic microwave oven were carried out. The effects of ratio of microwave absorbant to biomass and coal, microwave output power and pyrolysis time were investigated. Pyrolysis products at different conditions were analyzed using GC-MS, SEM and FTIR before and after pyrolysis. The results showed that lignite and biomass conversion during co-pyrolysis increased with increasing the ratio of microwave absorbant to biomass and coal, microwave power and pyrolysis time. The microwave co-pyrolysis is an effective way of thermo-chemical conversion of biomass and lignite.@In order to obtain the feasibility of in-situ CO2 gasification of high moisture content lignite. A moving bed tubular experimental reactor, which used for the in-situ CO2 gasification of undriedlignite, was built. The effects of temperature and CO2 flow rate on the product yield, gas composition, low heating value of gas and other evaluations for gasification were investigated. Experimental results showed that the gasification of lignite with in-situ steam and CO2 was carried out simultaneously. As the CO2 flow rate was 1.1 L/min, the gas yield and carbon conversion rate heightened significantly with the increase of gasification temperature. The increase of CO2 flow rate enhanced CO2 gasification of the nascent char, which increased the gas yield and carbon conversation rate and the gas total calorific value also increased accordingly. The experimental results proved that high moisture content lignite in-situ CO2 gasification process is an effective methodology for the clean and efficient utilization of lignite.@On the basis of component and property, extraction of liquefaction residue from Shenhua coal with distillation coal liquefaction oil (CLO) and washing oil were investigated. It was found that extract yield of residue was about 22.85% (dry found) with CLO (distillation point at 137 ℃-213 ℃) at 30 ℃ and solvent and residue mass ratio of 2∶1. Meanwhile, extract yield of residue was 44.63% with washing oil (distillation point at 230 ℃-317 ℃). Two step solvent extract separation of residue with CLO and washing oil was investigated, extract and remain were obtained. The application of extract and remain in use of coal direct liquefaction recycle solvent and coal water slurry were also studied exploratory.@The physic-chemical properties of coal direct liquefaction residues (DLR) was studied, and the production behaviors of liquid phase products during the pyrolysis of DLR at 300 ℃-425 ℃ was also investigated. The results showed that the n-hexane soluble (HS) content of DLR was up to 40.45% and the asphaltene content was 24.14%. Compared with the DLR through reduced pressure distillation, the DLR contained more HS and fewer asphaltene. The HS of DLR was mainly composed of 1-4 ring arenes and kinds of heteroatomic compounds like phenol, anthraquinone, ester and carbazole, and the content of aliphatic hydrocarbon was rather low. When the pyrolysis temperatures were 400 ℃ and 425 ℃, the yield of HS was 7.61% and 10.10% higher than that of HS in DLR, which meant that most of the asphaltene transformed into HS with small molecules under the conditions of this paper. It indicates that low temperature pyrolysis is a feasible and economic method to realize the high value-added utilization of DLR.@FeOOH and Si/Al modified FeOOH catalysts were synthesized by a precipitation-oxidation method. The microstructures and morphologies of catalysts were characterized by BET, XRD, SEM, and TG-DTG. The coal liquefaction catalytic performances of the modified catalysts were evaluated in a 500 mL autoclave using Shendong coal. The results showed that the crystalline phases changed from α-FeOOH and γ-FeOOH to amorphous ferrihydrite (6-line) along with the amount of Si increasing. The aggregation was detected when the catalyst was doped with more than 5%Si. The modification by Si didn’t change the decomposition temperatures of FeOOH phases, but could reduce the weight loss in TG tests. Al could substitute with Fe to form Al-substituted FexAl1-xOOH, while increasing the decomposition temperatures of FeOOH phases in TG-DTG tests. The direct coal liquefaction results showed that Si and Al modified catalysts maintained the high coal conversion, reduced the H2 consumption and promoted the asphalt converting to oil thus improved the oil yield. The optimal amount of Si and Al was 5% and 10%-15%, respectively.@The surface mophology, micropore structure and ash content of coke were studied after heat-treatment at 1 100 ℃, 1 200 ℃, 1 300 ℃, 1 450 ℃, 1 600 ℃ and 1 800 ℃. The results showed that the changes of micopore structure and ash content were greatly related to that of treating temperatures. With the increasing of heat-treatment temperature, ashes continuously dissolved to the surface of cokes, which reached the most amount at 1 300 ℃. When the treating temperature exceeded 1 300 ℃, ashes began to escape from coke, which resulted in the decling of ash content. And the ash content decreasing began to accelerate under higher temperature. The volumes and BET surfaces of micropores decreased first, then increased slowly and finally increased fastly to a bigger magnitude.@The vitrinite of 6 kinds of coking coals were enriched in order to describe the relative active quality difference of different ranks coking coals more accurately. The relationship between the caking index (G values) of different degrees of metamorphic coking coals and the vitrinite contents was investigated. The results showed that G values were increased with the increase of the vitrinite contents and it showed a significant linear relationship. The reciprocal of the slope (1/k) and Y intercept (y0) by fitting the linear equation could be used as new indexes to evaluate the activity quality of vitrinite. These indexes fitting by Gauss curve model could describe accurately the change rules of coking coal vitrinite activity quality with the increase of the average maximum reflectance of vitrinite.@A series of air-blown pitches with different softening points were prepared from the refined coal tar. The air-blown pitches and the refined coal tar were analyzed by 1H-NMR, elemental analysis, group composition, ash and true density measurement. The results show that the air blowing promotes the dehydrogenative condensation reaction and the cross-linking reaction. As changing the oxidation level, the softening point, composition and structure of the air-blown pitches changes. Calcined coke can be produced by the pyrolysis of the air-blown pitches. The good quality isotropic coke could be prepared by selection of suitable air-blown pitches as raw materials.@The fluorescence parameters (IF,max, IF,450, IF,470) for 13 kinds of coking coals with different coal ranks were determined using the three-dimensional scanning fluorescence spectroscopy. The relationships between fluorescence parameters and caking properties (caking index G, Gieseler fluidity lgα and Audibert-Arnu dilatometer b) were analyzed. The results show that IF,max, IF,450 and IF,470 have little difference with the increase of G (G<90), and increase linearly with the increase of G (G>90). The relationship of these fluorescence parameters with the fluidity is similar with G, and the turning point is lgα=3.0. Therefore, the fluorescence parameters are new index to evaluate the caking properties for the strongly caking coals. The fluorescence parameters first increase then decrease with the increase of b and the maximum is 195%.@Co-pyrolysis characteristics of four kinds of coals (Huangling coal, Checun coal, Hecaogou coal and Hepan coal) were studied in a dry distillation equipment. The article has systematically investigated influencing factors of four kinds of coals from retention time, carbonization temperature and heating rate. Calorific value of char was tested with temperature varied, and the char shapes at different temperature were observed by SEM scanning. The results showed that the rising temperature had the greatest in fluence on the yield of Checun coal. The low calorific value of Hecaogou coal was increased by 23.4% when temperature reached 550 ℃. At the same time, the structure of the char became closer and its reactivity decreased. Changed heating rate had the greatest influence on the char of Checun coal, which decreased from 84.29% to 81.54%. While the carbonization product of four kinds coals were hardly affected by varying final temperature.@In order to further improve the quality of low-temperature co-pyrolysis oil of biomass and coal, the research of adding different quality of char to low-temperature co-pyrolysis of wild crassipes (EC) and low rank coal (LC) was undertaken in an home-made dry distillation equipment. The results show that the yield of pyrolysis oil is 11.16% with char ratio of 30%, which decreased by 4.62% compared with the basic experiment without char (11.70%). The pyrolysis oil was detected by GC-MS. The results indicate that straight-chain alkanes increased by 15.53% in the pyrolysis oil (27.256 6%) compared with the oil without char (23.593 6%). The content of carbonyl compounds and benzene and its derivatives decreased obviously, which shows that the addition of char improved the quality of the pyrolysis oil significantly, realizing the convertion to a light fraction of low-temperature coal tar to a certain extent.@The phenol adsorption of active coke from lignite was investigated. The cokes from the pyrolysis of lignite under different preparation conditions were activated with the agency of steam in a quartz fixed bed. The phenol adsorption experiments were conducted with cokes from different preparation conditions and after that the iodine value as well as the methylene blue adsorbance was achieved according to the national standards. The results indicated that proper preparation conditions were reasonable for active coke phenol adsorption. The steam flow could enhance the number of micropores and mesopores equally while the other two factors tend to singly change the number of micropores and mesopores. The best condition for the preparation of activated coke was found at temperature of 800 ℃, activation time of 80 min and steam flow of 8 g/h. In that case, the phenol adsorbance could reach 13.8 mg/g.@The influence law of the surface structure and the adsorption performance on the coal-based electrode material by changing the nitric acid concentration were mainly studied, when the coal base electrode material was activated with nitric acid. Characterized the adsorption properties and surface chemistry, pore size distribution of the coal-based electrode material by using scanning electron microscopy(SEM) and electron probe, X-ray diffraction(XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy(FTIR), Beohm titration method and N2 adsorption method. The results showed that iodine value of the modified coal-based electrode material first increases and then decreases, its yield and compressive strength decreases, while the total content of oxygen-containing functional groups in the gradually increasing on its surface with increasing concentrations of nitrate. The carboxyl content increased by 65.01%, and lactone content increased by 47.37%, phenolic hydroxyl content increased by 60.00%. When the nitric acid concentration was 40%, the yield of the coal-based electrode material reached 67.64%, the iodine value was 301.72 mg/g, the compressive strength was 0.234 MPa, specific surface area was 256 m2/g, the average pore size was 1.978 nm and the total pore volume was 0.127 cm3/g.@Methanation fixed bed reactor has been simulated by inserting methanation reaction rate equation into the simulation process with the form of compiling CEL source terms in ANSYS CFX software and the reactor internal flow field, temperature field and the concentration distributions of components also have been obtained. The accuracy of the simulation results has been proved comparing with the outlet permanents such as temperature and the concentration of the components detected on-the-spot. In addition, by changing the air inflow way at the intake and increasing turbulent equipments, the uniform distribution of flow has been achieved, and then the relationship between production rate and structure was studied.@
